prod_name,rating,rating_count,desc,profile,vitolas,Binder,Filler,Flavored,Has Tip,More Details,Origin,Pressed,Profile,Shapes,Sweet,Wrapper,Brand:
1876 Reserve,Rated 4.3 out of 5, Based on 513 Ratings ,"Even gramps would be proud.On a trip to factories in the Dominican Republic some time ago, I was offered a boatload of a really nice, smooth handmade called 1876 Reserve. I’m guessing the manufacturer either drank too much Dominican rum or his abacus was busted. Don’t get me wrong, I certainly ain’t complaining because I think under normal circumstances it would’ve cost me twice as much to buy what I bought (I better remove his name from the mailing list so he doesn’t see this later). What I do know is that this is an incredibly mellow Dominican cigar that’s well worth our ridiculous 2-fer price. In fact, the buy-in here starts under two bucks apiece! Is that too cheap? Maybe it’s me that’s getting soft in the head. Oh well, if you like easy going cigars, you’ll love this deal.",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Sumatra,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,
1876 Reserve Maduro,Rated 4.19 out of 5, Based on 247 Ratings ,"A dark horse from 1876 Reserve.Maestro....drumroll please. And now, without further delay, enter 1876 Reserve Maduro. That's right, the fan-favorite 1876 Reserve now comes draped in a dark, juicy maduro wrapper leaf. The profile is still relatively tame, yet the darker, richer leaf adds a welcomed layer of complexity. And better yet, the price is exactly the same, right around two bucks apiece. I don't like taking credit when it's not due, but I definitely deserve a pat on the back for this one. Well-made Dominican lovelies stuffed with aged Dominican long-fillers and sporting a toothy maduro wrapper, all for pennies on the dollar. You can put this one at the top of the list for best damn value around. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Maduro,
3x3 Tubos by Davidoff,Rated 4.44 out of 5, Based on 16 Ratings ,"3x3 = an Unbridled Winner! There’s tons of cigars that have gone the way of the Dodo bird over the last few years… but perhaps the most sought-after blend post-disappearing act is the famed 3x3. On paper, this cigar shouldn’t work. It’s just a collection of 9 cigars, packaged in three rows of three, that each come in aluminum tubes. But the secret to this one is in the sauce! Handmade by the folks behind the famed Davidoff brand, 3x3 tubos are produced in the Dominican Republic and feature a silky-smooth Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper leaf. Underneath, you’ll find Dominican binder and long-fillers, delivering a toasty, earthy, slightly spicy profile with a smooth finish you’ll certainly love.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto",No,Connecticut,Davidoff
5 Vegas Big Five,Rated 4.22 out of 5, Based on 64 Ratings ,"High five! 5 Vegas's first new release in years is big. No, really. These suckers are HUGE. With each size weighing in at a hefty 60-ring gauge, these flavorful heavyweights are the all-you-can-eat buffet of the cigar world. And they're bulked up to contain that massive amount of flavor you'd expect from a 5 Vegas brand. Featuring a silky-smooth Ecuadorian Habano wrapper, these gems are packed to the gills with Habano tobaccos from Jalapa, Ometepe, Condega, and a pinch of ligeros from Esteli. This medium-bodied behemoth hits the spot with rich notes of earth, cedar, and a smooth finish with just a few touches of soft baking spices. Indeed, 5 Vegas delivers another home run here, ladies and gentleman. But what else would you expect from this industry classic that consistently churns out top-notch sticks at working man prices? ",Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Torpedo",Varies,"Habano, Nicaraguan",5 Vegas
5 Vegas Cask-Strength,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 101 Ratings ,"A luxurious encore presentation.The term ’cask strength’ is a term single-malt scotch and malt whisky enthusiasts are familiar with. Cask strength refers to whiskies that are undiluted, usually creating a powerful bottling strength, high alcohol content, and ample character. That was the inspiration for 5 Vegas Cask-Strength and the blend lives up to the name....and then some.Hailing from Esteli, the cigar-making capital of Nicaragua, 5 Vegas Cask-Strength will captivate you from the get-go. Dressed in a stunning, reddish-hued Corojo wrapper from Nicaragua - one that’s dark and oozing with oils - this 6""x52 Toro is lovingly box-pressed for maximum flavor. Beneath this exquisite wrapper, a bold combination of aged ligeros from Nicaragua, Honduras, and beyond has been expertly blended. Cask-Strength opens with a feisty bouquet loaded with hearty spices. An eventful opening indeed - which prepares the palate for a deep series of oak, cedar, earth, and toast. Spicy throughout with a warm, toasty aroma, expect a full-bodied and full-flavored crescendo as you gradually approach the nub. Marvelous!Cask-Strength is also available in a 6""x60 Firkin size - with loads of extra flavor and body, this cigar is perfect for those who love big-ring value.",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Gordo, Toro",No,Corojo,5 Vegas
5 Vegas Classic,Rated 4.45 out of 5, Based on 751 Ratings ,"A top-seller for nearly two decades!Ain't nothing like a classic, that much is true. Behold, the original, 90-rated 'red label' 5 Vegas Classic....the popular blend that started it all for this beloved brand. It’s hard to argue with two decades of proven quality and even harder to argue with the millions of customers who’ve given 5 Vegas Classic their stamp of approval over the years. In short, this one’s a blue chip that’s somehow remained utterly affordable nearly a quarter century later. Expertly crafted by Nestor Plasencia, 5 Vegas Classic is a savory blend of Cuban-seed long-fillers from Nicaragua and the Dominican Republic paired with a dark, oily Sumatra wrapper. This virtuous combination delivers one of the most consistently delicious, medium-bodied handmades you can get. Rich and creamy notes of deep tobacco flavors mingle with hints of toast, coffee, nuts, and gentle spices on the finish. A ton of complex and satisfying nuances to satisfy even the most fancy-pants critics, eight awesome sizes, one hellaciously affordable cost to you....in short, front row quality at Uecker seat prices. This 90-rated beauty’s got all the right stuff. 5 Vegas Classic received a healthy '90' rating noting: “A solid medium bodied cigar. It is filled with complex earth flavors, and a pleasant coffee ground taste. It is also very smooth."" ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Churchill, Corona, Double Corona, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Sumatra,5 Vegas
5 Vegas Gold,Rated 4.52 out of 5, Based on 1322 Ratings ,"Solid gold.Despite the pomp and circumstance surrounding full-bodied, powerhouse cigars these days, smooth cigars still rule. Without a doubt, the uber-popular 5 Vegas Gold is the perfect example. This gorgeous creature is crafted by industry legend Nestor Plasencia with extensively aged tobaccos, including a beautiful, almost shimmering Ecuador Connecticut wrapper leaf with a rich satiny texture. This charming blend is the big easy. I’ll recite the reasons chapter and verse. Top quality tobaccos? Check. 5 year aged long-fillers? Check. Seamless wrappers? Check. Made in one of Honduras’ top factories? Check. Handsome packaging? Check. Toast the foot and take a draw. You’ll see some spirit up front: a slight nutty taste followed by some zesty peppery notes on the back of the palate. A feisty sucker! But instantly it mellows into a polished smoothness with ample creaminess. It stays utterly consistent from here on out, well-balanced with a sturdy creamy foundation, and booms out thick clouds. What a charmer! Right around medium it is, not super-mellow, but just shy of a middleweight. The fantastic “gold bar” style packaging and an astonishingly reasonable price point round it out. 5 Vegas Gold is a positively delightful blend! ",Mellow-Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Gordo Extra', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Honduran,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Gordo Extra, Presidente, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,5 Vegas
5 Vegas Gold Anniversary,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"A golden anniversary, the 5 Vegas way.By now, you’ve probably had a chance to try the 5 Vegas Gold. If not, let me fill you in. 5 Vegas Gold is a juggernaut. The best-selling, mellow premium quickly became one of the most popular blends in the business, and now it’s time to celebrate that legacy with the irresistible 5 Vegas Gold Anniversary line, and one of the best names in the biz when it comes to anniversary editions.Created in collaboration with Nick Perdomo and made in the same factory that brought us the 10th Anniversary Champagne, the Craft Series, and the best-selling Lot 23, this beautiful handmade cigar comes meticulously wrapped in a carefully grown Connecticut leaf, with nearly invisible seams and a satiny, smooth texture. Underneath, a well-aged blend of Nicaraguan fillers gives the smooth, mellow profile a bit of extra spice and a rich character. This cigar is brimming with complexity and nuance, the price is right, and with a name like Perdomo handling production, the word is going to spread like wildfire. It's obvious you can't go wrong with this one, so grab a box and be part of the celebration!",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",False,Connecticut,5 Vegas
5 Vegas Limitada 2019,Rated 4.8 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"The wait is over.Listen up! It’s that time of year again, and your eyes aren’t deceiving you. CI Nation’s favorite limited edition release is back for its fourteenth year, and it’s never been quite this tasty. I’m of course talking about the 5 Vegas Limitada, and this year the blend is a bit more complex, but just as smooth as it’s always been.This is the first year the Limitada 2019 has been rolled in a 6” x 50 toro size, and it starts with some seriously high quality tobacco: a high-priming blend of Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers, beneath a Cameroon binder and a delicious Nicaragua wrapper. The medium-full bodied flavors of oak, pepper, cedar, and espresso have already captivated the whole office, and has us all wishing it were a mainstay. But alas, nothing this good lasts forever, so you’ll want to act fast and grab your 5 Vegas Limitada 2019 before they’re just a pile of ash and a good memory!",Medium,['Toro'],Cameroon,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,Nicaraguan,5 Vegas
5 Vegas Limitada 2020,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"What time is it?!? You know!For fifteen years now, we here at Cigars International have been bringing all of you in our CI Nation a limited-edition release cigar that knocks the previous year into the wind. Well, I’m happy to say that we have once again we have surpassed our own expectations with the 5 Vegas Limitada 2020!Produced in Estelí Nicaragua, this cigar takes Peruvian and Nicaraguan long-fillers and cloaks them with a dark, oily Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper creating a delicious medium to full-bodied robust flavor profile guaranteed to please the palate. Notes of leather, earth, cedar, and espresso flood the senses throughout the long, slow burn enhancing the experience. The 5 Vegas Limitada 2020 is the perfect cigar to sit back and relax with anytime of the day! It’s that time again…get your limited-edition addition before they are gone!  ",Medium-Full,['Torpedo'],Nicaraguan,"Nicaraguan, Peruvian",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,Torpedo,False,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Maduro",5 Vegas
5 Vegas Series A,Rated 4.52 out of 5, Based on 686 Ratings ,"Magnificent from A to B.Quite frankly, this has got to be one of the best handmades to ever land at CI, one that has nearly caused our cigar-crazed staff to come unhinged. Covered in a juicy Costa Rican maduro wrapper, it is breathtaking - like an ocean of dark chocolatey goodness - and will make you fumble, stumble and bumble for cutter and lighter. The toothy, dark wrapper in turn hugs a 3-country long-filler blend of 4-year-aged tobaccos, and the whole thing rests for 6 additional months after rolling. 5 Vegas Series 'A' delivers a panoply of robust, medium to full-bodied flavors, including subtle spices and coffee-like notes. The flavorful bouquet includes heavy doses of toasty earthiness served up in a rich but ultimately smooth fashion. The aftertaste is long and pleasant, featuring an enjoyable sweetness that relaxes your palate. The presentation is terrific: nestled inside an attractive, dark, Spanish cedar box, each cigar is handsomely dressed in cedar sleeves. Lastly, for just a few bucks per stick I will boldly state that this cigar may very well be the best bargain in the entire industry. If you are a fan of medium to full-bodied cigars, you owe it to yourself to pull the trigger on a box of ‘A’.Note: The 'Apex' and 'Archetype' sizes both feature box-pressed cigars.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Rothschild', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Perfecto, Robusto, Rothschild, Toro, Torpedo",No,Costa Rican,5 Vegas
5 Vegas Triple-A,Rated 4.58 out of 5, Based on 117 Ratings ,"5 Vegas + AJ... A Match Made in HeavenI don't want to overstate it, but this cigar is an opportunity for moral improvement....something to enrich your future, broaden your horizons and elevate your standing among peers. It's widely accepted among cigar experts that your transformation from deviant to upstanding citizen will be complete after nubbing your first 5 Vegas Triple-A. I made that up. But it's true that if you like gloriously full and rich, deep and dense blends, you are gonna find Triple-A shockingly refreshing.This devilish handmade is a marvelous creation of bold, finely aged tobaccos precision blended to generate a uniquely satisfying profile. The heart of this blend is its Cuban-seed Nicaraguan ligeros. Fillers from Esteli were chosen for richness and body, Condega fillers were added to promote a dense, aromatic bouquet, and tobaccos from Jalapa contribute balance and smoothness. Together this fine recipe, when topped off with a thick and oily Pennsylvania Broadleaf maduro wrapper - a coal-black beauty that generates a rich array of searing flavors - delivers a full-flavored experience to the core, with cascading notes of oak, leather, espresso, and toasty spices throughout. A hint of sweetness lingers after each puff, just before the dense, charcoal-like aroma fills the nostrils. Each of the flavors seems to come consecutively, a series of layered sensations that hits your senses without overwhelming the palate at any given point. Man. I just re-read that. Was it over the top? All I know is I am diggin' this cigar - it's become #1 in my rotation among full-bodied 'gars. ",Full,['Robusto'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Robusto,No,Maduro,5 Vegas
601 Blue Label Maduro,Rated 4.69 out of 5, Based on 26 Ratings ,"A box-press beauty from Erik Espinosa.As if 601 Serie wasn't good enough, Erik Espinosa decided to raise the bar with this maduro-wrapped lovely finished in box-pressed format. On the outside, a dark Nicaraguan maduro glistens with oils and boasts a mouthwatering, toothy texture. Inside, a robust blend of aged Cuban-seed long-leaf tobaccos marries to promote a rich, medium to full-bodied profile layered with satisfying flavors.Expect a classic combination of earth and coffee complemented by a touch of spice on the finish. Naturally, quality is top-notch with each slow-burning cigar, so sit back and savor this impressive super-premium. Stack 601 up against any other box-pressed maduro on the market — we're sure you'll be pleasantly surprised.601 Blue Label Maduro received a healthy, 93-point rating, which noted: ""A thick, box-pressed cigar with a triple-seam cap and dark, clean wrapper. The substantial draw layers the palate with a chewy, complex smoke full of dark-roasted espresso bean flavours, touches of almond, and caramel.""",Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Habano Maduro,601 Cigars
601 Green Oscuro,Rated 4.76 out of 5, Based on 29 Ratings ,"Another powerhouse from 601.Just when you thought 601 Serie couldn’t get any stronger, another fantastic, full-bodied brute has made its way onto the scene. Dressed in a dark, leathery Habano Oscuro wrapper from Nicaragua, this bold handmade employs an extensively aged mixture of Cuban-seed Nicaraguan long-fillers to create a real sparkplug of a cigar. Each 601 Green Oscuro is meticulously handmade to deliver a potent array of balanced flavor. Heavy in the hand and oily to the touch, the 601 Green Oscuro coats the palate with a dense bouquet loaded with rich, chocolatey flavors, coffee undertones, peppery nuances, and a long, toasty aftertaste.Great news! 601 Green Oscuro received a well-deserved, 90-point rating, noting: ""Dark and lush with good oils. This is a notably spicy perfecto with a core of leather flavors and a long finish. A medium- to full-bodied cigar.""",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Habano Oscuro,601 Cigars
601 La Bomba,Rated 4.58 out of 5, Based on 53 Ratings ,"Insert bomb joke here.The 'bomb' jokes flow all too easy with this one, and normally I'd be joining the fun. But after seeing countless 'bomb' references strewn everywhere, I'm going to take the higher ground with a more direct approach. Introducing, the 601 La Bomba.​La Bomba hails from the mind and hands of Erik Espinosa, and just to preface something, the blend definitely isn't for the timid. Dressed in a dark, oily Nicaraguan Habano wrapper, and teeming with extra fermented, extra feisty Nicarguan ligero long-fillers, this is one of 601's strongest creations to date. About as subtle as a bull in a china shop, La Bomba has no warm up, no gradual build, it charges at you full-tilt from the very first puff. Underlying traces of red pepper, nuts, cocoa, leather and espresso all make a cameo. Full-bodied and balanced, it's no doubt one of the most intriguing handmades in the 601 portfolio.601 La Bomba has received numerous high ratings, including a 91-rating noting: ""A strong cigar with a bold, earthy combination of raw cocoa bean and salty leather. Despite its power and dense smoke, there are hints of chocolate on the finish.""",Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Robusto",No,Habano,601 Cigars
601 Red Habano,Rated 4.25 out of 5, Based on 16 Ratings ,"Another gem from 601.Handmade in Erik Espinosa's boutique Nicaraguan factory, the 601 Serie Red employs a silky Nicaraguan Habano wrapper. It sorta reminds me of Cuba’s Ramon Allones Specially Selected (right down to the fur and smell). Nestled within this leaf, lies a potent blend of aged Nicaraguan long-fillers. Each 601 Red Label features dominant notes of earth and sweetness lingering on the back of the palate as waves of velvety flavor greets the senses. It's got some power, but the smoothness and balance help to mask its strength. Medium to full-bodied, and extremely well-made, you are in for a treat with the 601 Serie Red.601 Red Label Habano received a 93-rating, noting: ""A pointy torpedo whose nutty, woody core of cedar and walnuts is framed by notes of honeyed tea and a mineral finish.""",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Habano,601 Cigars
601 Snakebite,Rated 4.71 out of 5, Based on 17 Ratings ,"Venomously flavorful 601 cigars can do anything they want. It’s true – just check out some of Erik Espinosa’s past work. From the straight-laced Blue and Red Label, to the wild Wasabi, Espinosa is a font of great ideas, and today, we’re checking out his most recent blend: 601 Snakebite. Dismiss this cigar as a gimmick and you’d be dead wrong, my friend. Snakebite is the newest premium offering from Espinosa’s La Zona factory, and it’s good. Damn good indeed. Up front with 601 Snakebite you’ll find a deep, dark Sumatra wrapper leaf that’s been aged to perfection. Joined by binder and long-filler grown in the rich, volcanic soils of Esteli, Nicaragua, it’s no wonder this stick packs so much flavor. You might be expecting a powerhouse blend here, but it’s actually more of a medium-bodied morsel. Flavors of buttery smooth spice match up with leather and dark espresso to deliver a complex and enjoyable ride. ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Sumatra,601 Cigars
601 Steel,Rated 4.58 out of 5,,"Strong as steelHailing from La Zona – a factory claiming 2015 small operations factory of the year awards – comes another powerhouse blend from the 601 line. In this small factory in Estelí, Nicaragua, Erik Espinosa has been working hard with an excellent team of torcedores to produce boutique cigars that that have been taking 90+ ratings like they’re going out of style. 601 Steel is a Nicaraguan puro that employs a super dark Habano Oscuro wrapper atop Nicaraguan fillers and binder. With each puff you’ll be attacked by a full-body profile. Strong indeed, but easy enough on the palate to enjoy. Off the bat you’ll be barraged with red and black pepper but a few minutes in, the intensity settles and enjoyable notes of coffee, cocoa, cream, nuts, and cedar ensue. If you’re into the full-bodied boutiques, be sure to give this one a taste. ",Full,['Corona Extra'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Corona Extra,No,Habano Oscuro,601 Cigars
601 White Connecticut,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"601 Connecticut - Here to stay601 Cigars are a highly rated boutique cigar brand produced by Erik Espinosa in his La Zona Factory in Esteli, Nicargaua. From the 93-rated Maduro, to the 92-rated Habano, and the 90-rated Oscuro, they’ve created a top-notch blend for most wrapper types out there. Over the years they’ve tried a few different Connecticut blends, but they all seemed to be pulled from the market shortly after their release. Well, we’ve got some good news - 601 White Label Connecticut is back, and this time it’s here to stay.  601 White Connecticut arrives in a light brown Ecuador Connecticut wrapper with a Cuban style triple cap. Underneath this mellow leaf are stronger tobaccos. A Nicaraguan binder and long-fillers from both Esteli and Jalapa, Nicaragua. Overall, it’s a smooth medium-bodied blend that stays interesting from start to finish. There are notes of hay, wood, a slight nuttiness, and a pleasant creaminess. Packaged in boxes of 15, this cigar has all the boutique charm you want, at prices you can afford. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,
A. Flores AFR-75 San Andres Maduro,Rated 4.5 out of 5,,"A blend that fully honors the legacy.AFR-75 was released at the 2013 IPCPR as a tribute to Abe Flores, blender extraordinaire from Pinar del Rio. This is a rich and full-bodied blend topped in a dark, oily San Andres Maduro wrapper. The real treat comes on the inside, however, where a gorgeous blend of rare Nicaraguan Criollo ’98, Connecticut Broadleaf, and Dominican filler leaves impart plenty of flavor. The overall character is rich, creamy, and delightful. With a limited release of just 500 boxes per year, and available in your choice of three sizes, this is one you won’t want to pass up. ",Full,"['Gordo', 'Short Robusto']",,"Connecticut, Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Short Robusto",No,Maduro,
A. Flores Gran Reserva Corojo,Rated 5 out of 5,,"This is a tribute.In the cigar world, tributes are fairly common. Blends are made to commemorate anniversaries, people, legacies, and legends. And this treasure from Pinar del Rio, first released at 2013’s IPCPR, also happens to pay homage to someone pretty darn special. This handmade is meticulously crafted in honor of Abe Flores, the man you probably know as one of the best and brightest blenders in the business. Each A. Flores Gran Reserva Corojo is crafted using a Dominican binder, a bevy of Nicaraguan Habano filler leaves, and topped in an extensively aged 2006 Dominican Corojo wrapper. The result is medium in body, rich, and creamy. Plus with a limited run it has that whole “exclusive and elusive” thing going for it. Have your fill now, or thoroughly regret it later.Note: A. Flores Gran Reserva has recently undergone a packaging update. We currently have a mix of old and new packaging, but the blend is exactly the same.",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Toro, Torpedo",No,Corojo,Pinar del Rio
A. Flores Gran Reserva Desflorado,Rated 4.74 out of 5,,"These flowers were picked just for you. Abe Flores has been studying the mastery of cigar making for years, and it’s evident with the cigar at hand. The third addition to the Gran Reserva line, dubbed Desflorado, makes use of a technique that redirects the nutrients gained from sunlight straight to the tobacco plant's leaf, by cutting off the flower off of the plant. Desflorado literally translates to deflower, and the technique’s result is immediately evident in Desflorado’s medium-bodied full-flavor.Strapped with a pristine Ecuadorian Connecticut seed wrapper and dual binders from Nicaragua and Ecuador, Desflorado is packed with supremely fermented long-fillers from the Dominican Republic and Nicaragua. This 3-country cocktail coats the palate with enjoyable notes of creamy cedar, raisin, and a very subtle spice. Try one for yourself to see just how much the Desflorado can enhance your cigar experience. ​Note: A. Flores Gran Reserva has recently undergone a packaging update. We currently have a mix of old and new packaging, but the blend is exactly the same.",Medium,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']","Habano, Nicaraguan","Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Pinar del Rio
A. Flores Gran Reserva Sun Grown,Rated 4.5 out of 5,,"Blessed by the sunA. Flores Gran Reserve Sun Grown comes from one of the hottest boutique cigar makers in the game - PDR. The medium to full-bodied blend reminds people of the Corojo wrapped version, but with less intensity. What comes through is a smooth blend with notes of cream, hay, earth, and coffee to give you an experience you won't soon forget. This is a complex and enjoyable blend that surely deserves a place on your top shelf, and CI is bringing you boxes for the lowest price anywhere. Note: A. Flores Gran Reserva has recently undergone a packaging update. We currently have a mix of old and new packaging, but the blend is exactly the same.",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Toro",No,"Ecuador Habano, Sun Grown",Pinar del Rio
A. Flores Serie Privada,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"So vintage.Pinar del Rio’s second release of 2012 utilizes some of the oldest tobacco on hand in the factory, which explains what makes it so good. This medium-bodied blend opens perfectly with a natural sweetness, then swiftly follows up with a kick of spice that will drive your palate wild. Serie Privada is available in two Ecuadorian wrappers – Habano or Maduro – so go ahead and take your pick. Created as a tribute to Abe Flores, a master blender responsible for a host of 90+ rated lovelies, this is one stunning handmade that will get your juices flowing.",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Habano, Nicaraguan","Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Pinar del Rio
Abacus Cigars by Cult,Rated 4.67 out of 5,,"This Abacus equates to a fine cigarCult cigars are far from ordinary. You probably guessed that by the name. Starting out as a small boutique production at the TACASA factory in Esteli, Nicaragua, Cult has developed quite the following once word got out of the phenomenal quality put into their cigars. Abacus by Cult adds up to the same great taste and quality you expect. Featuring Nicaraguan fillers covered by a spicy Ecuador Habano wrapper, Abacus by Cult is riveted with flavor of black pepper, espresso, leather, and a hint of baking spice. Once you try a Cult cigar like Abacus, you’ll join the loyal bandwagon of this boutique brand.",Medium,['Torpedo'],,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Torpedo,No,Habano,Cult
ACID 20 by Drew Estate,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 16 Ratings ,"20 years and they just won’t stop.20 years ago, a little cigar called ACID hit the market. If you haven’t heard of it, I’ll fill you in- It’s an absolutely delectable stick imbued with herbs, botanicals, and essential oils, with the recipe and infusion process one of the most closely-guarded secrets in the world of cigars. No one had seen anything like it and no one has been able to successfully copy them to this day, and there are tons of ACID blends to fit any palate. The ACID 20 is the latest addition to this impressive and unique portfolio, and it’s the best ACID released since the omnipresent Kuba Kuba. Featuring a sweet-tipped Mexican San Andres wrapper over an Indonesian binder and Nicaraguan fillers, this 5” x 52 box-pressed beauty is a blend truly deserving of this milestone release. The medium-bodied profile is the perfect expression of all that Drew Estate has learned from slingin’ ACIDs for 20 years. There’s nothing on the market quite like ACID, and no ACID like the 20, so make sure you grab enough to last you until their 40th anniversary release!",Medium,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Indonesian,Nicaraguan,False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Robusto, Toro",Varies,San Andres,Drew Estate Cigars
ACID Cigars by Drew Estate,Rated 4.74 out of 5, Based on 1834 Ratings ,"#1 For a ReasonACID cigars always create excitement. But whether it's your cup of tea or not, you gotta hand it to Drew Estate - the ACID brand is in constant demand. No one can come close to the one-of-a-kind blends, aromas and shapes each ACID cigar provides. The tobaccos are cured in areas called cuarto aromaticos (aroma rooms) for months prior to rolling - these rooms are lined with over 150 different essential herbs, oils and botanicals imbued into the cigars over time. Handmade in Nicaragua with all natural ingredients, each ACID cigar size offers a distinct flavor and aroma. Below is a summary of each blend.ACID by Drew Estate:ACID One: non-aromatic: Cameroon wrapper; torpedoACID 1400cc: robusto in glass tubes: creamy with strong aromatic qualitiesACID Atom: maduro: medium-full bodied, richACID Blondie: small powerhouse cigar; slightly sweetACID Blondie Maduro: small maduro wrapped powerhouse; slightly sweetACID Blondie Belicoso: Blondie's delicious flavor in a larger sizeACID Blondie Red: a rich twist on the classic BlondieACID Blondie Gold: possibly the smoothest Blondie there isACID Blondie Candela: lean, mean, green machine; notes of tea and sugarACID c-notes: small cigarillos; medium-bodied and richACID Cold Infusion: smooth, refreshing tasteACID Deep Dish: rich and velvety with toasty sweetnessACID Earthiness: very full-bodied coronaACID Extra Ordinary Larry: huge size; sweet spice flavorsACID Kuba Deluxe Tubo: toro-sized Kuba Kuba; smooth and mellowACID Kuba Kuba: fat robusto; medium-bodiedACID Kuba Kuba Maduro: a rich twist on an ACID favoriteACID Kuba Kuba Candela: green, sweet and exceedingly uniqueACID Liquid: robusto; fuller, rich tasteACID Nasty: short pyramid shaped maduro; chocolateyACID Roam: creamy taste with a hint of floral aromaACID Toast: mellow and sweet; rich tobacco and black cherry notesACID Wafe: a super-thin, box-pressed blend that's big on flavorG-Fresh: A pack of 5 individually-wrapped ACID cigarsACID Plush: Broadleaf wrapped; rich & hearty, fuller flavorsCroqueta: 2 short San Andres wrapped sticks in a single tube. Plus, check out the Limited Edition ACID blend:ACID Ltd. Def Sea: ultra smooth double torpedo; best seller",,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Double Perfecto', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Petite Corona', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,Varies,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Cigarillos, Corona, Double Perfecto, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Petite Corona, Pyramid, Robusto, Short Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,"Cameroon, Candela, Connecticut, Connecticut Broadleaf, San Andres, Sumatra",Drew Estate Cigars
ACID Cigars by Drew Estate Blondie,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 449 Ratings ,"Blondies have more fun! ACID Cigars are #1 with a bullet when we're talking about the best infused cigars on the market. That's not even a question. And there's one line within the ACID brand that reigns supreme over them all — Blondie. Originally offered in a 4"" x 38 Sumatra wrapped version, Blondie has spawned tons of sequels and spin-offs, each just as delicious as the last. Featured below is the entire Blondie line. Each vitola in this chart-topping brand is handcrafted, and spends time in Drew Estate's aromatic rooms where over 150 essential oils and botanicals slowly influences the flavor of the final blend. The ACID Blondie line includes:ACID Blondie: small powerhouse cigar; slightly sweetACID Blondie Maduro: small maduro wrapped powerhouse; slightly sweetACID Blondie Belicoso: Blondie's delicious flavor in a larger sizeACID Blondie Red: a rich twist on the classic BlondieACID Blondie Gold: possibly the smoothest Blondie there isACID Blondie Candela: lean, mean, green machine; notes of tea and sugar",Mellow-Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Petite Corona']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Petite Corona",Yes,"Cameroon, Connecticut, Sumatra",Drew Estate Cigars
ACID Cigars by Drew Estate Opulence 3,Rated 4.69 out of 5, Based on 87 Ratings ,"​The finest ACID yet.No cigar has built a following quite like ACID by Drew Estate. Through a unique infusion process, Jonathan Drew takes traditional cigars made with superior, aged tobaccos and carefully enhances them with select oils, herbs, and botanicals. This process produces an extremely unique cigar with savory flavor profiles and hypnotizing aromas.ACID Opulence 3 takes things up a notch, thanks to a beautiful, aged San Andres maduro wrapper that’s rich, chewy, and loaded with natural oils. Beneath this leaf, a complex mixture of vintage, Cuban-seed long-fillers from Nicaragua was blended. After a painstaking infusion process, the Opulence 3 delivers a delicious array of rich tobacco flavors with a sweet, aromatic influence. The profile is deep in intriguing flavors and satisfying from start to finish, giving you a truly one-of-a-kind experience from the creative genius of Drew Estate.",Medium,"['Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",Yes,San Andres,Drew Estate Cigars
ACID Kuba Kuba Cigars by Drew Estate,Rated 4.8 out of 5, Based on 778 Ratings ,"The ACID ChampionIf you told me that Kuba Kuba was the best-selling cigar in the world, I wouldn't blink twice. Ask any cigar lover you know, and chances are they've enjoyed an ACID cigar at some point. Chances are even better that it was a Kuba Kuba. Originally offered in just one vitola, the Kuba line has now extended into a brand all by itself, with a variety of wrappers, sizes, and blends in the mix. Listed below are all of the best-selling Kuba Kuba offerings — if you've never tried this grade-A infused cigar before, now's the perfect opportunity. The ACID Kuba Kuba line includes:ACID Kuba Kuba: the original; a fat robusto, medium-bodiedACID Kuba Kuba Maduro: a darker, richer twist on an ACID favoriteACID Kuba Kuba Candela: green, sweet and exceedingly uniqueACID Kuba Deluxe Tubo: toro-sized Kuba Kuba; smooth and mellowACID Kuba Kuba Grande: limited edition gordo size; slow-burning",Mellow-Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Yes,"Cameroon, Candela, Connecticut Broadleaf, Sumatra",Drew Estate Cigars
ACID Ltd. by Drew Estate Def Sea,Rated 3.94 out of 5, Based on 66 Ratings ,"My personal favorite in the ACID cigar line.Drew Estate's ACID cigar line is undeniably the best line of infused cigars on the market. Year after year, these blends are at the top of the charts. And Def Sea is one of the best-sellers in the whole lot. Indeed, I am not alone when I say the Def Sea is my favorite blend from Drew Estate's highly enjoyable ACID family of cigars. In fact, many believe this big perfecto is the tastiest cigar Drew Estate manufacturers. ACID Ltd. Def Sea showcases a well cured Sumatra seed wrapper. This silky and reddish wrapper leaf perfectly blankets a mixture of Nicaraguan long-fillers underneath to create a pleasant medium-bodied experience. Def Sea is infused with an exotic mixture of honey water, jasmine, and double cured sugar cane extract. The result is a masterpiece. Experience a highly unique profile layered with rich tobacco flavors, complemented by sweet, soothing aromas and nuances.",Medium,['Double Perfecto'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,True,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Double Perfecto,Yes,Sumatra,Drew Estate Cigars
AFR-75 San Andres Claro,Rated 4.5 out of 5,,"Reviving the legacyAbe Flores makes tons of fantastic cigars in his Dominican Republic based factory (home of PDR cigars), but perhaps the finest blends to leave the building are the A. Flores AFRs. Only rolled by Abe’s four most-skilled torcedors, and utilizing the finest, hand-selected tobacco leaves, AFR-75 truly represents one of the most respectable blends on the market. Today, we’re looking at the Claro version of this masterpiece. Utilizing a lighter-colored Mexican wrapper leaf, AFR-75 Claro features a Nicaraguan Criollo ’98 binder and long-filler leaves from the Dominican Republic, Nicaragua, and the United States. Delivering a mixture of cream, cedar, and a slightly fruity note, AFR-75 Claro is delicious down to the nub. If you’ve ever enjoyed one of PDR’s cigars, you owe it to yourself to try the AFR-75 Claro ASAP. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro']",Criollo '98,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Short Robusto, Toro",No,San Andres,
Aganorsa Leaf Connecticut,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Not your daddy’s Connecticut! In the past few years, Connecticut cigars have evolved dramatically. Originally known for being mellow and not particularly flavorful cigars, today’s Connecticut blends are full-flavored while retaining their smooth and creamy body. The Aganorsa Leaf Connecticut is an awesome example of the new Connecticut trend: a flavorful and unique cigar that you can enjoy first thing in the morning. Though this cigar is relatively new, the seeds of the blend were planted back in 1998 when Eduardo Fernandez traveled to Nicaragua with a dream to grow the finest tobaccos available. Capturing the essence of Cuban cigars of old, the Aganorsa brand is now responsible for some of the best tobaccos on the planet. This Connecticut booms forward with a sweet and creamy flavor profile, along with hints of cedar and chocolate. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Varied,Varied,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Casa Fernandez
Aganorsa Leaf Signature Selection,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Sign here for maximum flavorThe AGANORSA farm has long been growing and cultivating premium Nicaraguan tobaccos. Indeed, if you’ve been around the block here a few times, you’ve likely enjoyed cigars featuring their tobaccos without even knowing. That’s why we were stoked when Aganorsa announced they’d be creating their own line of premium cigars a few years back, showcasing all their impressive farm has to offer. Today, we welcome one of the rarest and most sought-after Aganorsa cigars to the sunny shores of CI: the Signature Selection. Aged for a total of seven long years, each Aganorsa Leaf Signature Selection offers a rotund and unique cigar experience. That’s thanks to the small amount of medio tempo leaf included in each cigar. To put it in layman’s terms, this tobacco is a cigar nerd’s dream – super flavorful, balanced, and incredibly rare. Additionally, you’ll find a Rosado claro Corojo ’99 wrapper leaf overtop Criollo ’98 and Corojo ’99 long-fillers. Rich, sweet, and spicy, the Aganorsa Leaf Signature Selection is the full package. Good news, the AGANORSA Leaf Signature Selection has earned an awesome 91-point rating, noting; ""An attractive belicoso that smokes evenly, leaving delicate impressions of nuts, bread and cinnamon on the palate, along with salty touches of leather. The finish hints of walnut shell.""",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Corojo, Criollo '98",,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Corojo,Casa Fernandez
Aganorsa Signature Maduro,Rated 4 out of 5,,"It’s been a long time coming.Aganorsa used to be a name that you’d only hear if you were on the production side of premium cigars. Having grown some of the best tobacco in the biz for decades, it was only a short time ago that Eduardo Fernandez made the jump from tobacco supplier to cigar producer. But for the last 20 years, Eduardo has dreamed of growing and producing a naturally dark maduro leaf from his best farms in Nicaragua. That dream come true is what you see adorning the Aganorsa Signature Maduro.Riding on the success of the original Aganorsa Signature, the Signature Maduro replaces the Rosado Corojo wrapper with a Cuban-seed Corojo 99 maduro leaf over Nicaraguan fillers & binder, all harvested from Aganorsa’s fields. The resulting product is excellently constructed and extensively aged, so it’s ready to pump out full-bodied notes of earth, leather, pepper, and cedar the moment it arrives on your doorstep. The original Signature received a 91-point rating and is always flying off the shelves, so grab a box of the maduro-wrapped version while you still have a chance!",Medium-Full,"['Corona Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Nicaraguan,Casa Fernandez
Aging Room Bin No. 1,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"New Aging Room, nuff’ said.The guys who brought you the #1 non-Cuban Cigar of the Year in 2013 have reemerged with a blend that is sure to captivate the masses, Aging Room Bin #1. Hailing from Tabacalera La Palma, famed master blenders Jochi Blanco and Rafael Nodal have collaborated to design an absolute treasure. Its conception lies in superbly aged tobaccos dating back to 1999 and 2001 that have been preserved from the legendary growing region of the Cibao Valley in the Dominican Republic. Agin Room Bin No. 1 contains mature tobaccos, delivering a well-balanced cigar and producing a true medium-bodied profile with a wonderfully unique natural sweetness. The unique Cuban-seed tobaccos are the backbone of this project, acting as the filler and binder. Encapsulated by a pristine Ecuadorian Habano wrapper, Aging Room Bin #1 will be biting at its big brother’s heels in no time. Aging Room Bin No. 1 also received a 91-rating from Cigar Insider noting: ""Strong, spicy first puffs mellow out to show a meaty, leathery smoke with touches of ground peppercorn and a hint of graham cracker. Hearty and bold.""",Medium,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Aging Room Cigars
Aging Room Bin No. 2,Rated 5 out of 5,,"A symphony for your taste buds.When a true connoisseur lights up a stick, they expect more than just one flavor note. A great cigar should have concerto of flavors, rolling across the palate like a marching band. The components need to work together in harmony, balancing bright treble flavors with a rich, deep, bass-like bottom, and a distinct mid-range of providing contrasts and textures that keep things interesting. That’s exactly what you’ll get with this latest release from the minds at Aging Room.The tobacco in this special release was all hand-selected and blended by Rafael Nodal of Plasencia fame, and it all originates from the volcanic soils on the Nicaraguan island of Ometepe. This unusually rich soil produces tobacco like no other, and this puro exhibits the strength and complexity so characteristic of the island. Earthy, spicy notes of leather and wood are waiting to grace your next herf, with a heavy texture and lasting finish. Grab a box today, and see what sweet sweet music Aging Room and Rafael Nodal can make. ",Full,"['Double Robusto', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Double Robusto, Gordo, Robusto",No,Nicaraguan,Aging Room Cigars
Aging Room by Rafael Nodal Connecticut,Rated 4 out of 5,,"The DR Gets a Little SmootherRafael Nodal — the man behind ‘Aging Room’ cigars and the 95-rated Quattro F55 blend. Altadis USA — the brains behind such successful Connecticut cigars as the Montecristo White Vintage and Romeo y Julieta Reserva Real. Today, these two minds have joined forces, putting their collaborative efforts towards producing some of the best cigars money can buy. Case in point? The new Aging Room by Rafael Nodal Connecticut. There’s some cigars you just know you’re going to love from the first glance, and Aging Room Connecticut most certainly fits that bill. If you’re constantly searching for a perfect “Sunday morning” cigar to enjoy with the news and a cup of coffee, look no further. This Dominican handmade gets the job done most handsomely with its flawless Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper leaf delivering a perfect flavor for your first cigar of the day. Creamy and smooth, the Aging Room Connecticut finishes with just the slightest hints of black pepper. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Aging Room Cigars
Aging Room by Rafael Nodal Habano,Rated 4 out of 5,,"Habano – How bout yes? Since the inception of the Boutique Brand portfolio, brand owner Rafael Nodal has been obsessed with consistency and quality. This relentless pursuit of perfection carried through to all of his work, and it showed — not only was every Aging Room cigar guaranteed to give you a near flawless experience, the critics also rated the original Quattro F55 the highest non-Cuban cigar in 2013. Today, Rafael has joined forces with the folks behind Romeo y Julieta and Montecristo, but he’s kept his small-brand, meticulous-attention-to-detail mindset.Besides expanding on his successful “Quattro” line, Nodal has also decided to create a ‘Core’ brand of cigars, like the one you’re gazing at today. Aging Room by Rafael Nodal Habano is a Cuban-esque gem of the highest pedigree. Containing Dominican binder and long-fillers, cloaked by a Dominican Habano wrapper, this puro greets you with a medium-bodied profile of natural sweetness, earth, and a grassy quality.",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Dominican, Habano",Aging Room Cigars
Aging Room by Rafael Nodal Maduro,Rated 4.83 out of 5,,"Rafael Brings the Dark ChocolateRafael Nodal, the man behind the successful ‘Boutique Brands’ line of Aging Room Cigars, is no stranger to Maduro. Just look at the success of the original F55 Maduro, a blend that’s been pleasing palates and impressing the critics for years. So when he decided he wanted to launch a new line of “core” Aging Room offerings, featuring a Maduro blend at the center, we were most certainly excited. And let me assure you — Aging Room by Rafael Nodal Maduro doesn’t disappoint. Cloaked in a milk chocolate brown Nicaraguan Maduro wrapper leaf, this Dominican handmade looks, smells, and tastes mouthwateringly delicious. From the word go, a medium to full-bodied mixture of dark chocolate, leather, and coffee bean flavors meld together in a smooth profile with a warm, toasty finish. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Maduro, San Andres",Aging Room Cigars
Aging Room Pelo de Oro,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Gimme More-o of that Oro!Rafael Nodal’s name is synonymous with ‘unique’. He regularly utilizes some of the finest and most distinct tobaccos for his creations and the results speak for themselves. For the Pelo de Oro, Nodal teamed with AJ Fernandez for a truly fantastic cigar.For this handmade, a specially selected, dark Nicaraguan wrapper was carefully placed around rare Pelo de Oro fillers to create a naturally sweet flavor with a hint of spice and chocolate that will surely satisfy...but only if you can get your hands on them. When two true blend masters like AJ Fernandez and Rafael Nodal create something together, you know it won’t last long, and this small batch release is no exception. Limited quantities are available and once the last one is gone, that’s all she wrote.",Medium,['Robusto'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Robusto,No,Nicaraguan,Aging Room Cigars
Aging Room Pura Cepa,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"A purebred winner!Aging Room cigars entered the game as proven winners. Just check out the F55 Concerto – it wasn’t long ago that this 95-rated cigar was the highest-rated, non-Cuban blend of the year. Since then, the brand has grown and expanded, but has always kept its core idea the same: offering up a bevy of boutique blends that combine consistency with complexity and premium aged tobaccos. Today, we’re looking at Aging Room’s newest release, the Pura Cepa. A 100% Nicaraguan puro, Aging Room Pura Cepa featured an oily Habano wrapper leaf over a perfect blend of Nicaraguan long-fillers from Ometepe, Jalapa, Esteli and Condega. Crafted by Rafael Nodal and produced at the renowned Nestor Plasencia factory in Esteli, Pura Cepa delivers an overtly rich profile that delivers perfect harmony on every puff.Good news! Aging Room Pura Cepa has received a well-deserved 90-point rating, noting: ""This well-made robusto has a lush draw and even burn. Its earthy smoke is sweetened by touches of almonds, cocoa and honeyed wood before a black cherry finish.""",Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Nicaraguan,Aging Room Cigars
Aging Room Quattro Connecticut,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Aging Room Quattro – Four Lines to LoveThe original Aging Room Quattro releases (F55 and F55 Maduro) were, arguably, two of the best blends Rafael Nodal has ever done. I mean, how many cigars can claim they were the highest rated non-Cuban blend in a year? Not many. Today, F55 has been rebranded into the Quattro line, and we’re staring down the barrel of something I’ve personally been waiting a long time for: presenting the smoothest addition to the Quattro name, Aging Room Quattro Connecticut. Handmade in the Dominican Republic and blended as a collaboration between Rafael Nodal and the folks behind such monstrously successful brands as Romeo y Juliet and Montecristo, it’s no wonder Quattro Connecticut is such a stunner. Up to, a smooth Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper melds perfectly into Dominican binder and long-fillers to bring you a lusciously creamy profile featuring notes of roasted nuts and natural sweetness. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Aging Room Cigars
Aging Room Quattro F55 Maduro,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 22 Ratings ,"Rafael Nodal serves up a winnerThe Quattro F55 name carries quite the caliber. For those not familiar, this cigar was the highest rated non-Cuban on the Top 25 Cigars of the Year in 2013. It received the #2 spot, and an astounding 95-rating. And now, Rafael Nodal has crafted a maduro-wrapped version to, perhaps, his most famous cigar ever. This cigar is offered up in slim boxes of 10 that’ll keep you coming back for more. Each cigar is perfectly box-pressed, with the slight oily sheen of the Mexican San Andres wrapper highlighted on every edge. Underneath, Dominican Habano binder and long-fillers add some complexity to this maduro cigar. You’ll find notes of chocolate, earth, black pepper, and oak on every draw — in all, a worthy successor to this famous brand.  ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']","Dominican, Habano",Dominican,False,,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,San Andres,Aging Room Cigars
Aging Room Quattro F59,Rated 4.43 out of 5, Based on 14 Ratings ,"This blend is dressed to impress.Aging Room has come on the cigar scene like a wrecking ball, compiling high ratings and accolades like nobody’s business. Aging Room Quattro F59 is a small-batch handmade from tobacco gurus Raphael Nodal and Jochi Blanco of Tabacalera La Palma. Aging Room cigars are noted for their Cuban-esque appearance and complex flavor profile, so brace yourself, the next Aging Room is upon us.Aging Room Quattro F59 comes expertly box-pressed and features a luscious Habano wrapper sitting atop a Domicano binder and long-fillers. This magnificent example of craftsmanship is medium to full-bodied and features hearty notes of spice, wood, pepper, and leather before the spice takes a backseat and a pleasant creamy essence is introduced. Don’t wait too long to secure yourself a stockpile of these magnificent gems. ​",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']","Dominican, Habano",Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Dominican,Aging Room Cigars
Aging Room Quattro Maduro,Rated 4 out of 5,,"Rafael Nodal serves up a winnerThe Quattro name carries quite the caliber. For those not familiar, this cigar was the highest rated non-Cuban on the Top 25 Cigars of the Year in 2013. It received the #2 spot, and an astounding 95-rating. And now, Rafael Nodal has crafted a maduro-wrapped version to, perhaps, his most famous cigar ever. This cigar is offered up in luxurious boxes of 20 that’ll keep you coming back for more. Each cigar is perfectly box-pressed, with the slight oily sheen of the Mexican San Andres wrapper highlighted on every edge. Underneath, Dominican Habano binder and long-fillers add some complexity to this maduro cigar. You’ll find notes of chocolate, earth, black pepper, and oak on every draw — in all, a worthy successor to this famous brand.  ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']","Dominican, Habano",Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,San Andres,Aging Room Cigars
Aging Room Quattro Nicaragua,Rated 4.83 out of 5, Based on 36 Ratings ,"Quattro Nicaragua – It was Meant to BeFrom their dominance as the highest non-Cuban rated blend according to Cigar Aficionado in 2013 to present day, the Quattro line from Rafael Nodal has been a stunner. So when we heard Nodal was teaming up with the folks behind Romeo y Julieta and Montecristo to create a new, Nicaraguan puro extension to the blend, it was needless to say we were grinning from ear to ear. Gentleman, welcome Aging Room Quattro Nicaragua. For the rooks out there, a “puro” cigar features 100% of its tobacco from the same country. So, this Nicaraguan puro is all Nica – wrapper, binder, and long-fillers. The result is exactly what you’d want: a medium to full-bodied overload of flavor, rife with crisp flavors that are peppery, zesty, and rich. The original Quattro F55 was a damn fine cigar… but this one might just take the cake as Aging Room’s best yet.Great news! The Aging Room Quattro Nicaragua has been honored as the #1 cigar of 2019! The 96-point rating noted; ""Every last leaf in this blend is Nicaraguan and every puff is an overture of flavors that’s at times heavy and rich with notes of dark chocolate and wood, and other times, subtle and understated with hints of fine caramel and toasted almonds.""",Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Nicaraguan,Aging Room Cigars
Aging Room Quattro Original,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Turn it up a notch!What was the highest non-Cuban cigar on the top 25 Best Cigars of the Year in 2013? Which cigar took home the number 2 spot? Oh, just Aging Room Quattro Original, a small-batch boutique handmade from skilled brand owner Rafael Nodal and the folks behind brands like Romeo y Julieta and Montecristo. If you haven’t been introduced to Aging Room cigars yet, it’s high time you made their acquaintance. Made using very limited batches of tobacco leaves too small for regular production, these premium handmades are highly unique, highly in demand, and of course, highly limited in scope. Take the Aging Room Quattro Original. Sounds like a luxury sports vehicle, and perhaps rightfully so, because it performs like a dream. A flawless 2003 Sumatra wrapper leaf encircles a mix of Cuban-seed Dominican fillers and a Dominican binder. To finish, each is box-pressed and packaged perfectly. Aging Room Quattro Original received an esteemed 95-rating and was named #2 Cigar of the Year in 2013 when it was called Quattro F55, with the review noting, ""a balanced, sophisticated cigar that displays rich notes of roasted coffee bean and sweet cedar."" ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Sumatra,Aging Room Cigars
Aging Room Solera Corojo,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Pure to the boneIt’s not often I reach for a Dominican puro. Nothing against them, I just find that the Nicaraguan leaf is more my fancy these days. That is, until I experienced the new Aging Room Solera Corojo – a Dominican puro that reinvigorated Dominican tobacco. The secret? A unique aging process called “solero” that Rafael Nodal and Aging Room borrowed from Spanish winemakers. The specs here are simple — Dominican Corojo wrapper, Dominican Habano binder, and Dominican long-filler leaves. The profile — rewardingly complex. A warm, rich cedar core is greeted by notes of earth, milk chocolate, and coffee. Further into the blend, a sweet and fruity note enters the mix that stays around ‘til the end. It burns well, it tastes great, the price is right: I can’t think of a reason not to try the Aging Room Solera Corojo. ",Medium,"['Figurado', 'Robusto']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Figurado, Robusto",No,Corojo,Aging Room Cigars
Aging Room Solera Maduro,Rated 5 out of 5,,"A Solera in a tuxedoIf you’re scratching your head, thinking you’ve seen this cigar before there’s good news — you’re not going crazy! At least, not in this case. Aging Room Solera has been popping up around the cigar industry for years now, but it’s finally receiving a national release in four different blends, starting with Solera Maduro. A rich, medium to full-bodied cigar from Rafael Nodal and Aging Room, Solera Maduro is a treat for any boutique cigar lover. Handmade in the Dominican Republic, this cigar features Dominican binder and long-fillers, with a surprisingly smooth Mexican San Andres maduro wrapper up top. Beyond that, Solera Maduro gets its name from the aging process — one it shares with Spanish brandy, beer, and wine. The result is a remarkably dense core of flavors with sweetness, dark fruit, and a black pepper spice delivering on every puff. ",Medium-Full,"['Figurado', 'Robusto']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Figurado, Robusto",No,Maduro,Aging Room Cigars
Aging Room Solera Shade,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Throwin' some Shade!Aging Room Solera Shade is the 4th and most recent variation of the solera line. The solera process was developed in Spain and Portugal for aging wine, beer and brandy. It is used to fractionally blend varying ages of a product so that the finished product is a mixture of all ages. Aging room uses this process to combine different vintages of tobacco and obtain a fuller flavor profile. Comprised of Dominican fillers and a silky Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper, this beautiful medium bodied cigar produces a bounty of creamy flavors and offers a smooth and consistent draw. A complex and extravagant premium delivers an unforgettable cigar experience.",Medium,"['Figurado', 'Robusto']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Figurado, Robusto",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Aging Room Cigars
Aging Room Solera Sun Grown,Rated 2.5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Sun Grown, baby! Back in 2004, Rafael Nodal and his wife vacationed in Spain. I promise – the story gets more interesting. While there, Rafael discovered an aging process for wine, beer, and brandy called… you guessed it, the “Solera” process. And being the tobacco man he was, Nodal couldn’t wait to apply this unique aging process to premium cigars. Enter Solera: a full line of premiums from Aging Room, featuring four distinct wrappers and unique flavors across the board. The Aging Room Solera Sun Grown is a medium-bodied iteration of the blend. Once lit, you’ll find notes of maple, slight nuttiness, and a citrusy zest. It’s a bright a lively cigar, one that performs beautifully on its own, but just does as well with a nice glass of rum or bourbon to accompany it. Picking a favorite in this line would be a tough choice: but Sun Grown is certainly in the conversation. ",Medium,"['Figurado', 'Robusto']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Figurado, Robusto",No,Sun Grown,Aging Room Cigars
Agio Mehari's,Rated 4.36 out of 5, Based on 25 Ratings ,"Delicious quick cigars.Since 1976 Agio Mehari's have been creating smooth, aromatic small cigars that deliver time and time again. Now with an expanded portfolio of blends created to suit each unique taste, Mehari's has developed into one of the world's largest cigar brands.Java - The original Mehari's blend, this Java-wrapped beauty features a smooth, rich, timeless flavor that catapulted Mehari's to the big-time.Ecuador - crafted with rich, Ecuadorian wrapper leaf, this blend delivers a smooth, flavorful, and traditional experience. Brasil - a Brazilian Arapiraca wrapper coats this rich, aromatic cigarillo that's layered with notes of nuts, coffee, and pepper.Red Orient (formerly Sweet Orient) -  is draped in a top-grade Java wrapper, the Sweet Orient delivers an inviting array of vanilla, sweetness, tobacco, and a rich aroma. Everything about this cigar is the same, the name has simply changed to Red Orient.",Medium,['Cigarillos'],,,False,No,More Details,Europe,No,,Cigarillos,Varies,"Brazilian, Ecuador Connecticut, Sumatra",Royal Agio Cigars
AJ Fernandez Bellas Artes,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 14 Ratings ,"A Work of ArtLet me tell you all an obvious truth — AJ Fernandez makes some of the best cigars on the market. No, I’m not trying for the gold medal in the Captain Obvious Olympics. Just serving up a small reminder. From New World to Man O’ War, from Enclave to Diesel, each and every AJ blend is a delicious treat that I’d happily indulge in day in and day out. At hand today? The newest addition to AJ’s esteemed and ever-growing portfolio: Bellas Artes. The art, the box, the wrapper — everything here is flawless. Indeed, this stunner is a certified 10 for sure, and I’m not just talking about looks. Smooth and delightful, Bellas Artes reminds me of Cuban cigars of days past. Each draw delivers the perfect amount of cinnamon, cedar, sweet tobacco, citrus, and slight black pepper. No doubt it’s the work of the wrapper. Bellas Artes is adorned in a “Rojita” leaf, a hybrid creation that debuted on this amazing cigar. Possibly AJ’s finest creation to date, you owe it to yourself to secure these posthaste. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Brazilian, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Nicaraguan,AJ Fernandez
AJ Fernandez Bellas Artes Maduro,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"A darker work of artLet me make an obvious statement: AJ Fernandez makes great cigars. From the top-quality tobaccos he grows on his farms to the strict quality controls in his factory, the entire process is well-managed to ensure one thing: great tasting cigars with consistent performance. And while he built his empire making cigars for other brands, he has started to claim many ratings in recent years with cigars that bear his own name. Bellas Artes Maduro is his most recent release and is a follow up to the Havana art inspired Bellas Artes original. Up top it applies a dark and oily Brazilian Mata Fina wrapper over a Mexican San Andres binder and a blend of aged Nicaraguan long-fillers grown on AJ’s farms in Esteli. Just like the original, each size is crafted into a slow burning box-pressed vitola. It’s full-bodied and rich with notes of chocolate, espresso and some sweet spice. These cigars are fantastic if you’re looking for something with some power, and the artwork on the box and bands is just as pleasing. Go for a box, you won’t regret it. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Mexican,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Brazilian, Maduro",AJ Fernandez
AJ Fernandez Enclave,Rated 4.66 out of 5, Based on 64 Ratings ,"A blend this good commands your attentionAJ Fernandez. The man, the myth, the legend. AJ has been smacking the palates of thousands for years with creative, unique, and delicious blends to rival the best in the biz. It comes as no secret that he is at the top of his game, consistently delivering lip-smackers like San Lotano Oval, New World, and Man O’ War. Not enough can be said about this master-blender’s talents, so we will get right into the goods. First, brace yourself. Next, clean the drool from your chin, and finally do yourself a service and check out the newest hit from the Fernandez camp, Enclave.This pretty peach hails from the famed Tabacalera Fernandez factory in Esteli, Nicaragua. Draped in a gorgeous, reddish hued Habano Rosado wrapper leaf, Enclave sports dual bands that set an ambiance of old world Cuba from the get-go. Underneath the sheets rests a refined Cameroon binder sitting firmly atop select Nicaraguan long-fillers, including a choice Piloto Cubano strain grown on AJ’s proprietary farms. Cuban-esque to a T, Enclave boasts delicate notes of cedar, white pepper, cinnamon, and sweet spices that maintain perfect balance right down to the nub. Another secured mainstay in the humi from Sr. Fernandez, clear ample space for this treat!Enclave received a well-deserved ‘92’-rating and Top 25 Cigars of 2016 honors from Cigar Aficionado noting: “Each puff is full of earthy, bready notes punctuated by carob chips and coffee.”​",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Figurado', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Cameroon,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Figurado, Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,AJ Fernandez
AJ Fernandez Enclave Broadleaf,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"Enclave Gets FullerSometimes it’s embarrassing when your old man is great at doing what you do for a living. In the case of AJ and Ismael Fernandez, thank God AJ has the foresight to defer to Pops every once in awhile even when he’s at the top of the game. Even though AJ is the face of the brand, his father played a vital role in the creation of the original Enclave, wisely choosing to focus on flavor over power. The newest edition of the Enclave again focuses on flavor, but adds a touch of spice that has become popular among cigar enthusiasts. Enclave Broadleaf by AJ Fernandez features Nicaraguan filler and for the first time, utilizes a Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper for a spicy finish with notes of earth, cedar, and black pepper. This one is a fantastic cigar worthy of any cigar enthusiast’s collection.Enclave Broadleaf has earned a well-deserved 93-point rating, noting: ""Wrapped in a dark cover leaf the color of bronze, this Churchill has a copious draw that envelops the palate with earthy notes of mineral, salt and leather, accented by sweet bursts of milk chocolate, anise and vanilla bean.""",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Maduro",AJ Fernandez
AJ Fernandez La Gran Llave Connecticut,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"AJ Fernandez… so smooth!He may be loved as the Lord of Ligero, but AJ Fernandez doesn’t just make full-bodied powerhouse blends. No sir. You see, while uber-bold cigars like New World, Man O’ War Ruination, and Diesel Unholy Cocktail are all the rage with the AJ fanboys, his Connecticut blends are actually just as good — particularly in today’s case, with the introduction of La Gran Llave Connecticut. Some of you may be familiar with AJ’s original, Mexican San Andres wrapped La Gran Llave Maduro. For those who are already a fan of the series, you’re going to find a ton more to love with this Connecticut remix. Much like the original Gran Llave, La Gran Llave Connecticut features a satisfyingly creamy core with notes of cedar, a natural barnyard/tobacco note, and slight hints of black pepper. Never overwhelming in body, but practically pouring forth in flavor, Gran Llave Connecticut is an easy recommendation. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Habano,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,AJ Fernandez
AJ Fernandez La Gran Llave Maduro,Rated 4.6 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"A grand spectacle Michael Argenti, founder of the Berger & Argenti brand, has been around the cigar industry for quite some time. Working behind the scenes on numerous brands, Argenti has now teamed up with the talent of AJ Fernandez and his factory in Nicaragua. La Gran Llave is the result, a box pressed maduro that impresses immediately on first glance. And it’s one that needs to hit your wish list immediately. A gritty (believe me, I mean this in a good way!) Mexican San Andres wrapper greets you as you open the door, with Ecuadorian Habano binder and long-filler Nicaraguan leaves. Just the right amount of give on the squeeze should tell you immediately that this stick is going to burn like a champ. Toast the foot and you’ll find dark chocolate, cinnamon, oak, and a satisfying creamy core. La Gran Llave is going to become an instant go-to for cigar enthusiasts everywhere, so jump aboard this hype train before it goes off the rails. Good news! La Gran Llave Maduro has received a well-deserved 90-point rating, noting: ""Nearly perfect in appearance, this belicoso is evenly pressed with a clean wrapper and packed with tobacco. The draw is firm, but still offers floral nutty notes, earth and a peppery finish.""",Medium-Full,"['Corona Extra', 'Double Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Habano,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Corona Extra, Double Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Maduro,AJ Fernandez
AJ Fernandez Last Call,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"You don’t have to go home, but you can’t herf hereIf you ever get the chance to tour a cigar factory, do it in a heartbeat. If you get the chance to tour A.J. Fernandez’s world class operation in Esteli, Nicaragua, I’d recommend going even if it means you have to skip your mother-in-law’s 60th birthday party. What does that have to do with the Last Call? Quite simply, this cigar was handed out at the end of the night, normally in the 4th quarter of whatever game was on at the time, to guests staying at A.J.’s Casa Blanca house during their tour of his facilities.Since its inception as A.J.’s preferred nightcap, we’ve been getting requests to sell this cigar, and finally it has been released to the public. Handmade in Esteli, this Nicaraguan puro might be short, but you’d be crazy to think it doesn’t pack a punch. Booming forward with a core of roasted nut flavors, spice, and a unique creamy, woodsy note. Good news! AJ Fernandez Last Call has received an impressive 93-point rating, noting: ""A short, stout cigar with an uncut foot. It's a toasty, nutty smoke fortified with chewy, earthy notes and a savory, leathery finish.""",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Lonsdale', 'Rothschild', 'Short Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Lonsdale, Rothschild, Short Robusto",No,Ecuador Habano,AJ Fernandez
AJ Fernandez Last Call Maduro,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"It’s Last Call… er, again? Much like the film ‘biz, we’re an industry obsessed with sequels. Unlike summer blockbusters, though, cigar manufacturers have a great track record of improving upon their original releases, crafting fitting tributes and mouthwatering line extensions that oftentimes outshine the first blend. Today, we welcome the Last Call Maduro by A.J. Fernandez to CI, and I’ve gotta say, this follow-up might just be the true masterpiece of the duo. Originally crafted as A.J.’s personal final cigar of the night, Last Call was released nationally just a few years back, and it went gangbusters. Today, we’re staring down the same blend, just donned in a Pennsylvania Broadleaf Maduro wrapper that’s silky-smooth in all the right ways. Lighting this one up, you’ll be greeted with a Molotov cocktail of dark chocolate, espresso, black pepper spice, and a thick, molasses-like sweetness in the background. ",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Lonsdale', 'Rothschild', 'Short Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Lonsdale, Rothschild, Short Robusto",No,Nicaraguan,AJ Fernandez
AJ Fernandez New World,Rated 4.88 out of 5, Based on 194 Ratings ,"When ya comin’ home Dad? I don’t know when, but we’ll get together then.After a 17 year career with the Plasencia family, Ismael Fernandez has come out of retirement to join his son, the very well-known AJ Fernandez. Their first collaboration together, called New World, is a nod to the discovery of tobacco by Christopher Columbus and its introduction to the rest of the world in 1492. Draped in a bold, dark Nicaraguan wrapper and jam-packed with powerful ligeros from Esteli and Condega balanced by the uniqueness of Ometepe tobacco, this rich, medium to full-bodied blend offers an elegant, refined profile. Notes of earth, espresso, and a dense array of sweet and spicy notes characterize its smooth, complex profile. As it burns, the strength and flavors intensify perfectly before an exciting finale. There’s something really special with this one, and knowing how near and dear to AJ this blend is, they planned it that way all along. ​Good news! New World by AJ Fernandez has earned a well-deserved 91-rating, noting: ""The earthy, rustic notes of this dark, box-pressed belicoso become more refined and precise, showing cacao and coffee bean qualities before a finish of nuts and fruit.""",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Varies,"Nicaraguan, Oscuro",AJ Fernandez
AJ Fernandez New World Cameroon,Rated 4.77 out of 5, Based on 13 Ratings ,"A historic first! Ask a cigar lover to name a master blender nowadays, and nine times out of ten their first response is going to be AJ Fernandez. And for great reason. From his monumental successes with boutique lines like Diesel and Man O’ War, to his revitalization of Cuban classics like Ramon Allones, to his own core line of products like New World and Bellas Artes, AJ is truly at the top of the game. Today, we welcome one of the newest additions to his wide portfolio – the New World Cameroon. Can you believe in all his time blending, AJ’s yet to release a cigar with a Cameroon wrapper? Well, no longer. New World Cameroon features a sultry blend of tobaccos with binder and long-filler both supplied from AJ’s farms in Esteli. While the first New World was a full-bodied, all-throttle blend, this one’s a little closer to medium. Lighting it up, you’ll find tons of sweet, spicy notes perfectly balanced by the African leaf. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Double Robusto', 'Gordo', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Double Robusto, Gordo, Short Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Cameroon,AJ Fernandez
AJ Fernandez New World Connecticut,Rated 4.57 out of 5, Based on 47 Ratings ,"Connecticut fans rejoice!After the overwhelming success of Mr. AJ Fernandez’s smash hit New World, it was only a matter of time before a line extension was in the works. The same father/son duo teamed up again, but this time they put their focus on delivering a refined blend of a more mellow character. The result, New World Connecticut, a true gem that enthusiasts new and old can enjoy to the fullest.Unlike the original New World, New World Connecticut is not box-pressed, and the differences don’t stop there. At play is a conglomerate of vintage long-fillers from Brazil and Nicaragua. Encasing the filler tobaccos is a rugged San Andres binder, with a true U.S. grown Connecticut-shade wrapper leaf topping off this symphony of tobacco goodness. Mellow to medium-bodied, subtle notes of cream, slight spice, and cedar grow in intensity the further into the journey you get. A pure delight to enjoy, don’t be the last to grab some of these treats.​",Mellow-Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Mexican,"Brazilian, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,AJ Fernandez
AJ Fernandez New World Puro Especial,Rated 4.73 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"A new world of New World? That's world news!New World Puro Especial is the newest addition to the popular New World line by AJ Fernandez. The blend was developed by AJ Fernandez and and his father, Ismael, over the course of several years using tobaccos exclusively from Fernandez-owned farms in Nicaragua, all of which have been aged three to five years. The wrapper, binder, and filler all come from different farms in order to provide different aspects to the cigar in terms or flavor, aroma and mineral qualities. While AJ is typically known for his fuller-bodied offerings, New World Puro Especial weighs in at more of a medium body. And it's a real winner of a blend. In fact, this cigar saw limited release before but AJ liked the blend so much he decided to go national with it. You can expect this gem to be medium-bodied and perfectly balanced, with notes of nuts and a sweet finish. Order a box today and be one of the first to taste this tasty Nicaraguan puro.New World Puro Especial has received a 93-rating, and earned a spot in the Top 25 Cigars of 2017.",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Habano, Nicaraguan",Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Habano, Nicaraguan",AJ Fernandez
AJ Fernandez Ramon Allones,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"A stunning tributeA.J. Fernandez can do no wrong. From his boutique brands like Diesel and Man O’ War, to his flagship, larger scale releases like San Lotano and Last Call, all the way down to his reinterpretation of classic Cuban brands like Romeo and Hoyo, this man can, quite simply, do it all. And he does it all masterfully. Today, we welcome the newest A.J. tribute to a classic Cuban name, Ramon Allones by A.J. Fernandez. And, quite simply, it might be his best work to date. You see, this is a true passion project for A.J. Ramon Allones was his father’s favorite cigar brand back in Cuba, and the cigar has a long, storied history in our industry (did you know Ramon Allones was the first handmade cigar to feature a band?). To pay true homage to this historical landmark in tobacco, A.J. spared no expense, producing one of the most beautiful packages I’ve ever seen. Employing an incredibly rare medio tempo wrapper leaf, Ramon Allones by A.J. is medium to full-bodied and signs with a beautiful harmony of cedar, spice, chocolate, earth, and slight hints of black pepper.Great news, Ramon Allones just earned a stunning 92-rating and was honored as one of the Top 25 Cigars of 2018. Here's what the experts had to say: ""Each puff of this toothy cigar leaves big notes of semi-sweet chocolate, leather and cherry on the palate before a sweet finish that shows more of the same.""",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Corojo,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Habano Oscuro,AJ Fernandez
AJ Fernandez Rosa de Guadalupe,Rated 4.33 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"The Rose of MexicoAJ Fernandez makes a damn fine cigar. That’s just common sense now a days. From his core lines like New World, San Lotano and Enclave, to the many boutique brands that are made at his Esteli factory, he makes something that anyone can get behind. Rosa de Guadalupe is a new 2019 release that is well deserving of a spot in your humidor. Offered up in three expertly crafted sizes, it features a beautiful and oily Mexican San Andres wrapper leaf. The rest of the blend is entirely Nicaraguan tobaccos grown on Fernandez's farms. AJ is known to highlight the powerful Nicaraguan tobaccos in his blends, normally leaning on the full-bodied side, but Rosa de Guadalupe burns smooth offering a medium-bodied and nicely balanced experience throughout. It provides notes of earth, leather, dry spice, and bit of cedar. You can’t go wrong here, Rosa de Guadalupe is yet another tally in the win column for Tabacalera AJ Fernandez. ",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,San Andres,AJ Fernandez
AJ Fernandez San Lotano Oval,Rated 4.71 out of 5, Based on 42 Ratings ,"​San Lotano comes full circle....err....full Oval.Before the Oval, San Lotano was praised by all who crossed its path. But after Oval there’s nothing left to say - this exciting new handmade says all that needs to be said.Introducing the San Lotano Oval, a completely unique blend and shape that’s all its own. Featuring a distinctively-shaped press finish that looks like, you guessed it, an oval, and a blend of tobaccos that’s equally as unique, San Lotano Oval is truly a special cigar. Sporting a toothy and scrumptious Habano 2000 wrapper and brimming with rich Nicaraguan and Honduran long fillers, San Lotano Oval is primed for flavor. Accenting the blend further is a secret filler, known only to the people at Tabacalera Fernandez. Despite its untraditional appearance, this shape perfectly complements this masterfully blended handmade, creating an amazingly smooth and balanced experience. Expect notes of leather, nuts, and spice backed by a long, rich finish. Medium to full-bodied, the Oval burns and draws spot on. Unlike anything else, and that’s a good thing.San Lotano Oval received five separate 91-point ratings, one of which earned it a spot in the Top 25 Cigars of the Year. But this one in particular says it all perfectly: ""Crafted with a very round head and ovular edges, the flat corona is rich with steady notes of leather, wood and dried cherry. The draw is even and lush throughout""",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Gordo, Pyramid, Robusto, Toro",No,"Habana 2000, Habano",AJ Fernandez
AJ Fernandez San Lotano Oval Connecticut,Rated 4.47 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"​Welcome the third member of the Oval family.Hailing from master blender AJ Fernandez, it would be safe to say that expectations for San Lotano Oval Connecticut have been sky high. Especially when you factor in the success of the original Oval (recipient of five 91-ratings along with being ranked as one of the Top 25 Cigars of the Year) and Oval Maduro. The Connecticut definitely had some big shoes to fill. But when you're AJ Fernandez, exceeding expectations is your forte.For those of you unfamiliar with the concept, the Oval shape is best described as being a rounded box-press. This rare shape not only looks great, but it also makes for a cool, slow-burning experience loaded with flavor. This go round, a core of Nicaraguan, Honduran, and proprietary long-fillers, join forces with a silky Connecticut wrapper. Expect a mellow to medium-bodied profile to deliver nutty, leathery, and cedary nuances growing more intense with each billowy puff. Believe the hype and give this handmade a try. You’ll be happy you did. Real happy.",Mellow-Medium,"['Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,"Honduran, Nicaraguan, Varied",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Corona, Double Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,AJ Fernandez
AJ Fernandez San Lotano Oval Maduro,Rated 4.73 out of 5, Based on 30 Ratings ,"San Lotano Oval gets a tan.San Lotano Oval has taken the cigar industry by storm. The blend has been sizzling hot: receiving multiple 90+ ratings, named #2 cigar of the year in Cigar Journal, and has been engulfed by staggering amounts of buzz. If you have yet to try one, trust me when I say the hype is real, and the cigars deliver as advertised. Now enter the next chapter in the Oval saga, the Oval Maduro. Picking up right where Oval left off, the Oval Maduro uses the same exquisite fillers, and binder, but now comes draped in an enticing Connecticut Broadleaf maduro. This dark leaf shimmers with oily goodness, and conceals the Oval’s balanced and refined core of Nicaraguan and Honduran long-fillers. This time around, expect an uber-smooth and balanced profile, containing more predominant notes of coffee bean, leather, cocoa and pepper backed by a long and hearty finish. This sequel my friends is a rarity, and is as good, if not better than the original.  ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Habano Maduro",AJ Fernandez
AJ Fernandez San Lotano Requiem,Rated 4.93 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"​Full bodied fans rejoice - San Lotano Requiem is here.Few cigar makers are as in demand as AJ ’Abdel’ Fernandez these days. Looking at his impressive portfolio of top-notch blends, it’s easy to understand why. Take for instance his already impressive portfolio boasting the likes of Man O’ War, Diesel, Morro Castle, and 5 Vegas Triple-A - all winners, no doubt. AJ’s highly successful blends are indicative of his ferocious passion and deep seeded desire for perfection. But now, AJ has taken his craft to another level with the first major release bearing his name, San Lotano by AJ Fernandez. A truly complete ensemble, the San Lotano collection offers something that everyone can rejoice in. Ranging from mellow to full, the new San Lotano line is sure to satisfy even the most discerning of palates. The San Lotano Requiem is the epitome of what a full-bodied cigar should be. Strong and flavorful, yet balanced and smooth, San Lotano Requiem is extraordinary. Blended using an exquisite medley of rich Nicaraguan, Dominican, and Honduran tobaccos, the Requiem is anything but boring. Accompanying the complex blend is an extremely rare Brazilian-grown Habano wrapper, available to merely two manufacturers in the world. Together, the unique wrapper and fillers strike a resounding accord of flavor, body, and complexity. Once lit, the Requiem graces your palate with nuances of wood, leather, and spice. Expect an even burn accompanied by an easy draw and long finish. Easily one of AJ’s best blends yet!",Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,AJ Fernandez
AJ Fernandez San Lotano Requiem Connecticut,Rated 4.69 out of 5, Based on 13 Ratings ,"San Lotano Requiem Connecticut: a welcomed addition to AJ’s repertoire.Few cigar makers are as in demand as AJ ’Abdel’ Fernandez these days. Looking at his impressive portfolio of top-notch blends, it’s easy to understand why. Take for instance his already impressive portfolio boasting the likes of Man O’ War, Diesel, Morro Castle, and 5 Vegas Triple-A - all winners, no doubt. AJ’s highly successful blends are indicative of his ferocious passion and deep seeded desire for perfection. But now, AJ has taken his craft to another level with the first major release bearing his name, San Lotano Requiem by AJ Fernandez. A truly complete ensemble, the San Lotano Requiem collection offers something that everyone can rejoice in. Ranging from mellow to full, the new San Lotano line is sure to satisfy even the most discerning of palates. Known mainly for medium to full-bodied gems, AJ Fernandez delivers a refreshing change with his new San Lotano Requiem Connecticut. Mellow-medium bodied, but brimming with ample flavor and complexity, this San Lotano Requiem is elegant, refined, and highly enjoyable. Bursting from within lie premium, well-aged Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers, all hugged by a rich Honduran binder. To finish the ensemble, San Lotano Requiem Connecticut is draped in a velvety Ecuadorian Connecticut shade wrapper. The end result is a flavorful and smooth experience that you'll enjoy any time of day. Expect notes of cream, nuts, wood, and buttery-smooth finish. Have one for breakfast, lunch, or dinner. Or, take my advice and burn  'em all day long - you won’t be disappointed.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,AJ Fernandez
AJ Fernandez San Lotano Requiem Maduro,Rated 4.83 out of 5, Based on 12 Ratings ,"A meticulously crafted maduro, San Lotano Requiem Maduro.Few cigar makers are as in demand as AJ ’Abdel’ Fernandez these days. Looking at his impressive portfolio of top-notch blends, it’s easy to understand why. Take for instance his already impressive portfolio boasting the likes of Man O’ War, Diesel, Morro Castle, and 5 Vegas Triple-A - all winners, no doubt. AJ’s highly successful blends are indicative of his ferocious passion and deep seeded desire for perfection. But now, AJ has taken his craft to another level with the first major release bearing his name, San Lotano Requiem by AJ Fernandez. A truly complete ensemble, the San Lotano Requiem collection offers something that everyone can rejoice in. Ranging from mellow to full, the new San Lotano Requiem line is sure to satisfy even the most discerning of palates. The Maduro variety of San Lotano Requiem features a dark, oily San Andres maduro wrapper balanced by a blend of premium Nicaraguan and Honduran long-fillers. The end result is a luxurious experience as rich, chocolaty, slightly sweet, and creamy flavors are delivered through billowy layers of thick, flavorful nuances. Medium in body, but loaded with flavor the San Lotano Requiem Maduro is dee-lish. And for added intrigue, I've heard quite a few accounts that mention San Lotano Requiem Maduro's eerie resemblance to Padron Anniversary. I don't disagree.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Honduran Broadleaf,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,San Andres,AJ Fernandez
AJ Fernandez San Lotano The Bull,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"Take this bull by the horns.I won't beat around the bush. San Lotano The Bull is good, real good. A few words that come to mind are: fantastic, delicious, extraordinary, any of the aforementioned will do. And that's no errr....bull. Crafted by A.J. Fernandez in Esteli, Nicaragua, The Bull is the San Lotano that charges at you from the very first puff. The great news here is, The Bull isn't just a bunch of hype. Instead, it takes the higher ground with an all substance approach. To craft The Bull, an extensively aged, and hearty core of Nicaraguan long-fillers are nestled beneath an Ecuador Sumatra wrapper. Firm in the hand, this well-made cigar unleashes a medium to full-bodied profile. Strong, yet smooth, the senses are greeted with oak, coffee, leather, and spices. The cherry on top is a wonderful box-pressed finish. The Bull is the San Lotano you've been waiting for, and as I see it you've got two options. You can click the back button and retreat, or man up and run with the bull. ",Medium-Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Sumatra,AJ Fernandez
Al Capone,Rated 4.65 out of 5, Based on 43 Ratings ,"""I am like any other man. All I do is supply a demand.""Named after the infamous Chicago gangster, Al Capone cigarillos are mellow and affordable with a pleasantly sweet taste. Available in your choice of several delicious flavors, these delightful small cigars are consistent and easy to love. Keep them on hand for when you need a quick pick-me-up for a price that can’t be beat. And, if you have a bit more time on your hands, these pair quite nicely with a stiff drink. Note: Al Capone Cigarillos are a premium, hand rolled product.",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Cigarillos,Varies,Indonesian,
Alec & Bradley Blind Faith,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"The new generation of Alec BradleyA little family history lesson for you – Alec Bradley is not a real person, but rather two. These are the names Alec Bradley Cigar Company’s founder, Alan Rubin, two sons. When Alan Rubin first started the company, they were just kids. But over the past 20 years, they have grown up in the business, learned the heritage, the tradition, techniques, and found a love for tobacco on their own. And Alec & Bradley Blind Faith is the first blend they have created on their own.It starts out with a deep brown Habano wrapper grown in Trojes, Honduras. Underneath is a double binder combination from Honduras and Nicaragua that creates a sturdy, slow burning cigar. The meat is a three-leaf combination or Nicaraguan long-fillers. Medium to full-bodied, Blind Faith provides an evolving cadence of personality. A strong spicy note off the bat gives way to flavors of pepper, nuttiness, and earthiness. If Alec & Bradley’s first crack at a premium cigar blend is and inclination of the future, more good things are to come. ",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Honduran, Nicaraguan",Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Habano, Honduran",Alec Bradley
Alec & Bradley Gatekeeper,Rated 4.8 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"A new line from the future of the cigar industry.Alan Rubin has built quite a beat with his Alec Bradley line. Receiving numerous 90+ ratings and and earning a spot in humidors all over the world, it’s been very exciting to see what Alan has up his sleeves. But this release from Alec Bradley isn’t about Alan, it’s about his company’s namesake. Alec & Bradley are Alan’s sons, and fans of Rubin’s work have been patiently waiting to see what the boys would bring to the industry when they came of age and joined their father in the family business in earnest. Their first venture into premium handmades was a limited release called Blind Faith, and the first batch quickly sold out. Their second is called Gatekeeper, and trust me when I say, the brothers are already at the top of their game.Gatekeeper comes dressed in an Ecuador Habano wrapper over a Nicaraguan binder, with fillers from the Dominican and Nicaragua. Its smooth, rich profile is accentuated by notes of cedar, nuts, and leather, and the construction is what you would expect from the factory that produces such great sticks as the Prensado. This cigar is the result of a great man passing along his wealth of knowledge and skill to the next generation. Judging by the excellent results, our industry has nothing to worry about.",Medium,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,False,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley 90+ Rated 2nds,Rated 4.27 out of 5, Based on 579 Ratings ,"​Alec Bradley cigars are scorching hot, ranking among the highest rated handmades on the market today. These are legit 2nds from the brand's 90+ rated blends only. Tempus, Prensado, Family Blend, etc. Each burns and tastes just like their high-end firsts, but were sorted from the packaging line due to minor imperfections or slight variations in wrapper color. I'm still sworn to secrecy as to which is which, but I think you'll easily figure it out.NOTE: The sizes listed below are only guidelines. Since these are 2nds, they sometimes come in varying sizes. ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Short Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley American Classic Blend,Rated 4.52 out of 5, Based on 87 Ratings ,"American Classic Blend, a classic all American cigar.Alec Bradley American Classic Blend is crafted in Nicaragua to replicate the classic taste of old-style, Tampa-made premiums. To craft the American Classic Blend cigar, an aged recipe of long-fillers from Nicaragua is secured inside a bold Nicaraguan binder, then cloaked by a lovely Connecticut-seed Honduran wrapper. The flavor is mellow to medium-bodied — smooth, and teeming with satisfying flavors. A rich core of tobacco is complemented by sweet notes, nuts, and a touch of coffee, while the finish is long, woodsy, and soothing on the palate. Complex yet tame, the American Classic Blend from Alec Bradley is fit (and priced) for daily enjoyment.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Honduran Connecticut,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley American Sun Grown,Rated 4.46 out of 5, Based on 156 Ratings ,"​A Nicaraguan puro with American spirit.Since its release, the Alec Bradley Ameri​can Classic has been a hit, a winner through and through. Carefully blended by Alan Rubin, the line now has a new member of the family, and it's a home-run. Enter the new Alec Bradley American Sun Grown. This Nicaraguan puro utilizes the same Nicaraguan long-fillers as the American Classic, but now comes nestled inside a beautiful Nicaraguan sun-grown habano wrapper. This leaf imparts a heartier, spicier, and overall richer character, while retaining the smooth balanced core that made the American Classic so enjoyable. Medium to full in body, the Sun Grown is complex yet smooth, and dishes out notes of black pepper, cedar, and nuts with a slight sweetness occasionally entering the fray. No doubt a more robust offering, the Sun Grown hits its mark, proving that sometimes the simplest ideas have the best results. Good news! Alec Bradley American Sun Grown has received a well-deserved 91-point rating, noting: ""Though the draw is notably firm, the cigar still produces a rich foundation of leathery, earthy notes complemented by sweet hints of toffee and a nutty, cashew-like finish.""",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Sun Grown,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Black Market,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 70 Ratings ,"So good, it should be illegal.When Alan Rubin commits to a project, quality standards of the highest decree are implemented, sparing no resource in the process. As a result, Alan Rubin, the founder of Alec Bradley cigars, has bee​n churning out delectable blends since 1997. His prestigious line is continually receiving countless praise from the nation’s top cigar advocates - Cigar Aficionado, Cigar journal, Cigar insider (you get the point). Bragging about his innumerable 90+ ratings almost feels arbitrary....almost. So in short, Alan Rubin’s masterful blends are good. Scratch that, great.A superb release from Alec Bradley, Black Market was launched at the 2011 IPCPR tradeshow (a festival for industry geeks). This 4-country blend is jam-packed with Jamastran, Honduras and Panamanian long-fillers, capped off by a lively Sumatra binder and powerful Nicaraguan wrapper leaf. Upon first lighting, the blend burns with purpose. Unique and satisfying arrays of flavors greet your palate, as spice, pepper, and peaty undertones finish the ensemble. With a long dry finish, and slow burn, the Black Market cigar is a finger burner. Alec Bradley Black Market received a well-deserved 90-rating, noting: ""This cigar is draped in a dark, alluring wrapper. Each puff unfolds sweet notes of chocolate around a hearty core of coffee bean. The finish hints of rum cake and minerals.""",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Sumatra,"Honduran, Nicaraguan, Panamanian",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Perfecto, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Honduran, Maduro, Nicaraguan",Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Black Market Esteli,Rated 4.66 out of 5, Based on 50 Ratings ,"Black Market gets spicierAre you on the hunt for an unforgettable cigar experience? Alan Rubin of Alec Bradley cigars works to create just that for any enthusiast. His portfolio of cigars are crafted of top-notch tobaccos and receive rave reviews again and again. The latest and greatest premium of the bunch is the bolder Black Market Esteli. Alec Bradley Black Market Esteli is the long-awaited sequel to the 90-rated Alec Bradley Black Market. A high-quality crafted cigar, just like you've come to expect from Alec Bradley's line, offers complex notes of leather, pepper, and cocoa. Full-flavored and featuring a four-country blend of Central American tobaccos and a Nicaraguan wrapper, this is sure to be one for the history books. Great news! Alec Bradley Black Market Esteli has earned an impressive 93-point rating along with being named the #9 Cigar of the Year, noting: ""A rich combination of savory and sweet, this oily torpedo is loaded with earthy, leathery notes balanced by undercurrents of raisin and cocoa. Delicious and satisfying.""",Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']","Honduran, Nicaraguan",Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,Nicaraguan,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Black Market Vandal,Rated 4.44 out of 5, Based on 87 Ratings ,"This one’ll steal your heart.The wisest men among you may recall Black Market – a medium-bodied masterpiece from Alan Rubin that was introduced way back at the 2011 IPCPR tradeshow. Well, ever since then I’ve been hearing nothing but praise for this fine specimen, and those same lads have been begging and pleading for more. Ask and ye shall receive, gentlemen! Adding to his vast portfolio of 90+ rated beauties, Monsieur Rubin has come to...shall we say...turn up the volume on this revered blend. I present to you: Black Market Vandal.The components may look familiar – 4-country blend of long-fillers, stimulating Sumatra binder, and hearty Nicaraguan wrapper leaf. This is all carried over from the original version. But here’s where things get interesting: included in that long-filler mix is a super-charged, super-secret, extra special tobacco leaf that ratchets up the intensity big time. Tremendous notes of spice and pepper explode on the palate, and culminate in a long, lingering finish. If you loved Black Market, then you’re gonna worship Black Market Vandal. And if you’ve never tried either... sorry to hear it. Here’s your chance to rectify that situation, pronto. ​",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Perfecto', 'Toro']",Sumatra,"Honduran, Nicaraguan, Panamanian, Varied",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Belicoso, Perfecto, Toro",No,"Maduro, Nicaraguan",Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Black Market Vandal The Con,Rated 4.3 out of 5, Based on 33 Ratings ,"Black Market pulls a hat trickWay back in 2011, Alan Rubin introduced the Alec Bradley Black Market to the world at the yearly IPCPR in Las Vegas. Since then, the medium-bodied stunner has gone on to win a couple awards, and spawn a couple sequels. First up, we had Black Market Vandal — a super-charged and uber-flavorful blend imbued with an extra-special ligero strain that amped up the flavor in droves. Today, we take a look at Black Market’s mellower side with Vandal The Con, the first Connecticut-wrapped Black Market. The crazy packaging and gray and green color scheme might make you think Vandal The Con is a gimmick, a cigar that spent all its time on marketing and none on the blending. But you’d be dead wrong. Vandal The Con is one of the smoothest cigars I’ve ever sampled from the AB crew, thanks to its silky smooth Honduran Connecticut wrapper leaf. Each puff delivers sweet spice, creamy cedar, and slight nuttiness – a most enjoyable combination, at a price that could easily demand twice as much.",Mellow-Medium,['Toro'],Honduran,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Toro,No,Honduran Connecticut,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Boy/Girl,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 26 Ratings ,"Relax while you can.It’s pretty much standard operating procedure that when you welcome a new bundle of joy into your life, you mark that occasion by passing out cigars. These handmade beauties from Alec Bradley are not the usual “new baby” cigars, these are actually good. So before the real work begins, sit back and relax while you can, and enjoy a premium handmade cigar from one of the top manufacturers in the biz.Alec Bradley It’s a Boy/Girl cigars come wrapped in a gorgeous, elegant Connecticut leaf and are flavorful medium-bodied sticks. Coming in either a blue it’s a boy or pink it’s a girl band, each cigar will tempt you with its creamy nuances and seductive aroma. These cigars can be enjoyed by the grizzled cigar vet or cigar newbie.​",Mellow-Medium,['Toro'],,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Toro,No,Connecticut,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Caribbean Cask,Rated 4.44 out of 5, Based on 41 Ratings ,"Toes in the sand, Alec Bradley in-hand.What’s more relaxing than kicking your feet up with a good, mellow cigar? Almost nothing, but what if I told you that cigar could transport you from your ho-hum patio to the shores of the Caribbean, until you can practically feel the waves lapping at your legs and the warm sun on your face? Most of us can only take one or two beach trips a year if we’re lucky, but with the new Alec Bradley Caribbean Cask Cigars, you can enjoy the tastes of paradise every day.Wearing a silky smooth Connecticut-shade wrapper securing well-aged long-fillers carefully infused with a splash of Caribbean rum, you’ll forget about the stresses of the daily grind the second you light up an Alec Bradley Caribbean Cask. Mellow, well-constructed, and satisfyingly sweet, keep a box on hand any time you need a miniature vacation, flip-flops and straw hat optional!",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,,More Details,,Varies,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Connecticut,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Connecticut,Rated 4.4 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"Connect with Alec Bradley.Say hello to Alec Bradley Connecticut. Sounds kind of generic I know, but the good news is the Connecticut boasts an array of big-time flavors, all while remaining pleasant and tame in body. If you love a fine Connecticut cigar, look no further than this one. Dressed in a seamless Ecuadorian Connecticut shade wrapper, and chock full of Honduran and Nicaraguan long-fillers, Connecticut produces a highly satisfying mellow to medium-bodied experience. Plumes of creamy and cool flavor coat the palate as notes of cedar, nuts, and toast enter the fray before a slightly sweet finish. Or, to keep it simple — it tastes really damn good.Good news, Alec Bradley Connecticut has earned a well-deserved 90-point rating, noting: ""An attractive-looking cigar with a three-seam cap. Its smoke shows nutty and spicy impressions alongside touches of citrus and sweet wood. The long finish hints of caramel.""",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Honduran,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Connecticut Fumas,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"You already know Alec Bradley as a top-name in premium, affordable handmade cigars, and now you can get that same experience for pennies on the dollar with Alec Bradley Fumas! These sticks use the same high-quality blend as their originals, but may show a blemish here and there that kept them from making the final cut. But once you light up, you’ll agree that these Fumas are the real deal.The Fumas Connecticut is wrapped in a silky-smooth Ecuador Connecticut leaf, covering fillers from Nicaragua and Honduras. You’re in for a mellow-medium bodied profile, with creamy nuances of cedar and roasted nuts, with a toasty finish.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",Honduran,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Coyol,Rated 4.58 out of 5, Based on 117 Ratings ,"Another stud is added to the Alec Bradley arsenal!Picking a favorite is hard, but I think it's safe to say Coyol is my #1 Alec Bradley blend. A classic, retro-feeling brand that’s bold and complex, Alec Bradley Coyol features a Honduran wrapper plus Nicaraguan and Honduran long-fillers with unique tobaccos from a farm named Coyol, giving this robust blend a one-of-a-kind taste. Known for the highest of quality control and its numerous 90-plus-rated hit-makers such as Prensado and Tempus, Coyol hails from the Raices Cubanas factory of Honduras. The Coyol farm became the inspiration behind this blend after AB owner Alan Rubin fell in love with the aroma and taste of the tobaccos that this revered farm produces. This celebrated tobacco can be found in every aspect of the Coyol blend. Wrapper, binder, and filler all have Coyol farm tobaccos making an appearance. A bold, medium-bodied profile with notes of earth, leather, and spice flourish around the palate from first light. Subtly sweet notes of cherry and nutmeg are also present on the finish. Yet another masterpiece from Alec Bradley…par for the course these days.Alec Bradley Coyol received a well-deserved 93-rating and was named the #18 Cigar of 2016 noting: ""Malty and rich flavors with a floral quality complimented by layers of cocoa, honey and cloves. The draw and burn are lush and flawless."" ​​",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Honduran, Nicaraguan","Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Toro",No,Honduran,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Magic Toast,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"Buttery smooth!Ever since he hit the #1 Cigar of the Year with Prensado, you’d guess that Alan Rubin (the founder and chief mind behind Alec Bradley) is blessed. Blend after blend, year after year, his cigars continue to grow in popularity… and the critics continue to love them too, doling out 90+ ratings by the dozen. Today, we shine the spotlight on a release from the 2018 IPCPR trade show: Magic Toast. And to clarify, we’re talking toast of the whiskey kind, not rye or sourdough. A strange name to be sure, but one with meaning: Magic Toast is named after a drink shared in one of Honduras’s tobacco fields. But I wouldn’t blame you for thinking it references the blend — this buttery-smooth cigar features a unique mixture of natural tobacco sweetness, chocolate, and hints of cedar. A blend of Honduran and Nicaraguan tobaccos, Magic Toast fits right into the rest of the AB portfolio, and I’m guessing it’ll find a place in your humidor most easily. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Honduran, Nicaraguan","Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Honduran,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley MAXX,Rated 4.53 out of 5, Based on 74 Ratings ,"Enjoy the true personality of Alec Bradley cigars.MAXX cigars were designed to deliver an eventful character that is balanced and far from overwhelming. Cloaked by a dark Nicaraguan maduro leaf, a complex, 4-country blend of tobaccos is bound by a tasty Co​sta Rican Binder. The complex cocktail of countries in this charmer includes: Colombia, Nicaragua, Honduras and Mexico. The result is a medium to full-bodied blend that's rich and smooth as silk from the get-go, but filled with toasty, earthy flavors and a natural sweetness on the lingering aftertaste.Despite the wonderful array of flavors and aroma, what's most striking about MAXX is the lineup of sizes. Each cigar within the line is quite large, maximizing flavor and strength inside a long, luxurious experience.MAXX also received numerous 90+ ratings, including a well deserved '91' rating, stating: ""It has a sweet wood flavor, with toast and spice notes, and it continues to improve as it's puffed.""",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Toro']",Costa Rica,"Colombian, Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Toro",No,Nicaraguan,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Medalist,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 16 Ratings ,"“To be the best, you have to beat the best.” The quote above is a direct response from Alec Bradley’s founder, Alan Rubin, when asked about Medalist. It’s a spirit that the folks at Alec Bradley have always carried, especially since they earned the #1 Cigar of the Year spot a few years back. Constantly tinkering, innovating, and asking themselves how they can do better, Alec Bradley releases winner after winner on a most consistent basis. Today, we shine the spotlight on the latest trophy in their case, Alec Bradley Medalist. Showcasing a stunning Honduran puro blend, Medalist pays homage to Alec Bradley’s roots. Known today for their medium to full-bodied blends, Medalist reminds us of a day where mellower cigars ruled the roost – and does so most impressively. Toasting the foot on these Connecticut wrapped perfections, you’ll find a warm and toasty flavor profile, complemented by soft cedar notes, and an enjoyable creaminess that stays with you down to the nub.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Honduran,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Mundial,Rated 4.51 out of 5, Based on 89 Ratings ,"A global sensation.Even though it took Alec Bradley almost five years to complete Mundial, it was well worth every hard-earned day. This blend hung out on the back burner for years, making way for hits such as Prensado, Cigar Aficionado’s Cigar of the Year in 2011. As for Mundial, the timing was never just right....Until now.Make way for this incredibly special blend, featuring a careful mix of four distinct fillers from Nicaragua and Honduras with a generous amount of ligero and two binders – one Honduran, one Nicaraguan. The wrapper leaf is a thing of beauty, a stunner from the Trojes region of Honduras. Besides just the blend, the shape of this handmade is a real standout, with all sizes being rolled in the perfecto shape. All in all, Mundial is worth the wait, and it showed up right on time.Alec Bradley Mundial has been awarded with an impressive 92-rating, noting: ""Full of meaty, rich intonations, this cigar also imparts a pleasant minerality before a spicy, leathery finish. It’s well rolled with a pointed foot and dark wrapper.""",Full,['Perfecto'],"Honduran, Nicaraguan","Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Perfecto,No,Honduran,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Nica Puro,Rated 4.59 out of 5, Based on 68 Ratings ,"​Alec Bradley's first Nicaraguan puro.The Nica Puro marks the first Alec Bradley cigar crafted with all Nicaraguan tobaccos. Surprising, I know, especially when you consider the impressive slew of 90+ rated blends now under the Alec Bradley​ umbrella. But that's neither here nor there - what is important is that the Nica Puro hits all the right keys in typical Alec Bradley fashion.Medium-bodied, well-balanced and rich, the Nica Puro is everything a Nicaraguan cigar should be. It all starts with an extensively fermented Nicaraguan Habano wrapper, glistening with oils and soft to the touch. Just beneath this leaf, a bold yet balanced core of Nicaraguan long-fillers secured by a Nicaraguan binder. This all-Nicaraguan cast of tobaccos strikes up bevy of chewy hearty flavor. Hints of leather, cocoa, nutmeg, toast and roasted nuts wash over the palate, before a long satisfying finish. This may be Alan Rubin's first Nicaraguan puro, but it sure is good.Nica Puro is the proud wearer of numerous 90-ratings. One review noted, ""Rich notes of leather and raisin make this dark and oily cigar a solid performer. The draw imparts copious amounts of lush, flavorful smoke.""",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Short Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Habano,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Nica Puro Rosado,Rated 4.47 out of 5, Based on 17 Ratings ,"The sequel suprasses the originalI don't know how they do it, but the crew at Alec Bradley cigars consistently churns out one delicious blend after another. High ratings are the norm for the boutique brand — including the 96-rated Alec Bradley Presnsado and 90-rated Nica Puro, and each cigar they release seems to earn higher marks across the board. Nica Puro Rosado represents an evolution for the brand. A Nicaraguan double binder and core of long-fillers from Nicaragua's 3 main growing regions — Jalapa, Condega, and Esteli — are blanketed by a golden Nicaraguan Rosado wrapper. This medium to full-bodied morsel delivers flavors of nuts, chocolate, leather, and spice, with each flavor remaining balanced and complementary. Taste the next incarnation of the highly-rated Alec Bradley Nica Puro, and order this delicious blend today. ​This blend earned multiple '91'-ratings, with one noting: ""A blend-blueprint of dense double-binders and tobaccos from three growing regions of Esteli will satisfy both novice and complex palates alike. A truly 'essential' experience."" ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Short Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Nicaraguan,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Occidental Reserve,Rated 4.52 out of 5,,"Take advantage of our occident-ally low prices.Take flight in the way-back machine to around the year 2000 and you can witness the birth of the Occidental Reserve and the launching of a now legendary brand.  Alec Bradley Occidental Reserve was the first truly premium offering from the newly formed Alec Bradley cigars and paved the way for this boutique brand’s enduring success.Named for Henke Kelner’s (blender of Avo and Davidoff) Dominican cigar factory, Occidental Reserve is sheathed in a silky Ecuador Connecticut Shade wrapper sitting atop Dominican Olor, Piloto, and San Vicente long-fillers. Mellow to medium-bodied, you’ll experience hints of cream, tasteful spice, cedar, and earth which set the table for an enjoyable cigar. Take advantage of our ludicrous pricing and scoop up a couple bundles before they’re gone. ​",Mellow-Medium,['Gigante'],Connecticut,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Gigante,No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Alec Bradley Post Embargo,Rated 4.74 out of 5, Based on 31 Ratings ,"So close, yet so far away.Although it’s only 90 miles off the Florida coast, Cuba might as well be a whole world away. Alan Rubin, of Alec Bradley cigars, looks hopefully towards the future with Alec Bradley Post Embargo. This new cigar imagines a day when Cuban and non-Cuban brands can compete on a level playing field.Crafted at the Raices Cubanas factory in Honduras, Post Embargo comes dressed in a Honduran wrapper, 2 binders from Honduras and Nicaragua, and a blend of prime long-fillers from Nicaragua and Honduras. This medium to full-bodied morsel boasts flavors of earth, spice, cocoa, and nuts, with some subtle sweetness at play in the background. Sample the Post Embargo and experience a blend that looks to the future.The Alec Bradley Post Embargo recently earned a well-deserved '92'-rating. The review noted, ""Savory notes of leather and briny olive take on a malty earthiness before a sweet finish redolent of chocolate-covered raisins.""",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Honduran, Nicaraguan","Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Yes,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Toro",No,Honduran,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Prensado,Rated 4.71 out of 5, Based on 299 Ratings ,"96-Rated and oh-so-amazingIntroducing, Prensado....a rich a redolent handmade guaranteed to satisfy. This exquisite handmade employs a special '​Trojes' Corojo wrapper grown in Honduras and a flavorful blend of Nicaraguan, Honduran, and more Trojes long-fillers. Expect a bold and eventful blend that brings interesting flavors in spades. Buttery-smooth notes of deep, rich nuances including roasted flavors, coffee, and a dash of sweet red pepper. 96-rated and impressively built, that's Alec Bradley Prensado.In addition to being named the Top Cigar of 2011, Alec Bradley Prensado received an unheard of, 96-point rating, noting, """"The Alec Bradley Prensado is as gorgeous a cigar as you’ll ever see, with a picture-perfect head and a stunning wrapper. But it is the flavor that makes it a classic. The Honduran and Nicaraguan tobaccos come together to create leather, chocolate and spice notes, and a long, lush finish.""",Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Yes,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Honduran,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Prensado Fumas,Rated 4.33 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"You already know Alec Bradley as a top-name in premium, affordable handmade cigars, and now you can get that same experience for pennies on the dollar with Alec Bradley Fumas! These sticks use the same high-quality blend as their originals, but may show a blemish here and there that kept them from making the final cut. But once you light up, you’ll agree that these Fumas are the real deal.Aficionados the world over have sought out the Alec Bradley Prensado for an unbelievably rich experience ever since it was awarded the #1 Cigar of the Year spot with a 96-point rating in 2011. Consisting of Honduran and Nicaraguan fillers wrapped in a gorgeous Honduran leaf, The Prensado Fumas pump out the same full-bodied notes of spice, leather, and chocolate, with a long & satisfying finish as the original, that will have you smacking your lips thinking of the next one!",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto']",,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Churchill, Robusto",Varies,"Honduran, Sun Grown",Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Prensado Lost Art,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 65 Ratings ,"Find Yourself LostThe long awaited sequel to the 96-rated, #1 Cigar of 2011 is here. Alec Bradley Prensado Lost Art a full-bodied blend from one of the hottest brands on the market created to pay homage to the lost art of handcrafting goods. Yeah, its all fine and dandy that technology allows us  to mass produce our fine goods, but knowing how to turn out a hand rolled cigar is truly a work of art. Prensado Lost Art is a superb example of a handcrafted premium. This highly-anticipated blend is made up of the finest Nicaraguan and Honduran tobaccos, and covered in a Honduran Corojo wrapper. Full in body, Prensado Lost Art offers rich notes espresso. leather, and pepper making this an indulgent cigar for your collection. Good news! Prensado Lost Art has received a well deserved 91-point rating, noting: ""Tightly packed with tobacco, this fat, box-pressed cigar has an excellent draw that delivers notes of sweet molasses, nuts and hickory wood. The finish hints of coffee.""",Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']","Honduran, Nicaraguan","Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Yes,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Honduran,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Project 40,Rated 4.57 out of 5, Based on 21 Ratings ,"Here to help with your 40%.Project 40 has probably impacted your life, without you even realizing it. Basically, Project 40 is based on the concept that 50% percent of your happiness comes from genetics, 10% is based on circumstance, and the remaining 40% all depends on your outlook and mindset. The goal is to find how a product can have a positive impact on your mind and body, and improve your happiness and comfort overall. We all know that cigars are a relaxing activity that brings people together and helps create a sense of comfort and mental well-being, so it was only natural that Alan Rubin of Alec Bradley would apply this concept to cigars!Project 40 comes draped in a Nicaraguan wrapper leaf concealing a Brazilian Habano binder stuffed with Nicaraguan fillers, and the well-balanced blend of cedar, nuts, and spice will certainly give a boost to your mood. Add in the excellent construction and CI’s low every day pricing, as you’ve got a cigar sure to warm your soul.Good news! The Alec Bradley Project 40 has earned an impressive 93-point rating, noting ""The draw of this rustic-looking cigar is effortless, offering floral and nutty smoke with pronounced notes of baking spices, chocolate and walnut. Touches of tropical fruit also come through. Balanced and elegant.""",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Brazil, Habano",Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",False,Nicaraguan,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Sanctum,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 34 Ratings ,"Find your peace, find the SanctumThere are more 90+ rated cigars in Alec Bradley’s portfolio than screaming teenagers at a One Direction concert. With a string of hits including Tempus and Prensado, they really had to bring the heat with their newest addition, Sanctum. The over the top packaging sets the bar high and boy does the Sanctum deliver on all fronts. Featuring a Honduran Corojo wrapper, a Costa Rican binder, and a blend of Colombian, Nicaraguan, and Honduran long-fillers, the flavor profile is rich and distinct. Sanctum is medium to full-bodied and the construction is perfect with an excellent burn and draw. The flavors will draw you in, setting the table for a complex and pleasurable experience with notes of pepper, fruit, spice, and wood. Scoop up some peace of mind and don’t miss out on Alec Bradley Sanctum. Alec Bradley Sanctum received two 91-ratings, and Top 25 honors for 2015 (#15 overall) and a well-deserved 93-rating noting,""intensifies to show a diverse but harmonious range of flavors from white pepper and cinnamon to vanilla bean and almond paste.""​",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],Costa Rica,"Colombian, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Robusto,No,Corojo,
Alec Bradley Select Corojo,Rated 4.18 out of 5, Based on 22 Ratings ,"A great selectionAlec Bradley cigars are hard not to love. This family owned boutique brand works incredibly hard, constantly releasing new products that are always well received. In fact, as I’m writing this, it was just announced that their Alec Bradley Black Market Esteli blend earned a 93-rating and landed at #9 on the Top 25 Cigars of 2018 list. Back to Select Corojo – this one is a sure bet for an everyday charmer. Packaged in affordable bundles of 20, Select Corojo allows you to get a taste of boutique charm, at a price point that can land it in your everyday rotation. Up top is a high quality Corojo wrapper that coats a core of Nicaraguan grown long-fillers. They burn smooth and slow, providing flavors of coffee, natural tobacco, baking spice, and sweet earth. Pick up a bundle today to get a taste of this celebrated brand. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Sumatra,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Corojo, Nicaraguan",Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Superstition,Rated 4.32 out of 5, Based on 28 Ratings ,"The Writing’s on the WallTalk to a manufacturer or tobacco grower in our industry and they’ll tell be sure to tell you about their one “hidden secret.” The secret sauce in their formula that no one else has. Maybe it’s the way they transplant their tobacco to the fields, maybe it’s a special soil, or an aging technique, or the quality of canvas they use to wrap bales of tobacco… whatever it is, everyone in our industry is a little superstitious. But when you use great tobacco and quality techniques, you don’t need any tricks or secrets — you just make fine cigars day in and day out. Case in point? Alec Bradley Superstition, today’s specimen of attention. Highly-complex and uber-enjoyable, each AB Superstition included Cuban-seed long-filler tobaccos from Honduras, Nicaragua, and the DR underneath a beautifully oily Nicaraguan Habano wrapper leaf. Light it up and you’ll find loads of espresso, leather, roasted nuts, and a bit of spice on the finish. ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Sumatra,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Torpedo",No,"Habano, Nicaraguan Jalapa",Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Tempus,Rated 4.64 out of 5, Based on 177 Ratings ,"A 94-rated masterpiece.Here it is, quite possibly the crowning achievement of Alec Bradley Cigars. Tempus is truly boutique, right down to the tobaccos used. The Habano-seed wrapper hails from a small tobacco field located on the border of Nicaragua and Honduras, capturing the rich, hearty flavors of Honduras. This leaf is dark and leathery, and conceals a complex mixture of Cuban-seed long-fillers grown in both Nicaragua and Honduras. The cigar explodes with rich, but smooth flavors noting toasted wood and nuts. The finish is long and peppery with an enjoyable sweetnes​s.The Magistri is a special size produced in limited quantities. Only 1,000 boxes were produced total, and each of these perfectos utilize a higher priming wrapper that is darker in color. Thanks to numerous well-deserved '94' ratings, the Alec Bradley Tempus was named the #5 Cigar of 2017. The reviews noted, ""Dark and attractive with an effortless draw, this cigar produces a rich, semisweet smoke, leaving balanced impressions of wood and nuts. Big, delicious flavor.""",,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']","Honduran, Indonesian","Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Perfecto, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Honduran,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Tempus Fumas,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"You already know Alec Bradley as a top-name in premium, affordable handmade cigars, and now you can get that same experience for pennies on the dollar with Alec Bradley Fumas! These sticks use the same high-quality blend as their originals, but may show a blemish here and there that kept them from making the final cut. But once you light up, you’ll agree that these Fumas are the real deal.The 94-rated Tempus is the pinnacle of Alec Bradley’s blending expertise, and the Tempus Fumas lives up to that reputation. The hearty, medium-full bodied notes of leather, earth, and wood is achieved by a carefully balanced blend of Nicaraguan and Honduran long-fillers, tucked beneath a sturdy Honduran wrapper.",,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Honduran,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Tempus Maduro,Rated 4.46 out of 5, Based on 108 Ratings ,"A darker, richer Tempus cigar.Take the 94-rated Tempus, add a maduro wrapper into the equation, and come out on top with another winning blend. If only everything were that easy. But for Alan Rubin of Alec Bradley, the wind is always at his back.Tempus Maduro cigars combine the same rich filler bl​end as the original Tempus, now paired with a San Andres maduro wrapper. This wrapper leaf is dark and luscious, specially fermented using an old Cuban technique. The result is a rich, full-flavored blend that's smooth and balanced throughout. Notes of coffee, cocoa, pepper, cedar, and a slightly sweet finish characterize this complex new addition to the Alec Bradley line up.Alec Bradley Tempus Maduro received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""A dark cigar with some pronounced veins and a roughly applied cap. It's notes of licorice and nuts take on a firey, chili pepper spiciness. The finish is a touch chalky."" ",Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Honduran, Indonesian","Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,San Andres,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Tempus Nicaragua,Rated 4.54 out of 5, Based on 92 Ratings ,"Time for a change.Move aside Pete Rose, Alec Bradley is the new hit leader. Alec Bradley Tempus, a 94 rated gem, adds a new player to the lineup, Alec Bradley Tempus Nicaragua. Handmade with the same attention to detail and with the use of Nicaraguan ultra-premium tobaccos, this puro is sure to have fans clamoring for more.With a choice, premium Nicaraguan Jalapa wrapper surrounding a Nicaraguan double binder and long-fillers from Nicaragua’s 3 growing regions, Jalapa, Condega, and Esteli, you’ll be dizzy from sensory overload. The cigar boasts a gorgeous appearance and comes in at a solid medium-body with a rich and earthy profile with highlights of spice, pepper, cedar, and leather. Be sure to try this sumptuous treat and kick back and soak in the big, delicious flavors.Alec Bradley Tempus Nicaragua received two separate 90-ratings in 2016 and 2017, noting: ""There's a bit of an oily gleam to the wrapper of this dark, reddish-brown cigar. It's a toasty smoke accentuated by nutty notes and a sweet, caramel finish.""​",,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,Nicaraguan,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley Texas Lancero,Rated 4.6 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"Everything’s bigger in Texas!In America, and growing rapidly across the globe, the demand for thicker, longer cigars has changed the shape of the cigar industry (get it?). Alec Bradley answers the bell with this new, ironically named behemoth of a handmade, the Texas Lancero. This massive, 7”x70 giant will set you in a state (get it?) of euphoria for what seems like days. Along with its gargantuan size comes enormous flavor. A bevy of Nicaraguan, Honduran, and Costa Rican long-fillers plump up this monster before it’s all secured by a gleaming Nicaraguan wrapper leaf. A rich and spicy profile is supported by notes of citrus, leather, and nuts to create a delicious, medium-bodied profile you’ll want to burn for hours.  And thankfully, this big-ring beauty obliges and burns just about as long as you’ll let it. ",Medium,['Gordo'],Indonesian,"Costa Rican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Gordo,No,Nicaraguan,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley The Lineage,Rated 4.64 out of 5, Based on 73 Ratings ,"It’s all in the family.A family man at heart, Alan Rubin’s next endeavor was inspired by two very important people. For those unfortunate souls who have yet to become acquainted with Alec Bradley and his vast portfolio, here’s a quick fact: Alec Bradley is not the name of the manufacturer. The line was founded in 1996 and was named after Alan’s two young sons,  Alec and Bradley. Eighteen years later, both lads have reached legal age in most states. To celebrate this momentous occasion, Alec Bradley Lineage was born.Lineage is an extension to the Family Blend line, a collection of premium handmades that already boasts multiple 90+ ratings, and by the looks of it, this is sure to be another. A milk chocolaty Honduran wrapper leaf from the Trojes growing region covers finely aged Nicaraguan and Honduran long-fillers. Beautifully constructed, Lineage delivers notes of earth, cedar, and citrus, with a subtle spice appearing on the retrohale. This selection is a must-try, that’s for sure. Plus, at these affordable prices, it’s so easy to say yes! Good news! Alec Bradley the lineage has received a well-deserved 90-point rating, noting: ""Topped with a pigtail cap, this robusto smokes evenly with a clean burn and full draw. It's a toasty, creamy smoke with some salty elements, a bit of earth and a toffee sweetness.""",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Honduran,Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley V2L Black,Rated 4.44 out of 5, Based on 27 Ratings ,"2 Visos, 2 Ligeros, 2 good to pass up.Alec Bradley is a powerhouse. With so many 90+ ratings, and even a few Cigar of the Year awards under their belt, it’s dead obvious that they know what they’re doing. They have a cigar to please every palate, and they’re all blended to impress. Needless to say, when Alec Bradley announces a new cigar, I prick up my ears and pay attention (and clear some space in my humidor). And I have plenty of space open for the new stick that just landed on my desk, the V2L Black.I know what you’re probably thinking, and V2L isn’t something under the hood of your car. Instead, it describes the delicious tobacco beneath the toothy Nicaraguan wrapper and flavorful Honduran binder of this redolent new handmade. A core of 2 Viso and 2 Ligero long-fillers from 4 different farms gives you all the horsepower you need to finish your day, with notes of earth, spice, and oak, and a bit of pepper in the finish. Weighing in at medium to full-bodied, the V2L Black is sure to get your motor started.",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Ligero, Maduro, Nicaraguan, Sun Grown",Alec Bradley
Alec Bradley White Gold,Rated 3.85 out of 5, Based on 644 Ratings ," All Gold Everything.Is this the same Alec Bradley responsible for countless 90+ rated blends?...Yes! And the same one who has a multitude of Top Cigars of the Year?...Yes! The same Alec Bradley that demands top dollar day in and day out?...Sure is! But now, thanks to CI, he will be remembered for bringing you White Gold. Alec Bradley White Gold is a modest, ‘Cuban Sandwich’ creation issuing smooth, mellow nuances of toast, cream, and gentle spices with every puff. Draped in a Connecticut wrapper, each cigar burns like a dream, proving that they could easily fetch twice the asking price. If you’re a fan of mellow, affordable handmades, you should be half-way to checkout by now. This is sheer insanity.",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,Alec Bradley
Alpha Absinthe Infused - Connecticut,Rated 3.88 out of 5,,Get into the spirit of Alpha’s cigarThe absence of Absinthe is done with. That’s right boy. You heard correct. The once-banned green liquor made a comeback that’s being served up in more than your shot glass. Alpha Cigar Co. concocted a Connecticut Absinthe infused cigar as their debut blend. Classic creaminess in the perfectly aged Connecticut wrapper meets notes of hay and spice with traces of pine and citrus. Inside this mellow to medium-bodied cigar lies Cuban seed Piloto Cubano leaves where one lucky leaf in each is infused with premium French Absinthe. Botanical subtleties will greet your palate from the 15 different herbs used in the blend. Absinthe Infused Connecticut – a unique cigar well worth trying.,Mellow-Medium,['Gordo'],Dominican,"Cuban, Nicaraguan",True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Gordo,Yes,Ecuador Connecticut,
Alpha Absinthe Infused - Maduro,Rated 4.55 out of 5,,"A highly-praised infused Maduro from Alpha CigarsDiscover a Maduro cigar that stands above the rest, Absinthe Infused Maduro. Receiving a well-deserved 92-rating from Cigar and Spirits magazine, this spiked stogie has claimed the spot as the world’s highest-rated infused cigar by any major publication. That alone should put you in high spirits to try this handmade premium. Each Absinthe Infused Maduro is rolled in pairs with a single leaf bathed in top-notch French Absinthe and is bunched in the Cuban entubado style for an optimal draw. A full-bodied one-of-a-kind cigar, this Maduro offers notes of cocoa, spice, and botanical nuances from the 15 herbs it’s crafted with. ",Medium,['Corona'],Dominican,"Cuban, Nicaraguan",True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Corona,Yes,San Andres,
Alta Gracia,Rated 4.36 out of 5, Based on 277 Ratings ,"A wee bit of Irish goodness!Alta Gracia means “High Grace.” Appropriately so because these little cigarillos are heavenly. Made in Ireland - the land of Saints & Scholars (not to mention Jameson, Guinness and Riverdance) - Alta Gracia cigars are one of a kind 'in-betweener' blends. They burn a tad hot toward the end but all the while exude a creamy tobacco flavor with a naturally sweet finish. Choose between Natural, Maduro, Irish Cream, and Maduro Irish Cream and savor Alta Gracia’s smoothness. Perfect for a quick indulgence....besides, at my friggin' awesome price it's hard to go wrong.",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],Indonesian,Dominican,True,No,More Details,Ireland,No,,Cigarillos,Varies,Sumatra,
Amati,Rated 3.5 out of 5, Based on 441 Ratings ,"TRY THIS….and tell me it’s not the best value around.This is not an optical illusion. It is not a misprint. Nor is it a sick joke. This is 100% the real deal, boyo! That’s right, here at CI we make miracles happen, and this one is worthy of notifying all the clergymen. USA Connecticut wrapped lovelies in a box for right around a dollar a stick. Holy s…err cow, is right! And it gets even better. Each Amati cigar is constructed with Dominican long-fillers, for an incredibly smooth and creamy experience. Oh, yes. It’s a damn near impossible combination at these prices. Be one of the first in line, and fully enjoy thy spoils.​",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,
Anonymous Cigars by Cult,Rated 4.67 out of 5,,"A cigar so good it was named AnonymousCult cigars make sure they stand out from the crowd with their unique flavorful premiums made out of the TACASA factory in Esteli, Nicaragua. This boutique brand is anything but ordinary, with a name like Cult, but their cigars are on point in quality and taste. Enter their latest Anonymous. Made up of the finest Nicaraguan long-fillers, a blend of binders from Indonesia, Nicaragua, and Mexico, and covered in a spicy Ecuador Habano wrapper, Anonymous is a great cigar to enjoy time and time again. Keep it anonymous when you buy a bunch of these premium handmades.",Medium,['Toro'],,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Habano,Cult
Archetype Axis Mundi,Rated 5 out of 5,,"The world revolves around ArchetypeYou shouldn’t judge a book by its cover, but I knew I’d love Archetype’s Axis Mundi at first glance. Just look at this thing! Glistening with oils, sharply contrasting with the metallic red band, Axis Mundi is a beautifully dark maduro that practically begs you to pick it out of your humidor. And I’d recommend you do — you won’t be disappointed. The wrapper leaf in question is a dark Ecuadorian Habano Maduro that sits expertly atop an Indonesian Sumatra binder and Nicaraguan Habano filler leaves. Toasting the foot of the Archetype Axis Mundi, you’ll find droves of tobaccos sweetness, complex baking spices, and a core flavor of dark fruit. Rated an insane 96 by Cigar & Spirits magazine, Axis Mundi might just be the best boutique blend you try this year. The Archetype Axis Mundi received a respectable 93-rating, and earned a spot in the Top 25 Cigars of 2017. The reviewers noted, ""rich layers of coffee bean, caramel, and nuttiness... a hint of cedar manages to manifest itself as well.""",Full,['Corona'],Sumatra,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Corona,No,Ecuador Habano,Archetype Cigars
Archetype Dreamstate,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"A cigar straight outta my dreams! There’s two things I need for a perfect morning — a hot cup of coffee, and a delicious Connecticut wrapped cigar. Luckily, with Archetype Dreamstate, I’m already halfway there. With incredibly artistic packaging and an insane attention to detail, Dreamstate begs for your attention. And if you enjoy a smooth cigar, I’d recommend you don’t ignore it. Getting things started, you’ll find a Dominican San Vincente binder and an Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper. The tobaccos used are choice leaves, handpicked and perfectly aged for each and every cigar. The result is a gorgeously balanced flavor profile, featuring a complex bouquet of fruit, vanilla, and white pepper. Don’t sleep on this one boys, Dreamstate is well worth the try. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Toro']",Dominican,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Archetype Cigars
Archetype Initiation,Rated 3 out of 5,,"Prepare yourselfAh, Initiation. A word that instantly transports me back to college, fraternities, and the crazy ass stunts we pulled under what would now be called “hazing.” Luckily, this cigar from Archetype isn’t here to make you eat a goldfish. No sir, instead, Archetype Initiation is an adventure in the art of nuanced flavor, presenting an Ecuadorian Habano wrapped blend that any cigar enthusiast can enjoy. If you love Habano, Initiation is the cigar for you. From filler to binder to wrapper, every single leaf in this beauty is fine Habano tobacco. The profile weighs in at a comfortable medium, with floral and citrus notes leading the charge for most of the burn. A step up from most Connecticuts on the market, Initiation would make a perfect choice for the new cigar enthusiast who’s looking to try something a bit more complex. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Habano,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Archetype Cigars
Archetype Sage Advice,Rated 3 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Take this adviceThe Archetype cigar line launched with five blends, each unique and delicious in their own right. Today, we’re examining Sage Advice – part of Archetype’s “Series A” releases. This, Dreamstate, and Strange Passage were all produced at Davidoff owned factories in the Dominican Republic. So you can be sure you’re getting quality tobaccos. As for the blend itself, Sage Advice features a booming seven different tobaccos. The filler blend is undisclosed, besides the fact that they’re all long leaf. For the binder, you’ll find a Dominican San Vincente leaf, underneath a proprietary hybrid Habano wrapper. Toasting the foot, Sage Advice gives off some of the grassy notes you’d expect from a Davidoff cigar, mixed with natural tobacco and sharp pepper. The pun is too obvious, but I’ll say it anyway: take my advice, and secure yourself a box today.",Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Archetype Cigars
Archetype Strange Passage,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Prepare for a journeyStrange Passage is a cigar that’s guaranteed to make you do a double take. From the bizarre name, to the dragon in the art, to the small maze on the foot band, this presentation is most certainly… unique. But believe me, Strange Passage is legit, and most worthy of your attention. The name here isn’t just a marketing gimmick — Strange Passage is blended to be multi-dimensional, a cigar that transforms as you burn it. At the start, you’ll find a classic full-bodied profile loaded with notes of coffee and woods. But let this baby burn, and soon earth, fruit, and a light, spicy finish will join the mix. It’d be tough to pick a favorite cigar from Archetype, but Strange Passage is, without a doubt, their most complex. Good news, the Archetype Strange Passage has earned an awesome 92-point rating, noting; ""Sweet, warm notes of chocolate and toast set the tone for this box-pressed robusto, which also imparts a nutty, nougat sweetness and a salty hint of leather.""",Full,"['Robusto', 'Short Robusto']",Corojo,,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Robusto, Short Robusto",No,Ecuador Habano,Archetype Cigars
Arganese Connecticut,Rated 4.16 out of 5, Based on 207 Ratings ,"Oh boy, Arganese just got a makeover!Same great blend, same low price, bold new look. This is the exact type of handmade you should be trotting out at picnics and BBQs, or anytime you’re looking to impress someone without spending a fortune. I can guarantee that the presentation will hint at a hefty price tag, but because you’ve shipwrecked here on the shores of CI, you’ll never pay even close to what it’s worth. So go ahead – bring home a slew of tasty, well-made, and flavorful handmades starting at just 40 bucks per bundle.Arganese Connecticut utilizes a mellow, well-aged long-filler blend underneath a seamless Connecticut shade wrapper. Smooth and creamy throughout with a backing core of crisp, toasty tobacco flavors. Mellow in profile, but impressively tasty.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Indonesian,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,Arganese
Arganese Habano,Rated 4.26 out of 5, Based on 222 Ratings ,"Arganese's bread and butterA perfect handmade to keep your humidor stocked to the brim, this bundle is a great item to have on hand for your next BBQ or family gathering. Impressive and affordable, Arganese delivers high-quality flavor at low-quality prices. Start enjoying them today for right around a buck a stick.Arganese Habano incorporates a dark-brown, you guessed it, Habano wrapper from Nicaragua and a bold Cuban-seed long-filler blend to deliver a dense tobacco core supported by subtle notes of leather and a long, semi-sweet and peppery finish.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Habano,Arganese
Arganese Il Mezzo,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Il CherootArganese has been killing the bundled cigar game the past couple of years. Delivering well-constructed and flavorful handmade cigars for bottom dollar prices, they’ve earned a place in your humidor. And now they’re taking their talents in another direction. Arganese Il Mezzo is an Italian-style rustic little cheroot (open on both ends). They don’t look the prettiest, but they deliver some powerful flavors in droves. Hailing from the Dominican Republic, they use 100% American grown tobaccos for the wrapper, binder, and filler. All dark fire cured leaves grown in Kentucky and Tennessee. Light one up and experience rich and feisty flavors that are heavy on the palate. Packaged in convenient cardboard packs of 5, these are great to carry around on a night out. ",Medium-Full,['Cigarillos'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,False,,Cigarillos,False,Kentucky Fire-Cured,Arganese
Arganese Maduro,Rated 4.33 out of 5, Based on 180 Ratings ,"Arganese's boldest blendRich, toothy, and inviting the Arganese Maduro is like a cool breeze on a hot summer day. Smooth and refreshing to burn, and even more refreshing on the ol' wallet.Arganese Maduro utilizes a well-aged blend of Nicaraguan long-fillers paired with a dark, oily Broadleaf maduro wrapper to deliver a medium-bodied array of coffee and dark chocolate flavors complemented by a naturally sweet finish. In a word, it’s dee-lish – and priced to move.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Habano,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Arganese
Arturo Fuente Chateau Fuente Series,Rated 4.73 out of 5, Based on 102 Ratings ,"The Original MasterpieceThere’s a time and a place for risk taking....like Vegas, for example. And then there’s a time and place where you just want a guaranteed outcome, like after a long, hard day of bringing home the bacon. When it comes to consistency, Arturo Fuente is just like winning the lottery every single day – consistent quality, consistent flavor, consistent construction. It’s the cigar equivalent of how your spot on the couch somehow manages to feel exactly the same no matter how many times you sit on it. Quite simply the Arturo Fuente cigar reviews all read the same way, “This cigar is great, its my favorite cigar in the world, buy now.”Need a little more info? The Chateau Fuente Series cigars are made with Connecticut Shade or Ecuador Sungrown wrappers. They're masterfully blended from the Fuente's private reserve of aged tobaccos and the cigars themselves are all aged to perfection before being placed in their signature cedar sleeves. Well-made, mellow to medium in body, and beautifully constructed. Looks, personality, dependability....its all here. The Arturo Fuente Chateau Fuente Series cigars have received multiple 90 ratings, as high as a 91-point rating, noting: ""a distinctively rich, tobacco aroma as it burns. It is balanced and complex with toast, coffee bean and nutty intonations.""",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,"Cameroon, Connecticut, Connecticut Broadleaf",Arturo Fuente
Arturo Fuente Chateau Fuente Series Sun Grown,Rated 4.45 out of 5, Based on 78 Ratings ,"Gran Reserva goes sun-grown.Denoted by the black-trim band, the Sun Grown by Arturo Fuente combines the Gran Reserva's popular binder and filler tobaccos with a dark Ecuadorian-grown sun-grown wrapper leaf. This recipe cooks up a slight, natural sweetness complemented by a medium-bodied richness that's smooth and balanced. A consistent, well-made handmade from the Dominican Republic.​Arturo Fuente Sun Grown features a perfect draw, with a long, fruity finish. Each perfectly crafted cigar in this box also has a light cedar spice, from the cedar wrap placed on every individual stick.",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Figurado', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Figurado, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Sungrown,Arturo Fuente
Arturo Fuente Don Carlos,Rated 4.34 out of 5, Based on 67 Ratings ,"This Don reigns supremeThe Don Carlos line from Arturo Fuente is among their very best. And when you make a cigar brand this amazing, that's really saying something. Utilizing some of the highest quality Cameroon leaf on the market, Don Carlos has been impressing aficionados for decades.The Fuente name, combined with top Cameroon wrappers and fine Dominican long-filler tobaccos make this well-aged cigar a highly sought after commodity. Each exquisitely rolled specimen delivers flavors of nuttiness, sweetness, earth, and a very smooth black pepper through the retrohale. Enjoy it on it's own, or pair this one up with your favorite single-malt — either way, you're going to enter complete bliss.Arturo Fuente Don Carlos received Top 25 honors for 2015 (#4 overall) and a well-deserved 94-rating, a 97-rating, and the #1 Cigar of the Year for 2017: ""Its wrapper-to-filler ratios resulted in a perfect combination of the Cameroon cover leaf’s sweet-and-sour properties along with the Dominican binder and filler, which gave the cigar a zesty, nutty quality full of shaved almonds and candied orange peel.""",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Corona', 'Double Robusto', 'Presidente', 'Robusto']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Corona, Double Robusto, Presidente, Robusto",No,Cameroon,Arturo Fuente
Arturo Fuente God of Fire by Carlito,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"A rare treat for Fuente fans.God of Fire is made annually, in extremely limited quantities, making it a hard to come by super-premium. These choice cigars come in two blends: one by Carlito Fuente, the other by Don Carlos. Either way, you're in for a full-flavored treat.The Carlito blend is the more powerful of the two. Chock full of Dominican long-fillers, this handmade utilizes a toothy Cameroon wrapper to deliver a full-bodied, spicy smoke similar to the Casa Fuente brand.God of Fire by Carlito has received a well-deserved 90-point rating, noting: ""A mottled looking cigar that starts out with a firm draw, but it opens to show a balanced culmination of tea, cedar and leather notes. Medium bodied and flavorful.""Click here to shop God of Fire by Don Carlos.",Full,"['Churchill', 'Double Robusto', 'Pyramid']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Double Robusto, Pyramid",No,Cameroon,Arturo Fuente
Arturo Fuente God of Fire by Don Carlos,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"A rare treat for Fuente fans.God of Fire is made annually, in extremely limited quantities, making it a hard to come by super-premium. These choice cigars come in two blends: one by Carlito Fuente, the other by Don Carlos. Either way, you're in for a full-flavored treat.The Don Carlos blend is similar to traditional Don Carlos cigars, but unique in flavor. Some believe this is due to the Ecuadorian-grown wrapper used, which is said to be the same wrapper used for the King B. Either way, the Don Carlos blend is complex, but smooth, offering a full-bodied, full-flavored profile.God of Fire by Don Carlos has received an impressive 93-point rating, noting: ""The draw is perfect, bathing the palate in a profoundly leathery, spicy smoke that is both balanced and complex. Nutty flavors precede the long finish.""Click here to shop God of Fire by Carlito.",Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Arturo Fuente
Arturo Fuente Gran Reserva,Rated 4.71 out of 5, Based on 357 Ratings ,"The Original MasterpieceThere’s a time and a place for risk taking....like Vegas, for example. And then there’s a time and place where you just want a guaranteed outcome, like after a long, hard day of bringing home the bacon. When it comes to consistency, Arturo Fuente is just like winning the lottery every single day – consistent quality, consistent flavor, consistent construction. It’s the cigar equivalent of how your spot on the couch somehow manages to feel exactly the same no matter how many times you sit on it. Quite simply the Arturo Fuente cigars review all read the same way, “This cigar is great, its my favorite cigar in the world, buy now.”Need a little more info? Made with African Cameroon, Connecticut Shade, or Ecuador Sungrown wrappers, Arturo Fuente cigars are well-made, mellow to medium in body, and beautifully constructed. Looks, personality, dependability....if only they could cook your dinner, you wouldn’t need much else in this world. If you need a size recommendation, the Arturo Fuente 858 has been one of the best-selling options for years. Finally, after years of waiting, the Arturo Fuente Gran Reserva core line has received a 90-rating for the Maduro, noting: ""dark chocolate and licorice notes... it's balanced by a medium-bodied base of almonds and wood.""",,"['Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Lonsdale', 'Petite Corona', 'Presidente', 'Rothschild', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Churchill, Cigarillos, Corona, Lancero/Panatela, Lonsdale, Petite Corona, Presidente, Rothschild, Toro",Varies,"Cameroon, Candela, Connecticut, Connecticut Broadleaf, Dominican, Ecuador Connecticut",Arturo Fuente
Arturo Fuente Hemingway,Rated 4.85 out of 5, Based on 158 Ratings ,"Four years in the making at Tabacalera A. Fuente.The Hemingway line of cigars is a tasty series of shapely handmades from Carlos Fuente including Arturo Fuente Hemingway Short Story. The Fuente family carefully ferments and ages tobaccos, specially selected from only the best crop years. This highly sought after cigar is handmade by only the most experienced cigar makers, each of whom are limited to only 75 cigars per day. The Arturo Fuente Hemingway is aged for six months to fully enhance the flavor and aroma in cedar lined ag​ing rooms.Lighting these up, you'll find a complex, medium-bodied flavor that the Fuente name is practically synonymous with. The dark and toothy wrapper leaf gives way to a flavor that's rich, toasty, and spicy. Each cigar delivers a wide range of expertly balanced notes, as they burn down to the cool nub. Incredibly rare and sought-after, we'd recommend grabbing a box posthaste. The Arturo Fuente Hemingway series has earned a 94-rating, calling it the #6 Cigar of 2018. One review noted, ""impeccably crafted... spicy and woody notes turn to sweet leather and cedar. Balanced and elegant, medium-bodied.""NOTE: The Arturo Fuente Hemingway line is an extremely limited release brand. We receive small shipments whenever we can, so if they're showing out of stock, check back often or sign up for notifications so you don't miss out when we get more! If they're in stock, our advice is to stock up!",,['Perfecto'],Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Perfecto,No,"Cameroon, Connecticut Broadleaf, Ecuador Sungrown",Arturo Fuente
Ashton,Rated 4.71 out of 5, Based on 70 Ratings ,"The finest money can buy“Dependable” is one of those words that gets thrown around a lot in the cigar game, but what does it really mean? Well, to me it means that you know what you’re getting. Whether it’s three in the afternoon or three in the morning, whether there’s rain, snow, or sweltering heat, whether you just found out that your old baseball card is worth six figures or whether you just got your credit card statement after your wife’s little shopping spree, it will deliver the exact same performance. Dependability. It’s a quality that’s often taken for granted, and one that deserves much more credit than it’s given.Talk about Ashton cigars and within a couple of sentences, dependability is bound to come up. Made in the Dominican, they combine an aged blend of mellow Dominican tobacco leaves with a golden brown Connecticut shade wrapper. The result of this pairing is rich and smooth, with a mellow to medium body that boasts universal appeal. Well-made, good quality, satisfying, and yes, highly dependable – these are the things that Ashton is made of.Nice! Ashton has just received a 90-rating! Cigar Aficionado notes: ""The leather and citrus notes of this lonsdale become nutty before transitioning to a sweet nougat and marzipan finish.""Click here to shop Aston Cigars in an array of smaller sizes. ",Mellow,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Lonsdale', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Lonsdale, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,Ashton
Ashton Aged Maduro,Rated 4.59 out of 5, Based on 39 Ratings ,"A hard to find treat made by Fuente.The Ashton Aged Maduro is a dark, slightly sweet and almost black cigar which comes from the long process of naturally fermenting Connecticut broadleaf wrapper leaf, giving this cigar its flavor and smoothness. Unlike other maduros on the market, Ashton remains right at a comfortable mellow profile, making this perfect for those dipping their toes into the darker waters. Each Ashton Maduro features Dominican grown leaf for the filler and binder. The result is a beautiful cigar with oily, silky Connecticut Shade grown wrappers providing a complex and distinctive character with a chocolatey and spicy sweet flavor.Ashton Aged Maduro received a well-deserved 92-rating noting: ""A dark and oily cigar with a good cap. The draw is a bit firm. The smoke is rich, leathery and cedary, with notes of semi-sweet chocolate. Very tasty.""",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Gordo', 'Presidente', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Double Corona, Gordo, Presidente, Pyramid, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Ashton
Ashton Cabinet Selection,Rated 4.61 out of 5, Based on 33 Ratings ,"Ashton's top-shelf, vintage beauty.When it comes to Ashton cigars, top-notch quality is a given. So what makes the Ashton Cabinet Selection special and worth the extra couple of shillings over the Ashton Classic line? I'm glad you asked. Ashton Cabinet Selection cigars utilize a 4-5 year aged blend of Dominican long-fillers adorned with a top-grade Connecticut shade wrapper leaf that's been aged for a full 12 months longer than the wrapper leaf on Ashton Classic. The result is a smooth, elegant profile that's crisp, clean and layered with notes of oak, cedar, pepper, cream, and coffee. Expensive, yes, but likely worth every penny. Ashton Cabinet Selection received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""Draped in a smooth, blond wrapper, this cigar draws and burns very well. Its woody, mellow flavors have light creamy undertones. The finish is toasty.""",Mellow-Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Corona', 'Perfecto', 'Petite Corona', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Corona, Perfecto, Petite Corona, Pyramid, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,Ashton
Ashton ESG,Rated 4.52 out of 5, Based on 21 Ratings ,"ESG... Extra Special Good? Ashton ESG is one of the rarest cigars on the market, no doubt. But if you have the cash and you can get your hands on some, you're in for a truly memorable experience. Carefully crafted at the renowned Arturo Fuente factory, ESG (Estate Sun Grown) employs an extremely scarce Dominican Sun Grown wrapper - a dark and oily leaf that's grown within the Fuente Estate. Ashton's ESG is a perfectly rolled cigar, utilizing rare and well aged tobaccos to create a unique, full-bodied profile. Notes of leather, spices, nuts, earth and wood are perfectly balanced and delivered in remarkably smooth fashion. If you can only try one cigar in the Ashton profile, flip a coin between this and VSG. Each will treat you equally well.Ashton ESG 22-Yr Salute received a most impressive 94-point score noting: ""Marvelous notes of rich graham cracker and cracked black pepper concentrate with a creamy vibrancy in a consistent, precise draw. Buttery accents of sweet cedar segue into a seductive full-bodied finale.""",Full,"['Churchill', 'Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Perfecto, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Dominican, Sun Grown",Ashton
Ashton Heritage Puro Sol,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 27 Ratings ,"Ashton's top of the line.Made by Fuente, Ashton Heritage is a unique cigar constructed entirely of sun-grown tobaccos (wrapper, binder, and filler), hence th​e name Puro Sol. These sun-grown leaves are rich in flavor and complexity, and the shiny Ecuador Habano wrapper is the icing on the cake. Ashton Heritage cigars deliver a rich, medium-bodied and well-balanced flavor profile with a touch of natural sweetness. Like all cigars in the Ashton profile, Puro Sol delivers extraordinarily in every category: flavor, balance, draw, and burn... they're all flawless. Get yourself a box today. In addition to being named one of the Top 25 Cigars in the world, number 7 to be exact, Ashton Heritage Puro Sol Received a well-deserved 94-point rating, noting: ""The cigars are rich and beautifully balanced, with notes of leather, coffee and a chocolate sweetness.""​",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Robusto']",Sungrown,Sungrown,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Corona, Double Corona, Robusto",No,Ecuador Habano,Ashton
Ashton Small Cigars,Rated 4.62 out of 5, Based on 60 Ratings ,"The finest money can buy“Dependable” is one of those words that gets thrown around a lot in the cigar game, but what does it really mean? Well, to me it means that you know what you’re getting. Whether it’s three in the afternoon or three in the morning, whether there’s rain, snow, or sweltering heat, whether you just found out that your old baseball card is worth six figures or whether you just got your credit card statement after your wife’s little shopping spree, it will deliver the exact same performance. Dependability. It’s a quality that’s often taken for granted, and one that deserves much more credit than it’s given.Talk about Ashton cigars and within a couple of sentences, dependability is bound to come up. Made in the Dominican, they combine an aged blend of mellow Dominican tobacco leaves with a golden brown Connecticut shade wrapper. The result of this pairing is rich and smooth, with a mellow to medium body that boasts universal appeal. Well-made, good quality, satisfying, and yes, highly dependable – these are the things that Ashton is made of.Ashton offers an array of smaller formats to experience this exquisite blend for when a more concise, but equally savory experience is desired. Shop them all below.Click here to shop Ashton's more traditional, full sized cigars. ",Mellow,"['Cigarillos', 'Petite Corona']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Cigarillos, Petite Corona",No,"Cameroon, Connecticut, Connecticut Broadleaf",Ashton
Ashton Symmetry,Rated 4.69 out of 5, Based on 29 Ratings ,"Reunited and it feels so good!For years, cigar fans waited for Ashton and Arturo Fuente to collaborate again. And with Symmetry, it finally happened. Some things in life are worth waiting for, and we're happy to report that Ashton Symmetry is most certainly one of them. Ashton and Arturo Fuente have teamed up to create a scrumptious, medium-bodied morsel. Symmetry also serves as the first Ashton-branded cigar to contain Nicaraguan tobacco. A perfect Ecuadorian Habano wrapper that’s oily, smooth, and golden brown is accented by a Dominican binder and Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers. This well-proportioned blend offers notes of cinnamon, caramel, and a hint of white pepper on the finish. Naturally, it holds true to the smoothness and balance that Ashton is known for.Ashton Symmetry was named the #8 Cigar of 2015, AND the #6 Cigar of 2017, and received numerous well-deserved 94-ratings, noting: ""Both creativity and textbook precision integrate quite elegantly here, as notes of nougat, toast, chicory and nuts blossom on the palate and stay interesting down to the robusto’s last puff.""",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Yes,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Ashton
Ashton VSG,Rated 4.86 out of 5, Based on 49 Ratings ,"The 94-rated beast from Ashton cigars.Ashton VSG cigars are extremely well-made gems from the Dominican Republic that represent one of the cigar world's most prized non-Cuban cigars. The tobaccos used are exquisite, making each cigar within the line a homerun from start to finish. Taken from the tobacco plant's highest primings, the Ecuadorian sun grown wrapper offers a rich, reddish hue and spicy, chewy flavor. The 4-5 year old Dominican long-fillers are masterfully blended to promote a smooth, but eventful flavor that's hearty and robust. Together, these tobaccos combine to satisfy even the most achieved palates.In addition to an astounding 94-rating, Ashton VSG was also named one of the Top 25 Cigars of 2013. The review stated, ""Strong, oily, flavorful leaf that leaves an impression on the palate. It's one of the benchmark brands for Ashton... hearty flavor with a robust nuttiness and a caramel sweetness for balance.""",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Lonsdale', 'Perfecto', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Lonsdale, Perfecto, Presidente, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Sun Grown,Ashton
Asylum,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"Enter the Asylum ... and enjoy your stay.Don’t be fooled by the name. Asylum is far from a shark-jump into the uber-boutique realm of handmade cigars. The man behind the blends is Christian Eiroa, the mastermind and creator of the 94-rated Camacho. Christian has returned to his roots, with a shiny new factory and delicious, full-flavored tobaccos to play with. Enter the Asylum and savor the full-flavored goodness inside.Each Asylum cigar is medium in body and crafted using an aged blend of all Nicaraguan tobaccos. From the dark, toothy wrapper to the skillfully combined long-fillers within. This Nicaraguan puro hails from – you guessed it – Nicaraguan and booms with rich, medium to full-bodied nuances throughout the slow burn. Each cigar is rich and satisfying, with deep and chewy notes of black tobacco, coffee, and leather with a touch of spicy-sweet notes on the finish.Asylum has already caught the eye of critics earning a 91-rating noting: ""A full draw brings big flavor with this tiny cigar. Leather and coffee with hints of green apple make this smoke pleasingly tart and robust.""",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Habano, Nicaraguan",Asylum
Asylum 13,Rated 4.92 out of 5, Based on 50 Ratings ,"Asylum 13 cigars....good enough to drive you insane.Years ago, Christian Eiroa and his 94-rated Camacho family of brands conquered Honduras. Today, he's out to conquer Nicaragua. Enter the Asylum, a gorgeous, boutique lovely showcasing the very best Nicaragua has to offer, let alone the raw blending talents of Eiroa himself.Asylum 13 cigars are true Nicaraguan puros. A dark, Nicaraguan Habano wrapper cloaks a feisty combination of aged Cuban-seed long-fillers grown throughout the black, volcanic soils of Nicaragua. Upon igniting, one can expect a complex, medium to full-bodied array of flavorful, Nica-influenced goodness, along with a slow, cool burn letting you fully appreciate every last nuance. Earth, cocoa, espresso bean, black tobacco, sweet notes, and gentle spices. Indeed, Asylum 13 is eventful throughout, and a cigar you don't want to miss out on.",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto",No,Habano,Asylum
Asylum 13 Authentic Corojo,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Hello, Honduras.Asylum 13 Authentic Corojo takes a departure from the previous Asylum blend and ditches Nicaragua for Honduras. And it should come as no surprise – Christian Eiroa and family are well-known for their skilled use of the Honduran leaf, which is notoriously finicky and difficult to perfect. But on the Eiroa family farm in the Jamastran Valley in Honduras, the growers have managed to develop an exemplary product, which makes up the base for the newest addition to the Asylum family.This all-Honduran puro is legit....super legit. A corojo seed wrapper that’s free from vein or blemish is lain overtop a mix of Honduran long-fillers for a balanced, full-flavored experience from start to finish. A rich tobacco core is punctuated by notes of refreshing citrus for a taste that’s truly unique. Take your pick of five sizes, including a monstrous 6”x70 behemoth.",Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto",No,"Corojo, Honduran",Asylum
Asylum 13 Connecticut,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 10 Ratings ,"Connecticut is running the asylumConnecticut wrapped cigars reign supreme in the cigar industry, and Asylum is throwing their hat into the ring with their latest release – Asylum 13 Connecticut. The brainchild of Christian Eiroa – of Camacho fame, and Tom Lazuka, Asylum cigars have built their reputation on full-bodied, big-ring beasts. This blend is a bit of a departure for the boutique brand – but rest assured, Asylum 13 Connecticut is not the tame run of the mill mild cigar - it’s got some serious huevos. Asylum 13 Connecticut is handcrafted at the El Aladino factory in Honduras and features a silky, golden Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper hugging a blend of Honduran long-fillers. Mild to medium-bodied, Asylum 13 Connecticut boasts a feisty flavor profile and makes its presence known from the start. This cigar is the perfect change of pace blend for full-bodied fanatics and offers up a heartier experience for those who prefer a milder cigar.  Try Asylum 13 Connecticut and I’m confident you won’t look at a Connecticut wrapped cigar the same way again. ​",Mellow-Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto']",Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Asylum
Asylum 13 Medulla Oblongata,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"A Cigar for Your Cerebellum The brainchild of Christian Eiroa and Tom Lazaka has evolved into what can only be described as insanely good. Asylum 13 offers bold blends with abundant flavor and craftsmanship that is nothing short of perfection - and the newest creation will blow your mind.Medulla Oblongata is composed of Honduran wrapper, binder, and filler - making this little puro a medium to full-bodied taste sensation with notes of leather, earth, espresso, and spice. What makes this cigar so unique is how it’s packaged. Each box comes with a 50/50 split where half of the cigars are Medulla (round parejos) and half are Oblongata (box-pressed cigars) – a great way to experience the variations of these two formats. Order a box today and step into the Asylum for an experience you won’t find anywhere else.",,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Corojo, Honduran",Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Corojo, Honduran",Asylum
Asylum 13 Medulla Oblongata Maduro,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"This is your brain on maduroAfter being one of the main minds behind the Camacho brand, it’d be hard to go anywhere but down in the industry. Luckily, Christian Eiroa has exceeded expectations, by starting his own boutique brand known as Asylum. Handcrafted in Honduras, each of these blends features abundant flavor with a level of craftsmanship that can’t be defined as anything other than perfection. Today, we’re staring down the barrel of the Maduro follow-up to the Medulla Oblongata, and it’s a most tasty treat indeed. Stepping up the cigar in terms of body and flavor, each one of these handmades booms out thick notes of black pepper, leather, espresso, and earth. Plus, each box features a 50/50 split of half round cigars and half box-pressed ones, allowing you to experience two uniquely nuanced versions of this showcase cigar. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Corojo, Honduran",Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Maduro, San Andres",Asylum
Asylum 13 Ogre,Rated 4.64 out of 5, Based on 33 Ratings ,"Get outta my swamp!Years ago, Christian Eiroa and his 94-rated Camacho family of brands conquered Honduras. Today, he's out to conquer Nicaragua. Enter the Asylum, a gorgeous, boutique lovely showcasing the very best Nicaragua has to offer, let alone the raw blending talents of Eiroa himself.Asylum 13 Ogre certainly is eye-catching. The first thing you’ll notice is the highly unique, Habano and Candela barber-pole wrapper. No chance of flying under the radar while enjoying this one. The second thing to catch your eye will probably be the massive sizes – other than the traditional 5""x50 robusto, this baby goes big and it ain’t messin’ around! The blend itself is a Nicaraguan puro, and is very similar to the original Asylum 13, with a complex, full-bodied array of flavors that are sure to satisfy. If you’ve been looking for something unique, then you’re in luck, because you just found it.",,"['Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,"Honduras, Nicaragua",No,,"Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto",No,Habano,Asylum
Asylum 33,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Check in to this asylum.Asylum cigars takes a detour from their usual approach with their new release, Asylum 33. Brand owners Christian Eiroa, of Camacho fame, and Tom Lazuka are focusing this line extension towards small batch manufacturing and the inclusion of hard to find tobaccos. Asylum 33 hails from the El Aladino factory in Danli, Honduras. This cigar is a Honduran puro that uses aged, premium 7 year old tobaccos resulting in a medium to full-bodied blend. You can expect your palate to be carpet bombed with flavors of red pepper, baking spices, chocolate, espresso, cream, wood, and leather. This stick is a slow burner with complexity, balance, and displays a pleasing evolution of flavors. ​",Medium-Full,['Gordo'],Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Gordo,No,Honduran,Asylum
Asylum Insidious,Rated 4.62 out of 5, Based on 29 Ratings ,"Insidious by Asylum.Insidious the horror movie may have made you cry like a little baby, but as luck would have it, Insidious by Asylum delivers quite the opposite effect. Tom Lazuka of Asylum Cigars created this blend to appeal to any cigar enthusiast, and each one features an uncharacteristically smooth profile and the first sweetened cap of any Asylum offering to date. This style of cigar was previously missing from the Asylum portfolio, so to please the masses, Insidious was born.Insidious utilizes the first Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper leaf of any Asylum release. Smooth and creamy, this wrapper conceals Honduran long-fillers and a Honduran binder, all combined to produce a relaxing, mellow experience. Each of the five vitolas in the line boasts a price point less than five buckaroos, making this sweet snack both easy on the palate and easy on the wallet.",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Yes,Ecuador Connecticut,Asylum
Asylum Insidious Habano,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Insidiously delicious.Asylum cigars come from the fertile minds of Tom Lazuka and Tom Baxter with some help along the way from Christian Eiroa. Asylum has been taking our industry by storm with their innovative and flavorful blends and edgy packaging.Asylum Insidious Habano comes dressed in a Habano wrapper atop a blend of Honduran long-fillers, and hails from the El Aladino factory in Honduras. This cigar boasts expert construction, a sweetened cap, and notes of spice, pepper, cream, and cocoa. Asylum Insidious Habano is medium to full-bodied and will provide an enjoyable experience whether you’re a longtime cigar fan or a newcomer. ​",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Short Robusto']",,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Short Robusto",Yes,Habano,Asylum
Asylum Insidious Maduro,Rated 4.55 out of 5, Based on 20 Ratings ,"The second Insidious, much darker than the first.The sweet capped, Insidious line by Asylum is in for another addition to the family. Riding high on the success of the Connecticut-shade, original Insidious line, the next offering comes to you sporting a Mexican San Andres wrapper leaf, and houses the same Honduran long-fillers and binder as the original. Equipped with a deliciously robust profile, Insidious Maduro boasts heady notes of cream, spice, and cocoa with a razor sharp burn. Sticking to a similar every day price-point, this offering is sure to sneak its way into regular rotations of sweet-cap fanatics overnight. ​",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Yes,San Andres,Asylum
Asylum Nyctophilia,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"A Delicious Dose of DarknessThe minds behind Asylum Cigars are once again giving fans an escape from reality, and this time - they’re going dark. This Honduran handmade blend from Tom Lazuka and Christian Eiroa is a must-try for anyone who wants a full-bodied blend. Nyctophilia literally means to have a preference for the darkness, and that’s exactly what you’ll have once you sample the brand’s newest blend. Masked in a sable San Andres wrapper with top of the line Nicaraguan fillers at the core, Asylum Nyctophilia is a full-bodied cigar that’s sure to sway your allegiance to the dark forces that are maduro wrapped gems. Full-flavored with notes of black pepper, cocoa, and a touch of earth - Nyctophilia is a certified dose of flavor that should not be missed.",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto",No,"Maduro, San Andres",Asylum
Asylum Straight Jacket,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"""Which one of you nuts has got any guts??""The brainchild of Christian Eiroa and Tom Lazuka, Asylum Straight Jacket is not for the timid. This is their strongest blend to date, and boy, does it deliver on that promise. Rolled by hand at the El Aladino factory, Straight Jacket is the first limited edition blend from Asylum.Straight Jacket is an all-Nicaraguan puro with a smooth, chocolate-y brown wrapper. But even more impressive than the wrapper is this band. Featuring an edgy, illustrated straight jacket, it really sets the tone for the cigar. A dense, intensely flavored powerhouse that's 100% consistent from start to finish. Notes of earth, pepper, cocoa, and coffee gradually reveal themselves, but in a way that means business. In this instance....it's ok to go a little loco.Asylum Straight Jacket received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""Packed solid with tobacco, this Churchill has a firm draw but delivers plenty of sugary sweet notes that range from malted chocolate to toasted almonds. It's balanced by notes of black pepper and oak.""",Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Nicaraguan,Asylum
Avanti,Rated 4.59 out of 5, Based on 87 Ratings ,"Tasty little firecrackers!The word Avanti also means ""forward"" in Italian, and these cigars have been moving forward in the industry for decades. After setting out to make the best cigar they could, at the best prices they could afford, Avanti was born, in a variety of different finishes. Now listen, these cigars ain't winning any beauty contests. But that's cuz they're free-rolled, with no press, and inside you'll find 100% American tobaccos from Kentucky and Tennessee. They're loaded little firecrackers, with each puff delivering wave after wave of full, rustic flavor. Smoked with Hickory logs, Avanti cigars are truly an experience you can't get anywhere else, and are something any cigar enthusiast should try. Avanti is available in five flavors: Anisette, Estilo Cafe Mocha, Bourbon, Vanilla, and Licorice.Note: The Anisette box of 50 is 50 individual Cigars in a 4.5"" x 34 size. The Anisette pack of 50 is made up of 10 boxes of 5 cigars in a 4.2"" x 32 size. ",,['Cigarillos'],,United States,False,No,More Details,United States,Varies,,Cigarillos,Varies,Kentucky Fire-Cured,
Avanti Ramrod,Rated 4.7 out of 5, Based on 30 Ratings ,"Team Ramrod!The Avanti Ramrod is a Bourbon-blended cigar utilizing only the best tobaccos that Tennessee and Kentucky have to offer. First released back in the day, Ramrod continues on the path of edginess. The package may have undergone a makeover, but these little flavor bombs still pack the same bold punch.  Avanti Ramrod provides a distinct hearty smokiness joining forces with a pleasant aroma to create a great everyday, flavorful blend.",Medium,['Cigarillos'],,United States,True,No,More Details,United States,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,Maduro,
Ave Maria,Rated 4.54 out of 5, Based on 565 Ratings ,"The One that Started It AllThe original Ave Maria cigar is, quite simply, a masterpiece. Produced at AJ Fernandez’s factory in Nicaragua, this ultra-premium blend is a shining example of a worthwhile boutique cigar. From the stunning packaging to the immaculate performance, each Ave Maria scores a perfect 10/10 in any category you judge it on. On top of this gem sits a gorgeous, silky Ecuadorian Habano wrapper. Clip the foot and give way to a medium to full-bodied, balanced profile featuring notes of earth, light spice, nuttiness, and a crisp, tobacco core. And it’s not just cigar nuts that love this stick, it’s cigar makers themselves. Alan Rubin of Alec Bradley and Nimish Desai of Rocky Patel both declared Ave Maria a fantastic cigar. Get yours today. ",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Salomon', 'Toro']",,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Perfecto, Presidente, Robusto, Salomon, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Ave Maria
Ave Maria Argentum,Rated 4.6 out of 5, Based on 194 Ratings ,"Witness Ave Maria’s dark side.The newest line from the best-selling Ave Maria, Argentum, is out to slay inferior cigars. Since Ave Maria first came on the scene praise has been universal, and we’ve had to put in overtime to make sure this delectable blend remained in stock. Brace yourself for Ave Maria Argentum, which puts the brand’s dark side front and center.Coming in a black, high gloss, handmade wooden box and arriving in the desired Morning Star vitola, Ave Maria Argentum makes its presence known from the start. Medium to full-bodied, this decadent beast comes dressed for battle in a dark and oily Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper. A peek under the armor reveals a luscious and hearty blend of Nicaraguan long-fillers setting the table for a flavorful feast at the round table. Flavors abound, including hearty and pleasing notes of dark chocolate, coffee, leather, cedar, with light spice playing in the background for the duration. Pick up the Ave Maria Argentum and join the fight against lesser blends. ​",Medium-Full,"['Double Robusto', 'Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Robusto']",,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Double Robusto, Gordo, Perfecto, Robusto",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Ave Maria
Ave Maria Dark Knight,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"For a limited time, you'll receive FREE shipping on your entire order when you buy a box of Ave Maria Dark Knight!Dark Knight rising…AJ Fernandez is man that needs no introduction. Especially with how well-loved the Ave Maria blends are to CI Nation. So don’t look at me like I’m crazy when I say this may be the best of the bunch. Look, I’m no joker, man. I take this very seriously. This blend is damn tasty, my friends. This potent Nicaraguan puro could be the strongest Ave blend yet. Loaded with a hefty dose of well-aged, flavorful long-filler tobaccos, Dark Knight is cloaked inside a dark Nicaraguan maduro wrapper. Upon lighting, you get notes of spice and leather up front, that finishes with a smooth, rich dark chocolate note. A potent as it is, this beauty still finishes smooth and balanced. But what else would you expect from AJ?  ",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Robusto,No,"Habano, Maduro, Nicaraguan",Ave Maria
Ave Maria Divinia,Rated 4.54 out of 5, Based on 197 Ratings ,"A divine new blend for the Ave Maria arsenal.Divinia. Cigar making at its finest. Only by holding one in your hand will you truly appreciate the magnitude of what’s been accomplished. By now, it is no secret that the Ave portfolio is ripe with some of the most enticing blends on the planet. Now, with the release of Ave Maria Divinia, a new standard has been set.With this offering, a lush, Habano Sun Grown wrapper encases a bold, ultra-refined core of Cuban-seed long-fillers. A Cuban-esque flavor profile dominated by notes of black pepper, cocoa, coffee, earth, and nutty sweetness, is delivered in a silky medium to full-bodied profile. Simply incredible…and stunningly presented in individual coffins. ",Medium-Full,['Toro'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,Toro,No,Sun Grown,Ave Maria
Ave Maria Immaculata,Rated 4.65 out of 5, Based on 233 Ratings ,"The ""Immaculata"" conceptionAnother instant hit from master cigar blender AJ Fernandez, a man whose portfolio of hits reads like the All Star Team of cigars....if such a thing existed. This is a kinder, gentler, mellower Ave Maria, and is well suited to most any taste preference. Only take this on if you’re in the market for delicious, smooth flavors from start to finish.Ave Maria Immaculata is awash in splendor. At hand, a golden brown and silky-smooth Ecuador Connecticut wrapper ensconces a well-aged blend of Cuban-seed Nicaraguan long-fillers for a taste that will satisfy your every whim. Mellow to medium in body, this high-end handmade caresses the palate gorgeously with notes of cream, cedar, white pepper, caramel, toasty tobacco, and a rich, aroma of baked bread. The taste of this masterpiece lingers long after your last puff.",Mellow-Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Ave Maria
Ave Maria Lionheart,Rated 4.83 out of 5, Based on 18 Ratings ,"A noble selection, fit for a king. We’re all on a crusade for reasonably-priced cigars that taste great and burn well, and sometimes this quest can seem Quixotic indeed. But one brand has always been a trusty squire in your joust with MSRPs, and that’s Ave Maria. Coming to you like a faithful steed from AJ Fernandez’s factory in Nicaragua, the Ave Maria Lionheart is always the perfect choice to lead your herf to delicious victory. Draped in a Sun-Grown wrapper is a lion’s share of Brazilian, Mexican, and Nicaraguan long-fillers secured by a Nicaraguan binder. Ave Maria’s blenders have traveled far and wide to exotic lands to gather the tobacco in this blend, and the result is nothing short of magnificent. Graceful, yet commanding, your palate will receive a royal feast of cedar, spice, coffee, and citrus notes, with a smooth finish. Grab a box today, because if you miss your chance you might have to launch a crusade to get more!",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,"Brazilian, Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Robusto",False,Sun Grown,Ave Maria
Ave Maria Reconquista,Rated 4.81 out of 5, Based on 105 Ratings ,"An extraordinary achievementReconquista from Ave Maria is a thing of considerable beauty. Spectacular, inside and out. I would comfortably stack this against any medium to full-bodied blend available today....to say Reconquista will compare favorably is an understatement. Gorgeously packed in heavy, giant chests – inside each cigar is individually encased in cedar coffin boxes then laid neatly over a bed of tobacco leaves. As good as this looks, the real juice is unquestionably the blend itself. Reconquista is made in one size only: a stately 7”x54 Torpedo. This big, yet manageable, vitola optimizes the rich blend of aged tobaccos….a size perfectly tailored to the cigar’s formulation. The wrapper is a dark, toothy Habano Oscuro variety grown in Brazil: thick and oily, sodden with a feisty and voluptuous character. Its filler tobaccos combine rich, well-aged, Cuban-seed, Nicaraguan-grown leaves from Esteli, Condega, and Jalapa. The combination explodes with uniquely rich and dense, finely balanced, and smooth flavors. Hearty notes of espresso, pepper, oak, spices, tobacco, and cocoa lightly dust the palate, leading to a toasty-sweet finish. ",Full,['Torpedo'],Honduran,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Torpedo,No,"Brazilian, Habano Oscuro",Ave Maria
AVO 30 Years - AVO LE05,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"A legend, returnedTo celebrate the AVO brand’s 30th birthday, AVO has decided to rerelease many of their best limited edition cigars for the past thirty years, with a special 30th Anniversary secondary band. Today, we’re staring down the barrel of one of AVO’s most popular cigars ever: the LE ’05. Released in just 1,500 boxes of 20, mark my words now – this cigar is going to sell out, and there’s no telling if or when we’ll see a rerelease of this blend again. The original blend is back in action — the AVO 30 Years LE ’05 utilizes an Ecuadorian wrapper leaf overtop a Dominican binder and Dominican long-fillers. It’s a medium to full-bodied profile that has been called, by many AVO fans, the best AVO limited edition release ever. Toasting this extremely rare cigar, you’re going to find a rich and spicy flavor, balanced by a unique toasty core of tobacco sweetness.",Medium,['Robusto'],Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Robusto,No,Ecuador Connecticut,AVO
AVO 30 Years LE - AVO Signature,Rated 3 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"The return of the champAVO Signature – named after the famous musician himself, the Signature was the personal blend of Avo Uvezian. This cigar was a mainstay in the AVO line for years, before going the way of the Dodo bird… but now, in celebration of the AVO brand’s big 3-0, the Signature line has been brought back in limited edition boxes of 10 with an eye towards modern aesthetics. Those familiar with AVO blends will find few surprises, on paper, in the Signature — AVO Signature uses an Ecuadorian Habano wrapper leaf overtop a Dominican binder and long-fillers. But the profile may surprise you: each puff of the AVO Signature delivers rich, satisfying woody flavors with oak and nuttiness to boot. It’s a cigar that can easily be burnt any time of day. The only catch? Only 1,500 boxes were made, so if you want to jump aboard the ship, do so now before she departs.",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Double Corona', 'Robusto']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Double Corona, Robusto",No,Ecuador Connecticut,AVO
AVO 30 Years LE AVO 22,Rated 5 out of 5,,"30 Years at the top2018 was a big year for Davidoff cigars. Not only did they celebrate the 50th anniversary of the Davidoff brand, but they also celebrated the 30th anniversary of AVO cigars, a brand that they produce and distribute. For the AVO brand, they celebrated by re-releasing some old limited edition blends that have disappeared from the market with new 30 Years secondary bands. The AVO 22 30 Years blend is probably one of the best in the lineup. Originally released in 2002, AVO 22 was a special cigar for Avo Uvezian, founder of AVO cigars, who was born on March 22nd and also arrived in the US for the first time on the 22nd. The blend is the same delicious concoction as the original – a golden brown Ecuadorian sun grown wrapper over a Dominican binder and four different varieties of Dominican long-filler. It’s a pleasant mellow to medium-bodied cigar with notes of sweet cedar, bread, pepper, and earth. Only 3,200 of the beautiful upright canisters of 19 were produced, grab one while you still can. ",Mellow-Medium,['Double Robusto'],Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Double Robusto,No,Ecuador Connecticut,AVO
AVO 30 Years Maduro,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Maduro makes a comebackThe AVO Improvisation series is a highly anticipated release every year. They take tobaccos from some of their current blends, then tweak and repackage them to create limited edition releases. This year’s Improvisation Series is a special one. Not only did they put out a new Improvisation blend, AVO Improvisation 30 Years No. 3, but they are celebrating the brands 30th birthday by also putting out a limited release of some previously discontinued blends. AVO Maduro 30 Years is one of them. AVO Maduro 30 Years returns in its four original sizes with only 600 boxes of each produced. It uses the exact same 90-rated blend we enjoyed in the past. A Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper is applied on top a Dominican binder and core of Dominican long-fillers. It’s medium to full in body with a rich, sweet, and creamy flavor profile. If you were a fan of AVO Maduro a few years back, I suggest you claim a box of these now, they won’t last long. ",Medium-Full,"['Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Pyramid, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,AVO
AVO Classic,Rated 4.74 out of 5, Based on 73 Ratings ,"AVO cigars are one of the most prestigious brands on the market.AVO cigars are the result of a collaboration between Hendrik Kelner, Avo Uvezian and Davidoff. Avo Uvezian is a composer, perhaps best known for penning Sinatra’s ""Strangers in the Night."" Together with Kelner’s cigar making skills and Davidoff’s reputation, Uvezian’s quest for perfection in a cigar has resulted in this one terrific blend. In fact, more than 2 million of these super-premium sticks are sold annually. The AVO Classic cigar is a beautifully constructed piece from the very finest premium leaves, including a silky Connecticut shade wrapper and Dominican long-filler leaves. The result is a creamy, smooth taste and wonderful aroma.  Secure yourself a box of these today, and rest assured you've always got a great blend to rely on. AVO Classic has earned a 90-rating, noting: ""There's a sweet tea quality to this cigar... complemented by a graham cracker note... picks up some intensity as it goes.""",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Pyramid, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,AVO
AVO Domaine,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"The Domaine series from AVO is a beauty.AVO Domaine offers the same consistent quality from the Davidoff factory, rolled with dark Sun-grown Connecticut wrappers from Ecuador, Dominican long-fillers and binder. But the kicker is a fuller, more robust flavor than the regular line that’s potent but not overwhelming. With a smooth and effortless draw. Lighting up the AVO Domaine, you'll find flavors of soft spices and an earthy core. It's a complex blend that stays interesting down to the nub. If you haven't tried AVO yet, Domaine offers the perfect chance to get on board. AVO Domaine received a well-earned 91-rating, noting: ""Earthy and well balanced. There are notes of orange peel and cumin... rich, smooth and elegant.""",Medium-Full,"['Cigarillos', 'Robusto', 'Salomon', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Cigarillos, Robusto, Salomon, Toro",No,Sun Grown,AVO
AVO Heritage,Rated 4.55 out of 5, Based on 49 Ratings ,"Introducing, AVO Heritage Series.The Heritage Series of AVO is a remarkable, medium to full-bodied blend that pays homage to the farmers, blenders, and rollers responsible for making AVO one of the industry's premier, super-premium brands. The AVO series holds a remarkable amount of esteem in this industry, and the 90-rated Heritage is one of the best cigars they make... and certainly the fullest-bodied!Avo Uvezian worked side by side with cigar-making legend Hendrik 'Henke' Kelner to select the finest Cuban-seed, Ecuadorian sun-grown wrappers attainable, and combine a robust mixture of Cuban-seed Dominican long-fillers inside. The result is a satisfying series of rich, complex flavors delivered in smooth, balanced fashion. The core is creamy with notes of toast and cocoa, and a touch of sweet cedar and subtle spices on the finish.AVO Heritage Series was awarded a 90-point rating, noting: ""A very dark and oily cigar that smokes evenly. It starts out a bit papery but warms to show a woody, leathery character and apple-like sweetness.""​",Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Habano,AVO
AVO Improvisation 30 Years No. 3,Rated 4.74 out of 5,,"30 years of AVONow 3 decades into this industry, AVO Cigars are a name to be reckoned with. The Davidoff owned brand is known for their musically inspired, top-shelf blends, with smooth Dominican profiles. The Improvisation Series was first introduced in 2015 and puts out limited edition releases utilizing tobaccos from previous AVO cigars and incorporates them into a whole new blend. AVO Improvisation 30 Years No. 3 is the 6th installment in the series and uses tobaccos from the AVO Classic blend, the oldest blend in this brands portfolio.The wrapper leaf applied on top is a golden brown Ecuadorian Marron wrapper. The blend tucked underneath uses the same Dominican binder and long fillers from the ever popular AVO Classic line. The result is a smooth medium bodied profile with an array of complex flavors. We get notes of cedar, earth, nuts, and a little bit sweet vanilla on the back half. Only 2,400 boxes were produced and we’re expecting a swift sellout. Jump on this high-end release while it’s still available. ",Medium,['Churchill'],Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Churchill,No,Ecuador Habano,AVO
AVO Improvisation LE19,Rated 3 out of 5,,"Break the mold.If you know luxury, you know AVO, the brand inspired by famed jazz artist Avo Uvezian and crafted by the illustrious luxury cigar maker Davidoff in the Dominican Republic. The LE19 is the seventh installment in the Improvisation series, and honors AVOs legacy of breaking the mold to create innovative & never-seen-before blends and packaging. For this release, AVO utilized a beautifully dark Ecuadorian wrapper overtop a Dominican binder, concealing five different tobacco leaf fillers from the Dominican and Peru. Creamy, spicy notes are at the forefront of this medium-full bodied blend, along with earth and cedar that will excite the palate and keep you coming back for more. The cigars are packed in boxes that represent a cigar mold, and feature a striking box-press that feels great in the hand. These are exclusive to the US market, but a limited quantity were made and when they’re gone, they’re gone. Rarely does a cigar harmonize this well on your palate, so be quick and don’t miss a beat!",Medium,['Toro'],Dominican,Dominican,False,,More Details,Dominican Republic,True,,Toro,False,Ecuador Habano,AVO
AVO Syncro Nicaragua,Rated 4.48 out of 5, Based on 61 Ratings ,"AVO goes flat and hits a high note.AVO cigars are the brainchild of composer Avo Uvezian and the master blender of Davidoff cigars, Henke Kelner. Usually known for their mellow to medium-bodied Dominican flavor profile, AVO cigars​​ have embarked on a new journey with the Avo Syncro, seeking to incorporate the diverse flavors from tobaccos sourced from Nicaragua, Peru, and the Dominican Republic.AVO Syncro Nicaragua is AVO​’s first box-pressed cigar, and the first in its portfolio to use nutrient-rich tobacco from the revered black volcanic soils of Ometepe, Nicaragua. Coming dressed in a gorgeous, oily, dark, Ecuador Connecticut wrapper concealing a Dominican binder and Nicaraguan, Dominican, and Peruvian Olancho long-fillers, AVO Syncro Nicaragua makes its presence known immediately.Medium to full-bodied, and with spot-on construction, expect a flavorful kick of spice and pepper before the cigar settles into notes of cream, leather, and cedar. Complex and boasting wonderful balance that AVO consistently delivers, Syncro will have you chomping at the bit for another go 'round.AVO Syncro Nicaragua received Top 25 honors for 2015 and a welll-deserved 93-rating noting: ""blocky dimensions and smart blending allow each tobacco to express itself, showing notes of leather, minerals and a dried apricot sweetness.""NOTE: The AVO Syncro Nicaragua LE 30 Years Box-pressed Toro features the same blend with limited edition packaging, celebrating 30 years of excellence for AVO cigars. ​",Medium-Full,"['Cigarillos', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, Peruvian",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Cigarillos, Gordo, Robusto, Short Robusto, Toro",Varies,Ecuador Connecticut,AVO
AVO Syncro Nicaragua Fogata,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"Hey, Fogata-bout it!If I'm spending top dollar on a cigar, I need to know it's amazing. I'll roll the dice on a bundled blend, but when we're talking ultra-premiums, I'm way too thrifty to gamble with my cigars. That's why I love new releases from Avo Uvezian and Henke Kelner. The men behind numerous Top 25 and 90+ rated cigars are back with another fantastic release, and based on the samples I went through, this may be one of my favorites ever.AVO Syncro Nicaragua Fogata cigars are a follow-up project to last year's 93-rated AVO Syncro Nicaragua. That box-pressed blend was the first AVO release to feature Nicaraguan leaf, and this one has even more. At the risk of being hokey: if it ain't broke, don't fix it! That typical Davidoff floral, grassy aroma was strong on the Ecuadorian Habano 2000 wrapper. After a quick clip and light, you'll find wood, leather, cinnamon, and a slightly sweet finish. In all, Syncro Nicaragua Fogata is a fantastic release that reminds me why I love AVO: Loads of flavor, high quality control, and a refreshing consistency from box to box. ​Note: The AVO Syncro Nicaragua Fogata LE 30 Years Toro vitola features the same great blend but comes in limited edition packaging, celebrating 30 years of excellence from AVO cigars. ",Medium-Full,"['Cigarillos', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Mexican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Yes,,"Cigarillos, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Habana 2000,AVO
AVO Syncro South America Ritmo,Rated 4.29 out of 5, Based on 17 Ratings ,"Git me mo’ ritmoFor the third cigar in their now-famous Syncro series, Avo wanted to do something a bit different. The first two entries in this esteemed line, the 93-rated Syncro Nicaragua and the sweet and spicy Nicaragua Fogata both featured… you guessed it, Nicaraguan tobaccos. With Ritmo, Avo flexes their blending muscles — tobaccos from seven different countries make up this intricate and complex handmade. Produced in the Dominican Republic, this stick has tobaccos from practically every cigar country featured inside. The filler blend is an astounding five ingredient cocktail of Nicaraguan, Peruvian, Brazilian, Honduran, and Dominican tobaccos. Add on the Ecuadorian wrapper and Mexican binder, and it’s clear why they named this cigar after a continent, not a country! The flavor here is a mixture of sweet coffee, roasted nuts, charred oak, and slight chocolate in a medium to full-bodied experience you’ll savor time and time again. Syncro is quickly becoming Avo’s best line of sticks, in my not-so-humble opinion, and South America Ritmo is one more notch on their belt of W’s. NOTE: The AVO Syncro Ritmo LE 30 Years Toro vitola features the same great blend but comes in limited edition packaging, celebrating 30 years of excellence for AVO cigars. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Mexican,"Brazilian, Honduran, Nicaraguan, Peruvian",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,Ecuador Habano,AVO
AVO Unexpected Series,Rated 4.48 out of 5,,"A masterpiece series that lives up to the name!As a former Jazz musician, Avo Uvezian has mirrored his finesse with music into each cigar he's ever created, making each their own work of art. From AVO Synchro to Avo Classic, Avo has created a unique experience for his customers, emerging them into different cultures. His most recent line, The Unexpected Series, showcases Avo's improvisation skills, as he has taken the line and created four different blends, each with it's own standout ingredient or process. While not much is known about the blends, we are privy enough to know the uniqueness of each and of course, we are sharing each with you.Unexpected Celebration - The yellow banded cigar was rolled with Dominican binder and fillers, wrapped in an Ecuadorian leaf and then aged 6 years.Unexpected Tradition - The green banded cigar has a blend that incorporates Peruvian tobacco. Unexpected Moment - The blue banded cigar was created using highly aromatic tobacco all grown at the same Dominican Republic farm.Expect the unexpected with these cigars. Journey into the unknown with AVO's newest line and immerse yourself into your own unique experience. We can't wait to hear all about it!",,['Toro'],Dominican,Dominican,False,,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,"Dominican, Ecuador Connecticut",AVO
AVO XO,Rated 4.56 out of 5, Based on 62 Ratings ,"Top of the line from AVO.The XO series from AVO is the cream of the crop from this factory - a factory already known for such legendary brands as Davidoff, the Griffin’s, and the regular AVO line. AVO XO is a masterpiece from the AVO brand, featuring tobaccos that are aged at least six years in each and every stick. Remarkably smooth, yet surprisingly complex, XO is a treat that you should indulge in whenever you can. Starting this party off, you'll find a Connecticut-seed Sun Grown Ecuadorian wrapper leaf that's incredibly smooth — almost no veins are visible on these flawless specimens. Underneath, Dominican binder and long-fillers support a medium-bodied profile with notes of cream, wood, spice, and dried fruits. It's a masterclass in blending, and you should certainly be dipping into these as quickly as you can.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,AVO
Baccarat,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 757 Ratings ,"Always a safe betI’ve never had Lady Luck on my side when it comes to playing cards, but at least I know that in the cigar world I can count on a ‘W’ when I go for a few rounds of Baccarat. One of our best-selling Connecticut-wrapped offerings, Baccarat is an extraordinary experience for the money. But don’t just take my word for it – over 600 members of CI Nation have given this handmade a well-deserved 4.5 out of 5 rating. The secret? Havana-seed Honduran long-fillers. Meld those together with a beautiful Mexican binder and you’ve got a recipe for success – a slightly sweet, coffee taste comes through on each puff, staying cool to the end. Baccarat comes in both Connecticut and Maduro wrapper varieties, but whichever one you go for, you’re going to come out on top.NOTE: Baccarat Candela returns after a nearly 5-year hiatus. This unique variation of the legendary, top-selling Baccarat line adds an interesting, but delicious twist to a mellow, slightly sweet iconic blend. Limited to only 700 total boxes, this annual release will be gone as quickly as it came. ",Mellow,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Double Corona', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Lonsdale', 'Petite Corona', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Mexican,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Cigarillos, Double Corona, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Lonsdale, Petite Corona, Presidente, Robusto, Toro",Yes,"Candela, Connecticut, Connecticut Broadleaf, Maduro",Baccarat
Baccarat Candela,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 35 Ratings ,"The bestselling Baccarat goes green!Baccarat has built a solid reputation for being one of the world’s highest quality mellow-bodied cigars with a slightly sweet twist. Baccarats are fantastic, and are great for someone looking for the perfect morning smoke or a little change of pace. But today we shine the spotlight on Baccarat Candela which returns after nearly a 5-year hiatus. The Baccarat Candela version combines the rich, mellow earthiness of aged-premium Honduran tobaccos with the unique subtleties of a candela leaf. Add in the trademark naturally sweet pectin used to create the traditional Baccarat blend and you have yourself an interesting new mellow-bodied handmade. Rich, earthy, slightly peppery and pleasantly sweet, the Baccarat Candela is limited to only 700 boxes total, I suggest you pick up this annual release before they’re gone. ",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Robusto']",Mexican,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Robusto",Yes,"Candela, Connecticut",Baccarat
Baccarat Nicaragua,Rated 4.4 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"Are you game?Just like a Las Vegas card shark on a winning streak, Baccarat cigars are the always-satisfying best-selling cigar in their class and price range, with unmatched quality and a delectable slightly-sweet flavor. Their classic Connecticut-wrapped cigar is already one of the most popular in the US, but now they’re pulling out a card hidden up their sleeve and upping the ante with the Baccarat Nicaragua. Coming wrapped in a sultry Habano wrapper and featuring a Sumatra binder over Nicaraguan fillers, the toasty and slightly sweet leather and cedar flavors are always a safe bet. This medium-bodied blend will win the hand every time, and you’ll be taking home the pot. With a buy-in this low, you don’t need to hesitate to step up to the table and lay your cards down.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Double Corona', 'Petite Corona', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Sumatra,Nicaraguan,False,False,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Double Corona, Petite Corona, Presidente, Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,Baccarat
Backwoods Cigars,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 431 Ratings ,"Relish in the famous taste of Backwoods Cigars for all cigar fans to take pride in. Browse through our selection and choose your favorite Backwoods flavors. Pick up a box of Backwoods in a variety of flavors like Black and Sweet, Honey, Honey Berry, Sweet Aromatic and Backwoods Original Cigars here at Cigars International. The Backwoods Cigarillos line includes:Original: smooth, easy on the palate, and full of complex flavor Sweet Aromatic: mellow and smooth with a fragrant scent and distinct tasteHoney: golden honey sweetens up the natural tobaccos of this classicBlack N’ Sweet Aromatic: dark, short, and tasty – a lusciously fragrant classic cigarHoney Bourbon: delightful sweetness mixes with a smooth kick of the best Kentucky bourbonDark Stout: creamy, dark flavors of stout beer pair with smooth tobaccosRussian Cream: uniquely aromatic and satisfying with smooth flavor of vodka, coffee liqueur, cream, and dark coffee Honey Berry: Flavors of fresh berries are perfectly complimented by a touch of golden honey",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,Dominican,True,No,More Details,United States,No,,Cigarillos,Varies,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Indonesian",
Bahia B-Line,Rated 3.88 out of 5, Based on 100 Ratings ,"Bahia's backyard burner!Amazingly, the original Bahia B-Line received a ‘90’ rating – an exquisite value cigar that’s perfect for everyday enjoyment. Simply a well-made sandwich cigar with mixed filler leaves from other Bahia blends, covered by a nice-looking Indonesian wrapper leaf. The blend is medium in body with some spice and earth. There’s a tendency to burn a little hot if you puff too fast, but take your time, and this sipper won’t disappoint. Save them for the backyard and bbq crowd, and I guarantee you’ll be seeing smiles from ear to ear. Thankfully, my insane-in-the-membrane prices – as low as $40 in a box – get your humidor stocked to the brim while keeping the wallet fat and happy. ",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto', 'Rothschild']",Habano,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Belicoso, Robusto, Rothschild",No,Indonesian,Bahia
Bahia Blu,Rated 4.11 out of 5, Based on 531 Ratings ,"Don’t be blue, get BahiaMan, I love my job. Not only do I get to chug beer and burn cigars all day long, I also get to deliver unfathomable deals to CI Nation day in and day out. One of my personal favorites? Bahia Blu, a superstar entry in the anthology of competition crushing deals. Yes, truly a champion of the bundled cigar world, Bahia Blu represents entry #12,743 in the CI handbook of MSRP destroying insanity. Bahia Blu is a medium-bodied handmade from Nicaragua that’s priced to move every day. Dressed in a fairly attractive Corojo wrapper that’s smooth and glistening, you’ll find 5 to 6-year-old Nicaraguan long-fillers grown in Esteli, Jalapa, and Leon. The end result is a rich and toasty flavor with a sweet, cedary core and a crisp, lingering aftertaste. But the best attribute by far? The crazy low price. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Corojo,Bahia
Bahia Brazil,Rated 4.26 out of 5, Based on 283 Ratings ,"Bahia’s fourth winnerBahia has long been among the best-selling bundles in our lineup, and for great reason. The extreme combination of value to flavor is unparalleled by any other brand in the biz, and with Bahia Brazil, the folks behind Bahia add one more thoroughbred, affordable gem to their stable.Ah, Brazil! Country of all things musical and Carnavale. And now, Brazil can add a new trophy to its case – in addition to being the bikini capital of the world, it’s also home to my new favorite Bahia cigar! Starting off with Nicaraguan long-fillers, these tobaccos are finished with a fine Brazilian maduro wrapper. Easily the richest of the Bahia bundled products, you’ll find notes of dark chocolate, earth, and spice. Get aboard this Bahia Brazil today, and never look back. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Brazilian, Maduro",Bahia
Bahia Connecticut Deluxe,Rated 4.16 out of 5, Based on 186 Ratings ,"A Deluxe blend at a value priceStarting under $1.50 per stick, how could you go wrong? Well, there are a few ways you could, but luckily with Bahia Connecticut Deluxe, that isn’t the case. Here, Bahia delivers in spades. At hand, boxes of 40 ‘Cuban sandwich’ style, Ecuador-grown Connecticut wrapped stogies that are equipped with all the quality and flavor you would expect from blends boasting price tags five times steeper. Fancy bands and boxes were bypassed with the main focus being to deliver an affordable, tasty blend that you will be able to partake in every day. Enjoyable notes of cream, cedar, and a slight spice entertain the palate while you are knee deep in that honey-do day. But whether you are kickin’ around a cigar while doing some yard work, or enjoying it with a cocktail as the day is winding down, at these tasty prices, you simply can’t go wrong. ",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Bahia
Bahia Gold,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 14 Ratings ,"The gold standard of Bahia.Bahia has been churning out delectable handmades for years, but none have withstood the test of time like the brand’s flagship, Bahia Gold. A full-bodied, full-flavored handmade, Gold has been the veritable poster-child of Bahia, proving time and time again to be one of the most impressive and well-rounded blends in its portfolio.Using the same recipe as the original Costa Rican versions blended by Don Douglas way back in the 1980's, and hand-crafted in small, yearly allotments, Gold is a complex and impressive box-pressed creation. No doubt a full-bodied offering, Bahia Gold is enticingly smooth. Puff after puff reveals notes of leather, espresso, and a touch of spice behind a bold toasty tobacco core. A well-balanced offering, Bahia Gold sets the bar, and sets it high.",Full,"['Robusto', 'Rothschild', 'Torpedo']",Pennsylvania Broadleaf,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Robusto, Rothschild, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Sumatra,Bahia
Bahia Gold Maduro,Rated 3.75 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"Gold goes dark.It's not easy living in the shadow of a 91-rated sibling, but luckily the Bahia Gold Maduro embraces the expectations, to deliver a highly worthy follow-up to the esteemed Bahia Gold. Bringing big-league flavors and complexity to the plate, the Bahia Gold Maduro is another home-run. Utilizing the original recipe crafted by Don Douglas in the 1980's Costa Rican factory, Bahia Gold Maduro is a treat for the senses. Up front, spicy-sweet notes coat the palate, as layers of cedar, coffee, tobacco, and a toasty finish soon follow suit. Remaining exceptionally smooth and delightful throughout, the Bahia Gold Maduro is a welcomed full-bodied contender in the Bahia Gold line. ",Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Sumatra,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Bahia
Bahia Maduro,Rated 4.4 out of 5, Based on 521 Ratings ,"Bahia delivers while the CI Hit Squad empties both barrels in its ongoing War on High Price.Bahia Maduro is Exhibit #19,650, delivering tasty handmades at prices that can best be described as recklessly low. Bahia Maduro is the one that put Bahia on the map some years ago: an all Nicaraguan-blend of aged Cuban-seed tobaccos secured in a 3-year old Habano binder from Nicaragua and cloaked in a dark and oily Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper. Expect thick plumes of heavy flavor as this medium-bodied Bahia dishes out a rich tobacco core complemented by notes of coffee bean and earth. Price seals the deal: 20 handmades, heavily discounted. Your choice of three chunky sizes. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Habano,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Bahia
Bahia Trinidad,Rated 4.24 out of 5, Based on 119 Ratings ,"CI S-CHIP Buster #2,481.One could view Bahia Trinidad as not merely a cigar but an indispensable weapon in the war on high cigar prices. Oh yes, that just happened. CI prices on this nice little handmade will transport you to a time when, pre-SCHIP taxes, there was a quaint notion of cigars actually being affordable. Well, click the heels of your ruby slippers gents because we’re back in Kansas and these cigars are practically chump change! Here’s a Nicaraguan puro crafted with a dark and oily Nicaraguan Criollo wrapper cultivated 2 years ago, optimally fermented and then tucked away for a cedar-nap ever since. Combined with this wrapper is a blend of 4-year-old Nicaraguan long-leaf tobaccos grown from Cuban seeds in Esteli and Condega. The end result is an aromatic, medium-bodied mix with mingling notes of cedar, cinnamon, and sweet tobacco flavors. Actually the real end result is a toothy grin on your haggard face after you realize all this cost you peanuts.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Criollo,Bahia
Balmoral Anejo XO,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Perfect boutiques from San PedroBalmoral cigars may be new on the scene, but they were born from a ton of experience. The creation of Royal Agio’s 4th generation CEO, it’s safe to say that these cigars come from a long and storied history of working with premium tobaccos. Handrolled in their boutique factory, San Pedro de Macoris in the Dominican Republic, every Balmoral cigar promises to offer a unique and balanced profile unlike anything you’ve experienced before. For the Balmoral Anejo XO, they’ve selected a sun-grown Brazilian Arapiraca wrapped leaf aged for an average of 10 years. Underneath the wrapper, you’ll find a Dominican Olor binder along with Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers and an exclusive Stalk-Cut Brazilian Mata Norte leaf. The results are delicious, delivering complex notes of cedar, cocoa and spice with a smooth and sweet finish.",,"['Corona', 'Lancero', 'Robusto', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,"Brazilian, Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Corona, Lancero, Robusto, Short Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,Brazilian,Royal Agio Cigars
Balmoral Anejo XO Connecticut,Rated 4.83 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"XO goes to ConnecticutSince they began their revolution in the industry, Balmoral cigars have been an absolute success. Each one of their blends delivers a load of complex, unique flavors and they’ve all been racking up awards across countless publications. So when they told me they were developing a Connecitcut blend, I was more than enthused. Today, we welcome their newest achievement: Balmoral Anejo XO Connecticut. Crowned with a shade-grown wrapper from the Connecticut River Valley, these Dominican handmades provide a luxuriously creamy experience. Underneath the genuine US wrapper leaf, an Ecuador Sumatra binder leaf encases Dominican Olor and Pennsylvania long-fillers plus the exclusive, stalk-cut Brazilian Mata Norte leaf that made the original XO so popular. Lighting it up, you’ll find a mixture of vanilla and toasted caramel notes with hints of white pepper. Good news! Balmoral Anejo XO Connecticut has received a 92-point rating, noting: ""Topped with a fantail cap, this short blond robusto draws perfectly, imparting a cedary, nutty smoke that also shows notes of coffee bean, vanilla and earth.""",Mellow-Medium,[],Sumatra,"Brazilian, Dominican, United States",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,,No,Connecticut,Royal Agio Cigars
Balmoral Anejo XO Nicaragua,Rated 5 out of 5,,"A new Nicaraguan, aged to perfection.Balmoral is a name you might not be too familiar with (yet), but the world certainly knows about their parent company Royal Agio. Agio has been making cigars in Europe since 1904 in their factories located in Sri Lanka, the Dominican Republic, Belgium, and the Netherlands, but only recently have premium, long-filler cigars come out of the Dominican factory bearing the name Balmoral. So far every one of their releases has been right on the money, and no holds were barred in the production of their first cigar ever to wear a Nicaraguan wrapper.Underneath the rich Nicaraguan Habano wrapper lies a Cuban-seed Brazilian binder and one of the most unique filler blends we’ve ever seen. The finest, aged Dominican Olor and Nicaraguan Esteli leaves are mixed with Balmoral’s stalk-cut Brazilian Mata Norte, the special leaf responsible for most of the amazing flavors you get from Agio’s premium brand. It took Royal Agio quite some time to perfect this medium-full bodied blend, but when the rich earth and espresso flavors hit your palate, their refusal to compromise becomes immediately evident. Grab a box of Balmoral Anejo XO Nicaragua, and taste the top 5% of tobacco quality. ",Medium-Full,"['Corona Extra', 'Gran Rothschild', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Brazil,"Brazilian, Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,False,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona Extra, Gran Rothschild, Short Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Nicaraguan,Royal Agio Cigars
Balmoral Anejo XO Oscuro,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Go all in on XOBalmoral Anejo has a simple mission statement: use the top 5% of select, premium tobaccos available and deliver meticulously crafted, sophisticated cigars. Sounds simple, right? Well, when you’re a 4th generation CEO of a large tobacco company, and own your own boutique factory in the Dominican Republic, it’s certainly attainable. But don’t take my word for it: the proof is in the pudding. And each Balmoral release that hits the shelves keeps flying off and receiving tons of industry praise.Today, I’m taking a look at the fullest-bodied blend in the Balmoral profile, the Anejo XO Oscuro. Crowned with a Sun-Grown, Stalk-Cut Mexican San Andres wrapper leaf, the Anejo XO Oscuro also features a Dominican Olor binder overtop Dominican, Nicaraguan, and stalk-cut Brazilian Mata Norte long-fillers. The result is a complex blend of dark chocolate, espresso and black pepper with a smooth, sweet finish. ",Medium-Full,[],Dominican,"Brazilian, Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,,No,Dominican,Royal Agio Cigars
Balmoral Serie Signaturas Dueto,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"The perfect “duet”oThe Serie Signaturas is the newest innovation from Balmoral cigars, and it’s certainly starting off on the right foot. Designed as a collaboration-based platform to help shine a spotlight on exciting new cigar blends, the first Balmoral Serie Signaturas is a collaboration between Boris Wintermans and the man, the myth, the legend: Ernesto Perez-Carillo. Dueto is the first release from Balmoral not rolled at the boutique San Pedro factory in the Dominican Republic. Instead, it’s rolled by hand at Tabacalera La Alianza (the winners of the #1 Cigar of the Year award in 2018). Featuring a stunning Nicaraguan leaf overtop Nicaraguan and Brazilian long-fillers, Dueto delivers a medium-bodied profile starring notes of roasted nuts, slight sweetness, and a rich earthiness that’ll keep you coming back for more.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Figurado', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Brazilian, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Figurado, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Nicaraguan,Royal Agio Cigars
Balmoral Serie Signaturas Paso Doble,Rated 5 out of 5,,"The flower of collaboration.Balmoral is making their rounds. The relatively new boutique brand has established themselves as an excellent independent producer, and the EP Carillo-made Dueto proved their skill when it comes to playing nice with the competitors. Now Balmoral is back with their second collaboration cigar, and they went in with a company that has never made anything but their own cigars up until now. That company is LFD, and that cigar is the Balmoral Serie Signaturas Paso Doble.The Paso Doble comes equipped with with a creamy Ecuador Habano wrapper concealing a Dominican binder and Dominican fillers from Litto Gomez’s legendary farms in the Dominican. The exquisite, full-bodied notes of nuts, oak, pepper, and earth in this gem are a result of Litto and Boris Winterman bringing all of their best leaves and their combined wealth of knowledge to the blending table, and the excellent construction is all thanks to their meticulous quality control. Add a box to your cart today, and don’t miss out on one of the greatest collaborations in the history of tobacco. ",Full,"['Double Corona', 'Double Toro', 'Robusto Extra']",Connecticut Broadleaf,Dominican,False,,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Double Corona, Double Toro, Robusto Extra",No,Ecuador Habano,Royal Agio Cigars
Bandidos,Rated 4.58 out of 5, Based on 641 Ratings ,"Mellow n’ sweet.Bandidos are not long on looks. But these rough little sons of a gun are super tasty, offering a crisp tobacco flavor and oh-so-gentle draw. In fact, these cheroots are made entirely by hand, crafted without binders. Torcedors simply bunch the fillers and apply a dark Sumatra wrapper.  The tips have been sweetened to provide a delicious, sweet and smooth taste. And the price! Indeed the price! These quality handmades even beat out its machine-made counterparts. So pick up a “bale” or two today and save mightily while enjoying delicious cheroots you can chaw on all day long.GREAT NEWS! Bandidos finally spawned a sequel and it's every bit as delicious as the original. Try the new Bandidos Black here.",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,Sumatra,
Bandidos Black,Rated 4.09 out of 5, Based on 98 Ratings ,"Dark n’ rich. Bandidos. A humble bundle of smooth n’ sweet cigarillos that’s become one of our absolute best-sellers in a matter of a few years. No lie. They may not be the prettiest on the eyes, but they’re damn tasty and insanely enjoyable to burn through… why else would guys come into our Bethlehem, PA store and buy these by the literal armful? Today, we’ve got a brand new addition to the Bandidos profile, the first sequel to this monstrous success story. Welcome, Bandidos Black. Handmade in the same style as the original Bandidos, the Black is a darker, richer version of the cigar that’s just as delicious as the first. Wrapped in an Olancho leaf with a slightly sweetened tip, you’ll find plenty to love with this new edition. Just be warned — if this thing is even half as popular as the first Bandidos then an insane mob is forming, ready to pillage our warehouse of all of our inventory right about… now. ",Medium,['Cigarillos'],,,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,Maduro,
Belstaff Bond,Rated 4.57 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"With nearly 100 years of history, Belstaff is known worldwide for its unique style and products. In 2016, Belstaff released its first cigar brand with a flagship blend that’s bold, rich, and creamy. Handcrafted in the Dominican Republic’s most prestigious factory – the home of Macanudo, Cohiba, and more – Belstaff Bond employs a delicious blend of aged long-fillers finished with a dark, sultry Ecuadorian wrapper. The result is a blend that’s spicy, with notes of nuts, wood, pepper, sweet cream, and more. In short, this one will satisfy even the most discerning palate. ",Medium-Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Brazilian, Dominican, Mexican",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Sumatra,Bugatti Cigars
BG Meyer Gigantes,Rated 4.7 out of 5, Based on 27 Ratings ,"Big personality, BG Meyer Gigantes.Running amuck in the industry the past couple years, the Board of the Bold (Mike Ditka, Matt Booth, and Rob Weiss) have dished out a gaggle of top-tiered blends. This powerhouse conglomerate prides themselves on delivering cigars of the utmost intensity and character, and the newest release from Rob Weiss’ BG Meyer line is as intense as they come. Crafted to pay homage to the pioneers of bold character, people who dared to speak their minds when no one else would, has a character of its own that can easily go toe to toe with the strongest personalities on the planet.Packing a combined age of over 20 years, the tobaccos utilized in this masterpiece are as refined as they come. Gigantes features a dark chocolate-colored, oily Nicaraguan Habano wrapper leaf cultivated in 2007. Underneath, this concoction boasts a Brazilian Mata Fina binder aged for a minimum of 6 years which hugs vintage Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers also with at least 6 years of aged behind them. Medium to full-bodied, bold notes of black pepper, licorice, and a lingering sweet spice are all noticeable with a hint of leather sneaking in on the back of the palate. Make time for this blend because it is sure to grab your full attention.BG Meyer Gigantes received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""Packed solid with tobacco, this Churchill has a firm draw but delivers plenty of sugary sweet notes that range from malted chocolate to toasted almonds. It's balanced by notes of black pepper and oak.""​",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Short Robusto']",Brazil,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Short Robusto",No,Nicaraguan,Camacho
Big Johnny by Island Jim,Rated 4.73 out of 5,,"Get big! The Leaf by Oscar brand has been sweeping the nation for the last few years, with cigar fanatics lining up around the block to get their hands on these uniquely packaged gems. Today, we welcome a new, insane cigar from the Leaf by Oscar crew – the Big Johnny by Island Jim. Just be warned: this cigar is BIG. Crafted in one size, a massize 8”x66 jawbreaker, the Big Johnny is gonna get your through at least one and a half football games, or a long afternoon of downing longnecks and grilling. In all seriousness, this mammoth stick will easily last you at least two-hours, and it’ll keep you entranced the whole time. Big Johnny delivers loads of dark tobacco, chocolate, cocoa, and naturally sweet notes, proving that even big cigars can be super complex. ",Medium,['Gordo'],Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Gordo,No,Nicaraguan Jalapa,
Big Papi by David Ortiz,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Hey slugger, take a swing at this Any baseball fan knows the name David Ortiz – a Dominican Republic native that made a living 4-bagging balls out of the park in Boston and became well known as “Big Papi”. Heading into retirement, Ortiz decided to step up to the plate in the cigar industry. Teaming up with Tabacalera El Artista, creators of the 91-rated Exactus brand, they constructed a cigar to match Big Papi’s performance – one bound for the hall of fame. First crafted in 2013 for personal enjoyment and charity events, the Big Papi received great reviews and was taken commercial in 2016. Now for the good stuff.Right off the bat, the presentation is pleasing – a sleek red and white box that matches the band, showcasing a silhouette of Ortiz pointing to the heavens, and a red fabric foot band to top it off. Pop the box open and there it is – an oily Ecuador Habano Claro Wrapper rolled to perfection over a Dominican Criollo ’98 binder and packed with Dominican and Nicaraguan fillers. Pleasant notes of pepper and chestnut will first grace your palate, thanks to the Ecuador Habano wrapper, followed by a touch of cream, and brought all together with rich notes of earth and leather. This medium-bodied premium from David Ortiz isn’t your ordinary celebrity cigar, this thing is a home run.",Medium,['Toro'],Criollo '98,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,Ecuador Habano,
Black & Mild,Rated 4.82 out of 5, Based on 91 Ratings ,"Middleton's Black and Mild cigars are for sure one of the top-selling and sought after brands on the market. Why you ask? These delightful cigarillos are fitted with a comfortable plastic or wood tip for a consistent and dependable draw. Using broad-cut black Cavendish with Burley and golden Virginia tobaccos, Middleton offers a full-flavored, sweet taste with a pleasant aroma. Not to mention the Black & Mild cigars price is oh so affordable.When you’re looking for a quick and tasty yet cheap cigar Black and Milds are a bargain for your buck. These smooth and mellow machine-made treats offer a mouthwatering experience for any pipe enthusiast or flavor premium connoisseur. Don’t stop at just the regular Black and Mild cigars, with the Black and Mild cigars price, try all of the insanely good flavors including Black and Mild Cherry, Jazz, Gold & Mild and Casino. Buy any pack of Black & Milds and enjoy.",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,,True,No,More Details,United States,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,Indonesian,
Blackstone Cigars,Rated 4.93 out of 5, Based on 73 Ratings ,"Swisher’s black sheep! Composed entirely of premium pipe tobaccos, Blackstone is one of the best quick cigars for those seeking a little indulgence on their lunch break or drive home from work. Tipped for convenience, Blackstone cigars deliver a smooth, mellow, and satisfying profile from its Indonesian wrapper. Made right here in the USA, one taste of these cigars will quickly point you towards why they sell so well year in and year out.",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,,False,No,More Details,United States,No,,Cigarillos,No,Indonesian,
Blood Red Moon,Rated 4.11 out of 5, Based on 136 Ratings ,"​Time to get mooned.Blood Red Moon is definitely one of the most fascinating little cigars to come across my desk in quite a while. Weighing in between 4.7""x42 and 5.5""x54 and coming in your choice of 3 wrapper varieties, these little guys pack a lot of rich, smooth and highly enjoyable flavor into a petite frame. Handcrafted in the small-batch, well-respected TACASA factory in Nicaragua, these sticks are complex and slow burning, and there's a lot more to Blood Red Moon than a catchy name. Because if astronomy class taught me anything, it's that some of the greatest discoveries are the smallest in size.Connecticut: Subtle and smooth, with flavors of cream, earth, wood, and leather.Habano: Medium-bodied with notes of spice, cedar, and pepper.Maduro: Medium to full-bodied with nuances of smooth cream, subtle spice, chocolate, and coffeeNOTE: Each Culebra contains one cigar of every wrapper. So, a ""Pack of 6"" Culebras is technically 18 total cigars - 6 Connecticut, 6 Habano, 6 Maduro. ",Medium,"['Perfecto', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Perfecto, Petite Corona, Robusto",No,"Connecticut, Ecuador Habano, Habano Maduro",Cult
Blue Label B2 Cuban Wheels,Rated 3.93 out of 5, Based on 85 Ratings ,"Deep discount on price, no discount on flavor!A star is born. Hailing from the hallowed halls where Gran Habano and Blue Label - among others - call home, B2 is a gem that's ripe for the taking. Here's the deal: packaging is minimalist, the blend is all substance, and all costs were focused on making a deliciously flavorful handmade at a sharp price. Eyeball these plumpin' 30-count wheels lustily - the salivary glands start pumping and the wallet is safely out of harm's way. B2 is as low as $49.99 for a big-boy wheel of 30 cigars. That's bang for the buck if I've ever seen it. Handcrafted in Gran Habano's Danli, Honduras factory, Blue Label's B2 employs a dark Nicaraguan-grown Habano leaf overtop a complex blend of aged Nicaraguan and Panamanian tobaccos. Medium to full-bodied, B2 is brimming with dense, hearty flavors and complexity. Notes of earth, coffee and leather coat the palate while sweet and peppery nuances round out the mix. Satisfying and delicious, B2 is a thing of beauty that answers the bell when you need Cadillac flavor at Yugo prices.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,"Nicaraguan, Panamanian",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Habano,
Bold by Nish Patel,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Get Bold. Nish Patel, younger brother of Rocky Patel, proves that talent runs in the family. He spent five years perfecting a blend that would be worthy of the Patel name. It's got a flavor unlike anything you've tried before, so prepare to be amazed.Bold by Nish Patel starts with a smooth, dark brown and well-aged Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper. Take a peek under the hood and you will find a double binder, one San Andres and one Connecticut, and a balanced medley of Nicaraguan long-fillers from Jalapa and Esteli. The flavors are distinctive, and include white pepper, cocoa, sweet spice, and roasted coffee. Hearty, BOLD, and intense, it's hard not to take notice of this unique blend.",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Connecticut, Mexican",Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Rocky Patel Cigars
Bolivar,Rated 4.48 out of 5, Based on 31 Ratings ,"Rich in history and flavor, the Bolivar Dominican cigar!If you desire a cigar that is fuller in strength, look no further than Bolivar. Behind the well-known Bolivar cigar brand name lies a long, rich history in premium cigars dating back to 1901. Bold and authoritative yet not overwhelming are characteristics of the exceptional handmade that mimic those of one of history’s greatest liberators, Simon Bolivar. The dark, reddish-hued ligero wrapper from Honduras combines with a long-leaf blend of tobaccos from the Dominican Republic and two different types of Nicaraguan fillers. The result in these robust Bolivar cigars is a smooth profile with a slight sweetness on the aftertaste. Ideal for an end of the night indulgence before you hit the hay. As one of the best cigars out there, Get your Bolivar box of 25 while they’re still on the shelves. Viva Bolivar!Bolivar received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""A rich brown wrapper. This cigar burns and draws well, with creamy, slightly sweet flavors. A well-made cigar."" ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gigante', 'Robusto']",Connecticut Broadleaf,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gigante, Robusto",No,Ligero,
Bolivar Cofradia,Rated 4.48 out of 5,,"Not for the faint of heart.    Bolivar, a brand rich in premium cigar history dating back to 1901, and bearing last name of the famous liberator of Southern America from Spanish rule, has created yet another potent blend for its line. Drawing inspiration from Simon Bolivar's bold and authoritative battle strategies, cigar industry legend Estelo Padron designed their newest creation to come out swinging. Made in Honduras, Bolivar Cofradia combines Honduran and Nicaraguan long fillers with a Connecticut binder and wraps it up in a robust Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper creating a full-bodied profile filled with notes of hearty earth and spice, guaranteed to wow even the most seasoned aficionado. Solid construction and lengthy burn time round out the gratifying experience and make this the perfect addition to anyone's humidor. ",Full,"['Churchill', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Connecticut Broadleaf,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,,More Details,Honduras,False,,"Churchill, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",False,Ecuador Sumatra,
Bolivar Heritage Series,Rated 4.83 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"Bolivar solidifies its reputation.The legendary Bolivar brand has been re-imagined, rejuvenated, and reinvigorated. The story began back in the early 20th century when the brand, named after “The Liberator” Simon Bolivar, was founded in Cuba. A testament to their quality and consistency, Bolivar is now releasing the long-awaited Bolivar Heritage Series. Heritage opens up with a bang, boasting heady notes of cashew mixed with white pepper. It's Connecticut maduro wrapper is seamless, hiding an Ecuadorian Sumatra binder and long-fillers from Honduras and Nicaragua. The further you burn it down, notes of earth, leather, and spices are revealed. Another step in the right direction, Bolivar Heritage is a must-try. ​",Medium,['Robusto'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Robusto,No,Connecticut,
Boss Classic,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"Yeah that’s right, you show that cigar who’s boss.Boss Classic comes out of the gates swinging. With a name like Boss, the blend has a lot to live up to, and Boss Classic delivers on all fronts. With eye-catching packaging and handcrafted by a second generation blender, Boss Classic is a refined premium you don’t want to pass over.Crafted by Henke Kelner, Jr. in his Dominican factory, Boss Classic features a blend of Peruvian, Nicaraguan, and Dominican long-fillers tucked beneath a Brazilian wrapper. On the softer side of medium-bodied, this blend greets you with flavors of coffee, dried fruit, and wood, and delivers a well-balanced and complex experience. With immaculate construction, a subtle transition of flavors, and a room pleasing aroma, Boss Classic is an exceptional cigar and will be embraced by newbies and grizzled cigar vets alike. Pick up some Boss Classic cigars today and leave no doubt that you’re the boss of your domain. ​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, Peruvian",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Brazilian,Bugatti Cigars
Boutique Blends La Boheme,Rated 4.6 out of 5, Based on 10 Ratings ,"This new offering hits all the right notes. La Boheme is a grand addition to a line that needs no introduction. From Boutique Blends, the team behind the #1 non-Cuban cigar of the year, La Boheme takes its name from Giacomo Puccini’s distinguished 1895 opera. Which happens to be Boutique Blends owner Rafael Nodal’s favorite work of Puccini’s. La Boheme emerges with enough class to match its refined taste and its ornate presentation is as striking as the Sydney Opera House itself.The blend starts softly, with well-aged Dominican long-fillers before slowly growing in strength. Gradually, the exquisite Ecuadorian Habano wrapper brings the mixture together, producing a truly enjoyable medium to full-bodied experience that’s layered with rich notes of coffee, wood, nuts, cream, and caramel. ​Very limited production to ensure a high quality product. So when you see em’ – snag em’!   La Boheme received Top 25 honors for 2015 (#12 overall) and a 94-rating noting: ""The combination of Ecuadoran Habano wrapper and Cuban-seed tobaccos has all the dynamic range of an operatic performance, hitting baritone notes like earth and ripe fruit, all the way to bright soprano tones of spice, ending with a midrange nutty finish.""​",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Toro']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,
Boutique Blends La Boheme Encantador,Rated 4.82 out of 5, Based on 11 Ratings ,"A simply lovely blendWhy mess with a good thing? I can only think of one solid reason…to make it better! And that’s what Boutique Blends set out to do with the newest extension of the fan-favorite, 91-rated La Boheme. The new addition, dubbed La Boheme Encantador, ratchets up the intensity for a flavor-filled, full-bodied show-stopper that’s sure to follow down the same path paved by the original.Featured on Encantador’s face is a high priming Ecuadorian Habano wrapper leaf, dark and chock-full of oily goodness. Lying just beneath, Dominican binder and long-filler leaves intertwine in sturdy, box-pressed fashion. Bold, rich notes of white pepper, honey, oak, and spice excite the palate from first light. If you’re looking for your new favorite treat, look no further.​",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,
Brazilian Cream,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 14 Ratings ,"Get on the Cream Team!When you’re perusing the insane discounts and great prices on all things cigars at Cigars International, you’ll no doubt notice our huge selection of bundle-brand sticks. Bundle brands fill a particular niche in the cigar industry, perfect for days outside doing yardwork, kicking it in the garage, after a few drinks, or whenever you need something to puff on that won’t break the bank. The quality of these selections runs the gamut, but when we tried a sample of these Brazilian Creams, a lot of us couldn’t even tell the Nicaraguan filler is Cuban-sandwich style. The hearty Brazilian wrapper provides rich, zesty notes and the finish is redolent of cigars five times the price. Grab a bundle of Brazilian Cream, and light up for pennies with pride!",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Brazilian,
Brick House,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 108 Ratings ,"She's a....Originally created by Julius Caeser Newman in 1937, Brick House has been a stalwart in the industry for decades. The brand gets it's name from the family's house in Hungary, a (you guessed it) brick house that housed the family up top, and the tavern they read on the bottom. Today, Brick House has stood the test of time, still delivering a top-shelf, complex handmade at an extremely wallet-friendly price. Brick House is a gorgeous Nicaraguan puro crafted with a dark, reddish-brown Habano wrapper and a robust blend of Nicaraguan long-fillers. The result is a medium to full-bodied cigar that's rich, flavorful, and smooth. Notes of earth, cedar, pepper, and coffee are complemented by a toasty, slightly sweet finish. Well-made, tasty, and modestly priced. Brick House received a well-deserved 93-rating and was named a Top 25 Cigar of 2016 AND a Top 25 Cigar of 2010. That's consistency! The reviews noted: ""It's hard to beat the bang-for-the-buck factor of the cigar, a $5 Nicaraguan Puro with copious amounts of flavor. It smacks of sweet wood and tea with a toasty aftertaste.""",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Habano, Nicaraguan",
Brick House Connecticut,Rated 4.4 out of 5, Based on 90 Ratings ,"Nearly 100 years of history...Brick House Cigars, crafted by the J.C. Newman Cigar Company, were first launched in 1937 as true Cuban Puros made with the finest Havana tobaccos. The Cuban embargo ended all of that and Brick House was later relaunched by J.C. Newman as a Nicaraguan puro that shattered all expectations. It quickly became a top-rated, fan favorite blend known to be a great bang-for-the-buck cigar. The entire Brick House line contains pure Nicaraguan cigars with quality construction and loads of rich flavor, not to mention being priced right in the $6 wheelhouse. Now extended to offer all of this in a mellower fashion with Brick House Connecticut — though the cigar is not as full-bodied as its counterparts, its certainly still full-flavored. Handmade by J.C. Newman in Nicaragua, Brick House Connecticut is adorned with a natural golden brown wrapper. Puff after puff you’ll be met with tame hints of sweet cedar, cream, and toast. If you enjoyed the original Brick House, be sure to give its mellow friend a try.  ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Connecticut Broadleaf,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,
Brick House Fumas,Rated 4.28 out of 5, Based on 1050 Ratings ,"Tradition meets value. For over 100 years, the J.C. Newman Cigar Co. has perfected their craft of superior cigar-making. With roots this deep, they’ve learned a thing or three about delivering high-quality blends at a fair price point. This talent was put on full display through Brick House. Seemingly overnight, Brick House became one of America’s most popular cigars. Now, the next edition of Brick House has arrived — an even more economical option that’s born to satisfy. Hugged by a silky, Sun Grown Sumatra wrapper, Brick House Fumas feature a ‘Cuban sandwich’ blend of aged Nicaraguan tobaccos to deliver an incredibly smooth, yet eventful experience. Simply put, the same flavors, quality and consistency that made Brick House a household name, smothered in value-enhanced goodness. Even more simply put: you’ll love ‘em…you’ll love the price…and you’ll love burning these one after the other — early, often, affordably.​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Sun Grown,
Brick House Fumas Connecticut,Rated 4.28 out of 5, Based on 29 Ratings ,"A Connoisseur's Cost-Cutting Connecticut In these crazy, ever-changing times we're living in, consistency is more important than ever, That's why when you light up your next cigar, you should go with a brand with a proven track record. JC Newman has been in business for more than 100 years, bringing us premium handmade cigars that we can count on to deliver excellent flavors & construction time and time again. The original Brick House is one of their finest lines at a fair price, and the Brick House Fumas takes that one step further. The Brick House Fumas Connecticut is the third entry into the Brick House Fumas line. Made from the same tobaccos as the original but utilizing 'Cuban-Sandwich' style filler and economical bundle packaging, Brick House Fumas feature all the flavors you love from the original for a fraction of the cost. Wearing a silky Connecticut wrapper over a dark Connecticut Broadleaf binder & Nicaraguan fillers, be prepared for a mellow to medium-bodied profile loaded with complex notes of cedar, cream, and pepper, Brick House Fumas Connecticut is perfect for whenever you have time to enjoy a fine premium, or when you're just looking for a knock around stick. JC Newman does it again!",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,
Brick House Fumas Maduro,Rated 4.24 out of 5, Based on 232 Ratings ,"Maduro for lessJ.C. Newman has been crafting cigars for nearly 125 years now. That’s a long time. And they’ve learned a thing or two along the way. One of their finest offerings is their Brick House line of cigars. Both the original and Maduro have received 90+ ratings and have a large following. A few years back, they came out with Brick House Fumas. A more economical version of the original filled ‘Cuban-Sandwhich’ style with the leftover clippings from the original blend. Today, we welcome with open arms a darker version, Brick House Fumas Maduro.It comes wrapped up in a chocolate brown Sumatra Maduro wrapper, with all Nicaraguan tobaccos bundled up underneath. It delivers a medium-bodied performance with all the great flavor you’ve come to love in Brick House Maduro, but at a price you won’t believe. Pick up a bundle of 20 Brick House Fumas Maduro for less than half the price of its long-filler counterpart. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Connecticut Broadleaf, Nicaraguan",Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Maduro,
Brick House Maduro,Rated 4.55 out of 5, Based on 103 Ratings ,"Maduro in the house!Surely you’ve heard of Brick House, a 93-rated gem that managed to work its way onto the “Best 25 Cigars of 2010” list. Well J.C. Newman is back with the Brick House Maduro. This cigar is darker and spicier than its predecessor. An oily Brazilian Arapiraca Maduro wrapper houses a blend of premium Nicaraguan long-fillers and a Nicaraguan binder. The bold, full-bodied flavor profile is punctuated by notes of cocoa and sweetness. Slow-burning, firm in hand, and deliciously tasty, it’s a fitting follow-up that will easily work its way onto your top ten list.Good news! In 2017 Brick House Maduro received an impressive 91-point rating, noting: ""Strong and earthy, this dark, attractive cigar also has a salt-and-pepper quality that becomes lighter and floral. The finish is bready with a hint of caramel.""",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Brazilian,
Brighton's Best,Rated 4.25 out of 5, Based on 158 Ratings ,"Brighton’s Best might be the new kid on the block, but it’s already got fans of flavored cigars going wild. With ten different options to choose from, and a price that’s more than palatable, it’s no surprise why. Let’s get this first part out of the way: Brighton’s Best may not be the prettiest gal at the dance. From the uh… serviceable packaging to the simple bands, these sticks ain’t winning any beauty contests. But look past the surface, and you’ll be pleasantly surprised. The Connecticut wrapper keeps things smooth, the flavors are imbued with just the right amount of sweetness, from Vanilla to Blueberry cigars there's a flavor for every preference, and each stick burns easily with no relights. Dollar for dollar, Brighton’s Best is a damn good deal. ​Blueberry: Fruity and sweet, this one's got tons of flavor. Chocolate: A rich and smooth choice, with appealing candy-bar qualitiesCherry: An American classic, Cherry is rich and deliciousCoffee: What better pairing with your mug o' joe? Creamy and deliciousMango: Light and fruity, Mango is the perfect companion to a hot day and a cool drink. Melon: Light this up post-BBQ, and you'll have no regrets. Vanilla: Reminiscent of classic pipe-tobacco, Vanilla has just the right hit of natural sweetness. ",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Lonsdale', 'Robusto']",,,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Lonsdale, Robusto",Yes,Connecticut,
Brioso Bundles,Rated 4.53 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"Brioso, bro. Get on it. Around here, we’re always trying to sniff out value and find good deals. That’s why we knew we had to pick up some Brioso bundles when we came across them. Manufactured by General Cigar Company (the name behind famous brands like Cohiba, Macanudo, and CAO), Brioso cigars are held to the same quality control standards as some of the best cigars in the world. Presented in both a Natural and Maduro wrapper leaf, Brioso combines a blend of Dominican seco and ligero tobaccos with Nicaraguan and Mexican fillers. The Natural keeps things smooth and mellow, delivering a crisp flavor profile with hints of cedar and a nice, chill spice. The Maduro steps things up a notch, adding black pepper and dry cocoa to the blend. Whichever one you go with, you’re guaranteed to find a perfect everyday blend.",Medium,"['Gigante', 'Toro']",Habano,"Dominican, Honduran, Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gigante, Toro",No,"Honduran, Maduro",
Brocatus,Rated 4.25 out of 5, Based on 277 Ratings ,"One of the best value handmades you will find.Last month I realized that for over 2 years I’ve been selling the daylights out of Brocatus and had never even smoked one. I had received some emails telling me how much people liked it, then came more emails, and even more until I finally took notice and grabbed a box to smoke. Damn right! This no-nonsense handmade is quite mellow with some nutty, oaky flavors and a balanced, consistent character. The long-fillers are all Dominican while the wrapper is a smooth Connecticut-seed Ecuadorian leaf with a nice sheen. And the price! For right around 2 bucks is downright spectacular. Note: Brocatus recently underwent a bit of a face lift on the box and band, but the blend and tobaccos inside remain identical.",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Brocatus Anejo,Rated 4.25 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Good burnin’ on a bottom-dollar budget.If you’re some high-society hoity-toity cigar snob who turns their nose up at cigars priced for the everyman, you might not have heard of Brocatus. You would also be doing yourself a major disservice by passing it by. These long-filler beauties might be inexpensive, but they’re a lot of cigar for the money, and exhibit smooth, well-rounded flavor profiles that can easily go toe-to-toe with sticks that cost three times the money. Featuring an oily San Andres wrapper overtop a Dominican binder and fillers from the Dominican Republic, Nicaragua, and Pennsylvania, the Brocatus Anejo is certainly no slouch. Brocatus is one of our best-sellers in the budget category, and connoisseurs with highly refined palates have even been known to reach for them for a good herf. True fans know that the earthy, creamy flavors from these beauties easily hold up to any activity you pair them with, be it walking the dog, mowing the lawn, or relaxing after a busy day. Grab a box of Brocatus Anejo, and get ready to redefine your conception of “value” cigars.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, Pennsylvania",False,False,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto",No,San Andres,
Buffalo TEN,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Beautiful boutiques to fit any budget!El Artista is a cigar factory known for their eclectic boutique offerings, and their dedication to growing and blending only the best leaves possible. Buffalo TEN is their newest offering, and this beautiful box-pressed toro pushes the envelope of quality and affordability. A true study in contradiction, the rare and heavily-aged components would be right at home in a cigar three times the price, but as El Artista puts it, ‘We make cigars, not money’. For the blend, a toothy, rich Mexican San Andrew wrapper covers a Dominican Negrito binder, and fillers from the USA, Colombia, and Nicaragua. Also used in the filler is an exclusive Dominican leaf known as T-13, which El Artista has been patiently aging for seven years. The result is a medium-bodied profile rife with notes of leather, cedar, spices, and cocoa, with toasty nuances and excellent construction. Coming in just one soft box-pressed toro size, Buffalo TEN is second-to-none, and ready to take its place in your daily rotation. ",Medium,['Toro'],Dominican,"Colombian, Dominican, United States",False,,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,"Maduro, San Andres",
Bugatti Ambassador,Rated 4.25 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"A Bugatti even I can afford.The name Bugatti immediately calls to mind the 200+ mph supercar of my dreams. While Bugatti cigars won’t help me motor down the highway at ridiculous speeds, this blend certainly lives up to the Bugatti promise of delivering a truly exceptional and luxurious experience. Bugatti Ambassador hails from the Dominican Republic and features a smooth Ecuador Habano wrapper atop a multi-country blend of Dominican, Brazilian, Pennsylvanian, and Nicaraguan long-fillers. These premium tobaccos are blended perfectly to offer up a medium-bodied and flavor-rich adventure. Hitting top speed in a flash, expect to be embraced with sweet, creamy flavors with a subtle hint of spice. A high performance blend in every aspect, Bugatti Ambassador features spot-on construction and an effortless draw paving the way for a relaxing and pleasant excursion.  Give the Bugatti Ambassador a test drive, and I’m confident you’ll want to revisit this blend time and again. ​",Medium,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Brazilian, Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Bugatti Cigars
Bugatti Medio,Rated 4.07 out of 5, Based on 147 Ratings ,"Bugatti gets you where you need to goWhen the bossman told me we had a ton of new Bugattis in for me to test drive, my jaw hit the floor. Needless to say I was a little disappointed when I found a package of cigars on my desk, instead of the keys to the supercar of my dreams. Luckily for me, these Bugatti blends performed exceptionally well, and are poised to find a place in your humidor. The Bugatti Medio is the “just right” blend in the new trilogy of Bugatti cigars – not too dark, not too mellow, just a comfortably balanced medium-bodied experience. Underneath the Sumatra wrapper, you’ll find a four-country long-filler blend of US, Dominican, Nicaraguan, and Honduran tobaccos. Light it up, and this high-performance cigar delivers creamy and woodsy notes up front, before developing into a spicier blend down the road. But let’s not skip the best part: this new Bugatti is a luxury we all can afford.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Sumatra,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Sumatra,Bugatti Cigars
Bugatti Potere,Rated 3.79 out of 5, Based on 38 Ratings ,"A smooth finish, guaranteed When I first got these samples on my desk, I have to admit that I just had no clue what “Potere” could mean. Luckily, the internet exists, and a little search engine told me that potere is Italian for “power.” Makes sense now that I think about it – this Italian supercar brand has been delivering powerfully great cigars to us for years, and Potere is no different. Now, let me clear up any confusion, though this cigar’s name means “power” it’s far from a powerhouse blend. Instead, Bugatti Potere delivers a charming Connecticut based blend to those who give it a shot. Up top, a pristine Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper leaf covers Cuban-seed, Nicaraguan long-fillers and binder. Toasting this silky handmade, you’ll find a sweet earthiness with hints of pepper and nuts. More of a medium-bodied Connecticut, Potere easily beats out the competition when it comes to flavor and value.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Indonesian,"Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Bugatti Cigars
Bugatti Quattro Claro,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"​Zero to delicious in no time flatQuench your need for speed with a Bugatti Quattro Claro. While it won’t go over 200 mph and send your wedding tackle up into your throat, this Bugatti blend establishes its luxurious credentials from the word go. Patiently handcrafted and blended to perfection, it’s time to hammer down on the gas pedal and bury the needle with Bugatti Quattro Claro.Bugatti Quattro Claro comes fully loaded and outfitted with a San Andres wrapper blanketing a Dominican Olor binder and a blend of Habano long-fillers from the Dominican Republic and Nicaragua.  Medium to full-bodied, this blend plays host to a wide array of flavors including coffee, wood, leather, cocoa, and hay, and will take your palate on one helluva joyride. Test drive the Bugatti Quattro Claro and I know you’ll be ready dedicate some room in your humidor for this delectable cigar. ​",Medium-Full,"['Figurado', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Figurado, Toro",No,San Andres,Bugatti Cigars
Bugatti Quattro Claro,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"​Zero to delicious in no time flatQuench your need for speed with a Bugatti Quattro Claro. While it won’t go over 200 mph and send your wedding tackle up into your throat, this Bugatti blend establishes its luxurious credentials from the word go. Patiently handcrafted and blended to perfection, it’s time to hammer down on the gas pedal and bury the needle with Bugatti Quattro Claro.Bugatti Quattro Claro comes fully loaded and outfitted with a San Andres wrapper blanketing a Dominican Olor binder and a blend of Habano long-fillers from the Dominican Republic and Nicaragua.  Medium to full-bodied, this blend plays host to a wide array of flavors including coffee, wood, leather, cocoa, and hay, and will take your palate on one helluva joyride. Test drive the Bugatti Quattro Claro and I know you’ll be ready to dedicate some room in your humidor for this delectable cigar. ​",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Figurado']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Figurado",No,San Andres,
Bugatti Quattro Maduro,Rated 1 out of 5,,"​Racing towards flavortownAfter leaving competing supercars in a cloud of smoke, Bugatti is looking to drop the hammer on the cigar industry. The preeminent name in high performance driving machines, Bugatti has been ahead of the curve and leading the pack for over a century. Taking their collective expertise in engineering, design, and cutting-edge style, Bugatti cigars are a heavyweight contender in the premium cigar arena. Bugatti Quattro Maduro is a full-bodied speed demon featuring an oily San Andres Maduro wrapper atop a Dominican Olor binder and a medley of Habano long-fillers from Nicaragua and the Dominican Republic. Expect a full-frontal flavor assault with notes of espresso, dark chocolate, pepper, earth, and oak to provide you with a palate awakening experience. Premium in every way – looks, taste, and construction – pick up Bugatti Quattro Maduro and prepare yourself for a helluva ride. ​",Full,['Toro'],Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,Maduro,
Bugatti Scuro,Rated 4.24 out of 5, Based on 86 Ratings ,"Bugatti’s dark horse emergesFrom their supercars to their pinpoint accurate lighters, every product bearing the Bugatti name is a reliable powerhouse. Today, we welcome the newest trilogy of Bugatti cigar releases to Cigars International, and I’ve gotta say, these blends all easily join the winner’s circle. My favorite of the new batch? Bugatti Scuro, a blend that any maduro lover can sink their teeth into. Underneath this Broadleaf wrapper lies the same four-country, long-filler blend of US, Dominican, Nicaraugna, and Honduran tobaccos that the Bugatti Medio features. In this version, however, the dark maduro wrapper takes the lead, delivering a toasty and cedar dominant profile that’s backed by dark chocolate and espresso. Affordable, reliable, and dee-lish, the Bugatti Scuro belongs on your “must-try” list. ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Sumatra,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Bugatti Cigars
Bugatti Signature,Rated 1 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"A high octane blendAlthough Bugatti Signature may not be able to go over 200 mph, it delivers an experience that’s sure to have your hair standing on end. With no expense spared in sourcing the most well-aged and rare tobaccos, this cigar delivers as only a Bugatti can. Fasten your seatbelts and prepare yourself for an adventure in the fast lane with Bugatti Signature.Crafted at the PDR factory in the Dominican Republic, Bugatti Signature utilizes rare, 10 year old Dominican Piloto Cubano tobacco in the long-filler tucked beneath a gorgeous Ecuadorian wrapper. Unapologetically full-bodied, the high octane Bugatti Signature will have your palate revving with flavors of cocoa and spice setting the table for a creamy finish. If you’ve been hunting for a full-bodied flavor bomb, your search ends here with Bugatti Signature. ​",Full,"['Churchill', 'Toro']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Bugatti Cigars
Cabaiguan by Tatuaje,Rated 4.83 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"If you thought Tatuaje was tough to say, try Cabaiguan on for size!Cabaiguan is hand-crafted by Jose 'Don Pepin' Garcia in the My Father Cigars factory in Nicaragua. Tough to say, but easy to burn, this mellow to medium-bodied blend employs a smooth Connecticut seed wrapper grown under the valley mist of Ecuador. Inside, a Cuban-seed mixture of Nicaraguan long-fillers is carefully blended to promote a flavorful cigar layered with rich, hearty nuances.Cabaiguan received a 92-point rating, noting: ""Solidly rolled with a lightly-colored wrapper and a pigtail cap. It exhibits great balance with a cocoa-powder sweetness, some light black pepper notes and cedary, leather intonations.""The Tatuaje brand is incredibly highly-rated, and features a huge variety of cigars. Shop them all here. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Corona Extra', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Robusto Extra', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Corona Extra, Petite Corona, Robusto, Robusto Extra, Toro",No,"Ecuador Connecticut, Ecuador Sungrown",Tatuaje Cigars
Cabaiguan Guapos by Tatuaje,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"A Handsome Release Indeed!Among all the gems in Tatuaje’s portfolio, some don’t get the attention they deserve. One line from Tatuaje that shouldn’t be overlooked is the Cabaiguan Guapos, a follow-up to the Ecuador Connecticut-wrapped Cabaiguan. Though the Nicaraguan fillers remain the same, the golden Connecticut wrapper has been replaced with your choice of a dark, oily Connecticut Broadleaf, or a spicy Ecuadorian Sun-Grown leaf. This gives the flavors more resonance while retaining the underlying profile, adding an extra dimension of earth, espresso, and pepper from the broadleaf, or a toasty, lingering spice from the Sun-Grown, for a medium-bodied cigar experience you won’t soon forget. ",Medium,"['Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,"Ecuador Connecticut, Ecuador Sungrown",Tatuaje Cigars
Cafe Creme Henri Wintermans,Rated 4.03 out of 5, Based on 33 Ratings ,"These little beauties offer a ton of flavor in a quick, relaxing form.Handmade in Holland since 1963 using an exceedingly gentle blend of smooth, dry-cured tobaccos Café Créme employs only premium,100% natural tobaccos. A top-seller worldwide, each bite-sized cigar offers an enjoyable 'tweener' that's both flavorful and satisfying. Perfect when time is short and packages in convenient pocket tins for portability and freshness.Original: The world’s first small cigar and global best-seller. Crafted with a Colombian, Dominican, Java, and Italian tobacco draped in a natural Java wrapper, Café Crème delivers a smooth and rich tobacco flavor. Blue: Utilizing the same blend of unique, premium tobaccos as the Original, Blue swaps in an Ecuadorian Connecticut shade wrapper to create a slightly gentler experience with a distinctly creamy and smooth profile. Arome: This variation employs the same combination of tobaccos as Café Crème original, but the leaves have been very subtly infused with a rich hint of aromatic coffee to create a wonderful smelling and tasting experience. ​Note: There has been a packaging change on Cafe Creme Henri Wintermans. These now come in cardboard boxes instead of metal tins. ",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,Dominican,True,No,More Details,Europe,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,Sumatra,
Cain by Oliva,Rated 4.69 out of 5, Based on 32 Ratings ,"Straight ligero, baby.Hand-crafted in the Oliva factory of Nicaragua, Cain is a powerful blend of patiently aged, triple-fermented tobaccos. Available in two varieties - a thick and leathery Habano and a dark, oily Maduro - Cain utilizes superior long-leaf ligeros from Nicaragua’s three major growing regions: Esteli, Condega, and Jalapa. The cigar is eventful and complex, delivering a full-bodied, full-flavored assortment of deep, hearty flavors in smooth fashion. Hearty spices mingle with a deep tobacco core and Cuban-esque qualities, smacking the palate with notes of earth and coffee along the way. The abundance of thicker ligero leaves provide a slower burn, allowing you to truly appreciate each long-lasting puff, as the cigar grows more intense in both flavor and strength toward the nub.The newer Cain ‘F’ is a bold new Nicaraguan blend, a stout addition to the family which delivers a full-throttle array of heady, satisfying flavors. Draped in a thick, dark brown Habano leaf and stuffed with an extra-generous dose of Nicaraguan ligeros, Cain ‘F’ is nothing if not full-bodied. Yet it’s unexpectedly smooth and balanced with a deep, rich flavor profile featuring notes of spices, earth, leather and coffee. Slow-burning, complex and robust, Cain ‘F’ sets a new benchmark in extra-full-bodied handmades.Cain Habano 'F' received a well-deserved 92-point rating, noting:""Solidly rolled with a dark, oily and attractive wrapper. The draw is bit firm, but instantly delivers rich, bold notes of leather and spice that intensify in both flavor and body.""As if that wasn't enough, Cain Habano received a '90' rating, commenting:""This toothy torpedo wears an oily wrapper. It has a woody flavor, with leathery notes that turn sweet and floral before a tea note lingers on the finish."" ",Full,"['Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Torpedo",No,"Habano, Habano Maduro",Oliva
Cain Daytona by Oliva,Rated 4.78 out of 5, Based on 23 Ratings ,"Ligero-laced, with McTwist!The Daytona continues Cain's employment of 100%, straight ligero blends....however, this one has a twist. Cain Daytona is a Nicaraguan puro made entirely of Cuban-seed, long-leaf ligeros from the Jalapa Valley. Jalapa is a primary resource for smooth, but rich tobaccos....tobaccos often used to help create balance in a full-bodied, full-flavored blend. In using these tobaccos, Oliva created a rich and flavorful blend with noble smoothness and superior balance. Deep notes of coffee and rich tobacco are complemented by the slightest hint of pepper and some sweet tones on the finish. Medium in body but full in flavor, Cain Daytona is a satisfying, anytime treat that'll delight the palate with genuine Nicaraguan boldness.",Medium,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Habano,Oliva
Cain F Nub by Oliva,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"Cain and Nub come full circle.First, there was Nub - a revolutionary cigar that captured the true essence of the tobacco at play. Then, there was Cain - a full-bodied, full-throttle blend crafted to redefine the full-flavored Nicaragua. Next came Cain 'F' - an even fuller-bodied variety of Cain. Now, the journey is complete as Nub meets Cain 'F'.Cain 'F' Nub....it was only a matter of time. To craft these full-bodied firecrackers, a select recipe of bold Nicaraguan long-leaf ligeros is carefully blended, then cloaked by a thick and oily Habano ligero wrapper leaf. Each cigar is crafted into short and stout, 60+ ring frames - in true Nub form - to capture the core flavors these robust tobaccos dish out throughout the entire burn. The end result: layers of flavor with every puff delivered in smooth, balanced fashion. A rich series of leather and hearty spices smack the palate from start to finish, giving room - from time to time - for an intriguing toasty sweetness. Complex, satisfying, and eventful....Cain 'F' Nub is a fine achievement from the Oliva factory.Cain F Nub by Oliva received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""Packed with tobacco, this short, fat cigar imparts a dense smoke that is strong and hearty with earth, coffee bean and leather notes. The finish hints of dried cherry.""",Full,['Gordo'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Gordo,No,Habano,Nub
Cain Nub by Oliva,Rated 4.43 out of 5, Based on 14 Ratings ,"Cain + Nub=deliciousness.Cain Nub is the latest addition to the ultra-successful list of offerings from Sam Leccia and the Oliva family. First there was Nub, a series of short and stout handmades that promise to hit their 'sweet spot' immediately and maintain it throughout the entire length of the cigar. Then there was Cain, a full-tilt, 'straight ligero' powerhouse that's rich, bold and complex. And now, there's Cain Nub, a highly-anticipated fusion of these two innovative cigars. All of Cain's flavor in a Nub costume, that's the Cain Nub. Offered in either a thick, leathery Habano leaf or a dark and oily Maduro, Cain Nub employs a robust mixture of long-leaf ligeros from a variety of regions in Nicaragua. Expect a powerful but refined display of complexity including hearty notes of spices, earth and coffee. Full-bodied, full-flavored and impressively smooth, Cain Nub delivers an unmatched experience. Only two sizes were created - a 4"" x 60 vitola with the same amount of tobaccos and burn time as a 6.75"" x 50 Churchill or a 4"" x 64 Torpedo that equals a 7"" x 50 Churchill.",Full,['Gordo'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Gordo,No,"Habano, San Andres",Nub
Caldwell Anastasia H,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"Anastasia’s ReturnIn 2016, Caldwell teamed up with industry legend E.P. Carrillo to create a tasty little cigar called Anastasia, named after a Russian Princess. These cigars were highly limited due to the availability of the wrapper leaf they chose to use. They only shipped to a small group of retailers across the country and they quickly disappeared from the market. But anyone who was lucky enough to taste the cigar raved over the great flavor. Well good news fellas, Anstasia is back with a slight tweak.Now dubbed Anastasia H, they swapped the original wrapper with a well-aged Habano leaf. Just like the original, the rest of the blend is being kept a secret but we’ve been told all the tobaccos are rare and have been patiently aging in the Tabacalera La Alianza factory. It clocks in as a medium to full-bodied blend with notes of caramel, spice, leather, and a creamy smoothness. Snag a box now, Anastasia has been known for a good Irish goodbye. ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,
Caldwell Blind Man's Bluff,Rated 4.61 out of 5, Based on 31 Ratings ,"This ain’t no bluff, you must try this cigarRobert Caldwell has burst onto the boutique cigar scene like some sorta supernova, and it seems like there’s no stopping his meteoric rise. You see, he makes cigars his way…he scours farms across the globe for the best tobacco leaves, tests and retests his blends until he gets the exact flavors he’s looking for, and keeps production limited in an effort to deliver a superior product. My word is bond, son, and I’m telling you once you try a Caldwell cigar you will count yourself among his growing legion of fans. Blind Man’s Bluff comes wrapped in an enticing Ecuadorian Habano leaf atop a refined Honduran Criollo binder, long-fillers from the Dominican and Honduras ramp up the intensity. Tasty notes of cedar, bread, and sweet spice all enter the fray with a long and cool finish topping off the experience. Do yourself a favor and pick this sucker up before everyone else beats you to it.​​",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,"Dominican, Honduran",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,
Caldwell Blind Man's Bluff Connecticut,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Blind Man Goes MellowCaldwell Cigars hasn’t been around for that long, but the brand has already become one of the bestselling, and it’s not an accident. Robert Caldwell has a keen sense for good tobacco, and he goes from farm to farm, trying to find the best crops to make his blends. All of his products are absolutely delicious and made with precision, there is little wonder as to why Caldwell has a devoted following of faithful enthusiasts.Blind Man’s Bluff Connecticut is a follow-up to the original Blind Man’s Bluff release. Like the original, this blend’s fillers are comprised of long fillers from the Dominican and Honduras, but it’s encased in a golden Ecuadorian Habano wrapper. Complex with some spice, this gem’s got flavor for days with notes of leather, cream, and toasted almonds. Go ahead, grab a box or two, and see for yourself why everyone’s going ga ga over Caldwell.",Mellow-Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,"Dominican, Honduran",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Caldwell Collection - E.S. Midnight Express,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"Hop aboard the Midnight ExpressRobert Caldwell has quite the following in the cigar world. Like, when he visited our offices, a certain CI individual went weak at the knees over him. While I’m not on that level, it’s easy to understand why people love these sticks. Caldwell consistently delivers small-batch, boutique handmades that rival any blend on the market. And with his newest creation, there’s just another reason to burn Caldwell. The Midnight Express is everything you’ve come to love about the Eastern Standard blend, amped up a notch. Utilizing perfectly aged, hand-selected Central American tobaccos for the binder and filler, each one of these boutique boomsticks comes equipped with an oily Connecticut Shade Hybrid wrapper that delivers an incredibly satisfying experience. With wave after wave of cedar, espresso, dark chocolate, spice, and a salty leather quality, this cigar is sure to be a favorite of Maduro lovers everywhere. ​Recently, Midnight Express joined the esteemed caliber of 90+ rated cigars. In February of 2017, the review noted, ""A dark and oily corona topped with a near-perfect pigtail cap. The cigar's easy draw delivers salty, brawny notes of walnut, earth and coffee bean.""",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Lancero', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Dominican, Habano","Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Corona, Lancero, Pyramid, Robusto, Toro",Varies,"Brazilian, Ecuador Connecticut",
Caldwell Collection - Eastern Standard,Rated 4.8 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"The new StandardIf you or anyone you know even remotely like boutique brands, you've probably heard the name ""Caldwell"" about 1,000 times in the last year. I'm not sure a small batch company has had a bigger hype train behind them, ever. And if we're being honest, most of the time hype only ends in derailing and disappointment. Luckily, Caldwell breaks the trend, and actually earns every good word that's said about them. This is one brand that's well worth digging into. And there's no better place to start than Eastern Standard. A smooth, medium-bodied cigar, Eastern Standard features a silky-smooth hybrid leaf of Connecticut Ecuadorian wrapper. It's expertly applied, and adds an unforgettable lemony brightness to the slight spice and grass notes of the Dominican and Nicaraguan filler. Good news, Eastern Standard has received an impressive 91-point rating, noting: ""Topped with a pigtail cap, this Churchill delivers a dense, chewy smoke that layers the palate with distinct notes of leather and black pepper. Touches of chocolate malt also come through.""​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Dominican, Habano","Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Caldwell Collection - Long Live The King,Rated 4.89 out of 5, Based on 19 Ratings ,"Long Live CaldwellRobert Caldwell has said, very seriously, “The purpose of Caldwell Cigars is to go wherever we must to find the most exotic flavors we can. The Caldwell Collection is made up of a number of very unique brands that utilize these premium rare tobaccos.” From the mouths of lesser brands, I’d mock this, but Caldwell is the real deal. This boutique brand does everything they can to find the best tobaccos available, and that’s on full display with the fantastic Long Live the King cigars. With a blend of long-fillers from The Dominican Republic, Nicaragua, and Peru, this blend surely utilizes some rare leaves. The other cigars in the Caldwell Collection are mellow, but this one takes a medium to full-bodied approach. Your palate will be instantly greeted with notes of earth, oak, dark chocolate, and hints of black pepper. It’s a demanding and satisfying cigar that you’ll want to give your full attention too. Long Live the King may be the best Caldwell cigar to date. ​Good news! Long Live the King has earned a well-deserved 91-point rating, noting: ""Rolled with a pigtail cap, this toro draws and burns evenly, imparting a cedary, leathery smoke that hints of cashew and leads to a tangy finish.""​",Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Toro",No,"Corojo, Dominican",
Caldwell Collection - The King Is Dead,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"A Kingslayer ApproachesRobert Caldwell’s premium cigar brand has been on fire since it released. On fire, cigars… get it? Alright, bad word play aside, this boutique brand has quickly built a reputation for releasing tasty, small-batch releases. Like the best bourbons, seeking Caldwell out can be a bit of a pain, but once you’ve had a great one, you can’t go back. The King is Dead is Caldwell’s second blend is a medium-bodied, complex balancing act. Every Caldwell sample I’ve had the pleasure of enjoying has burnt like an absolute champion. And The King is Dead is no different. Delivering notes of wood, earth, chocolate, spice, coffee, and a slight, nutty sweetness, you’ll enjoy every second of this handcrafted awesomeness. The price isn’t low, but with Caldwell, you really do get what you pay for. ​Good news, The King is Dead has recently earned an impressive 93-point rating, noting: ""The name is unorthodox and perhaps doesn't evoke visions of the everyday smoking experience, but this cigar combines the nuance of maple sweetness and the tonality of earth in unexpected ways.""​",Medium,"['Robusto', 'Torpedo']","Corojo, Dominican",Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Robusto, Torpedo",No,"Corojo, Dominican",
Caldwell Dos Firmas,Rated 4.89 out of 5,,"Two Signatures, One Great CigarThere are few cigar makers in the industry who have made quite as much noise as Robert Caldwell has in such a short time span. Caldwell delivers when it comes to quality and consistency in all of his blends, and I think it’s safe to say he rivals pretty much any cigar maker on the market right now. One of the brand’s newest releases is a signature blend that’s been made for years by Caldwell’s partner William Ventura. The new addition is an extension to Caldwell’s Eastern Standard Line and has been dubbed Dos Firmas, or two signatures, which refers to the pair of John Hancocks that appear on the cigar’s secondary bandThe cigar itself is built with a top secret blend of high quality, well-aged filler tobaccos that are masked by a Connecticut Shade wrapper. The end result is a smooth profile with a delightful and complex mix of tasting notes. You’ll experience hints of leather, cream, a bit of spice. Made in small batches, and crafted to perfection, Dos Firmas is sure to become a favorite for anyone who loves a classic Connecticut with a little bit of a twist.",Medium,"['Pyramid', 'Rothschild']",,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Pyramid, Rothschild",No,Connecticut,
Caldwell Eastern Standard Habano,Rated 4.8 out of 5,,"Not your standard HabanoCaldwell Cigar Company has gained a lot of steam in the boutique cigar game in the past couple years. They pay close attention to every detail and it shows in the quality of their cigars. One of their finest blends? The Connecticut wrapped, 91-rated Eastern Standard. At the 2018 IPCPR show Caldwell debuted his second extension of the Eastern Standard line – Eastern Standard Habano.It comes dressed in a hybrid Mexican Habano wrapper overtop an Ecuadorian binder and long-fillers from the Dominican Republic and Mexico. It comes in 4 sizes that all slightly differ from the original Eastern Standard and each one excels at showcasing its intricate flavor profile. You’ll be met with notes of dark chocolate, coffee, hay and a hint of cinnamon and black pepper in a medium to full-bodied format. Caldwell’s quality standards are extremely high, you can’t go wrong with a box of these beauties. ",Medium-Full,"['Double Robusto', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Ecuador,"Dominican, Mexican",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Double Robusto, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Habano, San Andres",
Caldwell Hit and Run,Rated 5 out of 5,,"No hittin' and quittin' hereRobert Caldwell of Caldwell Cigars teamed up with Matt Booth to help Booth make his triumphant return to the cigar industry and we are all better off for it. The result is called Hit & Run and it is a smooth and sophisticated masterpiece of a blend. So what do you get when two boutique legends put their heads together? A delectable cigar, of course. Dominican built, the Caldwell Hit & Run consists of an Ecuadorian Habano wrapper and Dominican long-fillers for a naturally sweet finish with rich notes of roasted nuts and caramel. With a combination of flavors like that, this gem will surely make itself comfortable in any enthusiast’s collection. Perfectly balanced at a nice medium-bodied profile, you'll be back for more of these in no time.",Medium,"['Double Corona', 'Perfecto']",Indonesian,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Double Corona, Perfecto",No,Ecuador Habano,
Caldwell Hit and Run Part Deux (Rip and Dip),Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"They’re baaaack! They’ve done the hit and run, and now these two perps return to the scene of the crime for a good ol’ fashioned sequel. That’s right, boys, today we’re checking out the Hit and Run Part Deux (Rip and Dip) from Robert Caldwell and Matt Booth, and this latest limited edition release from the Room101 and Caldwell founders is sure to be one for the history books. Handmade by Tabacalera William Ventura, the home of many of Caldwell’s releases and the original Hit and Run, Part Deux (Rip & Dip) is a gorgeous gem. Offered in the same style 10-count box of its predecessor, Hit and Run Part Deux features a tri-country mixture of long-filler tobaccos. The DR, Nicaragua, and the good ol’ U.S. combine to create a bolder profile than the original cigar, brimming with tons of rich spice, leather, and natural tobacco charm.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,
Caldwell Long Live the King Mad MF,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"You mad? Years ago, Robert Caldwell (the owner and operator of Caldwell cigars) told us his purpose was to go wherever he had to in order to find the most exotic flavors he could. A tough order to fill, for sure. But in the years since his statement, Robert has continued to deliver. Today, Caldwell stands tall as one of the best-selling and best-reviewed boutique brands in our catalog, and his latest release will no doubt strengthen that rep. Welcome, LLTK Mad MF. The Caldwell Collection Long Live the King – Mad MF is a limited edition release under this most-popular flagship brand of Caldwell’s. Utilizing a spicy, Mexican San Andres wrapper leaf atop Indonesian binder and Corojo ’98 and PA double ligero fillers, calling this one full-bodied would be an understatement. It’s uber-rich and dark, with each puff producing tons of milk chocolate, black pepper, oak, and leathery notes. ",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Corona, Gordo, Toro",No,San Andres,
Caldwell Lost & Found El Systematico,Rated 5 out of 5,,"You can’t beat The System, but you can burn it!Deep within the aging rooms of the world’s top cigar factories, bundles lie hidden. Fantastic cigars, rolled in super-small batches, just waiting to be rediscovered and brought to light. Calling out for cigar fans to give them the cut & light they deserve. Robert Caldwell has heard that call, and brings us yet another small-batch limited edition Lost & Found line from parts unknown. Presenting: Lost & Found El Systematico.1,500 El Systematico cigars were found in just one size, a perfectly crafted 7”x39 lancero. A luscious Costa Rican wrapper leaf covers an undisclosed binder, over a blend of Honduran and Costa-Rican long-fillers, and produces a medium-bodied profile bursting with flavor. You’ll get pepper, cedar, coffee, and a slight floral sweetness. Rolled in 2013, only 300 5-packs were released, so grab yours ASAP and don’t miss out!",Medium,['Lancero'],,"Costa Rican, Honduran",False,,More Details,,False,,Lancero,False,Costa Rican,
Caldwell Lost & Found Holy Braille,Rated 4.67 out of 5,,"What was lost, now is found.Among the swaths of delicious cigars that make it into full production, there are small batches of custom-made cigars or test blends that never end up seeing the light of day. Deep within the aging rooms of the most prolific factories, delicious boutique cigars wait for the day when they’re rediscovered and given the appreciation they deserve. Great cigars the world over calling out for someone to bring them into the world and into the hands of everyday cigar lovers like you and me. Robert Caldwell has heard that call, and presents to us the Lost & Found series.The Lost & Found Holy Braille was rolled by an undisclosed factory in the Dominican Republic, and blended by Francisco “Chico” Rivas, of Quesada fame. This cigar is 100% Dominican, from the 2008 Vintage Habana HVA wrapper all the way down to the well-aged long-fillers. As soon as you light a Holy Braille, you’ll notice a rich, unique profile only achievable through masterful blending and patient aging. Full-flavored notes of cedar, earth, barnyard, and chocolate are produced by the excellent burn from start to finish, and the agreeable aroma will pique the interest of anyone in the immediate vicinity. This is a must-try cigar, released in extremely limited quantities. Never again will this blend be seen on the market, so stock up today before they disappear!",Medium,['Toro'],Dominican,Dominican,False,,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,"Dominican, Habano",
Caldwell Lost & Found La Whatever,Rated 5 out of 5,,"I'll have Whatever!Caldwell’s Lost & Found Series is as eclectic as they come. Consisting of single batches of top-shelf cigars lost in the aging rooms of some of the world’s top cigar factories, most of the details about Lost & Found releases are undisclosed. But the flavors are absolutely something to write home about, and the packaging is always creative & entertaining.The Caldwell Lost & Found La Whatever might not have a fancy name, but it does have top-quality tobacco and flavor to spare, owing to the sun-grown wrapper glistening with oils. Beneath this beautiful leaf is a Sumatran binder and well-aged long-fillers sourced from Nicaragua and the Dominican Republic. Medium-full in body and loaded with toast, cocoa, and sweet spices throughout, the name of this highly limited release might sound like a joke, but the Caldwell Lost & Found La Whatever is a seriously good blend. ",Medium,"['Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Indonesian,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,,More Details,,No,,"Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Sun Grown,
Caldwell Lost & Found One Night Stand,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Cigars with benefits.Every cigar you buy has spent part of its life in a Spanish cedar-lined aging room before it makes its way into to market. Factories roll massive amounts of cigars at a time, and their aging rooms need to be vast to accommodate their inventory. In these huge rooms, among the hundreds of bundles of cigars, there are some that were custom-rolled as experiments or special projects and forgotten, left to age patiently, waiting to be discovered. Robert Caldwell’s Lost & Found project seeks to rediscover these blends and give them the attention they deserve. Among the newest Lost & Found releases is a familiar name, in an all-new size.One Night Stand was among the very first Lost & Found releases back when the series was known as ‘Impromptu’, but instead of the original corona gorda size, the new version comes in a classic 5”x50 robusto. And the blend details? This baby is all Corojo, from the wrapper down to the well-aged long-fillers. 320 10-packs were found, aging since 2010, so don’t miss your chance to enjoy the medium-bodied profile of toast, earth, and cedar that you’ll only get from the Caldwell Lost & Found One Night Stand.",Medium,['Robusto'],Corojo,,False,,More Details,,No,,Robusto,No,Corojo,
Caldwell Lost & Found Paradise Lost,Rated 5 out of 5,,"A rare moment of pure bliss.If you’re on the lookout for a high-end, limited edition cigar with a few years of good age on it, you could join some elite club and pony up big bucks, or you could pick up a Caldwell Lost & Found Paradise Lost! The Lost & Found Series consists of high-end cigars rolled in small batches by the world’s top manufacturers, that were tucked away in an aging room & forgotten. The special tobaccos used and the perfect aging conditions make these cigars truly special, and something you don’t want to miss.2306 Paradise Lost Cigars rolled in the year 2014 were found, rebranded with an illustration of Robert Caldwell & Matt Booth walking along a romantic beach, and packed in 10-count packs and boxes. Choose from three different sizes, all wearing a Habano wrapper over Sumatra binder and long-fillers from Nicaragua and the Dominican Republic, and all featuring creamy, smooth notes of cocoa, pepper, and toast. Grab a box today, and experience the taste you can only get from fine, well-aged handmades.",Medium,"['Corona Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Sumatra,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,
Caldwell Lost & Found Pepper Cream Soda,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Fresh and refreshing!The Lost & Found Series is an ambitious project by Robert Caldwell, with the mission of rediscovering forgotten batches of cigars in the aging rooms of some of the world’s top boutique cigar factories. Short runs of cigars rolled as custom orders or experiments, tucked away in perfect conditions, waiting for their chance to hit the market and delight cigar fans everywhere. The Pepper Cream Soda is the newest blend discovered by Caldwell, and while you may have heard the name before, it’s back with a new blend in an all-new size.A total of 3,200 of the 5.5”x48 Pepper Cream Soda cigars were found resting since 2010, packaged in paper-wrapped packs of 10. As for the blend, an Ecuador-grown Brazilian-seed Arapiraca wrapper sits atop a Piloto binder and Dominican HVA and Habano long-fillers. Medium-bodied but satisfying complex, the Pepper Cream Soda delivers crisp notes of coffee, toast, and cedar, with a pleasantly sweet finish. These won’t be around long, so grab a 10-pack today, sit back, and relax with a pack of Pepper Cream Soda! ",Medium-Full,['Corona Gordo'],Dominican,Dominican,False,,More Details,,False,,Corona Gordo,False,Ecuador Sungrown,
Caldwell Savages,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"A Savage KingCaldwell Savages was originally released in 2016 as a limited edition cigar in just one specially crafted size – a 6” x 46 Corona Extra. It was also an extension to the 91-rated Long live the King blend from the Caldwell Collection. After much praise it has received some additional sizes in the lineup and regular production for more to enjoy. The blend for Savages has been kept a secret, but we do know that it uses a Habano wrapper. While the Long Live The King blend was one of Caldwell’s most full-bodied releases, Savages takes it back a notch, falling in the middle of the spectrum. But the flavor is still there, in true Caldwell fashion, this cigar is incredibly rich, complex, well-balanced, smooth and enjoyable any time of day. We get notes of earth, pepper, leather, nuts and some coffee. If you some of Caldwells other lines, or are just looking for a flavorful new blend, this boutique beauty will not disappoint. ",Medium,"['Corona Extra', 'Double Corona', 'Pyramid', 'Rothschild', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona Extra, Double Corona, Pyramid, Rothschild, Toro",No,Habano,
Caldwell The Last Tsar,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"A new LE from CaldwellIf you’re a fan of boutique cigars, you’ve likely heard of Robert Caldwell and his line of premium handmades. These are exclusively available to the ‘First 49’, a group of retailers who have supported, and continued to support Caldwell in his ventures. Limited to just 500 boxes of 10, The Last Tsar is currently offered only in a Churchill vitola, although they plan to add another size later in the year. This one’s dressed in a Connecticut Arapiraca maduro wrapper, which is a hybrid leaf not found on almost any other cigars on the market. They didn’t announce the fillers, but what I can tell you is that this cigar is chock-full of delicious flavors of cedar, cocoa, and pepper. The price on this one is a bit rich for my blood, but it is a real treat that is perfect for any celebratory occasion. ​",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Corona', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Corona, Toro",No,Connecticut,
Caldwell The T,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Ain't that the Truth!Can you handle The Truth? I certainly hope so, because this new collaborative blend from Robert Caldwell, Matt Booth, and AJ Fernandez is an impressive creation and one you should grab as quickly as possible. A new cigar from any of these three industry legends is cause for attention. A collaboration between all three is set to blow the dial right off the cigar Richter scale. With a Nicaraguan Maduro wrapper holding perfectly-aged Nicaraguan long-fillers, this  Nicaraguan puro elicits boldness and spice with notes of dark chocolate and leather for a surprisingly smooth finish. All the innovation you'd expect from these three industry titans is on full display here — AJ finds the best Nicaraguan tobacco, Caldwell balances it all out, and Matt Booth lends his eye for design. In short, The T is the truth, and that's what's up.Good news! The T has earned an impressive 91-point rating, noting ""Dark and alluring, this box-pressed cigar has a lush draw and even burn. Rich notes of chocolate and almond paste are elevated by touches of coffee bean and anise. The finish is sweet.""",Medium-Full,"['Lonsdale', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Yes,,"Lonsdale, Robusto, Toro",No,Nicaraguan,
Caldwell The T Connecticut,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"You can’t handle the truth! When Robert Caldwell, Matt Booth, and A.J. Fernandez announced they’d be teaming up on a cigar, the hype train officially ran off the rails. The cigar, as expected, was fantastic, and at the 2018 IPCPR show Caldwell announced a follow-up to The T. That’s right boys, today we shine the spotlight on one of the hottest boutique Connecticut releases in years: The T Connecticut. Produced under the incredibly strict quality control standards of A.J. Fernandez at his world-renowned factory in Esteli, Nicaragua, Caldwell The T Connecticut is a fitting follow-up to the original blend. To craft this cigar, each torcedor utilizes a stunning Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper leaf above Nicaraguan binder and long-fillers. Toasting it, you’ll find cedar and slight coffee notes with a strong spice and nuttiness underneath. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Corona', 'Double Robusto', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Corona, Double Robusto, Short Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Caldwell The T Habano,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"The T will set you free!Ladies and gentlemen, the dream team is back, and their latest creation is even better than the last. Three of the greatest minds in the cigar industry: Matt Booth, Robert Caldwell, and AJ Fernandez have once again teamed up for an all-new addition to their The T line. Fans were delighted by the heavy, chocolaty The T Maduro, and fell in love with the smooth, buttery nuances of The T Connecticut, and now the trilogy is complete. Introducing: The T Habano.Produced in Nicaragua at the incomparable Tabacalera Fernandez, The T Habano is a Nicaraguan Puro wearing a sultry Habano Sun-Grown wrapper blanketing carefully blended long-fillers, which, when ignited, produce a bounty of medium-full bodied complexity and spicy flavors of bread, caramel, leather, and cedar. In theory, these three powerhouse cigar manufacturers should be bitter rivals. But in reality, their strong spirit of collaboration ends up working for everyone, and brings us great cigars we can't help but reach for again and again.",Medium-Full,"['Corona Gordo', 'Double Robusto', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona Gordo, Double Robusto, Short Robusto, Toro",No,"Habano, Sun Grown",
Caldwell Young Savages,Rated 4.67 out of 5,,"A bit smaller, but no less Savage.In 2014, Caldwell released the Long Live the King, and earned their place in cigar history. The packaging was striking and the blends were top-notch, and the mastermind Robert Caldwell capitalized on that success with a follow-up release: the Savages. The Savages used a Habano wrapper over an undisclosed blend very similar to the Long Live the King, and the success of the release became apparent when it sold out the same day it was released. Now we welcome the Savages’ little brother, the Young Savages.Young Savages uses the same undisclosed filler blend as the original and is draped in the same exquisite Habano wrapper, but in more compact sizes. These chunky little gems are chock-full of honey and pepper notes, with an interesting fruity sweetness that keep this savage very well-behaved on your taste buds. Going by the popularity of the original Savages line, it’s not a stretch to say these will probably be back ordered soon, so tame the Young Savage before it gets away from you!",Medium,"['Corona', 'Gordo']",Indonesian,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Gordo",No,"Ecuador Habano, Habano",
Camacho American Barrel Aged,Rated 4.54 out of 5, Based on 90 Ratings ,"​Camacho delivers an American classic.New innovations are seen a lot in the cigar industry. Everyone is trying to up the ante in one way or another. Some are flush and some are bust, but it never hinders manufacturers from giving it a go. But here, we have an absolute homerun for team innovation. Camacho has been thinking outside the box for some time now, and with the cigar at hand, they pulled a Babe Ruth and knocked this one straight out of the park. Enter, Camacho’s newest innovation, American Barrel Aged. Utilizing nearly 100% American leaves, Camacho Barrel Aged boasts a bold, oily Pennsylvania Broadleaf wrapper with American Broadleaf tobaccos also making appearances in the binder and filler tobaccos. The key to the blend comes in the form of a special Corojo filler leaf that’s aged for 6 years, only to be additionally stored in bourbon barrels to impart a truly unique flavor to an already stellar blend. The first Camacho to be produced in Davidoff of Geneva's prestigious Dominican factory, American Barrel Aged showcases bold notes of pepper, cashew, and sweet spices that are accented by a slight undertone of bourbon to deliver a blend you won’t soon forget.  ​",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Connecticut Broadleaf, Pennsylvania Broadleaf","Dominican, Honduran, United States",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Perfecto, Robusto, Toro",No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Pennsylvania Broadleaf",Camacho
Camacho BG Meyer Standard Issue,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 20 Ratings ,"BG Meyer…If you haven’t heard about the BG Meyer Standard Issue cigar, don’t worry. I am here to impart some knowledge. “What is a BG Meyer,” you may be asking yourself? Not a hot dog, but the newest addition to the already stunning arsenal that is Camacho Cigars. In a monumental revamping effort, Camacho created the “Board of the Bold,” a star-studded cast of brand directors including Mike Ditka, Matt Booth, and the person behind the BG Meyer Company, Rob Weiss. Rob Weiss is well-known in the cinema industry as one of the writers and producers on the hit HBO series, “Entourage!” I never heard of him, but he’s got a Wikipedia…and that’s proof enough for me. Plus, the cigar’s pretty damn tasty. So that’s that. BG Meyer’s Standard Issue stays true to the “Board of the Bold” name, delivering a medium-full bodied experience. A true gem, rare Dominican fillers are nestled within a Dominican binder. To cap it all off, an exquisite Ecuador Connecticut wrapper is draped over top, producing notes of wood, vanilla bean, and sweet spices. It’s like hobnobbing with the rich and famous of Hollywood, just a little better tasting. ",Medium-Full,['Corona'],Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Corona,No,Ecuador Connecticut,Camacho
Camacho Check Six LE '16,Rated 4.31 out of 5,,"Camacho’s got your sixCamacho Check Six is a cigar that demands immediate respect. Some things are bigger than cigars, and Check Six pays homage to the bold individuals who work to protect our freedom every single day. This blend is about honoring the brave men who make up the United States Armed Forces, and the best damn country on Earth. For that reason alone, the second release in Camacho’s Brotherhood Series immediately earns my seal of approval. Inside the cigar is a tri-country blend of original Corojo, San Vicente and Criollo tobaccos. These Nicaraguan, Dominican, and Honduran long-fillers combine to create a medium to full-bodied experience that brings red pepper, peanut, leather, bready notes, and a bit of vegetal flavors to the palate. Wrapped underneath an Ecuador Habana 2000 wrapper, Camacho Check Six is a gorgeous, delicious cigar with an awesome inspiration. And that’s something we can all get behind. ​",Medium-Full,['Toro'],Criollo '98,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,Habana 2000,Camacho
Camacho Connecticut,Rated 4.66 out of 5, Based on 71 Ratings ,"​More modest, but no less intense.It’s no easy task to scale back on strength without losing complexity and flavor. Lesser men have tried and failed. But the fine folks at Camacho have been around the block a few times....evidenced by their portfolio of 90+ rated blends and legions of devoted fans....and they know how to construct a damn good cigar. So it’s no surprise that they easily conquered this challenge.Camacho Connecticut is balanced and smooth, but also features a bold flavor profile that keeps things interesting. Boasting an Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper, an authentic Corojo binder, and a perfect blend of Honduran and Dominican Aleman ligero long-fillers, you can expect a spicy kick that’s not too overwhelming. Referred to as a “utility cigar,” this is the handmade you’ll want to keep on hand for everyday use. Camacho Connecticut received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""Perfectly symmetric in appearance, this pyramid has a bit of an airy draw. Initial acidity passes and the smokes takes on a creamy character with hints of citrus and sweet espresso.""",,"['Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Honduran",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Cigarillos, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Connecticut, Ecuador Connecticut",Camacho
Camacho Connecticut BXP,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Smooth, box-y, and intensely delicious. Camacho has long been known for thinking outside the box. But for their newest innovation, they’re proving that sometimes it’s hip to be square. The idea is simple — take three of Camacho’s best-selling and well-loved blends and give them a healthy box-press. The result — a series of new, bold offerings that keep the same qualities you’ve come to love, while offering a new, richer experience. The Camacho Connecticut BXP is as balanced and smooth as its rounder, 90-rated counterpart, with all the boldness you’ve come to expect from the Camacho brand. An Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper sits atop Corojo binder and the perfect mixture of Honduran and Dominican long-fillers to deliver just enough spice to wake up your palate. Great for experienced aficionados and newbies alike, Camacho Connecticut BXP is a real treat.",Mellow-Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Corojo,"Dominican, Honduran",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Connecticut,Camacho
Camacho Corojo,Rated 4.45 out of 5, Based on 44 Ratings ,"​Camacho's new classic.Camacho has managed to do something that no other cigar company can lay claim to...the recreation of Cuban conditions on non-Cuban soils. Impossible, some say, but that’s before they try a puff of these fine blends. Using a combination of authentic Cuban-seeds and the ideal location, the Jamastran Valley of Honduras, Camacho manages to harness the one thing that you didn’t even know you were missing. The magic ingredient, if you will. The tobacco holy grail.That’s Camacho Corojo in a nutshell, an everyday treasure that was crafted with the true cigar aficionado in mind. Made with a super high-grade, fifth priming Corojo wrapper leaf, this fine specimen aims to please and succeeds with ease. Beneath the covers, an authentic Corojo binder and bevy of three primings of Corojo long-fillers complete the mix. Smooth, classic, well-aged, and well-constructed, Corojo is everything you need it to be....and more.​Camacho Corojo received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""A nicely crafted figurado with superb texture to the wrapper. It smokes beautifully. It has complex flavors including sweet wood, cedar, walnuts, and leather and steel. Medium to full bodied.""",Full,"['Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Gigante', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Corojo,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Cigarillos, Gigante, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Corojo,Camacho
Camacho Corojo BXP,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"What’s old is new again. Camacho has long been known for changing up the game. Their first innovation? Recreating Cuban growing conditions on non-Cuban soils. That smooth, bold flavor profile provided by their Cuban-esque tobaccos is what made the original Camacho blends so popular. And now, they’ve pushed the envelope again by box-pressing their most popular selections. Enter Camacho Corojo BXP: a bolder, edgier take on the 90-rated classic. An everyday treasure that’s crafted with the true aficionado in mind. Made with a super high-grade, fifth priming Corojo wrapper leaf, this cigar impresses from the first glance. The blend here is the same as the OG Corojo, with a slight addition of Broadleaf in the filler toabccos, plus the addition of the soft-pressing, of course. Sweet wood, cedar, walnuts, leather, and a nice hit of black pepper coat the palate on every puff down to the cool nub. ",Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Corojo,"Honduran, United States",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Robusto, Toro",Varies,Corojo,Camacho
Camacho Coyolar,Rated 4.33 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"Coyolar(e) you going to try this new Camacho? For years now, cigar enthusiasts seeking the boldest of the bold, the richest of the rich, have flocked their ways to Camacho. Indeed, those who have felt the stung of this scorpion are most imbued with love for the brand, constantly stocking up to make sure their humidor never runs low. And for good reason. The Camacho brand has been one of the industry’s standards for quality and consistency for well over a decade, and that won’t change any time soon.Now before you think I’m trying to pull a fast one on you: Camacho Coyolar isn’t technically “new.” Originally grown on a 15-acre farm at the base of the mountain that joins Nicaragua and Honduras, Coyolar was on the market for years before mysteriously disappearing. But now, we can all rejoice, as Coyolar has made its triumphant return, sporting the same exact blend as the original. It may have a new coat of paint, but this one’s a tried and true blend — rich, bold, and incredibly full-bodied, Coyolar delivers heaping doses of oak, leather, and bitter espresso. A must try for fans of bold blends, Coyolar belongs in your rotation. ",Medium-Full,"['Figurado', 'Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Rothschild', 'Toro']",Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Figurado, Gordo, Perfecto, Rothschild, Toro",No,Honduran,Camacho
Camacho Criollo,Rated 4.31 out of 5, Based on 35 Ratings ,"​Say hello to Criollo. Camacho Criollo lives up to its fabled reputation of getting a whole lotta bang for your buck. Widely regarded as being ""as close to Cuba as you can get,"" Camacho cigars celebrate a long and illustrious tradition of pleasing the most grizzled enthusiasts.Criollo is a welcomed page in Camacho's book. Thanks to serving up a satisfying medium-bodied array of spicy-sweet undertones, there's a lot to look forward to. Featuring a gorgeous fourth priming Criollo ’98 wrapper and a balanced blend of Honduran and Dominican-grown Piloto Cubano long-fillers, it's got plenty of gusto too, but without all the knee-knocking strength Camacho is known for. That means you can get behind the wheel of this handmade almost any time of day. As my feeble minded co-worker likes to say, ""you can savor the flavor all day long.""Camacho Criollo Figurado received a well-deserved 92-point rating noting: ""Draped in an eye-catching Colorado wrapper, this well-rolled torpedo smokes perfectly, imparting profound cocoa notes, earthiness and savory leather.""",,"['Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Gigante', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Honduran",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Cigarillos, Gigante, Robusto, Toro",No,Criollo,Camacho
Camacho Diploma Black Special Selection,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"The Black Tie DiplomaEvery cigar produced by Camacho lives up to their stringent quality control standards, which is the way they’ve been doing business since the beginning way back in 1961. They’re committed to only using the best tobacco in all their product lines, but their Special Selection releases are on another level entirely. Released in a slightly different blend & package every year, in highly limited quantities, Special Selection Camachos contain only their absolute top-tier tobacco, and are rolled by the five best pairs of cigar makers in Camacho’s factory. We’re proud to introduce the latest Special Selection: The Diploma Black.Camacho Diploma Black Special Selection comes in just one 5” x 50 robusto size, rolled in a batch of 1800 boxes of 18 cigars. This small-batch release consists entirely of Honduran tobacco, and is packaged in striking, high-gloss triangular coffins. As for the flavors, these beauties pump out medium-bodied, toasty-smooth nuances of earth, cedar, baking spices, and leather. This is a release you won’t want to miss, so don’t wait until the next Special Selection release to pull the trigger. Add the Dimploma Black to your collection today while supplies last!",Full,['Robusto'],Corojo,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Robusto,No,"Honduran, Maduro",Camacho
Camacho Distillery Edition - Connecticut,Rated 4.54 out of 5,,"A new day for authentic Corojo.Camacho fans know there’s a little something different about the brand that truly sets them apart from their competition. The bold, complex flavors are like no other, and this is because Camacho is one of the only brands to use real, authentic, pre-1997 Cuban-seed Corojo in their blends. This leaf is what ensured their success and longevity, but now Camacho is kicking it up a notch. They took the rare leaf and aged it for 6 months in charred bourbon barrels to draw out even more flavor and complexity, and called it the Camacho Distillery Edition.The Distillery Edition comes in just one 6” x 50 toro size with your choice of three familiar, but amped-up blends. The Connecticut, Corojo, and Ecuador have all been meticulously reblended, all utilizing the sweet, complex barrel-aged Corojo, adding a whole new dimension to the flavor profiles you know & love. Connecticut: An Ecuador Connecticut wrapper overtop a Corojo binder and long-fillers containing Dominican ligero and barrel-aged Corojo, producing a medium-bodied profile of spice, cream, and nuts, with an oaky sweetness.If you’re already a fan of Camacho’s great blends, picking up a box of these should be a no-brainer. If you’re still on the fence, you won’t regret trying them out when you taste the profile that can only come from these rare leaves carefully processed and rolled by the company that does it best. And of course, they all go great with a glass of bourbon!",Medium,['Toro'],Corojo,"Dominican, Honduran",False,,More Details,Honduras,False,,Toro,False,Ecuador Connecticut,Camacho
Camacho Distillery Edition - Corojo,Rated 4.54 out of 5,,"A new day for authentic Corojo.Camacho fans know there’s a little something different about the brand that truly sets them apart from their competition. The bold, complex flavors are like no other, and this is because Camacho is one of the only brands to use real, authentic, pre-1997 Cuban-seed Corojo in their blends. This leaf is what ensured their success and longevity, but now Camacho is kicking it up a notch. They took the rare leaf and aged it for 6 months in charred bourbon barrels to draw out even more flavor and complexity, and called it the Camacho Distillery Edition.The Distillery Edition comes in just one 6” x 50 toro size with your choice of three familiar, but amped-up blends. The Connecticut, Corojo, and Ecuador have all been meticulously reblended, all utilizing the sweet, complex barrel-aged Corojo, adding a whole new dimension to the flavor profiles you know & love. Corojo: A Honduran Corojo puro, using a ligero wrapper, barrel-aged binder, and ligero, seco, and viso long-fillers. Full-bodied, bold, and complex, pumps out toasty, spicy notes of earth, caramel, and leather.If you’re already a fan of Camacho’s great blends, picking up a box of these should be a no-brainer. If you’re still on the fence, you won’t regret trying them out when you taste the profile that can only come from these rare leaves carefully processed and rolled by the company that does it best. And of course, they all go great with a glass of bourbon!",Full,['Toro'],Corojo,Honduran,False,,More Details,Honduras,False,,Toro,False,Corojo,Camacho
Camacho Distillery Edition - Ecuador,Rated 4.54 out of 5,,"A new day for authentic Corojo.Camacho fans know there’s a little something different about the brand that truly sets them apart from their competition. The bold, complex flavors are like no other, and this is because Camacho is one of the only brands to use real, authentic, pre-1997 Cuban-seed Corojo in their blends. This leaf is what ensured their success and longevity, but now Camacho is kicking it up a notch. They took the rare leaf and aged it for 6 months in charred bourbon barrels to draw out even more flavor and complexity, and called it the Camacho Distillery Edition.The Distillery Edition comes in just one 6” x 50 toro size with your choice of three familiar, but amped-up blends. The Connecticut, Corojo, and Ecuador have all been meticulously reblended, all utilizing the sweet, complex barrel-aged Corojo, adding a whole new dimension to the flavor profiles you know & love. Ecuador: Barrel-aged Corojo is joined by Dominican Pelo de Oro for the filler blend, and lays beneath a Brazilian Mata Fina binder and Ecuador Habano wrapper. Features medium-full bodied notes of citrus, toast, oak, and cream, with a spicy, floral finish. If you’re already a fan of Camacho’s great blends, picking up a box of these should be a no-brainer. If you’re still on the fence, you won’t regret trying them out when you taste the profile that can only come from these rare leaves carefully processed and rolled by the company that does it best. And of course, they all go great with a glass of bourbon!",Medium-Full,['Toro'],Brazil,"Dominican, Honduran",False,,More Details,Honduras,False,,Toro,False,Ecuador Habano,Camacho
Camacho Ditka Game Time,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"What time is it?For Camacho Cigars, it’s always Game Time. Some of the best, boldest blends wear the Camacho band, so who better to produce a cigar for a man with such exacting standards as Mike Ditka? Ditka won’t put his name on anything unless he believes in it, and when he believes in something, the result is always extraordinary. After having brought us the Ditka Signature and a few other limited edition lines, Game Time is set to be the newest addition to the Ditka-Camacho portfolio. The Ditka Game Time is a rousing blend of Dominican long-fillers inside a Corojo binder, and dressed in a silky Honduran Criollo wrapper. Coming in just one chunky 6.5” x 54 size, this stick is as big and bold as the man himself, and the complex yet balanced medium-bodied profile will have you fired up like a locker-room pep-talk. When you have a box of Ditka Game Time on hand, you’ll be ready for Game Time any time. ",Medium-Full,['Gigante'],,"Brazilian, Dominican, Honduran",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Gigante,No,Nicaraguan,
Camacho Ecuador,Rated 4.52 out of 5, Based on 61 Ratings ,"​Score one for Ecuador!Camacho Ecuador — quite simply, one of Camacho's finest offerings. This blend really has it all, from an intriguing, invigorating flavor profile to a mix of well-chosen tobacco leaves. Plus, the intensity: though it weighs in just above a medium-body, the flavor is incredibyl rich, with a long and unique finish you won't soon forget. Topped with a choice Ecuadorian Habano wrapper leaf, a Brazilian binder, and a blend of long fillers from Honduras and the Dominican, Camacho Ecuador is the total package. The flavors are thrilling, and include tones of pepper with light floral and citrus notes for balance. Go right ahead and light one up for yourself – you’ll be so glad you did.Camacho Ecuador received a well-deserved 91-rating noting: ""This attractive torpedo starts with an upfront punch of coffee and chocolate before taking on touches of sweet graham cracker and molasses.""",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Figurado', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Brazil,"Dominican, Honduran",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Figurado, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Camacho
Camacho Ecuador BXP,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"You won’t be hard-pressed to find something to love here. What motivates someone to reblend a 91-rated, beloved classic? For the Camacho BXP series, it was the goal of delivering an even more refined experience. Dylan Austin, VP of Camacho, explained that in creating the new BXP version of their popular blends he decided to add more broadleaf to each filler blend. The result, he says? An intense taste experience. And intense is the right word. A medium to full-bodied palate of pepper, light floral notes and citrus undertones is mixed with a hit of black pepper to give you a thrilling experience like no other. This is a cigar that performs exceptionally cigar after cigar. Meaning you can stock up your humidor with tons of Ecuador BXPs and know you’ve always got a dependably delicious cigar at hand. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto']",Brazil,"Dominican, Honduran, Varied",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Gordo, Robusto",Varies,"Ecuador Habano, Habano",Camacho
Camacho Hard Charger LE 2018,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Always ahead of the pack.On today’s episode of “Cigars That Live up to Their Names”: the Camacho Hard Charger LE 2018. This heady release is part of the Camacho Brotherhood Series, a family of highly limited blends that pay homage to the defenders of America’s freedom. So what’s under the hood? Camacho Hard Charger was inspired by the US Marines, and starts with a Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper over Camacho’s signature original Corojo long-fillers. As soon as you light up, you’re greeted by a charge of black pepper notes over cedar, espresso bean, and cocoa, with a subtle power that makes for a perfect herfing experience. Grab a box today, because the release was limited to just 1500 boxes of 20 cigars. Oorah!",Medium-Full,['Toro'],Corojo,,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Toro,No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Maduro",Camacho
Camacho Imperial Stout,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Beer, bourbon, and cigars. These are a few of my favorite things.If you’re into craft beer, you might have heard of the Oskar Blues Brewery in Colorado. I know I have, and their Ten Fidy Stout is in my regular rotation. So of course, when I heard they were releasing a special edition beer aged in bourbon barrels, I was excited, to say the least. But when I heard that Camacho, one of my personal favorite brands, was making a cigar aged in the spent bourbon barrels after Oskar Blues used to them for one of my favorite beers? I couldn’t contain myself. And I couldn’t wait to share it with the world.The blend starts with Camacho’s famous original Corojo tobacco, aged patiently in the beer-soaked bourbon barrels for a minimum of 6 months. The filler is then rounded out by Brazilian and Dominican tobacco, secured with a Honduran Corojo binder, and finished with a beautifully oily and rich Mexican San Andres wrapper, resulting in a veritable feast for the senses. This cigar comes in just one size, a 6”x 50 toro, and is brimming with notes of malty beer, rich caramel, oak, leather, and spice, creating a flavor profile the likes of which you haven’t seen before and may not see ever again. My favorite things in the world are beer, bourbon, and cigars, so if you’re anything like me, you’ll be jumping on these before they’re gone! ",Medium-Full,['Toro'],Corojo,"Brazilian, Dominican, Honduran",False,,More Details,Honduras,False,,Toro,False,San Andres,
Camacho Liberty 2012 Throwback,Rated 4.66 out of 5,,"The Liberty is back!Starting in 2002, Camacho has released an annual limited edition cigar called the Liberty. Predating the iconic scorpion labels, the Liberty has stood since its inception as one of the most highly sought-after cigars in the world. It’s also one of the rarest, with annual production being limited to 2000 boxes. Now the Liberty is back, and the blend hearkens back to one of the finest Liberty releases to date. The Camacho Liberty 2012 Throwback comes packed in a beautiful humidor-quality box containing 20 individually-numbered coffins with the cigars inside in the signature 11/18 perfecto shape. These beauties are comprised of nothing but the best well-aged Honduran Corojo leaves, and weigh in at medium-full body with notes of toasty earth, cream, spice, and cedar in perfect balance. A piece of Camacho’s history and one of the greatest cigars on the planet are right at your fingertips, so pull the trigger and proclaim your Liberty! The Camacho Liberty 2012 Throwback has been awarded a well-deserved 91-point rating, noting ""Tapered at both ends with a bulge in the middle, this figurado draws effortlessly, layering the palate with notes of leather, dark chocolate and nuts. Hints of saffron and caramel add balance and complexity.""",Medium-Full,['Perfecto'],Honduran,Honduran,False,False,More Details,Honduras,No,,Perfecto,No,Corojo,Camacho
Camacho Liberty Series 2020,Rated 4.66 out of 5,,"Long live Liberty!For 18 years now, Camacho has released an annual limited edition cigar right around the 4th of July holiday called the Liberty Series, honoring the birth of and celebrating the history of the United States. Predating the iconic scorpion labels, the Liberty Series has stood since its inception as one of the most highly sought-after cigars in the world. It’s also one of the rarest, with annual production being limited to a few thousand boxes only. For the first time since the start, the Liberty Series 2020 is not a throwback edition! Instead, Camacho has created a brand new blend created specifically for this year's release. Packaged inside a gorgeous patriotic inspired, humidor quality box, sit 20 box-pressed gordo (6"" x 60) sized cigars, all nestled within their own individual coffins. Comprised of four different tobacco primings from the same farm and vintage, the Liberty Series 2020 takes a Honduran Corojo binder and marries it with both Honduran and Dominican Corojo fillers, then adds a delicious Ecadorian Habano wrapper to produce an extremely satisfying medium to full-bodied experience filled with notes of sweet wood, cedar, walnuts, leather, and earth. Let's be honest, 2020 has already been a crazy year. Don't miss the opportunity to snatch up a piece of this year's more preferable history, purchase your box of Liberty Series 2020 today! ",Medium-Full,['Gordo'],"Corojo, Honduran","African, Dominican, Honduran",False,,More Details,Honduras,True,,Gordo,False,Ecuador Habano,Camacho
Camacho Machitos,Rated 4.43 out of 5, Based on 14 Ratings ,"Short, bold cigars.Although there are plenty of choices when you’re looking for a small cigar, very few can pack the complete experience of a full-size stick into a small package. Camacho Machitos are long-filler blends that don’t skimp on flavor or complexity, in short they’re everything you’d expect from a Camacho cigar in a short vitola. These feisty little boomsticks have the exact same blends as their larger counterparts and are available in Connecticut, Corojo, and Criollo. Try the Camacho Machitos for a perfect companion on your daily commute, when you’re walking Fido, or when the weather demands a shorter time.Camacho Machitos Connecticut features a Connecticut wrapper atop a blend of Dominican and Honduran long-fillers. Mellow to medium-bodied, with spice from the get-go and flavors including cedar and vanilla.Camacho Machitos Criollo is dressed with a Honduran wrapper over a blend of Dominican and Honduran long-leaves. Expect a pleasing balance of spice and sweetness. Medium-bodied and satisfying to the nub.Camacho Machitos Corojo is a full-bodied powerhouse that sports a Honduran Corojo wrapper resting over a potent blend of Honduran long-fillers. ​",Full,['Cigarillos'],,"Dominican, Honduran",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Cigarillos,No,"Connecticut, Corojo, Criollo",Camacho
Camacho Nicaraguan Barrel-Aged,Rated 4.55 out of 5, Based on 33 Ratings ,"Camacho — Master BuiltPrepare yourself. The newest Camacho is here, and this one’s a doozy! Camacho’s Master Built Series has always been known for innovation, and this release is no different. Featuring tobaccos aged in some of the world’s oldest Nicaraguan rum barrels, Nicaraguan Barrel Aged is a new release that can’t be ignored. On top of this cigar you’ll find an Ecuadorian Habano 2000 wrapper, with Mexican binder and long-fillers from Nicaragua and the Dominican. But it’s the aging in the rum barrels that gives this cigar its true flavor. Notes of spice and oak are met with warm sugar and caramel flavors. That’s because Camacho worked carefully with Flor de Cana to make sure every barrel is up to the highest standards of excellence. So light one up, pour out a few fingers of the good stuff, and enjoy! ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Mexican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Ecuador Habano, Habana 2000",Camacho
Camacho Powerband,Rated 4.61 out of 5, Based on 57 Ratings ,"Floor it with Camacho An intense, powerful, adrenaline-fueled blend like no other. Camacho Powerband cigars are here, and they're here to stay. Inspired by the strength, speed, and acceleration of a classic V-twin engine, Camacho Powerband is a high-octane blend for enthusiasts that prefer their cigars to have a healthy kick of oomph. This cigar takes its place in the Master Built series, alongside the Triple Maduro and the full-bodied American Barrel Aged. Powerband isn’t just flashy to look at though, it’s a masterclass performer under the hood. Rolled with a unique bunching process that makes sure there’s a great draw on every cigar, Powerband is everything you want in a premium cigar. Tobacco from five different countries shows off notes of dark coffee, chili pepper, and a rich oaky core with an Ecuadorian Habano 2000 wrapper bringing an extra bit of oomph to this one. Take the Powerband for a test drive, and I’m sure you’ll be back for the box. ​",Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Mexican,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,Camacho
Camacho Scorpion Connecticut,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 19 Ratings ,"Don’t get stung by high prices! Camacho cigars are great, that’s for sure. But sometimes my wallet’s a little… ahem, light. Let’s face it: burning cigar after cigar and chugging a six pack of beer a night is awesome, but it sure isn’t cheap. Luckily, today’s newest release from Camacho is both delicious and wallet-friendly: a combination that an absolute cigar nut like me can certainly get behind. Offered up in two different wrappers, today we’re focused on the Connecticut release. Handmade in Honduras and featuring a gorgeous Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper leaf, Scorpion Connecticut is as smooth as it is flavorful. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Camacho
Camacho Scorpion Fumas Connecticut,Rated 4.33 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Just a little sting, and your troubles are gone.If you’re looking for smooth flavors with boldness to spare, you’d be remiss to overlook Camacho. The brand was ubiquitous even before donning the signature scorpion artwork, and the blends have only gotten better and better. The Scorpion line is the newest member of the Camacho portfolio, consisting of limited release blends & sizes that continue the Camacho tradition for a fraction of the cost. The Scorpion Fumas Conecticut comes in bundles of 16, and wears an Ecuador wrapper over mixed-fill Honduran and Nicaraguan fillers. The flavors are all Camacho- a bit of spice complimenting notes of nuts, cedar, and cream, and makes for an unforgettable experience for pennies on the dollar. Grab a bundle of Camacho Scorpion Fumas Connecticut, and let the Scorpion’s sting get your mind right.",Medium,[],,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,,No,Ecuador Connecticut,Camacho
Camacho Scorpion Fumas Sun Grown,Rated 4.44 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"A scorpion for the everyman.Camacho is the big, bold, powerhouse of the cigar industry. Hailing from Honduras, each one of their blends exhibits hefty flavors and unmatched smoothness, and their striking packaging is usually the first thing you lay your eyes on in a cigar shop. With the Scorpion line, Camacho has continued this tradition of boldness and refined strength for a much lower price. The Scorpion Fumas are the most affordable offerings in the Scorpion line, but they still don’t sacrifice any flavor to do it. Featuring an Ecuador Habano wrapper over a Cuban-sandwich style blend of Honduran and Nicaraguan tobaccos, these beauties pump out flavors of nuts, coffee, and spice. You won’t believe how little you paid for these firecrackers when you light up your first, and you’ll be ordering more bundles before you know it!",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto",No,Ecuador Sungrown,Camacho
Camacho Scorpion Sun Grown,Rated 4.73 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"Camacho boxes – now more wallet-friendly than ever! The Camacho Scorpion is one of the most iconic pieces of branding in the cigar industry – a quick glance at that beast and you know you’re about to experience the classic Camacho mixture of boldness and reliability. So it was only a matter of time before the Scorpion got a cigar of its own. Available in both Connecticut and Sun Grown, today we’re looking at the darker meat. My favorite Sun Grown cigars always have a ton of rich, natural sweetness, and Camacho Scorpion doesn’t disappoint. Handmade in Honduras with handpicked tobaccos, this Scorpion stings with a rich flavor profile, featuring a warm, sugary sweetness on top of black pepper spice. It’s super-rare to find Camacho boxes as affordable as this, so do yourself a favor and jump aboard today. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto",No,Ecuador Habano,Camacho
Camacho Scorpion Sweet Tip,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"The sweet sting of victory.Camacho carries a well-earned reputation for pumping out bold, heavy blends with smooth flavors and meticulous construction, and any time you see the ubiquitous Camacho scorpion, you know your taste buds are in for a treat. The Camacho Scorpion line is the latest addition to their bevy of bold blends, and promises that same Camacho quality, and carries a much smaller price tag.Handmade in Honduras with Honduran filler, Mexican binder, and Ecuador Connecticut wrapper, and features a tip imbued with just the right amount of sweetness to compliment the flavors beautifully. When you light up a Scorpion Sweet Tip, you’re in for a great burn, a great draw, and medium bodied notes of almonds, cedar, and leather. Grab a bundle and let the Scorpion’s Sting coat your palate in bold, sweet bliss.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto']",Mexican,Honduran,False,,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Camacho
Camacho The Original Diploma,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Diploma’s returnHailing from the lush soils of Honduras, Camacho is a boutique line of cigars deserving of the many 90-plus ratings it has acquired. They have a reputation for expertly balancing unmatched flavor with a satisfying boldness. And The Original Diploma is one of their finest and most sought after blends created. It originally debuted in 2001 but soon vanished from the market. Then we saw it again in 2015 for a short run. Then in 2017, the company announced it would return once a year, in a new limited edition size.The blend uses some of the finest tobaccos in the world and is crafted by Camacho’s 5 most skilled torcedores (rollers) in the factory with the leaves hand-selected by the factory supervisor to ensure the best experience possible. The tobacco used is all Honduran Corojo from higher priming’s to add a little extra power. The end result is a medium to full-bodied cigar with balanced notes of wood, cocao, dried fruit, and some pepper on the finish. When this package arrives at your door you’ll be amazed. It’s some of the finest packaging in the industry and one of the best cigars to hit our docks this year. ",Medium-Full,['Figurado'],Corojo,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Figurado,No,Corojo,Camacho
Camacho Triple Maduro,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 55 Ratings ,"​A triple threat.If you want big, bold flavors, then you’ve come to the right place. Camacho often goes head to head with some of the most storied Cuban brands....and comes out on top time after time. These highly complex, intensely flavorful rock star blends come from the fertile soils of Honduras in a climate that rivals the lush Vuelta Abajo region of Cuba. Superior, expertly cultivated tobacco leaves are grown at Ranchos Jamastran under the watchful gaze of the Eiroa family.Camacho Triple Maduro is the world’s first all-maduro cigar. Prepare thyself for an explosion of dark, complex flavors. Triple Maduro was created for fans of a full-bodied blend, and this one is packing heat. You can anticipate rich and hearty undertones of spice and earth that are strong and bold without completely decimating the palate. Evenly constructed and epically dark and inviting, this is one maduro you won’t want to miss. Rumor has it that the Eiroas had to attempt the perfect blend 84 times before they got it right, but by George, they actually did it. ",Full,"['Figurado', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']","Corojo, Honduran Broadleaf","Brazilian, Dominican, Honduran",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Figurado, Gordo, Robusto",No,"Maduro, San Andres",Camacho
CAO America,Rated 4.58 out of 5, Based on 248 Ratings ,"God Bless America!CI and CAO, two rock-ribbed American companies put on this planet to bring you the best premium cigars at the best prices you can imagine. And what better way to tribute the best damn country in the world, than with a tasty and satisfying super-premium? Presenting one of our favorite cigars from this amazing brand, CAO America. America is part of the now famous World series from CAO. This blend boldly showcases a four country long-filler mix of Dominican, Nicaraguan, Italian, and, you guessed it, American tobaccos. Expect a rich, chewy profile, loaded with cream and oaky nuances. The finish is short and sweet, but don’t be fooled — CAO America is a robust, medium to full-bodied beast.CAO America cigars received an impressive 92-rating, noting: “A two-toned cigar rolled barber pole style in a light and dark wrapper… sweet and savory flavors come together in the form of roasted meat, sweet cedar, and chocolate.”",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Brazil,"Dominican, Italian, Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Torpedo",No,"Connecticut, Connecticut Broadleaf",CAO
CAO Black,Rated 4.41 out of 5, Based on 478 Ratings ,"CAO’s first and finest“The best cigar I’ve had, bar none.” I’m not exaggerating, I hear this over and over again from our customers. And I have to say I agree with them. You see, to many of us, the exclusive CAO Black cigar is CAO’s crown jewel, their piece de resistance. That’s a bold statement, considering CAO’s stable includes a number of exceptional cigars. You see, this blend was crafted with extensively aged, top-tier tobaccos, and each batch is made in limited quantities. Individually draped in cedar, this classic offers a ton of creamy spice flavors, with a subtle hint of vanilla along with an abundance of complex and varied, medium-bodied flavors. It booms out big, creamy rings, burns perfectly, and mellows nicely after the first third. Simply awesome. Just ask Cigar Buyer magazine, which awarded CAO Black with an unprecedented perfect score — 10 out of 10.  ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,"Honduran, Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,CAO
CAO Brazilia,Rated 4.78 out of 5, Based on 649 Ratings ,"CAO Takes Over the WorldReleased after five meticulous years of research and planning, the CAO Brazilia is a full-flavored cigar made from one of the finest Brazilian wrapper leaves we’ve ever seen. It’s a fitting tribute to the country — for centuries, Brazil has been celebrated for its art, and its creation of all things beautiful. And Brazilia is most certainly beautiful. Extensively aged, the long-fillers here are all Nicaraguan tobaccos of the highest caliber. Though Brazilia performs well in every size, most notable here are the 54 to 60-ring options. The complexity offered from these wider vitolas keeps the cigars smooth, burning cool all the way down to the nub. In short, Brazilia is a classic blend, well worth your consideration.In addition to numerous 90-ratings, Brazilia has an esteemed 91-rating, noting: “complex, with an earthy, floral flavor and a toasty, nutty quality. Full bodied, with a long, toasty finish.” ",Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Brazilian, Maduro",CAO
CAO Colombia,Rated 4.55 out of 5, Based on 154 Ratings ,"CAO Spans the GlobeCAO’s “World” cigar line is a star-studded arsenal, containing some of the finest cigars on the planet. To make someone choose a favorite would be a cruel request, they’re all amazing. But, if forced to choose, I wouldn’t be surprised to hear more than a few guys declare CAO Colombia as their #1. This unique gem features a mixture of Colombian and Brazilian leaves that no other cigar on the market can match. Cuban-seed tobaccos have actually been flourishing in Colombia since the 19th century, though you rarely hear about them. Discover their most-welcome qualities with CAO. Colombia showcases “Ica Mazinga” tobacco, a leaf that’s been developed over 15 years of hard work. Employing it with a Nicaraguan wrapper and Cameroon binder, Colombia dishes out spades of toasted nuts, coffee, and a sweet n’ salty finish. CAO Colombia has finally received a long overdue 92-rating, noting: “Its core of earth and wood is balanced by sweet, fruity notes of black cherry and nougat with a nutty touch of cashew.”",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto']",Cameroon,"Brazilian, Colombian",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto",No,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",CAO
CAO Consigliere,Rated 4.71 out of 5, Based on 84 Ratings ,"Introduce Yourself to an Old Friend“What do you hear, what do you say?” CAO Consigliere is the new boss in town, so you better pay your respects. Out to make all inferior blends sleep with the fishes, this bold offering from CAO isn’t messing around. Honestly, it reminds me of a blend from a few years back, but I can’t quite put my finger on it… Well, hey, what do I know? Fuggitaboutit!Let’s get down to the nitty-gritty. This perfect Malatov cocktail brings about a robust mixture of earth, sweet hints of cinnamon, and a nutty core. The Brazilian wrapper leaf is stunning on every sample that’s passed my desk, inviting you to indulge in just one more. The price for this one’s on point, the packaging is solid, the flavor is amazing — Bada Bing, Bada Boom!",Medium-Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Honduran,"Colombian, Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Brazilian,CAO
CAO Extreme,Rated 4.51 out of 5, Based on 206 Ratings ,"CAO Extreme Ain’t Messing AroundSome say never judge a book by its cover. Solid advice, most time, but today I say eff that noise. Extreme delivers exactly what you’d expect from first glance — a cigar built upon complexity, and power. CAO is the keeper of the over a dozen different 90+ rated brands, and over 50 unique 90+ ratings. Rest assured, Extreme fits right in with the rest of the CAO family. It all begins with a dark and oily Ecuador Habano ligero wrapper, which graces a rich and spicy Nicaraguan binder. These tasty leaves conceal a robust combination of long-fillers from Honduras and Nicaragua, with a dash of La Estradas leaf in the mix. After significant post-roll aging, this eventful cocktail serves up a bouquet that’s rich and hearty throughout. Toast, charred oak, nuts, espresso and black pepper smack every last taste bud, and the strength is more than satisfying. Save this one for after a large meal, and you’re in for pure cigar nirvana.",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,CAO
CAO Flathead,Rated 4.77 out of 5, Based on 917 Ratings ,"A Real Blockhead…‘Murica, son! Home of hot rods, pin-up chicks, and CAO’s greatest offering: CAO Flathead. Borrowing inspiration from American muscle cars, Flathead not only sports a highly-unique shape, but backs it up with a high-octane blend. Instead of the traditional round or torpedo shaped head, this sleek handmade is completely squared off. Heavy in the hand, CAO Flathead starts with a well-fermented Connecticut Broadleaf maduro wrapper. Thick and chewy, the leaf conceals a bevy of Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers embraced by a Connecticut Habano-seed binder. Then, each cigar is carefully box-pressed. We could tell you how good it is, or we could say this — CAO Flathead has over 600 customer reviews on CI, averaging 5 stars out of 5, and is the highest rated 60-ring cigar by Cigar Aficionado. Ever. Named the #3 Cigar of 2015, Flathead received an astounding 95-rating, noting: “From the first light, this seriously squared-off cigar takes off with notes of ripe fruit, leather, and molasses that only gain intensity.”",Full,"['Double Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']","Connecticut, Habano","Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Double Corona, Gordo, Robusto",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,CAO
CAO Flathead Gearbox,Rated 4.42 out of 5, Based on 118 Ratings ,"Flathead goes traditionalCAO Flathead Cigars are some of the most highly demanded cigars on the market today. They’re inspired by muscle cars, engines, and pin-up chicks – that’s America, son! The Gearbox is the spiritual successor to the original 95-rated Flathead and comes in three special edition sizes. It takes a more traditional approach with rounded heads and non-box-pressed vitolas. But other than that, it’s the same great high-octane blend that keeps connoisseurs and critics alike coming back for more. The packaging is also top-notch – a detachable lid that can be used as wall art and unique metal gears as secondary bands.CAO Flathead Gearbox features a 3 country blend that kicks off with a dark and alluring Connecticut Broadleaf maduro wrapper, and is completed with premium Connecticut Habano, Nicaraguan, and Dominican long-fillers. Upon lighting, expect a swift kick of flavor. A truly enjoyable full-bodied and complex cigar with hearty notes of spice, pepper, cocoa, and coffee. There’s only one way to experience this unique release, grab a box for yourself and enjoy!​",Full,['Gordo'],Habano,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Gordo,No,Connecticut Broadleaf,CAO
CAO Flathead Steel Horse,Rated 4.79 out of 5, Based on 112 Ratings ,"Helmet not includedCAO’s Flathead drew inspiration from hotrods and pinups, and now CAO pays tribute to motorcycle culture with a new extension of the line, Flathead Steel Horse. CAO Flathead Steel Horse hits the open road and hammers down with this powerhouse blend. Boasting the unique Flathead design, this immaculate handmade is a standard parejo with a squared-off head.CAO Flathead features a 5 country blend that begins with a gorgeous Connecticut Habano Oscuro wrapper, and is finished with a Brazilian Arapiraca binder and Honduran, Nicaraguan, and Dominican long-fillers. Upon lighting, expect a wallop of flavor. This is an enjoyable full-bodied and complex cigar with hearty notes of spice, pepper, chocolate, oak, and coffee. Get yer motor runnin’ and enjoy the ride with Flathead Steel Horse. ​​",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto']",Brazil,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto",No,Connecticut,CAO
CAO Flathead V19,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Hold on tight.CAO was firing on all cylinders when they released the Flathead. The high-octane blend received incredible ratings and the highest score given to a 6” x 60 by Cigar Aficionado EVER, and even took home the title of third best cigar of the year in 2015. The meaty box-pressed blend was inspired by the world of hot-rods and pin-ups, and featured smooth, full bodied flavors and flawless construction. Now the team at CAO have supercharged the Flathead, with the same blend but a unique fermentation process.The Flathead V19 utilizes the same Connecticut broadleaf wrapper, Connecticut habano binder, and Nicaraguan & Dominican fillers, but cuts the fermentation time. The result is that the leaves retain their native, natural flavors, which are then refined through longer than usual aging. On paper the V19 looks exactly the same as the original Flathead, but make no mistake: these cigars are in a class of their own. Deep molasses and leather notes will take your palate on a joy ride that you won’t ever want to end, so grab a box and light up any time you need to rev your engines.",Full,['Robusto'],Habano,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,Robusto,False,Connecticut Broadleaf,CAO
CAO Flavours,Rated 4.54 out of 5, Based on 432 Ratings ,"Subtle, exotic flavors by CAO cigars.CAO Flavours are top-notch flavored cigars with subtle, real flavors that don’t overpower. As one customer gushed, “this is the Godiva of flavored cigars!” CAO Flavours are different than most flavoreds. Made of​ high-quality long-fillers only, they’re very mellow and offer a great change of pace - plus CAO handmade quality.CAO Bella Vanilla: uses top-tier vanilla beans from Madagascar, considered the finest source for vanilla in the world. Complex flavors abound and these superior beans are imbued into a blend of rich Cuban seed tobaccos, resulting in a subtle, well balanced cigar with a rich, layered complexity.​CAO Cherrybomb: Cherrybomb explodes on the palate, quite literally, releasing an exceedingly flavorful and enjoyable series of cherry and black currant flavors. This explosion is soon tamed by a creamy core of vanilla and sweet, almost citrusy aroma. CAO Eileen's Dream: quite possibly the most unique of CAO's Flavours. Comprised of a smooth Cameroon wrapper and mellow Dominican filler that have been infused with an explosion of ingredients including Irish whiskey, cream, coconut milk, hazelnut, white chocolate, almonds, cocoa, and vanilla bean. This is a must-try.CAO Gold Honey: made with high quality orange blossom honey. Together with fine tobaccos, this is an exquisite, delicate blend with a faint citrus flavor.CAO Moontrance: an intricate blend of 100% natural exotic fruit and bourbon vanilla extracts. Offering a fantastic, caramel-like sweetness. When combined with a genuine Cameroon wrapper, Moontrance is sure to delight even the most skeptical of palates.CAO Solfyre: This new creation pumps out a unique spicy-sweet profile that's bound to turn a few heads (and cause a few flashbacks). Spicy notes of cinnamon join forces with the smoky character of whiskey. Yes...it tastes exactly like the liquor it was modeled after.",Mellow,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']","Connecticut Broadleaf, Nicaraguan","Dominican, Nicaraguan",True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Cigarillos, Corona, Petite Corona, Robusto, Torpedo",Yes,Cameroon,CAO
CAO Flavours Cigarillos,Rated 4.7 out of 5, Based on 255 Ratings ,"CAO Flavours Cigarillos are here to save your coffee breaks!CAO flavours are some of the most popular infused cigars on the market, boasting high-quality tobacco and smooth, never-overpowering sweetness. Truly well-made cigars, the Flavours line is well-loved by both entry-level cigar enthusiasts looking for a sweet stick and seasoned connoisseurs looking to mix up their rotation. Classic flavors like the vanilla cigarillos, top-notch fillers, and now coming in a size you can take with you and pull from the tin any time you have a little time to kill. Whether you pass them out to those who compliment the aroma, or keep them all for yourself, you can't go wrong with this convenient size of such a delicious cigar.CAO Bella Vanilla: uses top-tier vanilla beans from Madagascar, considered the finest source for vanilla in the world. Complex flavors abound and these superior beans are imbued into a blend of rich Cuban seed tobaccos, resulting in a subtle, well balanced cigar with a rich, layered complexity.CAO Cherrybomb: Cherrybomb explodes on the palate, quite literally, releasing an exceedingly flavorful and enjoyable series of cherry and black currant flavors. This explosion is soon tamed by a creamy core of vanilla and sweet, almost citrusy aroma. CAO Eileen's Dream: quite possibly the most unique of CAO's Flavours. Comprised of a smooth Cameroon wrapper and mellow Dominican filler that have been infused with an explosion of ingredients including Irish whiskey, cream, coconut milk, hazelnut, white chocolate, almonds, cocoa, and vanilla bean. This is a must-try.CAO Gold Honey: made with high quality orange blossom honey. Together with fine tobaccos, this is an exquisite, delicate blend with a faint citrus flavor.CAO Moontrance: an intricate blend of 100% natural exotic fruit and bourbon vanilla extracts. Offering a fantastic, caramel-like sweetness. When combined with a genuine Cameroon wrapper, Moontrance is sure to delight even the most skeptical of palates.",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],Connecticut Broadleaf,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,Cameroon,
CAO Fuma em Corda,Rated 4.72 out of 5, Based on 18 Ratings ,"Back to the BasinCAO Amazon Basin was one of the most popular new CAO cigars in years. It was only a matter of time before a follow-up was announced. And lucky for all of us CAO fans, turns out that this Amazon experiment is bound for a trilogy! Enter phase two: CAO Fuma em Corda, a full-bodied blend like no other. The word “unique” gets thrown around a lot. But here, it’s the real McCoy. The tobacco used in the Fuma em Corda is bound by tightly wound ropes and left to ferment, a technique native to the tobacco farmers of Brazil. The Braganca tobacco inside undergoes a different process — compressed and fermented for six months into tightly wound tubes. Add a Honduran Oscuro wrapper and Cameroon binder and you’ll find a woody flavor, with spiciness and an incredibly long finish. Our recommendation? Jump aboard this posthaste, or get left behind. ",Medium-Full,['Toro'],Cameroon,"Brazilian, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Toro,No,Honduran,CAO
CAO Gold,Rated 4.49 out of 5, Based on 341 Ratings ,"One of CAO’s First and Finest 90-Rated CigarsCheck out CAO Gold, one of the cigars that put CAO on the map. Blended with handpicked, aged long leaves, Gold reliably delivers a classic cigar experience, and comes handsomely packaged in great looking cedar chests.Don’t be fooled by the pristine Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper on CAO Gold, this cigar is not mellow. Weighing in at more of a medium-body, Gold’s exquisite wrapper is expertly applied atop of Cuban-seed Nicaraguan filler and binder. Overall, we’re looking at a silky cigar that’s deep and complex. If you’re hankering for a real morsel, you’ve come to the right place. The CAO Gold received a 90-rating, noting: ”It is filled with sweet herbal earthiness, that includes a hint of pepper, light cocoa bean, leather and even roasted nuts.”",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Double Robusto', 'Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Cigarillos, Corona, Double Corona, Double Robusto, Perfecto, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,CAO
CAO Gold Maduro,Rated 4.74 out of 5, Based on 27 Ratings ,"The Darker Side of Nicaragua’s First Mellow HandmadeIt’s safe to say, after the success of CAO Brazilia and CAO Black ‘VR,’ that the CAO brand has revolutionized the Brazilian Maduro wrapper leaf. So why not put it on their top-selling blend, CAO Gold? And that’s exactly what they did. CAO Gold Maduro is a re-invention of one of the first 90-rated CAO blends.CAO Gold Maduro combined the mellow long-filler combination of Nicaraguan tobaccos used in the traditional Gold series, but wraps it in a dark and toothy Brazilian Maduro leaf. The result is a chewy, medium-bodied flavor with hints of coffee delivered in a most pleasing creamy, buttery fashion.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Brazilian,CAO
CAO ICON,Rated 4.8 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"From humble beginnings comes a true ‘ICON’.Cano Aret Ozgener has worked incredibly hard and taken lots of risks to get CAO where it is today. Entering the tobacco industry as a Meerschaum pipe carver, it wasn’t until 1993 that Ozgener entered the cigar business, so he had quite a lot to prove. With the help of Carlos Torano and Nestor Plasencia, CAO released their first Honduran cigar in ’93, and their first Nicaraguan cigar in ’96. It didn’t take long for CAO to claim a legendary reputation as a consistent best-seller, and earn the honor of an ‘ICON’ cigar release.The CAO ICON joins the ranks of single size ICON releases with a chunky 5.5” x 54 Connecticut Broadleaf-wrapped robusto, containing a punchy but smooth mix of Dominican & Nicaraguan long-fillers. This is a bold, hearty stick that'll be good as soon as they hit your doorstep or after a few years of aging, with a profile loaded down with oaky, earthy nuances and notes of cocoa, cedar, and coffee. CAO is a dedicated cigar company, and the ICON represents the best of their talents to date. Pick up a box, and tip your hat to true ‘ICON’.",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,,More Details,Dominican Republic,False,,Robusto,False,Connecticut Broadleaf,CAO
CAO Italia,Rated 4.59 out of 5, Based on 106 Ratings ,"Full and Spicy!When one thinks of Italy, premium cigar tobacco is usually not the first thing that comes to mind. But for CAO, so accustomed to pushing the boundaries of flavor, this is where they discovered some of their best, and most unique, tobaccos. This particular tobaccos is grown in the Benevento region of Italy and offers an enjoyable sweetness backed ever so slightly by toasted earthiness. When combined with a luscious, dark Habano-seed wrapper leaf grown in Honduras, and a select blend of fine filler leave tobaccos from Nicaragua and Peru, you’ll find an intricate 4-country blend that’s incredibly rich, robust, and complex. Italia is full-flavored, with sweetness and a long, bold finish. CAO Italia has received a 92-rating, noting: “creamy… lush with fruity, ripe apple notes, molasses and brown sugar. The finish is long and spicy.” ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,"Italian, Nicaraguan, Peruvian",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Habano Maduro,CAO
CAO La Traviata,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"A round of applause for La TraviataLa Traviata, an old Cuban brand, and an even older three act Italian opera by Giuseppe Verdi. This cigar is a stunning showstopper. Draped in an exquisite Ecuadoran Havana wrapper and filled with perfectly balanced Nicaraguan and Dominican tobaccos, La Traviata is a favorite among many cigar enthusiasts. This medium-bodied handmade made the Top 25 Premium Cigars of the Year list by Cigar Aficionado not once, but twice! A well-performing beauty of a cigar also earned a well-deserved 93-rating for its full and complex Cuban-esque flavor. CAO La Traviata, a worldwide best-seller, should definitely be in your humidor. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Cameroon,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,CAO
CAO La Traviata Maduro,Rated 4.2 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"La Traviata’s Sequel Years ago, the 93-rated CAO La Traviata dominated the market, delivering a medium to full-bodied, complex cigar experience like only CAO can. Today, we’re starting down the barrel at La Traviata Maduro, the spicier, richer follow-up to this winner of a blend. Swapping out the Ecuadorian Havana wrapper leaf for a thick and oily Broadleaf, La Traviata Maduro by CAO pleases the palate with intense spice notes over dark chocolate and roasted coffee. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Cameroon,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,CAO
CAO L'Anniversaire Cameroon,Rated 4.64 out of 5, Based on 92 Ratings ,"CAO Comes Close to PerfectionThe CAO L’Anniversaire cigar line was developed in honor of the 30th anniversary of CAO cigars. The Cameroon Series is a highly successful complement to the incredible success of CAO’s L’Anniversaire Maduro series. In a nutshell, the Cameroon is an unforgettable blend with a great looking box-pressed shape. Made with reddish-brown Cameroon wrappers from Africa and premium Nicaraguan long-fillers and binders. Mellow to medium-bodied in taste and box-pressed — this is one attractive, high-quality release.The L’Anniversaire Cameroon has received a 92-rating, noting: “Nicely pressed, with rich color. The cigar has a lovely draw and burn. It’s nutty and toasty, with coffee, cocoa and dry wood flavors.”",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Cameroon,CAO
CAO L'Anniversaire Maduro,Rated 4.76 out of 5, Based on 54 Ratings ,"30 Years of CAOThe top of the line from CAO, L’Anniversaire celebrates the 30th Anniversary of the CAO brand. This beautiful Nicaraguan maduro is making people forget all about Cuban cigars, with its rich, medium to full-bodied and balanced profile. The incredible success of this L’Anniversaire line spawned a sequel: the 92-rated L’Anniversaire Cameroon. L’Anniversaire Maduro features a mixture of tobaccos that includes a Cameroon binder, and fillers from both Nicaragua and Dominican Republic. On top, the Connecticut Broadleaf maduro wrapper is oily, glistening with a shine that easily invites you in. Lighting the foot, you’ll find a toasty and chocolatey flavor profile that will easily satisfy any fan of CAOs, maduros, or just premium cigars in general. The CAO L’Anniversaire Maduro has received a 90-rating, noting: “Beautiful color and construction. A well-made cigar. It burns well, with a fine draw. The cigar has intriguing notes of espresso and honey, with a steely undertone. Peppery and rich.”  ",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Belicoso, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,CAO
CAO Mx2,Rated 4.57 out of 5, Based on 103 Ratings ,"A Jet Black Beauty from CAOCAO’s MX2 is a long-awaited, limited production cigar that employs two flavorful wrappers. The outermost leaf is an ultra-dark, super oily Connecticut Broadleaf Maduro. Underneath, there’s a second wrapper leaf — fuller-flavored Brazilian Maduro. On their own, each of these wrappers would be high-quality enough. But combine the two, and you’ve got something completely stunning. To mix the pot even more, the folks at CAO use a blend of select long-fillers from Nicaragua, Honduras, Peru, and the Dominican Republic to complete this complex handmade. The resulting profile is packed with layer after layer of spicy, sweet flavors. If you’ve ever enjoyed a maduro cigar, you better add this one to your cart as quickly as possible. ",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Brazil,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan, Peruvian",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,"Brazilian, Connecticut Broadleaf, Maduro",CAO
CAO Nicaragua,Rated 4.4 out of 5, Based on 42 Ratings ,"All around the world… and back to NicaraguaSince Rick Rodriguez has taken over CAO, they’ve released winner after winner after winner. From the uber-contemporary design and blend of CAO Flathead, to the experimental, innovative releases featuring Brazilian tobaccos like the Fuma em Corda, to more traditional cigars like CAO Pilon… it seems like Ricky can do no wrong. Today, that win streak continues with the newest entry in the “world-famous” World Series – CAO Nicaragua. Yes, though they’ve visited Italy, Colombia, and America on their tour of tobacco dominance, CAO has never released a blend specifically designed to highlight Nicaraguan tobaccos until now. At the core of this cigar you’ll find plenty of lush, extensively aged Nicaraguan long-fillers from the Jalapa Valley, Esteli, and Condega. Clad in a Honduran Jamastran wrapper leaf, this CAO booms out with a full-bodied blast of pepper with a core of nuts and toasty tobacco backing it up. Sure to become a best-seller like Brazilia and Italia before it, CAO Nicaragua is destined for greatness. Get in now.  Good news! CAO Nicaragua has earned an awesome 91-point rating, noting: ""There's a good draw and burn to this dark and oily cigar. It's earthy and oaky with touches of vanilla and spearmint that lead to a bold, leathery finish.""",Full,"['Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Honduran,CAO
CAO Orellana,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"From deep within the amazon, to deep within the aging room.In 2014, CAO announced a mysterious new cigar that piqued the collective interest of the cigar world. That cigar was the Amazon Basin, and utilized a special leaf in the filler known as Braganca. This rare tobacco is grown in patches of available sunlight in the Amazon, before being hand-rolled into tubes and rowed in canoes to the factory. This cigar spawned two offshoots, all using varying types and amounts of Amazonian tobacco and all selling out relatively quick. Now CAO is completing the series with the Orellano, the name given to the Amazon by explorer Francisco de Orellana. Despite this being the fourth cigar in the Amazon series, the Orellana’s Brazilian Cubra wrapper has been patiently aging since before CAO even discovered the Braganca used in the original. Cubra grows smaller, darker, leaves than most plants, and produces a pleasantly spicy, complex profile. The exotic wrapper is joined by a Nicaraguan binder and fillers from the Dominican & Colombia, with a healthy amount of Brazilian Braganca and Fuma Em Corda to ensure this cigar tastes like nothing you’ve ever had before. With its full-bodied bevy of spice, dark fruit, and leather notes, this is the perfect cigar to bring along on your next adventure.",Medium-Full,['Toro'],Nicaraguan,"Brazilian, Colombian, Dominican",False,False,More Details,,False,,Toro,False,Brazilian,
CAO Pilon,Rated 4.45 out of 5, Based on 122 Ratings ,"CAO piles on the flavorCAO is known for their laundry list of 90+ rated blends and for being one of the most innovative brands in the industry. From their breakthrough classic CAO Black, to the shape of the CAO Flathead, to their use of unique leaves in CAO OSA Sol, CAO has never been afraid to push the envelope. Now with their new release, CAO Pilon, they are resurrecting a seldom used and costly fermentation method, the circular pilon. A standard tobacco pilon is basically a pile of tobacco ‘hands,’ which are 10-15 tobacco leaves tied together, that are allowed to heat up and ferment. With a circular pilon the hands are carefully layered in a circular pattern, with the payoff being that the tobacco ferments at a slower rate which enhances the flavor.CAO Pilon comes dressed in a dazzling Ecuador Habano wrapper, encasing the binder and long-fillers from Nicaragua. This cigar is medium-bodied and packs flavor in droves with delicious notes of spice, cedar, pepper, nuts, and cocoa. CAO Pilon is a rich and hearty blend that continues CAO’s string of hits. CAO Pilon received an impressive 90-rating noting: ""This cigar has the sweet and bready cinnamon qualities of a graham cracker, along with a bold earthy core and cedary finish. The cigar gleams with oil and  burns evenly.""​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Habano,CAO
Carrington,Rated 3.86 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"Tasty & mellow, for any herfin’ fellow!Among all the blends that pass over our desks for, ahem, quality assurance, few have been burned with as much zeal as Carrington. While most of us prefer the strong stuff, none can deny the satisfaction of a good mellow stick to enjoy with our morning coffee, or to help ease the pressure of a long day setting up screaming deals for the cigar chompin’ public.  The Carrington blend starts with top-quality Dominican long-fillers, secured by an Indonesian binder and cloaked in a gorgeous khaki-colored Connecticut wrapper showing minimal veins and near-invisible seams. Upon lighting, you’ll be greeted by notes of roasted nuts, cream, cedar, and a touch of natural sweetness, for an experience that’ll have you coming back for more time and time again. Grab a box today, and have a Carrington on-hand for any time you need to slow down and relax.  ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Indonesian,Dominican,False,,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,
Casa Cuevas Connecticut,Rated 4.75 out of 5,,"The Triple C - Casa Cuevas Connecticut!Casa Cuevas Cigars is a family owned business that has spanned four generations. They first started out cultivating tobacco in the Pinar del Rio province of Cuba. Today, they operate out of the Santiago, Dominican Republic where they have been crafting premium cigars for brands like Gurkha, Sam Leccia, and Carlos Torano out of their Tabacalera Las Lavas factory. So after generations of crafting premium cigars, it is finally time to unveil a cigar of their own that bears the Cuevas name. Enter Casa Cuevas Connecticut. One of three of the new Casa Cuevas cigars, the Connecticut, comes draped in a golden brown Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper with elegant gold and blue band placed on top. Take a peek underneath and you'll find a bevy of Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers that blend to make a nice mellow to medium bodied treat. It offers a subtle spice with notes of leather and sweet cream. A classic Connecticut that can be enjoyed all day long. ",Medium,['Toro'],Habano,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Casa Cuevas Habano,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"The Cuevas strike out on their ownCasa Cuevas Cigars are a new brand to the US market, but I wouldn’t call this their first rodeo. Casa Cuevas is a family owned business that first started in the tobacco industry four generations ago in the Pinar Del Rio valley of Cuba where they cultivated tobacco. Today, they operate out of their Tabacalera Las Lavas factory in Santiago, Dominican Republic. Out of this factory, they have produced cigars for well-known brands such as Gurkha, Sam Leccia and Carlos Torano. The Casa Cuevas line is just the first to bear the family name. The blend at hand consists of premium tobacco from three different countries. The wrapper up top is a chocolaty brown Ecuadorian habano leaf that covers a Nicaraguan binder and long-fillers from Nicaragua and the Dominican Republic. The body and strength float around the medium-full range and offer and great balance of flavor. You can expect notes of fruit, black pepper, bread, wood and natural tobacco. It's about time this the Casa Cuevas camp but their name on a cigar, and they put their best foot forward with this one. Time to see what they're all about!",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Habano,"Colombian, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,
Casa Cuevas Maduro,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Straight outta Santiago!Casa Cuevas Cigars may be an unfamiliar name, but they are not new to this industry. They first got into the game in the 19th century cultivating tobacco in the Pinar Del Rio Valley of Cuba. But after the Cuban revolution 1959, the family business decided to move to Santiago, Dominica Republic. Here they have been crafting premium cigars out of their Tabacalera Las Lavas factory for brands such as Gurkha, Torano, and Sam Leccia. Finally, they are releasing a cigar to bear their own family name, and they come it three different varieties – Maduro, Habano, and Connecticut. The Casa Cuevas Maduro is slightly dialed back from its habano counterpart, clocking in at a nice medium-body. The blend is highlighted by a naturally fermented Mexican San Andres wrapper atop a Nicaraguan binder, and long-fillers from Colombia, Dominican Republic, and Nicaragua. The maduro wrapper provides immense natural sweetness that comes and goes, along with balanced notes of spice, chocolate, cedar, citrus, and earth. After tasting all three, I’m a true believer in Casa Cuevas cigars and the maduro was especially tasty. Scoop up a box today and you won’t regret it.",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Habano,"Colombian, Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,San Andres,
Casa de Garcia,Rated 4.15 out of 5, Based on 308 Ratings ,"Delicious buck-a-stick handmades from the makers of Montecristo.Altadis is responsible for crafting some of the most well-known and respected cigars on the market today, including Romeo y Julieta, Montecristo, and H. Upmann. But, in addition to these legendary brands, they also craft the highly-affordable Casa de Garcia brand. Made on the same rolling tables by the same top-notch rollers, just a heckova lot cheaper. These affordable everyday treats come available in these tasty varieties:Connecticut: Smooth, creamy nuances accompany a mellow body.Maduro: Hearty, backed by notes of espresso and natural sweetness. Medium-bodied.Sumatra: Subtle notes of spice, wood and nuts delivered through a well-rounded medium body.",Mellow-Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Honduran",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,"Connecticut, Connecticut Broadleaf, Sumatra",
Casa de Garcia Nicaragua,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 112 Ratings ,"A Casa de Garcia with more muscle.The Nicaragua is an amped up fuller-bodied version of the original Casa de Garcia line. Coming from Altadis, the same crew that gives us popular brands like Romeo y Julieta and Montecristo, this is a  highly-affordable option that doesn't skimp on flavor.  Utilizing Nicaraguan, Columbian, and Broadleaf filler and boasting a wrapper and binder from Nicaragua, this cigar delivers a robust medium to full-bodied experience with notes of leather, coffee and cedar.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Connecticut,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Nicaraguan,
Casa Fernandez Aganorsa Leaf,Rated 4.57 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"Become acquainted with Aganorsa Leaf.Aganorsa has been producing some of the most revered tobaccos in the industry for three decades. Used in respected blends across the industry, Aganorsa Leaf has plenty of street cred. Now they are putting their award-worthy tobaccos to use under their own name, and boy have they made a splash.Casa Fernandez Aganorsa Leaf Corojo is a Nicaraguan puro that utilizes ultra-premium tobaccos that were all cultivated on Aganorsa farms in Esteli, Jalapa, and Condega. The wrapper leaf is a Corojo Sun Grown wrapper that was harvested in 2006. Beneath, a bevy of vintage long-fillers, also from Aganorsa combine for a flavorful medium-bodied experience. Upon lighting Casa Fernandez Aganorsa Leaf, you are met with heady notes of caramel, toasted wood, and chocolate. Casa Fernandez is taking the industry by storm! Don’t be the last to try these high-grade treats.Casa Fernandez Aganorsa Leaf received a well-deserved 92-rating noting: “Box-pressed and gleaming with oil, this robusto has a bit of an uneven, blistery burn. A meaty, cedary flavor core is framed by walnut flavors and tannic notes that lead to a savory finish.” ",Medium-Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,Yes,,"Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Corojo, Nicaraguan",Casa Fernandez
Casa Fernandez Aganorsa Leaf Maduro,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"Don’t cry for me Aganorsa. Casa Fernandez has been producing some of the most revered tobaccos in the industry for three decades. Used in respected names from Illusione to Alec Bradley, Casa Fernandez has plenty of street cred. Now they are putting their award-worthy tobaccos to use under their own name, and boy have they made a splash!The Aganorsa maduro boasts the same vintage Nicaraguan long-fillers from Aganorsa as the original Corojo version. The twist comes in the form of a well-aged San Andres maduro wrapper leaf adorning the top pf the blend. Heady notes of chocolate, sweet cream, and coffee cascade over the palate with a medium to full-bodied strength bumping this offering up to the top of many connoisseur’s lists. Great news, Casa Fernandez Arganosa Leaf Maduro received a well-deserved 93-rating and landed on the 2016 Top 25 Cigars list just outside of the top ten at #11, noting: ""Many companies use Aganorsa tobacco, but in this brand, and particularly this Robusto Extra size, the tobacco shows its own distinct style.""​",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto Extra']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,United States,Yes,,"Gordo, Robusto Extra",No,"Maduro, San Andres",Casa Fernandez
Casa Fernandez Arsenio Serie Oro,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"No, not Arsenio Hall.Long time master blender Arsenio Ramos is the man behind countless 90+ rated blends and the Casa Fernandez line as a whole. For all of his long hours of labor, Eduardo Fernandez is set to honor him for his 80th birthday with the Casa Fernandez Arsenio Serie Oro. This all box-pressed line marks the second line to boast Arsenio’s name, and is sure to please as many, if not more than the first. Utilizing tobaccos from the renowned Aganorsa farm in Esteli, Nicaragua, Arsenio Serie Oro’s reddish-hued, Nicaraguan Corojo wrapper leaf stands out from afar. Extensively aged long-fillers from Aganorsa were selected specifically for this milestone project. Nuances of cedar, earth, sweet spice, and nut all make their presence known. Celebrate 80 years of excellence while enjoying one fantastic stick with the medium to full-bodied Arsenio Serie Oro.​",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,United States,Yes,,"Gordo, Toro",No,Corojo,
Casa Fernandez Miami,Rated 2.5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"This beaut is made in ‘Merica!Eduardo Fernandez has been busy since purchasing Tropical Tobacco from the legendary master blender Pedro Martin. He changed the name to Tabacalera Tropical, moved locations, and developed the delicious Casa Fernandez brand to critical acclaim. In 2011, the cigar at hand, Casa Fernandez Miami garnered a 92-point rating along with being named the number 12 cigar of the year. This flavorful bouquet is a Nicaraguan puro, boasting the highest grade tobaccos from Esteli, the Jalapa Valley, and the Condega Valley. Infused with ample refined ligeros, Miami is no slouch on strength, sporting a medium to full-bodied flavor profile. Bold notes of cedar, pepper, and sweet spice coat the palate and offer a long, lingering finish that keeps you coming back for more. Casa Fernandez Miami received a well-deserved 92-rating noting: ""Richly hued with minimal veins to the wrapper. Each puff is loaded with flavors that are nutty and leathery, leaving a cappuccino finish on the palate.""",Medium-Full,"['Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,United States,No,,"Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Toro",No,Nicaraguan,Casa Fernandez
Casa Fernandez Miami Reserva,Rated 4.33 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"Hailing from Little Havana, Miami.Eduardo Fernandez has been busy since purchasing Tropical Tobacco from the legendary master blender Pedro Martin. He changed the name to Aganorsa Leaf and developed the delicious Casa Fernandez brand to critical acclaim. In 2011, Casa Fernandez Miami garnered a 92-point rating along with being named the #11 Cigar of the Year. This extension to the decorated Casa Fernandez Miami boasts a bolder, darker appearance than the original.Casa Fernandez Miami Reserva is cloaked is a refined Nicaraguan wrapper leaf, which plays host to Nicaraguan long-fillers including a rare Medio Tiempo leaf, which is a higher priming than even the flavor inducing ligero. Spot-on construction results in Miami Reserva having an excellent draw and producing a white, firm ash. Nuances of leather, citrus, chocolate, and spice all rear their heads right down to the nub. A true boutique handmade, don’t miss the boat on these bad boys.Casa Fernandez Miami Reserva received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""There's a complex array of nutty notes in this cigar ranging from walnut and almond to peanut and cashew, all interwoven with honey and citrus.""",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,United States,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Nicaraguan,Casa Fernandez
Casa Fernandez Miami Reserva Maduro,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Casa Fernandez puts on a show.Eduardo Fernandez has been busy since purchasing Tropical Tobacco from the legendary master blender Pedro Martin. He changed the name to Tabacalera Tropical, moved locations, and developed the delicious Casa Fernandez brand to critical acclaim. In 2011, Casa Fernandez Miami garnered a 92-point rating along with being named the number 11 cigar of the year. This extension to the decorated Casa Fernandez Miami boasts uber-refined maduro leaf adding depth and flavor to this already stunning masterpiece. Casa Fernandez Miami Reserva is cloaked is a Mexican San Andres maduro wrapper leaf, which plays host to Nicaraguan long-fillers including a rare Medio Tiempo leaf, which is a higher priming than even the flavor inducing ligero. Spot-on construction results in Miami Reserva having an excellent draw and producing a white, firm ash. Nuances of leather, citrus, chocolate, and spice all rear their heads right down to the nub. A true boutique handmade, don’t miss the boat on these bad boys. ",Full,"['Gordo', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,United States,No,,"Gordo, Toro",No,Maduro,Casa Fernandez
Casa Magna Colorado,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"A 93-rated gem!Casa Magna Colorado is the brainchild of two of the cigar industry's most revered manufacturers, Manuel Quesada and Nestor Plascencia. This Nicaraguan Puro is full-bodied and moderately priced. Comprised of Ligero and Viso fillers from several different regions of Nicaragua and a beautiful Cuban-seed Ligero Colorado wrapper, the Casa Magna is hand-rolled in Plascencia's Nicaraguan Factory. The result is a smooth, rich, full-bodied cigar with undertones of coffee and sweet spices. A well-made slow-burner at a great price. Cigar Aficionado rated Casa Magna the #1 cigar of 2008 with an outstanding 93-point rating. Additionally, it's still going strong, earning the #10 spot for 2011. ",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Gordo, Robusto",No,Ligero,
Casa Turrent Serie 1901,Rated 4.25 out of 5,,"#12 Cigar in the world for 2016.The Turrent name carries a lot of weight in the cigar industry. The Turrent's have cornered the market in producing Mexican tobacco, a country of origin that has been steadily rising in popularity as of late. And Casa Turrent Serie 1901 utilizes their most premium Mexican crop, melds it with bold Nicaraguan tobaccos, and delivers the most decorated Turrent-branded release to date. The wrapper is a bit spotty (a norm with Mexican leaf), but don't let that deter you because once you spark this premium up, you'll be met with hints of sweet cedar, leather, mellow pepper, and nut. A perfect example of a cigar that meets all the criteria to land in the Top 25, give Casa Turrent Serie 1901 a visit soon.Good news, Casa Turrent Serie 1901 has received an astounding 94-rating, noting: ""Each puff envelops the palate with cocoa powder and coffee before a sweet, luxurious finish redolent of caramel and black cherry.""",Medium,['Gordo'],"Mexican, Nicaraguan","Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Mexico,Yes,,Gordo,No,San Andres,
Cazadores by La Aurora,Rated 4 out of 5,,"A lion’s share of flavor at a roaringly low price.Since before the invention of sliced bread, La Aurora has been making cigars to fit any palate, and they're certainly no stranger to luxury. Founded in 1903, they've consistently produced incredible expressions of cigar expertise, and set standards for quality that remain unmatched by any would-be imitators to this day. There's just nothing like a La Aurora cigar, and the Cazadores is no exception. Don't let the price fool you, it's the only thing mouse-sized about these beauties!Utilizing a beautiful, silky Connecticut wrapper over an Indonesian binder and Dominican fillers, this is unlike any other cigar you’re tried at similar price points. You’ll forget that this is a value-priced cigar once your palate is graced by the mellow-bodied notes of cedar, pepper, and a touch of citrus. Grab a box to pass out to company, and you might end up not wanting to share!",Mellow,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Indonesian,Dominican,False,,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Belicoso, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Connecticut,La Aurora
C'est La Vie,Rated 4.16 out of 5, Based on 208 Ratings ,"Well under a buck apiece.One glance at our ridiculously low prices, and you're probably wondering - how bad are these things? The answer: not bad at all. Made with a traditional 'Cuban sandwich' blend of Dominican and Nicaragua tobaccos topped with a Connecticut wrapper leaf, C'est La Vie offers a smooth, mellow to medium-bodied experience. There’s even a slightly sweetened option for an extra bit of added flavor. I'm not promising much here, but I'm more than confident they'll fit the bill for mowing the lawn or working around the yard. In fact, I wouldn’t be surprised if you found countless more opportunities to burn one. And the truth is, these are probably the cheapest full-sized cigars we carry….and they're surprisingly good.",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Brazil,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Connecticut,
Charter Oak,Rated 4.82 out of 5, Based on 17 Ratings ,"Sign the charterNo matter how far we might stray from it, home will always be an important anchor for all of us. Foundation’s Charter Oak features tobaccos grown in the Connecticut River Valley of founder Nick Melillo’s home state. The name itself pays respect to a historically significant tree near which Native Americans would congregate and grow tobacco of their own. But the respect doesn’t stop there as Melillo also honors his grandfather, a WWII vet who enjoyed Connecticut tobaccos with Charter Oak. Made of a Connecticut Shade wrapper and fillers from the Jalapa and Estelí regions of Nicaragua, the Charter Oak elicits a creamy flavor accented with chocolate, and hints of roasted nuts and pepper.Good news! Charter Oak Connecticut has received an impressive 93-point rating, noting: ""Rich woods and complex herbs set the tone for this attractive robusto. Each puff leaves impressions of oaky vanilla, spearmint and caraway seeds along with floral notes and a cashew nuttiness.""",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Petite Corona', 'Rothschild', 'Toro']",Sumatra,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Petite Corona, Rothschild, Toro",No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Ecuador Connecticut",Foundation Cigar Company
Chillin' Moose,Rated 4.52 out of 5, Based on 306 Ratings ,"It’s finally time to answer the question: is it moose, or is it meese? (Meeses?)No matter. You’ll be chillin’ like a vill- ..er, moose, with this totally radical and unique blend from Foundry. Known for off the wall concoctions, Foundry has done it again, and managed to release a blend that doesn’t just break the mold – it redefines it. Turn up for this party and go home happier than a moose at an antler convention. Chillin’ Moose features a high quality long-filler filler blend of carefully selected Nicaraguan, Dominican, US Broadleaf, and Mexican San Andres tobacco leaves. On top of that, an Ecuador Sumatra binder and a Connecticut Habano Rosado wrapper complete the package. This combo aims to please, and better still, it’s a great cigar at an even better price. In a word, it’s moose-tacular!​",Mellow-Medium,"['Corona', 'Gigante', 'Robusto']",,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Gigante, Robusto",No,Connecticut,
Chillin' Moose Too,Rated 4.35 out of 5, Based on 118 Ratings ,"Moose-tacular!Once the Foundry Tobacco Co. released the original Chillin’ Moose, it took little to no time for them to realize what a monster they created. A top-notch blend a super-value price point is a recipe for success any way you slice it. So naturally, a follow up was soon in the works. And this one, dubbed Chillin’ Moose Too, gives consumers a thicker, richer profile at the same value as its big brother. A different concoction all together from the original Chillin’ Moose, Chillin’ Moose Too sports a Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper, dark and leathery to the touch. Inside is a binder and filler blend from some of the lushest regions in Nicaragua. This 2 country devil’s brew delivers an expertly blended medium-bodied experience, rife with hints or sweet cedar, cocoa, moderate spice, and vanilla bean. The days of overpaying for delicious flavor are behind you, fill up the humi with the Moose of all value today. ​",Medium,"['Corona', 'Gigante', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Gigante, Robusto",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,
Churchill Deluxe by Caribe,Rated 3.66 out of 5, Based on 64 Ratings ,"Caviar taste on a pizza budget.Made by Caribe - makers of Camacho Corojo, Baccarat & Monte Carlo - this cigar is big on value. A ""Cuban-sandwich"" mixed filler cigar, rolled with high-quality tobaccos, Churchill Deluxe are your basic no-nonsense blends perfect for the golf course, fishing or for handing out to buddies who wouldn’t appreciate a $5 cigar anyway. Listen, if you’re burning ""Churchill Rejects"" or some other crummy machine-made homogenized brand, switch to this one. Same price, far superior quality, all-natural tobaccos and more bang for the buck. Made in Honduras from the aged trimmings long and short leaves left over after the manufacture of their long-filler name brands. For just over a buck apiece - watcha waiting for?",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Robusto']",Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Robusto",No,"Connecticut, Habano",
CI Fresh-Rolled Cuban Wheels,Rated 4.31 out of 5, Based on 950 Ratings ,"It’s true, too many cooks do indeed spoil the soup. So we whipped up a batch solo, and this simmerin’ pot’s about to boil over. Consider: all long-filler, USA Connecticut-wrapped Torpedos and Churchills for just under $1.75 apiece. Straight from one of industry’s most renowned factories to your doorstep with just a quick stopover at CI in the middle. Call it factory fresh, call it farm to table, call it like it is: one damn good deal. High-quality, mellow to medium-bodied beauties loaded with rich n’ creamy flavors for pennies on the dollar. They’re good, that’s a promise. If they weren’t we’d put someone else’s name on ‘em. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Torpedo']",Habano,Connecticut,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,
CI Fresh-Rolled Rosado Cuban Wheels,Rated 4.26 out of 5, Based on 744 Ratings ,"Fresh-Rolled, Rosado-style.We aim to please at CI. When we took pen to paper, crunched numbers to the bone, and delivered a savory blend entitled CI Fresh-Rolled Cuban Wheels, we knew we had a winner on our hands. Little did we know how fast, and how many would be flying off the docks. Keeping up with the demand is a battle, and we’ve been getting stink-eyes from purchasing ever since. But all office battles aside, we knew another addition to the line would be welcomed with opened arms. So after scouring the soils of Central America for a blend worthy enough to wear the CI name, we dialed in a sure bet winner. Hailing from the ultra-rich soils of Esteli, Nicaragua, CI Fresh-Rolled Rosado comes adorning a gorgeous San Agustin Rosado wrapper. Beneath the sheets, a bevy Cuban-seed long-fillers from Nicaragua and Honduras intertwine and deliver a slow burning, enjoyably smooth experience. Notes of sweet spice, wood, and cashew are just a few or the players, and with prices slashed just as much as its predecessor, you’ll be happily partaking in CI Fresh-Rolled Rosado anytime you choose!​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Torpedo']",,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Torpedo",No,Honduran,
CI Knock-Offs - Coffee,Rated 4.43 out of 5, Based on 671 Ratings ,"Knock off a few dollars from your favorite coffee blendCI Knock-Offs have long been the be-all, end-all, when it comes to enjoying a fantastic cigar on a budget. Sure, you can pay for brand names and fancy packaging. Or, you could make the wise move, and enjoy blends that stack up inch for inch, puff for puff, for just pennies on the dollar. The newest entry in our esteemed, price-shaving profile? CI Knock-Offs Coffee: a cigar that's flavored to enjoy with everyone's favorite morning mug. Slightly sweet, with notes of cocoa and natural, crisp tobacco, these beauties are ready to enjoy any time of day. And at this price, you can easily afford to!",Mellow-Medium,"['Corona', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,,True,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Toro, Torpedo",Yes,Maduro,CI Knock-Offs
CI Knock-offs - Coffee: Irish Cream,Rated 4.23 out of 5, Based on 48 Ratings ,"A wee bit o’ Irish goodness, for just a wee bit o’ money.If you seriously enjoy the flavor of a great cigar, and you’re not easily swayed by brand names and fancy packaging, you should certainly keep CI Knockoffs stocked. The CI Knockoffs portfolio contains a wide range of brand-busting, dollar-shaving gems that are just as good as sticks costing 5 times as much. The Coffee Knockoff was an unabashed success, and now the newest CI Knockoff is here and ready to impress - the CI Knockoffs Coffee: Irish Cream! Imbued with the luxurious essence of whiskey, cream, coffee, and a smooth sweetness, this stick is just what you need to pair with your morning coffee or your evening nightcap, and at these prices, you can do both!",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Lonsdale', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,True,False,More Details,,No,,"Churchill, Lonsdale, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,CI Knock-Offs
CI Knock-Offs - Compare to Cohiba,Rated 4.15 out of 5, Based on 280 Ratings ,"Top-shelf taste, rock bottom price.When it comes to flavorful, top-shelf handmades, few do it better than the legendary, Cameroon-wrapped brand after which these were modeled. But with prices pushing nearly $500 per box, they're well out of reach for normal folks. So enjoy this knock-off instead - a tasty, well-made cigar utilizing a very comparable blend but at a fraction of the price.Cohiba is a registered trademark of General Cigar Corporation. ",Medium-Full,"['Cigarillos', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Cigarillos, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Cameroon,CI Knock-Offs
CI Knock-Offs - Compare to La Gloria,Rated 4.04 out of 5, Based on 328 Ratings ,"A full-flavored knock-off that stacks up well.Pennies compared to the continuously rising prices of their full-flavored Dominican counterpart, but eerily similar in flavor and quality. Expect solid construction and a full-bodied, complex taste that’s highly enjoyable and highly affordable. This Cuban sandwich style blend is the easiest way to keep your humidor chockfull of awesome handmades.La Gloria Cubana is a registered trademark of General Cigar Corporation. ",Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gigante', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gigante, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Habano,CI Knock-Offs
CI Knock-Offs - Compare to Macanudo,Rated 4.41 out of 5, Based on 543 Ratings ,"Love Macanudo, but hate the price?CI Knock-Offs are really a treat. This is an everyday, affordable way to enjoy a comparable flavor for much cheaper. Handcrafted with Connecticut shade wrappers and Dominican mixed filler leaves. If you like regular Macanudos but dislike the price, these handmade knock-off beauties are for you.Macanudo is a registered trademark of General Cigar Corporation.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gigante', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gigante, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,CI Knock-Offs
CI Knock-Offs - Compare to Montecristo,Rated 4.32 out of 5, Based on 687 Ratings ,"The classic taste of the world’s biggest brand, for a fraction of the price. Indeed. The time has come, and this newest CI Knock-Off may be the best yet. A surprisingly similar blend to one of the industry’s most respected names, these eerily similar-tasting handmades will save you a whole lotta cash. Each time you burn one of these smooth, creamy, and rich beauties, think about that Hamilton you saved, smile, then take another puff. You won’t miss much, but you’ll save so much cash you won’t know what to do with it all. Montecristo is a registered trademark of Altadis USA.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gigante', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gigante, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,CI Knock-Offs
CI Knock-Offs - Compare to Partagas,Rated 4.15 out of 5, Based on 234 Ratings ,"A delicious cigar that’s comparable in flavor to the big boys.This is a rich, robust and full-bodied gem handmade in the Dominican Republic. If you like full-flavored Dominican cigars such as Partagas, do your wallet a favor and try this knock-off on for size.Partagas is a registered trademark of General Cigar Corporation.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gigante', 'Robusto']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gigante, Robusto",No,Cameroon,CI Knock-Offs
CI Knock-Offs - Compare to Romeo y Julieta,Rated 4.22 out of 5, Based on 400 Ratings ,"Where art thou Romeo?Why part with your hard earned cash when you can grapple a nearly identical knock-off blend for a fraction of the price? Smooth, creamy, and enjoyable to the nub, these medium-bodied top-notch handmades deliver in every facet. You can thank me later.Romeo y Julieta is a registered trademark of Altadis USA.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gigante', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gigante, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Sumatra,CI Knock-Offs
CI Knock-Offs - Compare to White Label,Rated 4.14 out of 5, Based on 73 Ratings ,"A whiter shade of CI Knock Offs.In terms of elegant, high-end brands, the iconic cigars that inspired this blend are easily number one. But along with their rich history comes an even richer price tag – and retail prices over $20+ each. At hand is a very close second, for about one tenth of the price. Enjoy this mellow, yet rich, Connecticut-wrapped beauty featuring aged Dominican long-fillers and a balanced profile. ​",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Pyramid', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Pyramid, Short Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,CI Knock-Offs
CI Legends by AJ Fernandez,Rated 4.23 out of 5, Based on 47 Ratings ,"​CI legends is a series of cigars you can't do without.Arguably the hottest cigar-maker and blender in the industry, AJ Fernandez's edition of CI Legends is probably long overdue. With a deep bench of top-sellers and coveted blends, AJ is responsible for brands like Diesel, Man O' War, San Lotano, and a wealth of other blends for Gurkha, Padilla, Rocky Patel, and more. When it comes to AJ, flavor and quality are always top-notch - each blend offering a rich, Cuban-esque character and plenty of well-blended boutique charm. His blend for the Legends Series is no different. Crafted with a dark, top-grade Sun Grown Ecuadorian Sumatra wrapper and brimming with a robust blend of vintage Nicaraguan long-fillers, CI Legends by AJ Fernandez offers a hearty, medium-bodied profile. Notes of cream, oak, earth, coffee and pepper coat the palate before a clean, slightly sweet finish completes the ensemble. Delicious, expertly blended, and suitable for palates of all types, CI Legends by AJ Fernandez is an exceptional handmade....one that's most definitely on par with his much pricier offerings. To view the entire CI Legends Series, click on the following link. CI Legends Series​",Medium,['Toro'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Ecuador Sumatra,AJ Fernandez
CI Legends by Drew Estate,Rated 4.77 out of 5, Based on 1424 Ratings ,"Drew Estate's finest creation.Jonathan Drew is a creative force, formulating some of the industry's most innovative cigars. His inspiration for the 'Copper Label' (this blend's former name) was a fusion of ACID, Natural, and traditional blends....and he nailed it. CI Legends by Drew Estate easily stands among the best infused cigars that Drew Estate produces. Hugged by a beautiful Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper, this stunning handmade combines bold Nicaraguan long-fillers with a leaf of Dominican Piloto. These lush tobaccos have been carefully influenced by the delicious nuances of amaretto and hazelnut, completing a savory experience. After a sweet start, it coats the palate with loads of creamy flavor, offering a rich core of coffee flavors complemented by notes of hazelnut and pepper. Mellow to medium-bodied and oh-so-enjoyable.",Medium,['Toro'],,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",True,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,Yes,Ecuador Connecticut,Drew Estate Cigars
CI Legends by Drew Estate Black,Rated 4.51 out of 5, Based on 79 Ratings ,"A sequel ten years in the makingCreating a follow-up to the original CI Legends by Drew Estate blend is a task we didn’t take lightly. The original Legends by DE is an absolute monster. A near-perfect cigar, with over 1,000 reviews and a 5-star rating. How do you top that? Well friends, we’ve finally found an answer. Introducing the CI Legends Black by Drew Estate – a delectable morsel that’s truly the “yin” to the original’s “yang.”Legends Black is a new infusion, leading to a richer, deeper experience than the original line. Featuring a Brazilian wrapper leaf over top-quality Nicaraguan long-fillers, this perfectly crafted handmade sings with the sweetness of a bar of chocolate, while adding enough complexity on the finish to stand up to a tall glass of bourbon. An instant classic. Quite simply: If it weren’t amazing, we wouldn’t put our name on it. Enjoy. ",Medium,['Lonsdale'],San Andres,,True,,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,Lonsdale,True,Brazilian,Drew Estate Cigars
CI Legends by E.P. Carrillo,Rated 4.38 out of 5, Based on 40 Ratings ,"​CI + EPC = Perfection.If you've been paying attention over the last couple of years you have likely heard of Ernesto Perez-Carrillo, the man famous for creating the Dominican La Gloria Cubana line and now the proud creator of his own highly-rated brand. He's a legend, no doubt, and the success of La Gloria - and his newer E.P. Carrillo brand - is plenty of proof. Earning a few 90+ ratings and the #2 Cigar of the Year in 2014 plus the #4 Cigar of the Year in 2016, it's safe to say this man knows how to craft fine cigars.The E.P. Carrillo Legends showcases the classic, medium-bodied profile that made him famous.  Draped in a silky-smooth Ecuadorian Sumatra wrapper and loaded with rich Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers, this smooth, Cuban-esque blend delivers plenty of flavor. Medium-bodied with a creamy core of coffee, oak, pepper, earth, and toasty tobacco, the Brown Label Legends is a flavorful, easy-going handmade you'll enjoy any time of day. To view the entire CI Legends Series, click on the following link. CI Legends Series​",Medium,['Toro'],,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,Ecuador Sumatra,E.P. Carrillo
CI Legends by Graycliff,Rated 3.5 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"​For the definition of legend - see below.Avelino Lara’s achievement as the creator of the Cuban Cohiba blend could be considered a curse to some, as each of his new blends must live up to the incredibly lofty standards he set....for the industry and for himself. And time after time he clears that bar, as evidenced by his outstanding array of Graycliff blends. As you can imagine, Graycliff’s entry into the CI Legends series is bound to be an exciting one. A dark and oily Habano wrapper from Nicaragua cloaks a fine 2-country blend of supremely aged tobaccos from the Dominican and Nicaragua. This balanced mixture produces an explosion of rich and hearty nuances, noting hints of leather, earth, and coffee bean throughout the slow, smooth burn. Medium in body, balanced, and complex, this Legends is indeed delicious.To view the entire CI Legends Series, click on the following link. CI Legends Series​",Medium,['Toro'],,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Habano,CI Legends
CI Legends by La Aurora,Rated 4.82 out of 5, Based on 11 Ratings ,"​Two legends, one cigar.Known to the world as the Dominican Republic’s oldest and longest running cigar factory, La Aurora is a giant among giants. Guillermo Leon and Jose Blanco, the men controlling the high-end blends coming from this factory have taken this daunting task by the horns, in order to continue La Aurora’s legendary lineup of top-shelf classics and rival the already existing, highly popular Legends blends. Using a mouthwatering blend of aged tobaccos, their entry accomplishes both. Within a toothy Nicaraguan leaf, lies a fine blend of Corojo, Cubano Piloto and Nicaraguan tobaccos that has been aging since 2001. Experience an eventful bouquet of flavors with this mellow to medium-bodied beauty. A subtle peppery note mingles with an amaretto-like sweetness, complemented by an enjoyable, woodsy aroma and spicy aftertaste that lingers just long enough to satisfy til the next puff. Smooth from start to finish and pushing out plumes of thick, white smoke, Legends by La Aurora is a treat for the senses.To view the entire CI Legends Series, click on the following link. CI Legends Series​​",Medium,['Toro'],,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,Habano,La Aurora
CI Legends by Oliva,Rated 4.16 out of 5, Based on 31 Ratings ,"​Oliva dives into legendary status.​Extremely flavorful, ultra-consistent Nicaraguan handmades – that's Oliva in a nutshell. Their cigars are impressive, no doubt. And their 50 ratings of '90' or better are undeniable. From their affordable Flor de Oliva bundles to their heralded Serie 'V', everything they make comes out perfect. Their addition to the CI Legends Series is no different. CI Legends by Oliva is carefully crafted with a rich blend of Nicaraguan long-fillers topped with an Ecuadorian Habano wrapper. This well-aged Cuban-seed combination is bold and balanced with notes of cedar, pepper, cream, and coffee.To view the entire CI Legends Series, click on the following link. CI Legends Series​",Medium-Full,['Toro'],,"Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Habano,Oliva
CI Legends by Pepin,Rated 4.2 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"​It takes a legend to make a legend.To keep it simple, Pepin Garcia is ‘blowing up.’ Famous for creating the heavily sought Tatuaje and My Father brands, expect nothing short of spectacular from this intoxicating submission. Upon first glance, it’s easy to see Pepin’s Cuban heritage. The veiny, natural-colored wrappers and well-placed triple-caps. A spicy, earthy pre-light aroma. Handmade in his new Nicaraguan factory, this impressive blend utilizes Pepin’s prized, 1st Generation Habano seed tobaccos, all grown in the black soils of Nicaragua. The Corojo wrapper is top-notch, delivering a strong, spicy flavor even before the cigar is lit. Inside, a well-aged mixture of select Habano-seed long-fillers combine to deliver an assortment of satisfying flavors. Sit down before lighting, because this gem is a powerhouse. Expect a peppery burst of flavor upfront, which gradually mellows into chewy notes of wood and earth. This transition makes the cigar’s spicy character an afterthought, lingering long on the aftertaste urging you back for another puff. Naturally, construction is incredible. Enjoy the even, cool burn thanks to a beautiful, solid roll. Delicious.To view the entire CI Legends Series, click on the following link. CI Legends Series​​",Medium-Full,['Toro'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Corojo,CI Legends
CI Legends by Perdomo,Rated 4.2 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"A legend makes a legend.Nick Perdomo, founder of Tabacalera Perdomo, went buck-wild in producing arguably the tastiest Legend to date. In fact, it’s hard not to be downright giddy before, during and after sparking this beauty. Aesthetically, the cigar is stunning, a tightly wound, cigar with a dark, positively first-grade sun-grown Nicaraguan maduro wrapper leaf. This leaf is eye-popping: smooth with nary a vein, glistening with natural oils, and giving off a lovely sheen. Filled to the brim with an intricate blend of aged Nicaraguan fillers, Perdomo’s medium to full-bodied treat instantly awakens your taste buds with a potpourri of wide-ranging flavors. It’s not overly rich however, and the well-balanced profile mellows as you go, occupying the palate with clearly discernible earthy notes, followed by a slightly cedary undertone and mellow spiciness. The draw is impeccable - slow, cool, and deliberate - making this cigar journey one you’ll want to take over and over.To view the entire CI Legends Series, click on the following link. CI Legends Series​​",Medium-Full,['Torpedo'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Torpedo,No,Habano,CI Legends
CI Legends by Rocky Patel,Rated 4.45 out of 5, Based on 31 Ratings ,"Rocky Patel: man, myth, or LEGEND!Within the past few years, Rocky Patel has reached super-stardom in the cigar industry. Indian Tabac helped put him on the map just 10 years ago, and more recently his astounding RP blends, including RP Vintage, RP Sun Grown and Edge have taken things up a notch. Each successive new blend seems to instantaneously become a darling, not only of Cigar Aficionado but of cigar enthusiasts everywhere - pleasing the most discriminating of connoisseurs. So we're proud to bring you Rocky’s entry into the sales juggernaut that is the CI Legends saga. His blend features a rich, patiently-fermented Corojo wrapper leaf that’s simply gorgeous – oily and toothy. The supremely-aged Honduran long-leaf fillers are plentiful, resulting in layers upon layers of deep, complex flavors including a toasty, coffee-like character and sweet creaminess, complemented by a pleasing charcoal aroma and medium-bodied profile.To view the entire CI Legends Series, click on the following link. CI Legends Series​",Medium,['Toro'],,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Toro,No,Corojo,Rocky Patel Cigars
Cimarron Connecticut,Rated 5 out of 5,,"T13 – A whole new worldOver six decades ago, the Rodriguez family got their start in the cigar industry in the Cibao region of the Dominican Republic. Led today by Radhames “Ram” Rodriguez, this family business has grown into a powerhouse in a manner of years – with over 1,800 acres and an annual production of over 12 million cigars a year, it’s safe to say El Artista has arrived. Today, we celebrate their newest milestone in tobacco achievement: the release of Cimarron. Cimarron isn’t just any line of cigars. Instead, they’re the first blends to feature T13, a hybrid leaf developed by Ram Rodriguez himself that most closely resembles San VincenteFor the Connecticut version, Ram pairs an Ecuador Connecticut leaf overtop Dominican Negrito binder and a tri-country long-filler blend of Dominican, Colombian, and US tobaccos. Notching in at a mellow to medium body, Cimarron Connecticut is a unique spicy-sweet mixture with a naturally creamy core, and cedar-driven finish. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Colombian, Dominican",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Cimarron Maduro,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Peak cigar blissWhen you think of inspiration for a cigar line, most people wouldn’t imagine the Cimarron region of the US. Most famous in Oklahoma, the Cimarron region is rife with huge, icy mountains looming over raging rapids and wide forests – not exactly an ideal cigar burning environment. At least, not until Cimarron from Tabacalera El Artista was released. Featuring a bold, multi-country blend and a unique tobacco that was developed by El Artista’s founder, Ram Rodriguez, Cimarron is a smooth and pleasant experience punctuated by intense notes of spice. Wrapped in a toothy Mexican San Andres leaf, Cimarron Maduro delivers a spicy-sweet profile with hits of black pepper and cedar spice along the way. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Colombian, Dominican",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,San Andres,
CLE Azabache,Rated 4.57 out of 5,,"A good luck charmChristian Eiroa’s success can be attributed to his skills as a tobacco blender - but a little luck doesn’t hurt. The limited edition CLE Azabache is a full-bodied blend, named for a jet black gem used as a good luck charm in Honduras. This limited edition beauty is brimming with long-fillers from Honduras, Peru, and Nicaragua, all masked with a Mexican Maduro wrapper that’s as dark as it gets. Rare and complex with notes of coffee, leather, and spice, this is one cigar you’ve got to try. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Short Robusto']",Honduran,"Honduran, Nicaraguan, Peruvian",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Yes,,"Gordo, Short Robusto",No,"Maduro, San Andres",
CLE Chele,Rated 4.83 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"A unique ConnecticutCLE Chele is a new offering from the cigar mind of Christian Eiroa. Known for creating fantastic brands like Camacho and Asylum, Christian has been innovating the game forever. And with Chele, slang for “white,” Christian continues his experiments with tobaccos. Unlike other Connecticut blends, this one packs a punch. At hand today is a medium bodied Connecticut wrapped gem, with long-filler tobaccos from Nicaragua. Throughout the cigar interesting notes of bread, earth, leather, and spice come through creating a nuanced, balanced flavor profile down to the nub. As you’d expect from the maker of Camacho, with its piles of 90+ ratings, construction and consistency are on point here. There’s nothing else I’ve got to say. If you know Christian’s work, you know this is one cigar you don’t want to miss out on. ​",Medium-Full,"['Corona Extra', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Corona Extra, Gordo, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,CLE
CLE Connecticut,Rated 4.14 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"A mellow masterpiece.Widely regarded as one of the best blend masters in the world, Christian Eiroa continues to impress with his CLE cigars. Based in Honduras, Christian’s blends are made up of top choice tobaccos and makes sure that each cigar is high quality and serves up big flavor.   Widely known for full-bodied cigars, Christian Eiroa took a leap in the opposite direction with this mellow to medium-bodied beauty. But rest assured, it delivers in spades. Draped in a flawless Ecuador Connecticut wrapper, and chock full of aged long-fillers from Honduras, each CLE Connecticut dishes out a barrage of soothing flavor. Hints of roasted nuts, cream, leather, and a dash of spices enter the fray before a long crisp finish. Refined and highly enjoyable, this is one you don't want to miss.Good News! CLE Connecticut has received a well-deserved 91-point rating, noting: ""A blond, lightly hued cigar with plenty of spice and mineral notes to segue into a complex palate of leather, orange peel and black pepper.""",Mellow-Medium,"['Corona Extra', 'Figurado', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Short Robusto']",,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Corona Extra, Figurado, Gordo, Robusto, Short Robusto",No,Ecuador Connecticut,CLE
CLE Corojo,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Zesty and Bold: Classic Christian EiroaThere are few blend masters in the world as innovative as Christian Eiroa. He’s been making cigars for over 20 years and it doesn’t seem like he’ll be slowing down anytime soon. These days, he’s crafting premiums under the CLE brand in Honduras - top quality gems that I just can’t seem to get enough of. CLE Corojo will definitely grab your attention with its full-bodied profile and plethora of complex nuances. This cigar can easily be called a classic corojo with zesty notes of earth, black pepper, oak, and roasted coffee - all of which are followed up with long and smooth finish. This beauty has received a well-deserved 90-rating, noting, “Earthy coffee notes lead to a sweet vanilla finish on this well-made, even-burning cigar. It is rolled with a bulging middle, tapered foot and three-seam cap.”",Full,"['Corona Extra', 'Figurado', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Short Robusto']",,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Corona Extra, Figurado, Gordo, Robusto, Short Robusto",No,Corojo,CLE
CLE Habano,Rated 4.05 out of 5,,"Another Gem From Mr. EiroaAnything Christian Eiroa touches seems to turn to gold. I’ve lost track of how many of his blends have received high praise from the critics, and I’d be even more hard pressed to count just how many of his cigars fly off our shelves during the course of a year.Mr. Eiroa is at it again with CLE Habano and like all of his cigars, this beauty is a decadent little gem that exudes a luxurious array of flavors that will excite your taste buds. Dressed to impress, CLE Habano sports a seamless Honduran Habano wrapper atop Honduran long-fillers. This premium is easily medium to full-bodied with a slew of flavor that soothes the soul. From first light to the last draw, this cigar as highly enjoyable - and it’s one you won’t want to miss.",Medium,['Gordo'],,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Gordo,No,Habano,
CLE Prieto,Rated 4.57 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"The first Broadleaf from CLE With CLE Prieto, Christian Eiroa proves that, in some cases, it’s hip to be square. Lame jokes aside, this box-pressed Nicaraguan cigar is the newest offering from CLE, and is sure to deliver a bold, rich blend to any cigar enthusiast. While its sister blend CLE Chele is slang for white, this one is slang for dark. And Christian delivers on that “dark” theme by using the first Broadleaf maduro in any CLE release. All that being said, I’m sure you’d all just like to know how the blend turned out. And I’m happy to report, this was a successful experiment. CLE Prieto is a delicious medium to full-bodied blend that booms out thick clouds of smoke with every puff. Complex coffee and chocolate notes make this one a must-try for fans of robust blends. ​Good news, CLE Prieto has recently received a well-deserved 92-point rating, noting: ""Powerful first puffs of this robusto show a strong earthy and coffee character that mellows a bit to a sweet and nutty smoke. The draw and burn are even.""",Medium-Full,"['Corona Extra', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Corona Extra, Gordo, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,CLE
CLE Signature Series Honduras,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"A second round knockout.CLE Signature Series returns for an encore. Made by Christian Eiroa, the mastermind behind the celebrated Camacho brand, CLE cigars have already earned a slew of 90+ ratings, and are produced in a small batch fashion with meticulous attention paid to even the smallest details. This cigar features flawless construction and abundant flavor and, unlike its predecessor, comes with bands.This new edition is made at Eiroa’s father’s Honduran factory, Las Lomas, and features a top secret blend of premium tobaccos. CLE Signature Series is enormously rich and flavorful, while remaining smooth and balanced. Boasting a complex profile, this stick is a thing of beauty with no soft spots and nearly invisible seams. This is a perfect cigar for marking a special occasion or just kicking back after a long work week. ",Medium,['Corona'],,,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Corona,No,Honduran,CLE
CLE Signature Series PLdM,Rated 5 out of 5,,"The fifth release from CLE.Christian Eiroa, master blender of CLE, has countless accolades to his name. Previously the man behind the esteemed Camacho brand, Eiroa blends passion with skill for a formidable combination. This venture is the first limited edition release to come out of the CLE camp, and they’re calling it CLE Signature Series PLdM. With exquisite construction and ample flavor, the only thing holding this gem back is minimal quantities, but Signature Series more than makes up for that with its quality. A seamless Corojo wrapper and binder grace the outer layers, while Corojo and Habano long-fillers are bunched together inside. Constructed to perfection with minimal veins visible, Signature Series PLdM is the epitome of complexity. Beginning with strong notes of leather, pepper, and nutmeg, it slowly transitions into a smooth sweetness with a noticeable spice on the retrohale. CLE Signature Series PLdM is a thing of beauty that’s worthy of a celebratory occasion, or just to cap off a long day on the job.Note: This CLE has recently been discontinued. Scoop up the last of our stock, 'cuz once this one's gone, it's gone for good!",Medium-Full,['Gordo'],Corojo,,False,No,More Details,United States,No,,Gordo,No,Corojo,CLE
Cohiba Black,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 145 Ratings ,"Step into the darker side of Cohiba cigars.Creating a suitable new blend for a legendary brand like Cohiba is no easy task. But, cigar master Daniel Nunez was up to the challenge, and proudly presents Cohiba Black cigars, espresso-black gems from the Dominican Republic.Hugged by a bold, Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper, this hearty maduro is dark, oily and quite intimidating. Inside, a long-leaf blend of Dominican and Mexican tobaccos is bound by a flavorful sungrown Dominican Piloto leaf that has been patiently aged in tercio for 3+ years. This complex mixture is masterfully balanced to offer a smooth, satisfying cigar layered with robust flavors.​ Note: Cohiba Black has recently undergone a packaging update, and we currently have a mix of new and old packaging. You may receive either, but rest assured, the cigars will be exactly the same.   ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Gigante', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Cigarillos, Corona, Gigante, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Cohiba
Cohiba Blue,Rated 4.29 out of 5, Based on 99 Ratings ,"For a limited time, receive FREE shipping on your entire order with purchase of select boxes of Cohiba Cigars!An Inclusive LuxuryCohiba – the brand that transformed its Cuban roots into a modern day legend. Anyone who knows anything about cigars has heard the name Cohiba. Every cigar in this portfolio is a beloved gem, praised for complex flavors and extravagant tastes. Now there’s a new Cohiba blend to be coveted by all – and it comes at a more inclusive price point. Cohiba Blue is rolled up into four crowd pleasing vitolas that showcase a gorgeously smooth Honduran wrapper which will wake the palate up right off the bat. Blue is filled with a three-country blend of Nicaraguan, Dominican, and Honduran tobaccos that are all held together by a Honduran habano binder. Produced in the Dominican Republic but heavy on the Honduran tobacco, this new gem is an inviting medium-bodied blend that is rife with rich hints of sweet leather, earth, cream, and cinnamon. It’s about time we could all indulge in another fine Cohiba, give Blue a taste and don’t look back. Note: Cohiba Blue has recently undergone a packaging update, and we currently have a mix of new and old packaging. You may receive either, but rest assured, the cigars will be exactly the same.   ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Rothschild', 'Toro']",Honduran,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Churchill, Robusto, Rothschild, Toro",Varies,Honduran,Cohiba
Cohiba Connecticut,Rated 4.6 out of 5, Based on 25 Ratings ,"For a limited time, receive FREE shipping on your entire order with purchase of select boxes of Cohiba Cigars!The most legendary name in cigars, gold plated.When you see the name Cohiba on a cigar band, you already know you’re in for a good experience. The folks who make them are very aware of this, and they work hard to uphold that reputation. Since 1966, they haven’t done anything halfway, and certainly don’t cut corners. That’s why when I heard that they were finally going to release a cigar with a Connecticut wrapper, I could hardly contain myself. I couldn’t wait to get my hands on a box.The blend for this cigar is, in a word, impressive. Inside, a veritable feast of Brazilian Mata Fina, Dominican Olor, Dominican Piloto Cubana, and Nicaraguan Jalapa fillers dancing beneath a rich, flavorful Mexican San Andres binder. But let’s be honest, it’s the wrapper that caught your eye, and for good reason. This beautiful blonde leaf is from Ecuador’s Los Rios province, and grown beneath natural cloud cover yielding a beautiful golden color and almost imperceptible veins. Expect a bounty of cream, toast, nuts, and a subtle spice that’ll go perfect with your morning coffee, or any occasion worth celebrating. It’s the most well-known name in cigars, with the best-selling wrapper leaf, how could you go wrong?",Medium,"['Gigante', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Mexican,"Brazilian, Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gigante, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Cohiba
Cohiba Macassar,Rated 4.23 out of 5, Based on 122 Ratings ,"For a limited time, receive FREE shipping on your entire order with purchase of select boxes of Cohiba Cigars!Mama-say, mama-sah, ma MacassarWalk up to anyone on the streets, ask them to name a cigar brand, and chances are they're gonna say ""Cohiba."" Cohiba has built their legacy brick by brick for decades, from their Cuban origins to their innovative new blends like Cohiba Nicaragua. With Cohiba Macassar, the Modern Luxury line continues its epic streak of successes. This new blend represents the pinnacle of the brand's offerings. They're big shoes to fill, but I promise you, Cohiba Massacar is the real deal. Each box of 10 is packaged in an elegant wood case made with ebony macassar, some of the rarest hardwoods in the world. For the blend, Cohiba has put together an insane collection of tobaccos. Burning this top-shelf stogie you'll get nuances of wood, spice, creamy earth, and most importantly, an unforgettable cigar experience like no other. Put this one on your wish list or snag a box ASAP, because Cohiba Macassar is redefining the game.  ",Medium-Full,"['Double Corona', 'Gigante', 'Toro']",Connecticut Broadleaf,"Dominican, Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Double Corona, Gigante, Toro",No,Connecticut,Cohiba
Cohiba Nicaragua,Rated 4.44 out of 5, Based on 61 Ratings ,"For a limited time, receive FREE shipping on your entire order with purchase of select boxes of Cohiba Cigars!​Stepping into uncharted territoriesCohiba, the king of the crop, the deity of the Dominican, has accomplished almost everything there is in this industry. One of the most recognizable names in the land, Cohiba has pumped out countless Dominican favorites over the years. Now, they are on to new horizons, getting their feet wet for the first time in the fertile soils of Nicaragua with the release of the Cohiba Nicaragua.This concoction of finely aged leaves boasts a bolder profile than many we’ve come to know from Cohiba. Adorned with a milk chocolaty Sun Grown Colorado Oscuro wrapper, this prize looks good enough to eat. Brimming with Nicaraguan long-fillers from Jalapa and Esteli all hugged by a Nicaraguan binder also from Jalapa, this is one medium to full-bodied masterpiece prime for the pickin’. Complex notes of cedar, leather, and pepper meld beautifully causing those who partake to begin frantically searching for another as soon as they see the nub is in reach.Cohiba Nicaragua was recently honored with a well-deserved 91-rating. The review stated, ""Notes of white pepper and cumin lead to a bold coffee bean character before the sweet, fruity finish. It's a dark and oily cigar that draws and burns evenly."" Note: Cohiba Nicaragua has recently undergone a packaging update, and we currently have a mix of new and old packaging. You may receive either, but rest assured, the cigars will be exactly the same.    ",Medium-Full,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Cigarillos, Corona, Gordo, Robusto",No,"Honduran, Oscuro",Cohiba
Cohiba Puro Dominicana,Rated 4.05 out of 5, Based on 249 Ratings ,"Ready yourself, this one's got some kick!The Cohiba Puro Dominicana cigar brings the heat. This is a flavorful sucker, an enchanting cigar that is purely Dominican, a 100% puro, one blended to provide a full-bodied, full-flavored profile that is purely Cohiba. Cohiba Puro Dominicana is robust and eventful, thanks to an oily Dominican natural wrapper that cloaks a bold recipe of Dominican long-fillers. To maximize these tobaccos, each and every hand of tobacco was patiently aged 'en tercio', within charcoaled wooden barrels producing a satisfying, oaky flavor with ample spice that's smooth and balanced throughout. Powerful, yet refined and elegant, this is the Cohiba cigar you've been asking for!​Note: You're not going crazy! Cohiba Puro Dominicana's are back from the grave, and we can all rejoice and enjoy this fantastic premium once again. In times like this, it's great to be a cigar enthusiast. ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,Cohiba
Cohiba Red Dot,Rated 4.49 out of 5, Based on 557 Ratings ,"For a limited time, receive FREE shipping on your entire order with purchase of select boxes of Cohiba Cigars!The result of five intense years of research, the famous Cohiba cigar brand is now available in limited quantities in the US market.Often called ""red dot"" Cohibas due to the markings on the band, this exquisite cigar offers a medium-bodied flavor and a strong, smooth and incredibly rich character. Handmade with a toothy Cameroon wrapper and aged mixture of Dominican-grown Piloto Cubano tobaccos, Cohiba's blend sets the standard among today's premium cigars.Cohiba received well-deserved '91' and '92' ratings noting: ""Well made with a good draw, Cohiba has a solid core of distinctly nutty flavors that have an underlying creaminess. French peanut notes and a touch of caramel on the finish make this a very tasty medium-bodied smoke.""​​Note: Cohiba Red Dot has recently undergone a packaging update, and we currently have a mix of new and old packaging. You may receive either, but rest assured, the cigars will be exactly the same.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Lonsdale', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Cigarillos, Corona, Lonsdale, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Cameroon,Cohiba
Cohiba Royale,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"A Cohiba fit for a king.For discerning connoisseurs who know a good cigar when they see one, Cohiba has no equal. Carefully crafted blends, precise construction, and exacting quality control standards are what makes Cohiba fly off the shelves, and now the most recognizable name in cigars is dropping their strongest blend to date.Broadleaf wrappers grown in Nicaragua are a rarity in the cigar world, and the one covering the Cohiba Royale is one of the most beautiful you’ll ever see. Dark, oily, and bursting with flavor, this prized leaf from the Jamastran province covers a Dominican Piloto binder and long-fillers from Nicaragua and Honduras. In true Cohiba fashion, each leaf in the blend has been aged for 5-6 years, smoothing any sharp edges while keeping the strength and spice intact, as well as heavy, full-bodied notes of espresso, earth, leather, and dried fruit. Grab a box of Cohiba Royale, and enjoy the taste of true luxury.",Medium-Full,"['Robusto', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,False,,"Robusto, Short Robusto, Toro",False,Nicaraguan,Cohiba
Cohiba Spectre CS19,Rated 4.23 out of 5,,"The definition of opulent.Let’s rewind to IPCPR 2018, to the General Cigar booth. A cigar was unveiled that was totally unlike any cigar that came before, and used such high-quality tobacco with such meticulous processing, it blew all the competition totally out of the water. While the price of admission was high, it was undeniably worth every penny. That cigar was the Cohiba Spectre, and now General has upped the ante on their finest release yet with a new Spectre release. This is definitely a cigar you won’t want to sleep on.There’s just one roller and one buncher in the entire factory skilled enough to produce this masterpiece. A quartet of some of the finest filler leaves in the world from three different countries are carefully rested in rum barrels before being transferred to airtight palm tree bundles for additional aging. The binder is wrapper-quality USA Broadleaf, ensuring a perfect burn and exquisite flavors. But the Nicaraguan wrapper is undoubtedly the cherry on top, having undergone an extra 12 weeks of fermentation in order to provide the richest and most delectable flavor possible. All the tobacco used is at least 5 years old, and all the completed cigars are treated to a 6-8 week nap in cedar shavings before being draw-tested so you never have to worry about a dud. Let’s take a look at the anatomy:Wrapper: Extra-fermented Nicaraguan JalapaBinder: 5+ year aged wrapper-quality USA BroadleafFiller: Brazil Matafina, Nicaragua Esteli, Nicaragua Jalapa, Dominican Piloto CubanoThe naturally sweet, opulent flavors produced by the Spectre have to be tasted to be believed. This will easily be one of the best cigar experiences you’ll have in your life, starting with the beautifully designed boxes and ending with a nub that’s too small to hold and a memory that will last a lifetime. Those with the chance to burn one of these would be remiss to pass it up, because they certainly won’t last long.",Medium-Full,['Toro'],Connecticut Broadleaf,"Brazilian, Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,Nicaraguan Jalapa,
Cojimar Private Collection Maduro,Rated 3.88 out of 5, Based on 33 Ratings ,"A modern-day classic goes darkCojimar Private Collection Natural quickly proved that the Cojimar brand is awesome, and here to stay. Named after a famous fishing town right outside of Havana, Cuba, this Cuban-esque brand is manufactured under the watchful eyes of the fan and industry-favorite Gurkha brand. While the Natural version of this cigar was smooth sailin’, this one’s a dark, rich experience that all Maduro lovers can get behind. Delivering a medium to full-bodied cocktail of chocolate, earth, leather, and a slight spice, the Cojimar Private Collection Maduro is a must try cigar if you want an awesome cigar to toast up. It ain’t often I cough up top dollar for a cigar, but a premium like this is truly worth every penny. Do yourself a favor and grab a 5-pack, you won’t regret it. ​",,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,"Connecticut, Connecticut Broadleaf, Maduro",
Comfortably Numb by Espinosa Vol. 1,Rated 4.57 out of 5, Based on 30 Ratings ,"Espinosa gets comfortableErik Espinosa may be regarded as a young buck in this industry, but if you've tasted any of his cigars in recent years, it's very clear he knows what he's doing. Espinosa is a Cuban native with a solid history in cigars. He's worked as a shop owner, factory manager, and not long ago opened up his own factory in Esteli, Nicaragua. He's been the mastermind behind some well-known brands such as Murcielago and 601 and his innovation shines through in Comfortably Numb Vol. 1. This psychedelic inspired cigar comes in one perfected size to offer a great balance. It's dressed in an Ecuador Habano wrapper and brims with hand-selected long-fillers from Nicaragua. It offers a complex flavor profile with notes of coffee, cedar, earth, a bit of sweetness and some spice on the finish. Check out a box today and see what this guy is all about. ",Medium,['Toro'],Corojo,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Ecuador Habano,Espinosa
Comfortably Numb Vol. 2,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"This tobaccy’s pretty whacky!Erik Espinosa is a far-out dude, and his cigars consistently stay on the best-sellers lists longer than the duration of a Grateful Dead concert. If cigars are a counter-culture, then Espinosa is a modern-day Timothy Leary, taking our palates to new heights and reimagining what draws us to cigars in the first place. If the psychedelic-themed Comfortably Numb Vol. 1 didn’t open your third eye, buckle up and spark up his newest creation: Comfortably Numb Vol. 2.  If the far-out packaging doesn’t grab your attention, then the blend definitely will. Comprised of a Nicaraguan and Honduran Ligero filler blend surrounded by a Corojo Ligero wrapper, this cool cat pumps out groovy notes of cedar, red pepper, and a toasty savoriness that’ll have you feeling comfortable in no time. This is the perfect blend for all of you easy-riders out there, so break out the shades, chuck a peace sign, and cruise with Espinosa’s Comfortably Numb Vol. 2.",Medium-Full,['Toro'],,,False,,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Maduro,Espinosa
Conspiracy Cigars by Cult,Rated 4.67 out of 5,,"How great this cigar is, is not a ConspiracyCult certainly likes to keep things interesting, but there are no gimmicks, cover-ups, or ruses with their latest cigar Conspiracy. What you get is another flavorful creation by the unique boutique brand carefully crafted out of the TACASA factory in Esteli, Nicaragua. A palate pleaser for sure, Conspiracy is loaded with well-aged Nicaraguan long-fillers combined with a blend of binders from Nicaragua, Mexico, and Indonesia all wrapped up in an Ecuador Habano leaf. This tasty stick offers a complexity of red pepper spice, sweet earth, oak, and cocoa. Any suspicions you may have is the amazingly low price of these premiums, but that’s no joke. Take the tin foil hat off, and stock up on Conspiracy. You’ll be glad to have extra after you try these delicious cigars.",Medium,['Gordo'],,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Gordo,No,Habano,
Cornelius & Anthony Aerial,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Fly high with C&A!While Cornelius & Anthony may be (relatively) new to the industry, you wouldn’t guess it from looking at the portfolio. Now the proud owner of a half dozen fan-favorite lines, this boutique offering has been working overtime the last few years to quickly establish a name for themselves. Perhaps the most popular blend? Aerial, a cigar handmade in the La Zona factory in Esteli, Nicaragua. Those who love a full-flavored blend may have checked out as soon as they realized this one was Connecticut, but I’d implore you to give Aerial a second look. Sure, it’s a light colored wrapper, but the flavor is like no other. The secret? A proprietary USA binder that adds loads of spice and complexity to the Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapped treat. The typical cream and slight cedar are there, joined by droves of black pepper and a natural grassiness. If you’ve been looking for a Cornelius & Anthony cigar to jump aboard, this might just be the one… ",Medium,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Cornelius & Anthony Daddy Mac,Rated 4.33 out of 5, Based on 27 Ratings ,"The big Mac! Growing tobacco within Southern Virginia since the 1860’s, it’s safe to say that the Baileys know a thing or two about the leaf. So while the Cornelius & Anthony name may be new to the world of premium cigars, you can rest assured knowing you’re still looking at generations of history and knowledge of growing and cultivating tobaccos. Today, we shine the spotlight on the blend honoring Steven Bailey’s father: the Daddy Mac.Wrapped in a rich Brazilian wrapper leaf, the Daddy Mac also features Ecuadorian binder and Nicaraguan long-fillers. Handmade in the La Zona Factory in Esteli Nicaragua, each Daddy Mac delivers a medium to full-bodied profile that’s layered with sweet and spicy flavors. It’s a perfect balancing act, one that we’re sure will make Papa Bailey proud. After all, if he didn’t like it, he probably wouldn’t let them put his picture on every box! Good news! Daddy Mac has been honored with a 90-point rating, noting: ""Draped in an oily reddish wrapper and crafted with a three-seam cap, this cigar has a lush draw that imparts notes of pepper and leather with a touch of red wine.""",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Brazilian,
Cornelius & Anthony Meridian,Rated 5 out of 5,,"The OG Stephen Bailey’s family has been in tobacco for years and years, but it was only a few years ago they got into the premium cigar game. And they got in good. Quickly releasing about a half dozen blends, each C&A release has been met with loads of critical acclaim. But let’s not forget their roots – Meridian, the handmade cigar that started it all. Cornelius & Anthony Meridian is manufactured in the La Zona factory in Esteli, Nicaragua, and sports a toothy, reddish Ecuadorian Habano wrapper leaf. Underneath, Nicaraguan binder and Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers meld together into a nutty core of flavor, featuring nice fruity sweetness and a sharp spiciness with a long, satisfying finish. ",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Toro",No,Varied,
Cornelius & Anthony Mistress,Rated 5 out of 5,,"mistress [mis-tris] - something regarded as feminine that has control or supremacyThat was the definition that Cornelius & Anthony based the name of one of their 2018 IPCPR Convention & Trade Show inclusions off of. Always the storytellers, Cornelius and Anthony gave a nod to what they felt many women tend to think of cigars as being when their significant others leave their company to enjoy a leisurely burn. With that thought in mind, the company developed The Mistress cigar into a curvy delicacy with balanced and vivid flavors that can captivate the senses of anyone looking for a good time.     Wrapped in an Ecuadorian Habano wrapper, The Mistress is composed of American-grown broadleaf binder and Pennsylvanian broadleaf ligero fillers, creating a full-bodied profile filled with with notes of sweet natural tobacco, earth, cinnamon, nutmeg, wood, and pepper to please the palate. If you're looking for something outside of your norm, we suggest indulging in your own Mistress experience.   ",Full,"['Corona Gordo', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Pennsylvania Broadleaf,Pennsylvania,False,,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,"Corona Gordo, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",False,Ecuador Habano,
Cornelius & Anthony Senor Esugars,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Your new sidekickA passion project from the Cornelius & Anthony founder, Senor Esugars was in development for over three years before it was released. Finally releasing at the 2017 IPCPR trade show, Senor Esugars is named after founder Stephen Bailey’s pet Daschund, or as Stephen Bailey calls him, his sidekick. Handmade at the La Zona factory in Esteli, Nicaragua, Senor Esugars features a Mexican San Andres wrapper leaf overtop US binder and Nicaraguan long-filler tobaccos. The blend is powerful and flavorful, weighing in at a medium to full-body, and dishing out notes of black pepper, berry-like sweetness, and a lot of red pepper spice. It’s a blend that’ll most certainly satisfy lovers of full-bodied blends, so if you’re in the mood to try a great new boutique blend, this one’s your Huckleberry. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Toro']",Habano,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Gordo, Toro",Varies,San Andres,
Crowned Heads CHC Reserve XVIII,Rated 4 out of 5,,"A mouthful of a name, a ton of flavorJon Huber’s incredibly successful Crowned Heads brand is without a doubt one of the boutique manufactures we hear the most buzz about. From their start in the industry with the uber-popular Four Kicks, to the release of the annual Las Calavares blend, Crowned Heads has gained quite the cult following. But it wasn’t until 2018 that they actually put the company’s name on one of their releases. Today, we welcome the first cigar to bear the Crowned Heads name, Crowned Heads CHC Reserve XVIII. The Crowned Heads CHC Reserve XVIII is a limited-edition blend crafted to honor the brand’s dedicated fans (jokingly referred to as their ‘Court’). Utilizing a Mexican San Andres wrapper leaf overtop Ecuadorian binder and Nicaraguan long-fillers, this medium to full-bodied blend features tons of chocolate and toasted woodsy notes, complimented by hints of red and black pepper as the burn progresses. ",Medium,"['Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,San Andres,Crowned Heads
Crowned Heads Four Kicks,Rated 4.29 out of 5, Based on 17 Ratings ,"Sticking to their guns.As people, we all adhere to normalcy. From what we eat and drink, to running around like mindless ants to get to where we're going. We're all victims of 'normal'. But at the end of the day, normal can get boring, fast. That's where cigar companies like Crowned Heads come into play. Influenced by the edgy, rebellious, and determined lyrics of the band, Kings of Leon, Crowned Heads goes against the programming of everyday handmades. Without further adieu, enter their first creation, Four Kicks cigars. Their motto is simple, yet loud and clear. Stick to who you are, stay loyal to those you care about, and never forget where you came from.Crafted under the watchful eye of E.P. Carrillo in the Dominican, Four Kicks brings the substance in spades. At first glance, it's easy to think of this is as a powerhouse cigar. But a closer look reveals a medium-bodied cigar bursting with flavor. It all starts with a smooth, reddish-brown Ecuador Habano wrapper. This leaf is seamlessly applied to a core of Nicaraguan long-fillers hugged by a Nicaraguan binder. From the first puff, the senses are met with a wave of chewy, spicy-sweet flavors. Nuts, leather, and a steady dose of pepper join forces with creamy, cedary undertones. There's a lot going on, but one thing is for sure. It works, and works well. Complex, interesting, and one eye-catching handmade, this should be on your to try list. Four Kicks already caught the eye of critics earning a 91-rating in the process, noting: ""There is a significant earthy character to this smoke, balanced by a sweet and spicy component and a black pepper finish."" ",Medium,"['Corona', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Robusto Extra', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Pyramid, Robusto, Robusto Extra, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Crowned Heads
Crowned Heads Four Kicks Maduro,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Crowned Heads gets a black beltBack in 2010, four former CAO employees started a little boutique brand known as Crowned Heads, led by Jon Huber. Their first blend, Four Kicks, was a huge success, and now they’ve re-blended the original release with master blender Ernesto Perez-Carrillo Jr. Offered up in the same four sizes as the original Four Kicks release, this darker retelling of the Crowned Heads story is most certainly worth checking out. It all starts with a toothy and rustic Connecticut Habano maduro wrapper leaf that gives off tons of cocoa and chocolate aromas as soon as you remove the cellophane. Toasting Four Kicks Maduro up, you’ll find those chocolatey notes in spades, backed by creaminess, and a nice core of toasty, natural tobaccos flavors. Never inching all the way into the “full-bodied” category, this cigar is a perfect choice for all-day enjoyment. Good news! Four Kicks Maduro has earned a well-deserved 90-point rating, noting: ""Enrobed in a dark and oily wrapper, this slim cigar delivers notes of almond, coffee and wood interwoven with pleasant touches of cocoa and herbs. A bold cigar."" ",Medium,"['Corona', 'Robusto', 'Robusto Extra', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Robusto, Robusto Extra, Toro",No,Habano Connecticut,Crowned Heads
Crowned Heads Headley Grange,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Already turning some 'heads'.The fellas at Crowned Heads are always thinking outside of the box. If you ever get a chance to chat with them, you'll quickly realize normal is for the birds. After all, it's not every day that a cigar is crafted to resemble the heavy, methodical drum-beat of 'When The Levee Breaks'. But that's exactly what they set out to do. Created once again under the skillful eye of E.P. Carrillo, Crowned Heads vivid vision quickly became a reality. Only a few years in existence, Crowned Heads is quickly building an impressive resume. And without a doubt, one of its highlights is Headley Grange. A smooth Ecuador Sumatra wrapper embraces rich, bold Nicaraguan long-fillers. Then, each cigar is gently box-pressed for a stunning presentation. The profile is medium to full-bodied emitting a buttery smooth nutty sweetness, that fuses nicely with coffee, nutmeg, and leather. I don't know if it reminds me a drum, but one thing I do know is it's damn hard to put down. Headley Grange has already made its way into the 90+ rated club! Earning a well-deserved 91-rating, it also ranked 24th in Cigar Aficionado's Top 25 Cigars of the Year. Here's what the critics had to say: ""The cigar is medium to full in body, with rich coffee flavors as well as notes of almond and spice, a solid follow-up to the first Crowned Heads cigar, Four Kicks.""",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Robusto Extra', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Robusto Extra, Toro",No,Ecuador Sumatra,Crowned Heads
Crowned Heads J.D. Howard Reserve,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"A real American outlaw.Look out, because I’m about to drop some knowledge: the infamous Jesse James spent most of his years robbing banks and causing a ruckus in the Wild, Wild West. That’s a true story, son! But when he wasn’t kicking ass and taking names, he spent a good amount of time living peacefully in Nashville under the alias “Howard.... J.D. Howard."" This inventive blend was inspired by his legacy.J.D. Howard Reserve is the third core line from Crowned Heads LLC, and is a fitting follow up to the Four Kicks and Headley Grange lines. Featuring an ultra-dark and toothy Brazilian Arapiraca wrapper, Ecuadorian Sumatra binder, and hand-selected long-fillers from Nicaragua, there's plenty of flavor in-store. Notes of wood, spice and coffee are present throughout a medium to full-bodied profile that's hard to resist. ",Medium-Full,"['Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Sumatra,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Toro",No,Brazilian,Crowned Heads
Crowned Heads Jericho Hill,Rated 3.78 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"An ode to the Man in Black.No, not Will Smith. This cigar is dedicated to the true Man in Black, the one and only Johnny Cash. The folks over at Crowned Heads are  sticking to their musically themed cigar lines and have decided to honor Cash with their newest release, Jericho Hill. One of the most influential American singer/songwriters of all time, Johnny’s checkered past compelled him to perform one of his most famous tracks –  Cocaine Blues, from his renowned concert at Folsom Prison. This is the ballad of a scorned man named Willy Lee whose drug induced rage got him arrested by a sheriff from Jericho Hill. Every aspect of this cigar takes inspiration from the song.Jericho Hill boasts a dark and sultry Mexican San Andres wrapper, which is a nod to both Juarez, Mexico, where Willy Lee was arrested, and to Johnny’s nickname, “Man in Black.” Nicaraguan long-fillers and a Nicaraguan binder help to give Jericho Hill some serious attitude (just like Johnny had). Stuffed to the brim with blasts of pepper, spice, and leather, this is one full-bodied firecracker. Only the most potent of blends would suffice in paying tribute to a legend of Johnny Cash’s stature, and this one fits the bill. RIP, JC.Crowned Heads Jericho Hill received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""Dark in appearance and flatly pressed, this cigar starts out herbal and woody, but develops heartier notes of toast, nuts and spice that lead to a licorice finish. """,Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Double Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,San Andres,Crowned Heads
Crowned Heads Jericho Hill Juarez,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"A cheaper travel ticket to Jericho Hill.Jericho Hill is Crowned Heads' ode to the Man in Black - Johnny Cash. It's earthy, rich, and complex, and the Jericho Hill Juarez brings you that heady flavor for much more accessible cost of entry. You'll get a Mexican San Andres-wrapped, medium-full bodied masterpiece, chock full of Dominican & Nicaraguan long-fillers secured by an Ecuador Sumatra binder. These cigars were inspired by the song ""Cocaine Blues', but we promise they have a much happier ending. ",Medium-Full,['Toro'],"Ecuador, Sumatra","Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,Toro,False,San Andres,Crowned Heads
Crowned Heads La Imperiosa,Rated 4.7 out of 5, Based on 20 Ratings ,"A crowning achievement.Crowned Heads is a different breed of cigar company. With a rebellious take-no-prisoners attitude and a small batch approach to blending, they already boast a slew of highly-rated cigars. From their core lines to their limited edition blends, Crowned Heads cigars are among the most popular and talked about sticks today.Las Calaveras 2014 was a limited edition blend that is widely considered as a modern classic. All but impossible to find these days, Crowned Heads listened to the cries for more and resurrected the exact same blend in a regular production cigar…meet La Imperiosa. Hailing from the My Father factory in Nicaragua, this hearty blend comes lovingly dressed in an oily and dark Ecuadoran Habano Oscuro wrapper concealing a choice blend of Nicaraguan long-fillers. La Imperiosa is full-bodied and oh so delicious with highlights of red pepper, fruit, earth, and leather. The complex and rich notes are perfectly balanced and will have your palate begging for more. ​",Full,"['Corona', 'Double Robusto', 'Robusto', 'Rothschild']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Double Robusto, Robusto, Rothschild",No,Ecuador Habano,Crowned Heads
Crowned Heads Las Calavares EL 2017,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"An annual boutique legendCrowned Heads’ yearly release of the Las Calaveras is meant to serve as a celebration of life that also calls attention to those we’ve lost in years past. Since its first iteration in 2014, the blends have changed, but the essence and purpose of Las Calaveras has remained steady. The 2017 version of this popular blend encases lively Nicaraguan filler in an Ecuador Habano wrapper for a complex and fulfilling blend. Three rows of eight cigars represent life’s beginning and end, and eternal life. Just like life though, these won’t last forever and we’re expecting them to sell out quickly, so get yours today. ",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Robusto,No,"Ecuador Habano, Maduro",
Crowned Heads Las Calaveras EL 2018,Rated 5 out of 5,,"The LE turns fiveFor the last five years, the Las Calaveras from Crowned Heads has consistently been among the best-selling small-batch, limited edition cigars we receive. And that’s saying something in an industry with this many brands and releases. This year, they’re changing things up a bit, and I’m not just talking about the bright green boxes. Instead, each Las Calaveras has a slightly different blend than year’s past. For those unfamiliar, Las Calaveras is traditionally released around Dias de los Muertos, and features art inspired by La Calavera Cartina. But enough about that, let’s get to what you really want to know: the blend. Las Calaveras is a medium to full-bodied powerhouse, utilizing a Mexican San Andres maduro wrapper for the first time, with Nicaraguan binder and long-filler. Flavors dance around your palate, alternating between chocolatey, peppery, and oaky, all while remaining smooth and balanced. Good news! Las Calaveras EL 2018 has earned a 90-point rating, noting: ""Enrobed in a dark, oily cover leaf, this finely crafted cigar smokes well, offering notes of cedar, wood and cinnamon balanced by hints of coffee bean and vanilla.""",Medium,['Robusto'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Robusto,No,San Andres,
Crowned Heads Las Calaveras EL 2019,Rated 4.86 out of 5,,"Ashes to ashes.Since 2014, Crowned Heads has used their annual limited edition Las Calaveras line to pay tribute to those who have passed away in the previous year. Always well-received and expertly crafted, the line is at the same time a touching tribute and a truly great cigar experience. This year’s release honors Cano Ozgener, who founded CAO International in 1968 and passed in 2018. This great man’s legacy has touched many lives, and will live on in the cigar industry and now in humidors all over the world with the Las Calaveras EL 2019.2019 marks the first time the Las Calaveras has worn a Habano Oscuro wrapper since the original release in 2014. The filler and binder are 100% Nicaraguan, and only the top quality leaves have been selected to fill this commemorative release. Crafted in the My Father Cigars factory in Esteli, Nicaragua, the EL 2019 is medium-full bodied, with well-balanced notes of pepper, leather, spice, and wood. Ozgener was Jon Huber's friend and mentor, and he would be proud to be honored with such a great cigar. Grab a box today and tip your hat to one of the greats in this wonderful industry. ",Medium-Full,['Robusto Extra'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Robusto Extra,No,"Ecuador Habano, Oscuro",Crowned Heads
Crowned Heads Las Mareas,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"An awesome comboCrowned Heads is a favorite of the boutique cigar crowd, and it’s no wonder why. Run under the watchful eye of Jon Huber, Crowned Heads has delivered wave after wave of delicious handmade, but now, the tide is coming in. Las Mareas, that is, which is Spanish for the tides. Inspired by the surf culture that Jon Huber witnessed living in Hawaii, Las Mareas is a fantastic cigar you don’t want to skip. Want to know the secret recipe that makes this premium such a hit? All of the tobaccos were produced by the Garcia family at the famed My Father factory in Nicaragua. Oh yeah, son. It’s about to get real. Medium to full-bodied, Las Mareas uses its Corojo ’99 wrapper to bring cedar, leather, and an awesome sweetness to the table. I don’t know much about surfing, but I can tell you this is one kickass blend. ​",Medium-Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Corojo,Crowned Heads
Crowned Heads Le Careme,Rated 4.56 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"Le souffle is served Under the supervision of E.P. Carillo, Crowned Heads cigars have been making small batch cigars committed to a combination of excellent flavor, balance and consistency.  Inspired by a time when quality, pride and integrity mattered, Crowned Heads believes in a strict attention to detail. They may have gotten a late start in the premium cigar industry just a few years back but they have already proven what they are committed to with a handful of top rated boutique blends. The first of their cigar lines to be inspired by food, La Careme is named after Marie Antoine Careme, a pioneer in French cuisine, who is known for popularizing the soufflé.Produced in the Dominican Republic, Le Careme is wrapped in a dark, oily Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper with an Ecuadorian Sumatra binder and Nicaraguan fillers. Right off the bat you’ll notice a strong earthy note followed by rich fruit, nuts and cocoa. Black Pepper joins the mix here and there but isn’t overwhelming. Reminiscent of a chocolate soufflé, there’s a sweet spot on everyone’s palate waiting to be hit with Le Careme. Receiving high praise from Crowned Heads fans, this is a cigar you don’t want to pass up on.​",Medium,"['Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Sumatra,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Crowned Heads
Crowned Heads Luminosa,Rated 4.67 out of 5,,"Morning GloryCrowned Heads Cigars is a boutique cigar manufacturer that has only been in existence for a short amount of time.  However, under the supervision of E.P Carillo this brand has already gathered a following in the premium cigar industry.  Paying great attention to detail, the rapid success of the brand is credited to the belief that quality, pride and integrity still matter. Blending cigars of high artisanal quality Crowned Heads is committed to providing cigars with a combination of excellent flavor, balance and consistency.  With a handful of top rated blends on the market already, Crowned Heads Cigars fills a void in their portfolio with a mellow to medium bodied cigar line called Luminosa. Categorized as a medium strength profile, the Luminosa originates in the Dominican Republic and is wrapped in an Ecuadorian Connecticut shade wrapper with an undisclosed binder and filler. With a mellower profile than other Crown Heads Cigars, company president John Huber states that the Luminosa is a great cigar to enjoy with a morning coffee.  If you’ve been waiting for a boutique cigar that tastes awesome in the morning, the Luminosa will surely shed some light on that search. ​",Mellow-Medium,['Gigante'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Gigante,No,Ecuador Connecticut,Crowned Heads
Cu-Avana Natural,Rated 4.2 out of 5, Based on 10 Ratings ,"Cuban flair, Dominican smoothness. If you enjoy pleasant and smooth cigars, Cu-Avana should be at the top of your list. This gorgeous cigar offers a genuine Connecticut shade wrapper and superior long-fillers. Despite the smooth and unobtrusive taste, there are some subtle yet distinct flavors of creamy spiciness, along with some coffee and almost lemon-like flavors, making this cigar a treat you can enjoy any time of day. ",Mellow,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,
Cu-Avana Punisher,Rated 4.4 out of 5, Based on 42 Ratings ,"[pun-ish'er] noun 1. ONE WHO DEALS ROUGHLY; 2. ONE WHO INFLICTS PAIN OR HURTPunisher is for seasoned lovers of the glorious tobacco weed. To those not converted to the sublime righteousness of ligero and high-priming tobaccos it will be the devil’s brew. If this is you: run, do not walk, in the opposite direction. Even stout men will be overwhelmed with its pure, undiluted, concentration of spice. Punisher is crafted for the minority, the insatiable ligero lovers. The juxtaposition of deep, dense flavors, searing spice, and classical construction deliver a righteous blend with layer after layer of sand-pounding, toe-curling, full-bodied power. The lips will burn. The head will swim. The tummy will ache. The eyes will warm. Sweat will collect. The heat will render you prone. Ligero-loving converts: this is a feature, not a bug. Nothing short of a religious experience. Unlike any other. The proof is in the box.",Full,"['Perfecto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Perfecto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Habano,
Cuba Aliados Cabinet Selection,Rated 4.65 out of 5, Based on 31 Ratings ,"​100% homegrown, baby!Cuba Aliados Cabinet Selection is by far the most impressive Cuba Aliados to date. Crafted solely with tobaccos from the Reyes family's Honduran farm, this hearty medium to full-bodied handmade is a delight. The fillers, wrapper, and binder are all Cuban-seed tobaccos patiently grown, and then carefully fermented by the legendary Reyes family. Each cigar comes packed to the gills with these rich tobaccos, as a dark and oily wrapper greets you from the outside. Densely packed, Cuba Aliados Cabinet Selection speaks volumes unleashing waves of pepper, coffee bean, cocoa and a semi-sweet finish. Cuba Aliados Cabinet Selection earned an impressive 93-rating, noting: ""A dark robusto whose toasty undertones are a flavor base for bold chocolate notes, red wine intonations and a meaty finish. The cigar draws and burns evenly."" ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Habano,
Cuba Aliados Maduro,Rated 4.83 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"The 90-rated Cuba Aliados is back!
Handmade by famed cigar maker Rolando Reyes, Sr. at the Puros Indios factory in Honduras, Cuba Aliados is a flavorful medium-bodied blend of Cuban-seed Dominican tobaccos and cloaked by a dark, Nicaraguan Maduro leaf. Expect a smooth and flavorful experience with notes of earth, spices, cedar and a toasty, semi-sweet finish. A great cigar at an even better price.Good news, Cuba Aliados Maduro has received a well-deserved 90-point rating, noting: ""The cigar has sweet wood, chocolate and mocha flavors, with an earthy, leathery core. Medium to full bodied.""",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Nicaraguan, Nicaraguan Broadleaf","Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Varies,"Habano Maduro, Varied",
Cuba Libre,Rated 4.49 out of 5, Based on 184 Ratings ,"A scrumptious blend from Nestor Plasencia.Cuba Libre is a positively delicious Honduran premium layered with robust yet balanced flavors. Its toothy Cuban-seed Corojo wrapper conceals a feisty recipe of Cuban-seed, long-leaf tobaccos grown in the fertile soils of the Jalapa Valley. After 8 months in Nestor Plasencia’s aging rooms, this flavorful mixture exudes a hearty core of earth and leather with a toasty influence. Each vitola pumps out voluminous, soft clouds of voluptuous, silky flavor that linger pleasingly on the palate before dissolving into a peppery-sweet finish with pronounced notes of pleasant spice through the nose. Buttery smooth and perfectly balanced, it’s medium in strength but a few clicks shy of full-bodied. I love this cigar. Not to get too far over the top, but Cuba Libre offers the ideal juxtaposition of disarmingly lush, intense flavors with classical, finely-tuned structure.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,Yes,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Corojo,Cuba Libre
Cuba Libre One,Rated 4.52 out of 5, Based on 380 Ratings ,"​One is not the loneliest number. ​That's because I've been aggressively sidling up next to these lovely cigars since the day I first saw them, and they haven't shown me the backhand even once.Cuba Libre One is a stellar new handmade from Nestor Plasencia, finally released after two years of work, now available to all (all those with a pulse and a checking account that is). An ultra-bold, mega-flavorful super-premium, this Nicaraguan's most apparent trait is its thick, dark Habano-seed ligero wrapper - a gorgeous leaf grown in the Jamastran Valley of Honduras that's brimming with flavor and giving off an oily, flawless appearance. Below the surface is a robust blend of Cuban-seed ligero long-fillers from the Esteli and Condega paired with additional ligeros from Honduras. It has two binders: a Habano leaf from the Jalapa Valley and a flavorful Costa Rican leaf. From first light to final puff, Cuba Libre One is rich, complex, and balanced. It's powerful but balanced, and layered with notes of coffee, earth, pepper, and cream complemented by a spicy-sweet finish. Strong, delicious, refined. A traditional and Cuban-esque blend with some punch and zest you won't soon forget.​Get this:A deliciously stout, 4.5""x60 vitola was crafted for those seeking the ultimate in full-flavored goodness. It's known as 'The Brute' and it's downright tasty. Layers of deep, concentrated flavor are waiting....while they last!",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Costa Rica, Honduran Habano","Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,Cuba Libre
Cuban Aristocrat Connecticut,Rated 4.7 out of 5, Based on 10 Ratings ,"A Cuban Heritage ClassicIndianHead cigars are back, and they’re here to stay. Jose “Jochy” Blanco is not content to just release new, innovative blends under his name though. He’s also dug through the treasure trove of discontinued brands, and found an absolute gem to revive: Cuban Aristocrat. After debuting in 2007, Cuban Aristocrat has been a hit for over a decade, and gets a new look here to fit into the contemporary market. Available in three wrappers, look to Cuban Aristocrat for a new, surefire go-to blend. The Connecticut wrapper is the smoothest option available in this trio of tasty blends, but that doesn’t mean it’s not full-flavor. A mixture of Dominican binder and Cuban-seed seco, ligero, and viso long-fillers sits under a silky Connecticut wrap, delivering a perfect companion to your morning cup of coffee. In a variety of classic sizes, Cuban Aristocrat is a mellow ride that stays cool down to the nub. Sweet creaminess and classic cedar, tobacco flavors come through in a blend that you don’t want to miss. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,
Cuban Aristocrat Habano,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"Habanos for daysIndianHead cigars are back, and they’re here to stay. Jose “Jochy” Blanco is not content to just release new, innovative blends under his name though. He’s also dug through the treasure trove of discontinued brands, and found an absolute gem to revive: Cuban Aristocrat. After debuting in 2007, Cuban Aristocrat has been a hit for over a decade, and gets a new look here to fit into the contemporary market. Available in three wrappers, look to Cuban Aristocrat for a new, surefire go-to blend. The cigar enthusiasts who love a medium-bodied, balanced blend will find tons of notes to like in the Cuban Aristocrat Habano. Natural tobacco sweetness, chocolatey undertones, and a slight pepper spice comes through the slightly oily Habano wrapper. With a cocktail of Cuban-seed long-fillers that are all hand selected, this is a recipe for success that any boutique enthusiast will enjoy. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Habano,
Cuban Aristocrat Maduro,Rated 4.57 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"A rich, smooth MaduroIndianHead cigars are back, and they’re here to stay. Jose “Jochy” Blanco is not content to just release new, innovative blends under his name though. He’s also dug through the treasure trove of discontinued brands, and found an absolute gem to revive: Cuban Aristocrat. After debuting in 2007, Cuban Aristocrat has been a hit for over a decade, and gets a new look here to fit into the contemporary market. Available in three wrappers, look to Cuban Aristocrat for a new, surefire go-to blend. A slightly oily Maduro wrapper sits atop a bed of Cuban-seed long-fillers and handpicked Dominican binder in this medium to full-bodied boutique gem. And like the best DJs, Cuban Aristocrat Maduro mashes together two hits all cigar lovers can get behind: Cuban tradition, and full-flavored, rich taste. Chocolate, earth, leather, and a nice spiciness make this one great for fans of heartier options. The only thing not bold about this one? The price, which stays real low and mellow. ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Maduro,
Cuban Classics Doble Capa,Rated 3.8 out of 5,,"Not a Cuban, but a classicA blend that was once well known is now back and better than ever. Previously offered in boxes and demanding premium prices, these Cuban Classics disappeared for a while and were nearly forgotten. These new Cuban Classics Doble Capa are almost unrecognizable, offered up in wallet friendly bundles and in an attractive barber pole styled wrapper. The barber pole here utilizes a maduro and natural wrapper expertly to create a unique combo that's easy on the eyes. Inside you’ll find a collection of Nicaraguan tobaccos that will drive your palate wild. You can expect a medium-bodied flavor profile that boasts notes of cocoa, coffee, and cream, with a hint of spice. Hop on this bargain bus and don’t look back.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Maduro, Varied",
Cuban Classics Maduro,Rated 4.38 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"A real ""Cuban Classic""! These fantastic maduros harken back to the golden days of Havana, Cuba, and are crafted with the same meticulous eye on quality control and consistency. With the maduro option, the Cuban Classic line adds an affordable option for those who prefer their cigars a bit richer. You’ll find earth, salty leather, but mostly, a deep cocoa and black pepper note that'll keep the palate entertained right to the end. There may be better maduros out there, but dollar for dollar, Cuban Classic Maduro is a must-try.​",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Robusto,No,Maduro,
Cuban Delights,Rated 4.16 out of 5, Based on 531 Ratings ,"Skyrockets in flight…Cuban Delight!This brand screams value. It’s perfect as an everyday blend, made of high-quality, mixed filler Dominican leaves. Handmade in the Dominican Republic and finished with a Sumatra wrapper, these mellow-bodied gems hit the spot. Cuban Delights offer exquisite sandwich-style cigars that deliver a premium cigar taste but a domestic cigar price and come packed in big-ass boxes of 50. Heck, these tasty morsels start for less than a buck apiece, so what do you have to lose?",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto",Varies,Indonesian,
Cuban Honeys,Rated 4.25 out of 5, Based on 372 Ratings ,"Ultra-premium tobaccos, paired with new mouthwatering flavors. The ultimate assortment of deliciously flavored, handmade cigars has had a complete overhaul. Now hailing from the largest producer of flavored cigars in the world, La Aurora, Cuban Honeys have been reblended and boast new flavors, updated packaging, and that same dessert-like quality…without all the calories. Utilizing all-natural flavors, these tasty, mellow cigars boast Cuban-seed tobaccos from the lushest soils that the Dominican Republic has to offer. Be ready for crowds to congregate once the scent of these affordable sticks hits the air, just make sure to keep a firm grip on these tantalizing treats, or else have plenty of backups.Coffee: Using fresh roasted beans, a truly unique coffee flavor is achieved and lingers on the palate. Mixed with subtle notes of sweetness and a gentle cream nuance, impressive balance lands this variety in regular rotations far and wide.  Southern Gentleman: Made with an intoxicating blend of ground vanilla bean mixed with a combination of tropical fruits. To top off the mix, a dash of Bourbon is added to deliver a truly unique taste of sweet citrus and a bold, aromatic vanilla.Cherry: The fan-favorite of the Cuban Honeys line, Cherry is exactly what you would want and expect. Bold black cherry notes coat the palate as soon as flame hits foot. The further you dive into this flavor bomb, subtle notes of sweet caramel enter the fray with a slight hint of cocoa appearing on the finish.Dr. Kocher: A delicious rendition on an American classic. Who doesn't love the taste of an ice cold soda? Now with the newest addition to the Cuban Honeys lineup, you can have the ice cold soda taste, along with notes of cherries and almonds, only in cigar form. You will quickly notice which soda this gem was modeled after. Don't miss out on this sure bet winner.Drunken Truffle: A delectable dish of hearty coconut extract spliced with whisky, chocolate, Irish cream, and French vanilla. Unfortunately, these fine delicacies won’t get you drunk, but they are damn tasty. Be sure to give these goodies a try.Honey: Naturally flavored with a generous dose of honey. A wonderful balance between slight hints of natural premium tobaccos and enticing notes of sweet honey, this snack is always a welcomed experience. Vanilla: A scrumptious blend of gentle Bourbon and vanilla extract, this combination is commonly known as Beanilla vanilla. This addition produces hearty notes of vanilla accented by lingering hints of caramel, spices, and a slight nuance of citrus. NOTE: Cuban Honeys is undergoing a slight packaging change, but the cigars inside the boxes are exactly the same. Product you receive may vary slightly from product pictured as we move through the ""older"" inventory and into the newest packaging, but either way the cigars are identical. ",Mellow,"['Corona', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto']",,Dominican,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Petite Corona, Robusto",Yes,Sumatra,
Cuban Rounds Connecticut,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 14 Ratings ,"A no-hiba to enjoy everyday.I dare you to find a better value than Cuban Rounds. This affordable blend features a premium Connecticut wrapper and each cigar was bunched and rolled in the traditional Cuban style. With a medium body and flavors you’d normally associate with an offering 5 times the asking price, you’d be hard-pressed to find a better Dominican cigar for your money than Cuban Rounds. ​",Mellow,['Churchill'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Churchill,No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Cuban Rounds Maduro,Rated 4.56 out of 5, Based on 16 Ratings ,"A faux-hiba for everyday pleasure.At first glance, Cuban Rounds may remind you of an ultra-popular cigar from the island south of Miami, but the similarities end with the packaging. Cuban Rounds Maduro is a short filler blend of premium Nicaraguan tobaccos enclosed by a premium Nicaraguan maduro wrapper. This stick is medium-bodied, and the tobaccos are rolled and bunched using Cuban methods for an enjoyable and smooth profile. Cuban Rounds are an always satisfying everyday blend.​",Medium,['Churchill'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Churchill,No,Maduro,
Cuban Rounds Natural,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"The best value going.Cuban Rounds take their design cue from a famous Cuban brand, but a similar design is the only thing they share. Cuban Rounds Natural are a short filler blend featuring a Nicaraguan Colorado wrapper over premium Nicaraguan short-fillers. The blend is spicy and peppery and this handmade is expertly constructed using traditional Cuban methods. Give Cuban Rounds Natural a try for a tasty, affordable, everyday cigar. ​",Medium,['Churchill'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Churchill,No,Habano,
Cuban Twists,Rated 4.69 out of 5, Based on 13 Ratings ,"Do the (Cuban) Twist!IndianHead cigars is one of the best boutique brands on the market today. That term gets thrown around a lot, but seriously, this company is delivering handmade cigars steeped in Cuban tradition that easily please every cigar enthusiast who tries them. And the best part about IndianHead? They deliver a ton of awesome cigars with bucketloads of discounts. Other brands nickel and dime you, but IndianHead cigars deliver pure value. With five different sizes available, these handmades hailing from the Dominican Republic are an absolute treat. With Dominican binder and a tasty Cuban Sandwich blend of Dominican fillers, Cuban Twists feature a toothy San Andres wrapper, which delivers all the flavors you’d be looking for in this type of handmade. Gritty and earthy with mouth-watering chocolate, leather, and peppery notes that’ll make this an awesome cigar to keep on hand. ​",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,San Andres,
Cubero Blend No. 7,Rated 4.16 out of 5, Based on 44 Ratings ,"Great grape!Cubero is an attractive and great-tasting brand of cigarillos crafted with 100% aged tobaccos and a gorgeous natural wrapper leaf. Expect a smooth, mellow experience with plenty of flavor. Blend No. 7 adds in a sweet hint of natural grape flavoring to create a uniquely delicious profile. ",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,,True,No,More Details,Europe,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,Sumatra,
Cubita Nouveau by Quesada,Rated 5 out of 5,,"A time-tested brand gains a new addition With over a century of experience in the cigar industry, the Quesada clan knows their way around tobacco. Manuel “Manolo” Quesada was brought up in this lifestyle, and for him, blending is in his blood. Right out of high school, Manuel went to work for his father’s tobacco brokerage in the Dominican Republic. He had the tough task of burning different premium tobaccos in order to better describe the taste to their clients - this is also where he acquired his passion to blend the best cigars around. Nowadays, with 90+ rated blends boasting the Quesada name, Manuel has become one of the top manufactures in the biz. His newest addition is the Cubita Nouveau, big flavor with a value price tag.The Cubita line has been around for about twenty years, loyal consumers are finally being rewarded with this long-awaited new extension to the line. Nouveau utilizes premium Dominican tobaccos in its every aspect, wrapper, binder, and filler. This medium-bodied Dominican puro was crafted with an everyday price in mind. At less than five bucks per stick, Manuel wanted a blend for the masses with a great taste that customers can afford to enjoy daily. With bold flavor and a cool, slow burn, Nouveau is the perfect option to fill up a nice chunk of the humidor.​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto",No,Dominican,
Cuesta-Rey Cabinet,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"A kingly treat.Way back yonder in 1884, a young Spanish immigrant opened a small cigar factory that blossomed into the birth of the Cuesta-Rey brand. In modern times, Cuesta-Rey premium handmades are all constructed at Tabacalera A. Fuente in the Dominican Republic, and they still retain the same dedication to quality, consistency, and excellence that was started so many years ago. Cuesta-Rey Cabinet Collection features a blend of well-aged Dominican long-fillers that are laid to rest in aromatic, cedar-lined cabinets to really allow the flavor notes to mature. The Cabinet Collection comes in your choice of African Cameroon, Connecticut Shade or Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper, and each option offers a distinctive, refined experience. Notes of coffee and spice are present in force, but the cigar still manages to remain smooth and balanced from start to finish.",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Corona']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona",No,"Cameroon, Connecticut",
Cuesta-Rey Centenario,Rated 4.72 out of 5, Based on 18 Ratings ,"Heavy is the head that wears the crown.There aren’t too many cigars that can lay claim to being the official cigar of King Alfonso XIII of Spain. With origins dating back to 1884 when a young Spaniard opted to open a humble cigar factory, this legendary brand boasts quality construction and superior craftsmanship. Fast forward to today, and the same still holds true as each cigar is rolled at Tabacalera A. Fuente in the Dominican.Cuesta-Rey Centenario is super smooth, super creamy, and mellow to medium-bodied. It comes in two equally impressive formats: A Connecticut-shade natural or Connecticut Broadleaf maduro wrapper. Each is filled to the brim with well-aged, top-notch Dominican long-fillers that have been resting an average of five years inside a cedar-lined humidor for maximum flavor. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Cigarillos, Corona, Pyramid, Robusto, Toro",No,"Connecticut, Maduro",
Cuesta-Rey Centro Fino,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"Fit for a king.You know if King Alfonso XIII of Spain chose Cuesta-Rey as his official cigar, then it just has to be good. Those blue-blood types don’t mess around. Known for excellent quality, fine taste, and exquisite craftsmanship, these luxury cigars were the brand of choice for no less than a king. A glowing recommendation for a brand that’s well worth the hype.Cuesta-Rey Centro Fino features a hearty blend of five-year-aged Dominican ligero long-fillers. A flavorful and rich Sumatra-seed Sungrown wrapper is cultivated on the Oliva family farm in the highly fertile Quevedo region of Ecuador. Each leaf is hand-selected from the “Centro Fino,” (fine center) of the plant. Medium to full in body, Cuesta-Rey cigars are then patiently aged in Spanish cedar-lined cabinets, which bring out even more pronounced flavors. Rich, bold, and evenly constructed, it’s simple to see why good old King Alfie loved ‘em so much.",Medium-Full,"['Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Pyramid, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Sungrown,
Cult,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"It’s safe to drink this Kool-Aid.Enter the new boutique creation - Cult. Hey, I know what you're thinkin', meetings in the woods, weird rituals, dark cloaks, alien abductions, that sort of thing. But luckily, Cult cigars have nothing to do with any of that hoopla. Cult is carefully handcrafted in Esteli, Nicaragua, at the revered TACASA factory. This is a small boutique factory, known for producing top-notch handmades. As weird as Cult might sound, I assure you it's as legit as they come. From the very first puff, Cult is different, and that's a good thing. Initial notes reveal a pleasant tea-like flavor, complemented by a gentle note of spice. As the burn progresses, notes of tobacco, leather, and cream enter the fray with a tick of sweetness on the finish. Each Cult produces thick velvety smoke, that is medium in body, and occasionally touches on medium to full. Due to its well-balanced blend, Cult is never overpowering, or unbalanced, and provides smooth soft flavors you can enjoy any time of day. Each Cult is packed with Nicaraguan long-fillers, and is hugged by a feisty Indonesian binder. The real icing on the cake is the velvety Ecuador Habano wrapper draped over the outside. Smooth and soft to the touch, each Cult looks and feels inviting, and is attractively packaged in eye-catching boxes. I’ll admit, I was a bit skeptical of Cult at first, but once you try one, you’ll become a believer too. Talk about attention to detail, this box is simply stunning! Each Cult comes perfectly packed in a gorgeous chest-style black box, complete with metal corner guards and accents, before being finished off in grand fashion with a Cult inscribed plate. Heck - even the hinges and clasp are well-done. This is one box worthy of collecting.",Medium,['Torpedo'],,"Indonesian, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Torpedo,No,Ecuador Habano,
Curivari Buena Ventura,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"This one's full of good luck.Welcome one of the hottest boutique brands on the market today, Curivari. Based out of Nicaragua, the Curivari team has put an emphasis on delivering cigars that boast a truly Cuban-esque profile, keeping the quality control as strictly scrutinized as any of the top factories in the biz if not more so. Every cigar to come out of the Curivari camp is expertly rolled with top-notch construction and finished with a beautiful, Cuban-inspired triple cap. The Curivari Buena Ventura is a medium-bodied pleasure that is quickly reserving permanent residence in humidors world-over.Literally meaning ‘good luck’ Buena Ventura boasts a truly old-world Cuban cigar look. A modest band sits atop a classic blend that is quickly gaining fans left and right. A milk-chocolate Nicaraguan wrapper encases vintage long-fillers from the black volcanic Nicaraguan soils to give this puro a distinct character all its own. Pronounced notes of cedar, pepper, and nougat all make appearances with a subtle undertone of sweet spice showing face on the finish. Jump on this gravy train early, you’ll thank me after.Curivari Buenaventura received a well-deserved 94-rating noting: ""The pressed cigar delivered a medium-bodied flavor profile with a decidedly creamy texture to the smoke, notes of roasted peanuts and a flavorful finish smacking of graham crackers.""",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Rothschild']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Rothschild",No,Nicaraguan,
Curivari Gloria de Leon,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"She make me feel so good, she make me feel all right, and her name is G-l-o-r-i-a.                                                         Curivari doesn’t have the name recognition as some other boutique brands, but that’s a result of being entirely focused on delivering cigars that are simply beyond compare. Construction, flavor, appearance, and price, Curivari Gloria de Leon is hitting all the right notes.A Nicaraguan puro, like the rest of their line, the Gloria de Leon is a premium, small-batch, medium to full-bodied cigar constructed of authentic Cuban seed Corojo and Criollo tobaccos. This cigar is visually striking and is reminiscent of the cigars coming out of Cuba during the golden years. The flavor profile is rich and loaded with notes of spice, cream, black cherry, coffee, and cocoa. This is cigar blending as an art form and at CI’s competition crushing prices, the Gloria de Leon is available for a song.​",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Nicaraguan,
Curivari Reserva Limitada 1000 Series,Rated 4.78 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"Curivari kicks it up.Curivari cigars are super premium, ultra-boutique and accessible for an everyday Joe like me. The cigars coming from this mostly unknown company are among the very best cigars being manufactured anywhere.The Curivari Limitada Café 1000 Series is a full-bodied addition to the Reserva Limitada Café line. The cigar is painstakingly constructed using authentic Cuban seed Nicaraguan Corojo and Criollo tobaccos yielding a dynamic full-bodied profile with flavors of nuts, spice, pepper, berries, and coffee. If you like a well-balanced, full-bodied cigar with impeccable construction, give the Curivari Reserva Limitada Café 1000 Series a try. You can thank me later.​",Medium-Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Nicaraguan,
Curivari Reserva Limitada Cafe,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Ssshhh, I’m gonna let you in on a secret…but this stays between us.  One word: Curivari.  Hailing from Nicaragua, Curivari puts an emphasis crafting cigars using traditional methods and focusing on flavor and balance over strength. The results are overwhelmingly positive as these small-batch Nicaraguan puros deliver a Cuban-esque profile that’ll make you think you were burning something fresh off “the island.”Curivari Reserva Limitada Café is medium to full-bodied and consists of authentic Cuban seed Corojo and Criollo tobaccos. This cigar incredibly balances rich flavors of cocoa, coffee, ginger, cream, and red pepper and is flawlessly constructed to boot.  Pick up a box today, but remember, do it on the down low…I know where you live.​",Medium-Full,['Petite Corona'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Petite Corona,No,Nicaraguan,
Curivari Reserva Limitada Cafe Noir,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"A darker variety for Cafe fans.Curivari Reserva Limitada Café Noir, a shining example of cigar blending as an art form.  The Curivari team’s quality control standards are as rigorous as any big name factory in the industry...probably more so. Each cigar coming out of the factory has been meticulously crafted to be reminiscent in look and taste to the finest Cuban cigars.Curivari Reserva Limitada Café Noir is the maduro option for fans of the Reserva Limitada Café. The cigar is visually striking with the wrapper being dark brown with a reddish hue.  The Curivari Reserva Limitada Café Noir is a made with 100% authentic Cuban seed Nicaraguan Criollo and Corojo tobaccos delivering a rich, Cuban cigar experience. Expect perfect construction with a medium to full body, and flavor notes of fudge, spice, vanilla, nuts, and earth. This cigar absolutely packs in the flavor and will quickly become a mainstay blend for the aficionado. Don’t delay and grab a few boxes before they’re gone.  Curivari Reserva Limitada Cafe Noir received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""This dark and semi-pressed cigar draws well, producing peppery smoke laden with an underlying woodiness. It warms to show a rich, chocolate character.""​",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto",No,Nicaraguan,
Curivari Reserva Limitada Classica,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"A classic blend from Curivari.Welcome one of the hottest boutique brands on the market today, Curivari. Based out of Nicaragua, the Curivari team has put an emphasis on delivering cigars that boast a truly Cuban-esque profile, keeping the quality control as strictly scrutinized as any of the top factories in the biz if not more so. Every cigar to come out of the Curivari camp is expertly rolled with top-notch construction and finished with a beautiful, Cuban-inspired triple cap. Curivari Reserva Limitada Classica is the perfect cigar to become acquainted with all that Curivari has to offer.Weighing in with a potency level just above medium, Reserva Limitada Classica hits all the right notes. Jam-packed with Nicaraguan Criollo and Corojo long-fillers held snugly in place by a Nicaraguan binder lying just beneath a dark, Nicaraguan wrapper leaf, this offering has a delectably Cuban-esque look. An array of spices are evident with undertones of coffee and leather appearing on the back of the palate. Excellent when enjoyed with a dark stout or a dry red wine, Reserva Limitada Classica continues to impress with every go ‘round. ​",Medium-Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Nicaraguan,
Cusano 18 Natural and Maduro,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"Back to basicsDavidoff made, CI Nation approved-these beauties are top of the line premiums at ridiculously low prices. Where else are you going to find a deal this outrageous on premiums this good? For starters, the tobaccos in both blends are 18 years old -- yes, you heard me - 18 years old! Oh, and did I mention they were made by Davidoff?Let’s start with Cusano 18 Connecticut, shall we? Creamy and oozing with delicious flavor - this ‘90’ rated beauty sports a ridiculously rich Connecticut shade wrapper with 18-year-old Ligero Piloto and San Vicent Olor leaves at the core. Great construction leads to an unbeatable burn, and the combination of tobaccos give this beauty notes of cedar, leather, and some cream at the finish.  Cusano 18 Maduro is unique to say the least - it uses two maduro wrappers, a Connecticut Broadleaf on the surface and a Brazilian Mata Fina in the filler. This combination leads to a rich, spicy, and silky smooth flavor. This medium-bodied beauty is exactly what you would expect from a cigar this unique.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Connecticut, Connecticut Broadleaf",
Cusano Connecticut,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 17 Ratings ,"Mellow body, affordable priceLook, I like to be a baller, a shot caller, but Benjamins don’t fall from the sky in these parts. That’s where Cusano Connecticut comes into play – a premium cigar from a legit manufacturer for $4 to $5 a stick – they had me at hello. Sure you can drop a sawbuck on a similar cigar, but I know you’ll be back, hat in hand, for a go ‘round with Cusano Connecticut. Crafted in the Dominican Republic, Cusano Connecticut features an Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper and binder over a top-grade selection of Dominican long-fillers. Nice and smooth, this mellow blend delivers sheer enjoyment with a relaxing and pleasant flavor profile. Expect to be met with hints of white pepper, spice, coffee, and cream with some cedar notes present. If you’ve been searching for an affordable and appetizing premium cigar – one to enjoy yourself or share with your buds – then you can’t go wrong with Cusano Connecticut.​",Mellow-Medium,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,
Cusano Maduro,Rated 3.96 out of 5, Based on 45 Ratings ,"A no nonsense premium blend My squirrely aunt Shirley had this to say about fancy restaurants, "" You can’t eat the chandeliers."" And the same holds true with cigars. Sure, fancy bands and extravagant boxes look purty, but you can’t taste the packaging. Cusano, responsible for the 90-rated Cusano 18 Corojo, set out to craft an affordable premium cigar without the frills and they’ve succeeded in spades with Cusano Maduro. So what happens when you drop all the distracting bells and whistles? You get quality tobacco, and consistent flavor. Cusano Maduro is dressed in a dark and oily San Andrés Maduro wrapper atop a blend of Dominican long-fillers enclosed with an Ecuadorian Connecticut binder. Medium-bodied, this blend delivers the goods with notes of coffee, wood, spice, and earth with an enjoyable sweetness present throughout. Cusano Maduro is balanced with a smooth, round profile and is enjoyable for grizzled cigar vets and newbs alike. Ditch the excess and try the affordable, premium Cusano Maduro today. ​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Maduro,
Cusano N1 Nicaragua,Rated 3.72 out of 5, Based on 71 Ratings ,"A medium-bodied bargain.Crafted in the Dominican Republic under the watchful eyes of Hendrik Kelner, mastermind behind countless Davidoff and AVO hit blends, Cusano N1 Nicaragua is easily one of the best cigars you can snag for the money. Originally released in the late ‘90s this reliable stand-by continues to please over a decade later. Spun carefully around a Sumatra binder and filler blend from the Dominican and Nicaragua is a polished Sumatra wrapper leaf. An uber-flavorful Dominican offering, N1 Nicaragua reveals evolving nuances of spice, nutmeg, and oak. Add in spot-on construction and a price point that’s well-under 2 bucks apiece, and you’ve got yourself a winner winner chicken dinner. ​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",Sumatra,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto",No,Sumatra,
Cusano Nicaragua,Rated 4.36 out of 5, Based on 42 Ratings ,"Complete the TrinityEvery once in a while, I want the fanciest of the fanciest, the best of the best. The top of the top-hats. But, most times, when I’m knocking around with a cigar, I’m just looking for something that burns well, tastes good, and doesn’t burn my entire paycheck. Enter Cusano. Responsible for the 90-rated Cusano 18 Corojo, Cusano boxes are an affordable, no-frills option for the cigar enthusiast who craves premium flavor, but cringes at premium price tags. Cusano Nicaragua has no fancy packaging. It has no fancy story behind it. But it does have a red-hued Sumatra wrapper, and tasty Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers. Medium to full-bodied, each Cusano Nicaragua will greet you warmly cedar, slight peppery spice, and a warm toastiness that’s balanced, bright, and a fantastic way to unwind after a long day. Cusano Nicaragua is a true cigar enthusiast’s cigar, showing that it’s the tobacco, and not the packaging, that makes the cigar. Give it a shot, and you won’t regret it. ​",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,San Andres,
Cusano P1 Maduro,Rated 3.29 out of 5, Based on 31 Ratings ,"Flavor-packed, prices hacked!Crafted in the Dominican Republic under the watchful eyes of Hendrik Kelner, mastermind behind countless Davidoff and AVO hit blends, Cusano P1 Maduro is easily one of the best cigars you can snag for the money. Originally released in the late ‘90s this reliable stand-by continues to please over a decade later.Spun carefully around the Connecticut shade binder and Dominican fillers is a rich, oily Mexican maduro wrapper leaf. A uncharacteristically bold Dominican offering, P1 Maduro reveals hearty notes of leather, white pepper, and sweet spice. Add in spot-on construction and a price point that’s well-under 2 bucks apiece, and you’ve got yourself a winner winner chicken dinner. ​",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo']",Connecticut,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo",No,Maduro,
Daniel Marshall Gold Torpedo 2012,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"You’ve got a golden ticket!Ok, simply put....this cigar ain't cheap. Why’s that, you say? Because Daniel Marshall DM2 Gold Torpedos come wrapped in up to 25 individual 24 karat gold leaves from Italy’s premier gold supplier. No kidding. It's physically encased in a layer of GOLD!Daniel Marshall cigars are coveted by everyone, from A-list celebrities to sports stars to just regular old connoisseurs of the leaf. Originally made famous by his ridiculously high-end humidors, Mr. Marshall branched out into the world of premium cigars and teamed up with Manuel Quesada and the Plasencia factory to create this masterpiece. Besides just being eye-catching, this handmade boasts real substance, including a 5-year-aged Nicaraguan Habano wrapper and a well-chosen mix of Nicaraguan long-leaf filler from Jalapa. It comes in a 6.2”x54 figurado shape, and oh yeah, there’s that gold you get to burn. Since gold combusts at higher temperature than tobacco leaves, you don’t have to worry for one second about lighting it up. Plus, you can even keep the gold ash when you’re finished and show it off to your friends. It’s better than a trip to the chocolate factory, and that’s saying a lot.",Medium-Full,['Torpedo'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Torpedo,No,Habano,Daniel Marshall
Daniel Marshall Red Label,Rated 5 out of 5,,"You probably recognize the name Daniel Marshall. Yes, it’s the same guy responsible for high-end humidors that grace the homes of movie stars and former U.S. presidents, like Sylvester Stallone, Arnold Schwarzenegger, Al Pacino, and Brad Pitt, to name drop a few. Now, he’s moving on to the next logical arena...cigars. And after teaming up with Manuel Quesada, maker of the 93-rated Casa Magna, I'd put money on his cigars catching on real quick like.Daniel Marshall Red Label is a Nicaraguan super-premium that lives up to the hype. Dressed in a 5-year-old Nicaraguan Habano wrapper, Red Label also features a Nicaraguan binder and a bold blend of Nicaraguan long-fillers from Jalapa and Esteli. The earthy core is punctuated by notes of sweetness, and offers up hints of espresso and cocoa. Balanced, smooth, and well-aged, this handmade checks all the boxes, crosses all the T’s, and dots all the I’s. The Daniel Marshall Red Label received a 92-point rating by Cigar Aficionado, noting: ""Crafted with symmetric shoulders, this Churchill burns evenly, delivering a smoke that is rich and woody with a solid core of earth and a touch of semisweet chocolate.""",Medium-Full,"['Lancero/Panatela', 'Petite Corona']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Lancero/Panatela, Petite Corona",No,Habano,Daniel Marshall
Dark Shark,Rated 4.35 out of 5, Based on 631 Ratings ,"The Shark is back!This top-selling handmade ain’t the prettiest girl at the prom but it may be the least worst option in this price range - especially if you like maduros. That’s ’cause this medium number really ain’t half bad. Crafted with a dark Broadleaf maduro wrapper and an all long-filler blend of Cuban-seed tobaccos, Dark Shark is indeed a lot more premium than it appears at a glance. And that’s probably why I’ve had such a damn hard time keeping these things in stock. Expect rich, mellow maduro flavor for as low as $29.99 per mazo of 20. I’m done with the sales pitch....Dark Shark sells itself. Buy it or don’t - doesn’t matter to me - I’ve got a long list of guys waiting for their usual 5-10 mazos per month.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,
Davidoff 702 Series,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Classic blends, Modern twistThe Davidoff name is iconic in the industry. At this point, no one can deny that. Known for their mellow, Dominican handmades, Davidoff has been on the top-shelf of cigar enthusiasts’ humidors for years and years. Now, Davidoff offers you the chance to revisit some of your favorite cigars with a small… update. The Davidoff 702 Series cigars consist of Davidoff’s best-selling blends, each with a 702 Ecuadorian wrapper on top. As for the 702 wrapper itself, it’s a leaf you’ll find nowhere else in the world. A hybrid-seed of three different strands of Cuban tobacco, 702 is grown in Ecuador and then expertly applied to each of these seven gems. Still as smooth as ever, you’ll find something new to love about each of these cigars in this amazing collection. All your favorite Davidoff releases — they’re all here and they’re all delicious.",Medium,"['Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Double Corona, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Habano,Davidoff
Davidoff Aniversario Series,Rated 4.86 out of 5, Based on 14 Ratings ,"Celebrate today!Davidoff Anviersario series is a cigar crafted to celebrate the finer moments in life. Whether that’s the birth of a new child, a promotion at work, or just taking some time out to reflect on the day, the Aniversario Series is a great companion. To ensure utter perfection, this blend is only crafted by the factory’s highest graded rollers, ensuring a perfect draw and burn on each and every cigar.Each Davidoff Aniversario begins with a blend of 4-year-aged tobaccos, hand-selected by Davidoff’s experts in the Dominican Republic. From there, the tobaccos are rolled using the most authentic, traditional methods in the industry, before they are set down to age. Finally, when they’ve passed the last quality control station, these cigars are sent to our warehouse where they’re waiting for you — Aniversario promises signature smoothness, ample flavor, and exquisite balance. And believe me, it delivers. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Perfecto, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Davidoff
Davidoff Cigarillos,Rated 4.59 out of 5, Based on 83 Ratings ,"Oh my!Davidoff has done it again with their handmade premiums. They've packed a lot a' luxury into a mini cigarillo. A perfect size cigar for when you're crunched for time but still want to enjoy the mellow goodness of Davidoff cigars. Extremely well constructed from all-Dominican filler tobaccos and luxurious wrappers, these little suckers are nice, medium-bodied, creamy short cigarillos. Davidoff Cigarillos are the on-the-go option with the same sophistication you know and love from the Davidoff brand. Experience 15 minutes of pure luxury.",,['Cigarillos'],"Brazil, Sumatra","Brazilian, Dominican, Indonesian, Nicaraguan, Varied",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,Cigarillos,Varies,"Ecuador Habano, Habano, Sumatra",Davidoff
Davidoff Escurio,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 43 Ratings ,"When the invitation says to bring your significant otherDavidoff cigars are known all over the world for their immaculate construction, their exquisite blending of the finest tobaccos, and being exclusive and hard-to-find. Davidoff Escurio is the follow-up to the highly rated Davidoff Nicaragua cigar, and is handcrafted at the company’s factory in Santiago, Dominican Republic. As with Davidoff Nicaragua, blending of this cigar was guided by Henke Kelner and Eladio Diaz, and this blend was created to be spicy-sweet.The Davidoff Escurio is draped with an oily and dark Ecuador Habano wrapper with a Brazilian cubra binder and Brazilian cubra, Brazilian mata fina, Dominican San Vicente, piloto, and olor/piloto secos long-fillers. Expect a well-constructed, slow-burning, medium bodied cigar with plenty of complexity. Your palate will dance a lively Samba with rhythmic notes including leather, cream, cinnamon, and nutmeg. Embrace the joy and vibrancy of Brazil and order Davidoff Escurio while they’re in stock. ​",Medium-Full,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Short Robusto']",Brazil,"Brazilian, Dominican",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Cigarillos, Corona, Gordo, Perfecto, Robusto, Short Robusto",No,Ecuador Habano,Davidoff
Davidoff Grand Cru,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Time for a Grand celebration! Davidoff cigars have been some of the best in the business since 1946. No exaggeration. Grand Cru celebrates the heritage of this highly prestigious line, honoring the original blends and sizes made by Zino Davidoff. Decades later, Grand Cru still stands up, offering a mellow to medium-bodied profile that any cigar enthusiast can enjoy. Grand Cru is a cigar that immediately impresses. Gazing upon this fine specimen, you’ll note the seamless, smooth Ecuadorian-grown Connecticut wrapper leaf, and the timeless Davidoff artwork. Most importantly, lighting it up, you’ll find a bouquet of complexity that only Davidoff can provide. Buttery and nutty in the beginning, Grand Cru develops subtle spice, cedar, and that signature Davidoff “grassiness” as it burns. Check out Davidoff Grand Cru today — you won’t be disappointed. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Corona', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Davidoff
Davidoff Maduro Series,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Davidoff Goes DarkHandcrafted in the Dominican Republic, Davidoff cigars are high in price and high in quality. Each one looks stunning and burns like a dream. Seamless wrappers, perfect burn, easy draw, relentless consistency, balanced flavor....time and again. Rolled by a select few and blended to perfection, all Davidoff cigars feature 4 year aged, hand-selected Dominican fillers. Davidoff’s Maduro Series features a dark Nicaraguan Habano Maduro wrapper and offers a rich, full-flavored maduro taste backed by Davidoff's signature smoothness and quality. If you're looking for a richer blend from the Davidoff line, look no further.",Medium-Full,['Toro'],,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,Habano Maduro,
Davidoff Millennium Blend,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 12 Ratings ,"A cigar for millenials? Handcrafted in the Dominican Republic, Davidoff cigars are high in price and high in quality. Each one looks stunning and burns like a dream. Seamless wrappers, perfect burn, easy draw, relentless consistency, balanced flavor….time and again. Rolled by a select few and blended to perfection, all Davidoff cigars feature 4 year aged, hand-selected Dominican fillers.Davidoff's Millenium Blend is typically regarded as their best cigar. Featuring an Ecuadorian Sun Grown wrapper, Millenium Blend releases a full-flavored, full-bodied blend that's rich and satisfying.Davidoff Millennium Blend has received numerous 90+ ratings, including a 94-rating stating: ""This cigar has good color and texture. The smoke is tremendously rich, with black cherry notes and an earthy complexity. The finish is warm and toasty."" ",Full,"['Petite Corona', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Petite Corona, Pyramid, Robusto, Short Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Sungrown,Davidoff
Davidoff Nicaragua,Rated 4.79 out of 5, Based on 71 Ratings ,"This Nicaraguan puro proves that Davidoff is still at the top of the heap.Enter Davidoff Nicaragua, a unique blend that utilizes all Nicaraguan tobaccos - a first for the legendary brand - for a flavor that defies explanation....in a good way. Enjoy their first foray into previously unexplored territory and appreciate this fine quality handmade that features all the attention to detail you've come to expect from a name like Davidoff.The cigar starts on a high note, with a flawless 10-year-aged Cuban-seed Nicaraguan Rosado wrapper. This vintage leaf is spun lovingly around a blend of long-filler tobaccos hailing from Nicaragua's premier growing regions of Esteli, Condega, and Ometepe. This complex core is then concealed by a rich Jalapa binder, kicking the level of complexity up another notch. Thick, billowing clouds of smoke greet the senses as this slow-burning cigar delivers all the way down to the nub. The best of what Nicaragua has to offer went into this one. And with a name like Davidoff behind it, it should come as no surprise. Great news! Davidoff Nicaragua earned an impressive 95-rating and the #3 spot of 2013's 'Best Cigars,' noting: ""The Toro was our favorite, showing complexity, elegance and balance, with floral notes, hints of coffee and leather and a very long finish. This is a beautiful, elegant smoke that's a worthy addition to the storied Davidoff name.'",Full,"['Corona', 'Robusto', 'Salomon', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Corona, Robusto, Salomon, Toro",No,Nicaraguan,Davidoff
Davidoff Primeros,Rated 4.93 out of 5, Based on 29 Ratings ,"Big flavor in a small package.Davidoff Primeros offer a perfect option for enjoying top of the line handmades when you’re stretched for time. Davidoff has been known for crafting one premium after another, and this addition is no different. Utilizing grade-A leaves of four different varieties, Davidoff Primeros run the gamut on flavor and strength.If you haven’t already tried a Davidoff, here is the perfect opportunity to give every variety a whirl and pinpoint the blend that grabs your attention.",,['Cigarillos'],"Brazil, Dominican","Brazilian, Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Cigarillos,No,"Ecuador Connecticut, Ecuador Habano, Habano, Maduro",Davidoff
Davidoff Real Especiales <<7>> Robusto,Rated 5 out of 5,,"A new limited edition by the number one name in luxury cigars, bar none.If you’ve been around cigars for a while, there’s a chance you recognize this name. The Davidoff Real Especiales <<7>> was originally released in 2004, and used a blend of tobacco that closely resembled the famous Millennium series. The <<7>> was meant to designate the fact that the cigar used 7 different tobaccos, being 5 fillers, a binder and a wrapper. The release was an instant success, and aficionados the world over mourned its passing deeply. But now it’s time to make some room in your humidor, because the Real Especiales <<7>> has made its triumphant return. This iteration of the <<7>> still uses 7 different tobaccos, the same found in the Millennium series that inspired the original. Olor and Piloto Seco, Piloto and San Vicente Viso, and San Vicente Ligero make up the filler, Dominican Olor is used for the binder, and the wrapper is from Ecuador, making this a true feat of cigar blending excellence and expertise. The flavors are replete with cedar, walnuts, citrus, and spice, and the complexity makes sure that you’ll stay interested until your fingers are burning. Production is limited to 4000 boxes of 10, so act fast and experience one of the best cigars you’ll ever try.The Davidoff Real Especiales <<7>> received an incredible 99-point rating from Halfwheel, noting: “The Davidoff Especiales <<7>>, as evidenced by the score, is the greatest cigar I’ve ever smoked from a technical standpoint. The flavors—mouth, retrohale, finish—were simply outstanding. And the construction was equally impressive, burning with a near perfect burn line for over 90 percent of the cigar.”",,['Robusto'],Dominican,Dominican,False,,More Details,Dominican Republic,False,,Robusto,False,Ecuador Habano,
Davidoff Royal,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Royally delicious.
Possibly the most exclusive and elusive offering in the cigar industry and certainly the most sought after in Davidoff of Geneva’s illustrious portfolio, Davidoff Royal is truly something special. Packed to the gills with complexity and captivating flavors, this gem will take you on a medium to full-bodied journey in one of the most refined blends to ever be concocted.
Gracing the top of this beauty is an extensively-aged, silky-smooth Ecuadorian wrapper leaf. Beneath, a bevy of carefully selected vintage Dominican long-fillers meld beautifully together. Extremely rich, and well-balance, Davidoff Royal delivers in spades with succulent notes of fresh cedar, sweet honey, citrus, and earth. With extremely limited quantities, this is a blend for the ages that you won’t want to miss out on.​",Medium-Full,"['Robusto', 'Salomon']",,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Robusto, Salomon",No,Dominican,Davidoff
Davidoff Signature Series,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"Sign here to enjoyIf you’re looking for one of the smoothest, most celebrated cigars the world over, I’ve got great news — you’re in the right place. Davidoff Signature Series has been a staple in the humidors of discerning cigar enthusiasts for years, and if you haven’t tried one yet, you’re in for a real treat. Utilizing only the finest, perfectly-aged tobaccos, Davidoff Signature is consistently delicious. Available in a wide variety of sizes, there’s bound to be a Davidoff Signature that fits your preferences. These cigars are handmade in the Dominican Republic, featuring an Ecuador Connecticut wrapper leaf over Dominican binders and long-fillers. Each cigar delivers a smooth profile of natural tobacco and cream, with a clean and elegant finish. A must-have for your top-shelf, pick up a few Davidoff Signatures today. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Cigarillos, Corona, Lancero/Panatela, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,"Ecuador Connecticut, Ecuador Sungrown",Davidoff
Davidoff Small Batch No. 1,Rated 4.44 out of 5,,"Davidoff raises the bar.Though many have tried, no one is Davidoff but Davidoff. Their worldwide reputation for producing the finest & most beautifully made cigars money can be buy can't be matched,and now with the release of the Small Batch Series, they've outdone even themselves. Consisting of a total of nine releases, each Davidoff Small Batch highlights a different blend of rare & exotic tobacco carefully sourced by master tobacconists. The quantities of each line will be extremely limited, and truly represent the exclusivity and luxury of this wonderful brand. The first release in the Small Batch Series is aptly named the Davidoff Small Batch No. 1. Weighing in at a satisfying 5.5"" x 52, the No. 1 wears a luscious Ecuadorian wrapper, over a Dominican binder and fillers sourced from Honduras and the Dominican Republic. From the first draw to the last, your palate will be enveloped in exquisite cocoa, coffee, cedar, and leather notes, in perfect balance with a touch of spice and a smooth, sweet finish. With a run of just 7100 cigars, you'll want to secure one for yourself before they're all gone. ",Medium-Full,['Robusto Extra'],Dominican,"Dominican, Honduran",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Robusto Extra,No,Ecuador Habano,Davidoff
Davidoff Winston Churchill,Rated 4.69 out of 5, Based on 45 Ratings ,"“However beautiful the strategy, you should occasionally look at the results.” – Winston ChurchillThis wise quote by the former Prime Minister of England, and the namesake of the ‘Churchill’ cigar size, holds true today…especially in the realm of cigars. Davidoff implements this philosophy daily, and the proof is in the pudding. With their newest release, made in honor of Winston Churchill...and fittingly dubbed as such, the results are nothing short of extraordinary.Dressed in an attractive Ecuadorian Habano leaf, just above, a band is boldly displayed with Winston Churchill’s profile front and center. Its core is comprised of an impressive five different long-fillers, three hailing from the Dominican and two from Nicaragua, all of which are hugged by a sturdy Mexican binder. Medium-bodied, Winston Churchill delivers in flavor, featuring pronounced notes of cedar, dried fruit, and earthy nuances. Flavor-filled with ample complexity, this cigar fits the bill on all levels.Davidoff Winston Churchill received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""This attractive Churchill has a lush, open draw that strikes an easygoing balance between peppery, woody notes and sweet, floral intonations.""​",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Mexican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Lancero/Panatela, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Davidoff
Davidoff Winston Churchill The Late Hour,Rated 4.88 out of 5, Based on 16 Ratings ,"Burning the cigar at both ends? Perhaps no historical figure is more iconic in the cigar world than the great Winston Churchill. He’s already got a size named after him (Churchill liked his large cigars, as you may have guessed). And a few years ago, Davidoff honored the man with a 90-rated medium-bodied gem of a blend. Now, Davidoff turns their attention to Churchill’s other side — the man who stayed up late, strategizing, obsessing, and perfecting. Davidoff Winston Churchill The Late Hour is a blend recognizing the honorary Sir Winston Churchill in the late hours of the night. This is where he found is inspiration. When the street lights dimmed, his creativity sparked. Davidoff celebrates this character with tobacco that is aged in Scotch single malt whiskey casks to bring out a unique complexity and a depth of balanced flavors. Throughout you'll experience varying layers of black pepper, dark coffee, sweetness, leather, wood and spiciness.  ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Mexican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,"Ecuador Habano, Oscuro",Davidoff
Davidoff Yamasa,Rated 4.71 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"Yamasay yamasa yamasuma!Contrary to popular belief, the newest Davidoff did not get its name from the incoherent mumblings of the late, great Michael Jackson. Instead, the latest hit to come out of the Davdioff camp calls on select tobaccos grown in Yamasa, Dominican Republic – a region with a reputation for being difficult to grow in. Davidoff’s newest release, fittingly dubbed Yamasa, demanded that years of industry know-how be put to the test. Yamasa showcases a gorgeous, milk chocolaty wrapper leaf grown in this challenging region that took a team of scientists to perfect…and it’s evident in its seamless appearance. Also featuring a binder from San Vicente, DR and aged long-fillers from Nicaragua, Yamasa excels with hints of sweetness, leather, and rich spices. ​Great news! In early 2017, Davidoff Yamasa received a well-deserved 90-rating. The review stated, ""Wearing a dark and alluring wrapper, this torpedo burns evenly. Earthy, woody impressions are balanced by a toasty quality and cocoa powder sweetness.""",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Pyramid, Robusto, Toro",No,Dominican,Davidoff
Davidoff Year of the Rat,Rated 4.44 out of 5,,"The Year of the Rat is upon us.Every year for the past 8 years, Davidoff has released an extra-special, highly limited cigar inspired by the Chinese Zodiak Calendar. 2020 is the Year of the Rat, and the exquisite cigars bearing the same name are available and ready to ship so you can ring in the new year right!This yea'rs release features an Ecuador Habano wrapper, and a meticulously hand-selected filler blend of Nicaraguan and Dominican tobaccos. The flavor is complex and weighs in at a perfect medium body, with distinctive and perfectly balanced notes of roasted nuts, dried fruit, espresso, spice, and cedar. Davidoff Cigars never cease to impress, and the Zodiak series takes their reputation of masterful cigar production to new heights. Grab a box today, and join the ranks of connoisseurs celebrating the new year properly. ",Medium,['Toro'],Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,Ecuador Habano,
De Nobili by Avanti,Rated 4.53 out of 5, Based on 43 Ratings ,"An American classic.Made right here in the greatest country on earth (America, son!), De Nobili cigars are made using 100% Kentucky and Tennessee Dark Fired tobaccos. These tobaccos strike up a bold character brimming with hickory and earthy-sweetness, along with a distinct and memorable aroma. De Nobili cigars have been a favorite for decades. And thanks to sticking to the same time-tested formula, that's not gonna' change any time soon. Like the old adage goes, if it ain't broke don't fix it.  ",Medium,"['Cigarillos', 'Lonsdale']",,United States,False,No,More Details,United States,No,,"Cigarillos, Lonsdale",Varies,Kentucky Fire-Cured,
Devil's Weed Connecticut,Rated 4.1 out of 5, Based on 40 Ratings ,"Make a Deal with the Devil's WeedEver notice how many Dons there are in the cigar industry? I mean, Hell, you'd think this is the mafia with all the Dons running around. Devil's Weed is made by yet another Don. This time, it's Don Leoncio's factory in the Dominican Republic. While I'm not sure what makes him, or any Don, the Don, these cigars are the real deal. Packaged in affordable bundles of 20, Devil's Weed Connecticut is a new handmade that's easy to enjoy any and every day. The blend consists of a silk Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper with binders and fillers from the DR. The draw is easy and clean, revealing pleasant notes of cream, hay, and a dash of spice. It's a great recipe for a smooth cigar, and makes this one an easy contender for all-day enjoyment. Plus, once you see our everyday discount, you'll realize this one's a no-brainer. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Devil's Weed Dark Brew Coffee Maduro,Rated 4.06 out of 5, Based on 51 Ratings ,"Wake up your palateNowadays, coffee blends are a dime a dozen. But when it comes to affordability, no one beats Devil’s Weed. The original Connecticut bundle was such a best-seller, we knew the people would demand more: so when these two coffee influenced blends landed on our dock courtesy of the DR, we got them upstairs for a little QA most expeditiously. And let me tell you: these blends are the real deal if you’re a fan of a little java with your tobac’. Today we’re looking at the ‘Dark Brew’ version of this bundled line, for those of you who like a little afternoon cold brew or just down a pot by yourself every morning. Up top, a toothy, slightly sweetened Mexican San Andres wrapper leaf provides the chocolate and black pepper notes to complement the coffee core, with the Dominican binder and long-filler keeping things sultry and smooth. Load up on a couple bundles – I’m willing to bet this one becomes a regular in your rotation. ",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Corona, Robusto, Toro",Yes,San Andres,
Devil's Weed Natural Brew Coffee Habano,Rated 4.11 out of 5, Based on 46 Ratings ,"Wake up your palateNowadays, coffee blends are a dime a dozen. But when it comes to affordability, no one beats Devil’s Weed. The original Connecticut bundle was such a best-seller, we knew the people would demand more: so when these two coffee influenced blends landed on our dock courtesy of the DR, we got them upstairs for a little QA most expeditiously. And let me tell you: these blends are the real deal if you’re a fan of a little java with your tobac’. For those who prefer the “con leche” approach, Devil’s Weed offers up the Natural Brew Coffee Habano. A slightly sweetened Ecuadorian Habano wrapper leaf sits atop a bevy of aged Dominican long-filler tobaccos. Together, they combine to create a creamy and smooth core of flavor that’s perfect for all-day enjoyment. Indeed, this delicious handmade is almost guaranteed to become an everyday favorite.  ",Mellow-Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Corona, Robusto, Toro",Yes,Ecuador Habano,
Devil's Weed Red Devil,Rated 4.55 out of 5, Based on 11 Ratings ,"Ch-ch-ch-ch-ch-ch cherry bomb!Don Leoncio’s Devil’s Weed brand is growing like… well, like a weed! The original Connecticut was an instant hit, and spawned two coffee-infused line extensions that broke the mold for what most people would expect from an affordable coffee-infused stick. Now the Don does it again, with a feisty blend infused with smooth cherry notes and priced for everyday enjoyment.The core of the blend consists of high-quality Dominican long-fillers secured with a Dominican binder, and tied together with a flavorful Sumatra wrapper leaf. The blend is delicious on its own, but the addition of just the right amount of cherry essence seals the deal, making this a fantastic cigar to enjoy at any time of the day. The aroma is excellent and the taste will keep you coming back for more, which you can do again and again at these prices. Whether you enjoy it after breakfast or as the cherry on top of your day, you can’t go wrong with Devil’s Weed Red Devil. ",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Sumatra,
Diamond Crown,Rated 4.64 out of 5, Based on 14 Ratings ,"An exquisite handmade cigar.Made by Stanford Newman, Diamond Crown cigars are an elusive super premium that utilizes a special, ""Connecticut Fermented Wrapper"" (CFW). This 5-year old wrapper undergoes multiple fermentation processes, giving it a unique taste filled with sweet, rich flavors. A luxurious experience that commands top dollar. Highly rated and heavily praised.Diamond Crown received a well-deserved 92-rating noting: ""This is a pretty robusto with an excellent draw. It delivers earthy flavors while remaining smooth and round, and has hints of nutmeg and burnt spices.""​Quantities are extremely limited.",Mellow-Medium,"['Double Corona', 'Figurado', 'Presidente', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Double Corona, Figurado, Presidente, Pyramid, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Connecticut, Connecticut Broadleaf, Maduro",
Diamond Crown Julius Caeser,Rated 4.8 out of 5, Based on 30 Ratings ,"Et tu....Don’t get all uppity by the spelling of “Caeser” – in this instance, the name comes from Julius Caeser Newman, the founder of J.C. Newman cigars. This cigar was created to celebrate the company’s 115th anniversary and to honor the founding father’s 135th birthday. Newman started out humbly rolling cigars in Cleveland, and the company now operates out of Tampa, with third generation Newmans running the show. Diamond Crown Julius Caeser is a limited production beauty that’s rolled in small batches by the Fuente family. Boasting a 93-rating and spot on performance, this cigar easily fits in with the elite crowd. Dressed in an Ecuador Havana-seed wrapper draped over a Dominican binder, and featuring an eclectic mix of Caribbean basin and Central American fillers, this gem of a cigar is nothing short of fantastic. Enjoy smooth and robust flavors galore, including rich coffee, sweetness, spice, and wood. Trust me....Brutus would be super jealous.In addition to being selected as one of the Top Cigars of the Year, Julius Caeser earned a 93-rating, noting: ""Lots of rich, coffee-laden smoke layers the palate with each puff. The bold coffee is balanced by sweet and spicy woody flavors and a savory finish.""",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Pyramid, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,
Diamond Crown Maximus,Rated 4.61 out of 5, Based on 36 Ratings ,"Maximus. Taking Diamond Crown to another level.If you enjoy the regular Diamond Crown blend, you’re in for a real treat with the DC Maximus. The secret behind this exquisite cigar is the dark, oily wrapper. Rolled with a super-rich, Ecuadorian-grown El Bajo sungrown leaf from the Oliva family’s farm, this cigar is almost as enjoyable to look at as it is to burn. A bold, full-flavored cigar that’s chock full of robust, satisfying flavors and luxuriously smooth from start to finish. A wonderful (but expensive) top-shelf premium.Diamond Crown Maximus received a well-deserved 93-rating noting: ""​a rich, sweet cigar with plenty of cedar on the palate and a finish with notes of espresso beans.""Quantities are extremely limited.",Full,"['Churchill', 'Double Robusto', 'Presidente', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Double Robusto, Presidente, Pyramid, Robusto, Toro",No,Sumatra,
Dias de Gloria by AJ Fernandez,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Viva la Gloria!When AJ Fernandez thinks back on the ‘Glory Days’, he’s not thinking about dating cheerleaders in high school or pounding kegs with his frat buddies in college. He’s thinking about the glory days of Cuban tobacco, before the rise of Castro and the exodus of the best tobacco growers and producers, when cigars from the Island South of Miami were considered the undisputed best. Now AJ Fernandez’s newest release is ready to hit your humidors, and it promises to take you back to the tastes of Cuba’s yesteryear.The AJ Fernandez Dias de Gloria is a Nicaraguan Puro containing tobacco from four of AJ Fernandez’s oldest farms, all located in Esteli, with a good portion of the leaves aged up to seven years. AJ has been methodically and deliberately setting aside tobacco from each farm for this release, and the resulting flavor profile is exactly what he intended. Lighting up, you’ll experience a toasty, medium-bodied profile reminiscent of pre-1957 Cubans, with notes of vanilla, leather, earth, and pepper. Grab a box of Dias de Gloria, and reminisce on your glory days while the aroma of pre-Castro Cuba envelopes your senses.Good News! Dias de Gloria has been honored with a well-deserved 90-point rating, noting: ""A primarily earthy, coffee-like smoke balanced by secondary notes of French peanut, chocolate and red pepper spice. The draw is open, the burn, quite even.""",Medium,"['Double Toro', 'Gordo', 'Lonsdale', 'Robusto Extra']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Double Toro, Gordo, Lonsdale, Robusto Extra",False,"Nicaraguan, Sun Grown",AJ Fernandez
Diesel,Rated 4.74 out of 5, Based on 500 Ratings ,"Diesel. Shaq diesel. The original cigar that started a titan of the industry. Blended in Esteli, Nicaragua by master of all-things-cigar A.J. Fernandez, Diesel utilizes bold Pennsylvania Broadleaf wrapper leaves, and Nicaraguan long-fillers grown in the jet black, volcanic soils of Nicaragua. Originally offered in just the original, stout “Unholy Cocktail” blend, Diesel has been expanded upon since to add two more regular blends. Whichever one you choose, rest assured you’ve found an absolute winner. A rare breed, this off-centered handmade is the cigar equivalent of a thick, juicy porterhouse. Crafted with the finest choice Nicaraguan tobaccos, Diesel’s geographical background is evident from first puff — layers and layers of thick spice come through on every puff, layered with natural tobacco sweetness, leather, and dark earthy notes. It’s a premium treat, priced at everyday friendly prices… in short, Diesel is an absolute no-brainer. Note: The original Diesel blend is also available in a special 6""x60 Double Perfecto. This full-throttle blend is rolled in limited quantities and is offered only in packs of 20 or packs of 5.",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Robusto",No,Pennsylvania Broadleaf,Diesel
Diesel d.10th,Rated 4.51 out of 5, Based on 109 Ratings ,"A Decade of Dominance It’s been 10 years since the small, boutique brand known as Diesel hit our docks. Back then, most people didn’t know who AJ was, and Diesel’s Unholy Cocktail had just a small, cult following. Jump ahead to today, and Diesel is one of the fastest-moving brands on our shelves, with AJ easily becoming a household name. Never compromising and never disappointing, Diesel continues to deliver rare breed blends day-in and day-out including its first ever anniversary cigar: Diesel d.10th. 100% full-bodied, 100% full-flavored, and 100% Diesel. D.10th will be most familiar to those who love AJ’s leaf. For this commemorative release, A.J.’s inspected and selected the finest Ecuadorian Habano Oscuro wrapper to top a blend that’s as delicious as it is powerful. Overflowing with rich, hearty notes of dark chocolate, earth, and roasted coffee and brought together by a mouthwatering, spicy-sweet finish, d.10th is an absolute must-have for fans of AJ’s work. Viva la Diesel!",Full,"['Robusto', 'Short Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Short Robusto, Torpedo",No,"Ecuador Habano, Oscuro",Diesel
Diesel Delirium L.E.,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Enter a state of Delirium.No, you’re not hallucinating, and trust us, you’re not crazy. There really is a new Diesel landing at CI Nation, and it’s not one to be taken lightly. That’s because the Diesel Delirium L.E. is strong, even by Diesel’s standards. Experienced puffers and stogie thrill-seekers listen up, because this blend is only here to raise a ruckus for a limited time. Starting with an Ecuador Sumatra wrapper and Connecticut Broadleaf binder, this treat for the senses contains all Nicaraguan fillers, including a heavy portion of ligero to kick up the spice. But Delirium is much more than a powerhouse. Layers of complex spice and pepper lay a foundation and remain prominent throughout, but underneath, careful blending resulted in a delicious bouquet of roasted nuts, oak, nougat, leather, and a subtle natural sweetness. Grab a box of Diesel Delirium L.E., and see what all the hysteria is about.Good news! Diesel Delirium has been honored with a well-deserved 90-point rating, which noted: “Rolled in a near-black wrapper and rough cap, this toro has a substantial draw and fairly even burn. Toasty at first with notes of cereal, this cigar takes on the smoky, woody character of mesquite and hickory with unexpected bursts of dried, tropical fruit before the savory finish.”",Full,['Toro'],Connecticut Broadleaf,Nicaraguan,False,,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,Toro,False,Ecuador Sumatra,Diesel
Diesel Hair of the Dog L.E.,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"A bark as good as its bite.AJ Fernandez is a madman, and he never has a dog day. Everything that comes out of his factory is top-notch, and so is the facility itself. The Diesel line is a great example: it’s one of CI Nation’s die-hard favorite brands for a reason. Our customers can’t get enough of the bold, complex flavors and striking packaging, and Diesel has upped the ante with their latest release from AJ’s factory in Nicaragua.Resting on its haunches and ready to pounce is a new, limited edition single-size release by Diesel called Hair of the Dog. Don’t let the name fool you, this cigar is anything but cute & cuddly. Inside a glistening Ecuador Habano wrapper and Ecuador Sumatra binder is a feisty blend of Nicaraguan Habano fillers, creating a profile that’s anything but tame but certainly not vicious. Full-flavored and medium-full bodied, the Hair of the Dog is a feat of tobacco blending prowess. A hearty dose of pepper, spice, and leather charges across your palate in perfect balance, with an excellent draw and burn throughout. Just don’t expect this stick to serve as your guard dog, because anyone who smells it will likely move a bit closer!Good news! The Diesel Hair of the Dog LE has received a 90-point rating, noting: ""This box-pressed cigar is draped in an attractive, chocolate-brown wrapper that feels smooth to the touch. Its lush draw delivers soft notes of wood and tea interspersed with sweeter hints of toffee and milk chocolate.""",Medium-Full,['Toro'],Habano,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,True,,Toro,False,Ecuador Sumatra,Diesel
Diesel Heart of Darkness,Rated 4.76 out of 5, Based on 63 Ratings ,"Best of the bestWe love Diesel. It’s a brand that has consistently performed, with each blend under the Diesel name promising a unique experience unlike anything else on the market. To ask for more seems greedy, but, let’s face it — with Diesel, we always want more. Enter the new Diesel Heart of Darkness. A limited edition blend, this one’s pure substance. It’s dark, it’s bold, and it’s unapologetically Diesel. Diesel Heart of Darkness comes in one perfected size: a meaty, 6” x 58 Gordo. Inside each box you’ll find 14 Ecuador Habano Oscuro wrapped gems. The dark, oily wrapper leaf sits atop a potent firecracker blend of all long-fillers from three different regions in Nicaragua, plus some additional Esteli ligero to put this one over the top. Each puff delivers a chewy feast of bitter espresso, earth, black pepper, and salty leather. Prepare for your palate to kick into overdrive as you burn your fingers taking this one down to the nub. If you’ve been around these parts long enough to have seen some other Diesel limited releases, you know as well as I do that this blend is gonna fly. Act quickly son. Otherwise you’ll be left with scraps while everyone else is enjoying filet. ​",Full,['Gordo'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Gordo,No,Ecuador Habano,Diesel
Diesel Rage,Rated 4.6 out of 5, Based on 184 Ratings ,"You’ll be angry you didn’t try it sooner.Creating a new Diesel is hard. Creating a new Diesel that outdoes the outstanding core lines is even harder. Almost impossible, actually. But AJ Fernandez  stepped up and nailed it…again. This limited edition cigar will blow your mind, that’s a promise.  Diesel Rage showcases an ultra-dark Ecuadorian Habano Sun Grown Oscuro wrapper overtop a perfect recipe of Cuban-seed Nicaraguan long-fillers grown for this project on AJ’s farms. This combination is 100% in sync, uniting to deliver an overload of complex flavors including earth, vanilla, coffee, spices, and cedar, all while offering just enough strength without becoming overpowering. It’s balanced. It’s bold. It’s smooth. It’s complex. It’s unique. It’s Diesel Rage and it’s a premium handmade stroke of genius.​",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Gordo, Toro, Torpedo",No,Habano Oscuro,Diesel
Diesel Uncut,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 334 Ratings ,"​The best value from Diesel to date.From the beginning, Diesel has been a brand of superior strength, body, and quality for a price point seemingly impossible to match. It’s like walking out of Costco with five shopping carts full of goodies and only dropping forty bones. Well now the ante has been upped with their newest release, Uncut. This beaut, blended by the masterful hands of A.J. Fernandez is undiluted, unapologetic, and unmatched in its flavor, consistency, and its unbelievable price point.To create Uncut, A.J. selected a robust blend of Nicaraguan long-fillers and finished it with a medium-brown Pennsylvania Broadleaf natural wrapper to deliver a rich, hearty blend loaded with notes of chocolate, nuts, black pepper, and cedar. The strength, complexity, and flavor that you have grown to expect from Diesel, at a price that lets you burn one after another. In short, Uncut is underpriced.​",Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Pennsylvania Broadleaf,Diesel
Diesel Uncut d.CT,Rated 4.48 out of 5, Based on 83 Ratings ,"​Connecticut – the Diesel way.Diesel…the mere mention conjures up thoughts of potent, full-bodied, knee-buckling, powerhouse cigars. There’s a reason why the brand sells out faster that fried Snickers at a weight loss convention, they’re damned good, and they’re damned affordable. Diesel Uncut, the blend favored by Tabacalera Fernandez’s workers, has quickly become the stuff of full-bodied folklore and with the newest addition to the line they bring a new wrapper to the table. Meet Diesel Uncut d.CT, still bold, and still jam packed with flavor, just with a toned-down intensity.Diesel Uncut d.CT comes dressed in an Ecuadoran Connecticut wrapper sitting atop a Nicaraguan binder and long-fillers. The Connecticut wrapper adds a creamy element to the familiar flavors of black pepper, nuts, cedar, and earth, and the blend is a medium-bodied treat. The potency is dialed down, but the blend will still wallop you with flavor and complexity. In short, it’s what you’d expect from a Diesel and at a price that’s hard to believe.​",Medium,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,Diesel
Diesel Unlimited,Rated 4.58 out of 5, Based on 600 Ratings ,"Unlimited flavor....Diesel Unlimited is the epic new follow-up to the epic original Diesel! Unlimited is rich, complex, full-bodied and ultra-flavorful....carefully crafted into 4 stately, big ring vitolas and booming with gobs of flavor, boldness, denseness and complexity. In spades. Then double it. Then multiply by six. That's about right.Diesel Unlimited is fitted with a dark, Habano Ecuador ligero wrapper leaf - oozing with oils, it looks like a tasty chocolate candy bar. Rich long-leaf filler tobaccos from Condega and Esteli Nicaragua meld with spicy San Andres leaves to create a strikingly robust and randy blend with intensely lush flavors. Expect notes of leather, spice, earth and oak, rounding out its toasty tobacco core. Smooth, slow-burning, zesty, full-flavored. Unlimited. ",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Presidente', 'Robusto']",,"Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Perfecto, Presidente, Robusto",No,"Ecuador Habano, Habano",Diesel
Diesel Unlimited Maduro,Rated 4.72 out of 5, Based on 260 Ratings ,"Just when you thought it was safe to leave the house – Diesel. Unlimited. Maduro.That’s right, gents, your favorite new blend has a whole new look, and you better believe it’s more enticing than ever. Another winning combination from Diesel should come as no surprise, especially since I can’t tell you how many requests I’ve been fielding for the maduro version of Unlimited. Well, your wishes are granted and your prayers are answered. This tasty little sucker has finally arrived, and it’s just as good as you hoped it would be.Unlimited Maduro is a full-bodied masterpiece, draped in an absolutely gorgeous Broadleaf maduro wrapper that glistens with natural oils. A quick peek beneath the sheets reveals the real meat and potatoes – a lovely San Andres binder and a bold mix of Honduran and Nicaraguan long-fillers. Think we’re done? Oh, hardly. Flavorful, feisty, and expertly crafted, this premium handmade will take you on a journey through notes of leather, coffee, cocoa, and spice, all complemented by a slightly sweet, slightly peppery taste. It’s rich. It’s satisfying. It’s the one you’ve been waiting for....Diesel Unlimited Maduro. ",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Presidente', 'Robusto']",Mexican,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Perfecto, Presidente, Robusto",No,"Maduro, Pennsylvania Broadleaf",Diesel
Diesel Whiskey Row,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 76 Ratings ,"Diesel LibationIf you’ve been around these parts long enough, you’re well aware of the Diesel brand. No-nonsense, full-flavored, and expert construction. These phrases no doubt come to mind. Diesel Whiskey Row stays true, but takes a unique approach for the brand. The binder is aged in Rabbit Hole Bourbon barrels – a first for Diesel as well as master blender AJ Fernandez. But have no fear – these bourbon barrels that once held Rabbit Hole Bourbon were first shipped to AJ Fernandez in 2016. After many months of testing, he finally nailed down a process that imparts the perfect amount of flavor and aroma into the tobacco and Diesel Whiskey Row was born. The core of this cigar is made up entirely of Nicaraguan long-fillers from 3 different growing regions - Ometepe, Jalapa, and Condega – that have been aged from five to eight years. The bourbon barrel aged binder is a Mexican San Andres leaf, and it’s all held together five-years aged Ecuadorian habano wrapper. The barrel aging produces a strong oaky flavor and hints of bourbon in the aroma. You’ll also notice some floral notes, spice and some sweetness in a medium-bodied format. In my many, many samplings of this cigar, the construction has been nothing short of flawless – something we’ve come to expect from AJ-made cigars. Grab a box of these unique Diesels today, pair ‘em with a few fingers of the good stuff, and you won’t be disappointed. Good news! Diesel Whiskey Row has received a well-deserved 91-point rating, noting: ""The earthy, chocolate notes of this cigar frame a hearty core of wood and cedar, all combining for a finish of bread and brown sugar.""",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gigante', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Mexican,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gigante, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Diesel
Diesel Whiskey Row Sherry Cask,Rated 4.62 out of 5, Based on 21 Ratings ,"A very Sherry Diesel.Rabbit Hole Bourbon & Diesel Cigars are a match made in heaven. The Diesel Whiskey Row was released in 2018 to a wave of excitement from cigar aficionados everywhere, owing to the fantastic blend and bold flavors from the binder aged in Rabbit Hole bourbon barrels. The follow-up to that fantastic success uses barrels that originally contained 30-year old Pedro Ximenez Sherry which were sent to Rabbit Hole to produce their PX Sherry Finish Bourbon, before finally landing at Tabacalera AJ Fernandez in Nicaragua.The blend consists of a dark Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper and Nicaraguan fillers, but the barrel-aged Brazilian Arapiraca binder is the star of the show. The flavors are wonderfully influenced by the sherry casks, without becoming infused or overly sweet. Instead, you’ll find notes of dark fruit, cedar, chocolate, and pepper, for a smooth medium-bodied experience that pairs great with any drinks with naturally sweet characteristics. Diesel crated something truly special & unique with this release, so you won’t want to hesitate to go down the Rabbit Hole. Good news! Diesel Whiskey Row Sherry Cask has received an impressive 91-point rating, noting: ""Sweet notes of fruit and cocoa powder take on a distinct woodiness before the long, licorice finish.""",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Brazil,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Connecticut Broadleaf,Diesel
Diesel Wicked,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 49 Ratings ,"wick•ed [wik-id] adjective1. mischievous or playfully malicious2. Slang . wonderful; great; masterful; deeply satisfyingI can assure you....you are not ready for Diesel Wicked cigars. Your unsuspecting palate is not yet prepared for the full-bodied complexity this devilishly enchanting breed has to offer. Your humidor cannot possibly fit another super-premium demanding permanent residency. Your daily rotation cannot be swayed, altered, nor manipulated to include an aggressive new ‘cuvee de’ Diesel layered with this level of depth and sophistication. Something Wicked this way comes....and I suggest you run, lest be consumed by its alluring embrace.By the pricking of my thumbs.... Pitch black, long-leaf ligeros cultivated from the rich, volcanic soils of Nicaragua’s top growing regions. Binders hand selected from top-priming Habano leaves grown in Esteli, Nicaragua. Thick, Broadleaf maduro ligero wrappers from Pennsylvania glistening with oils. These are the components used to craft Diesel Wicked. A full-bodied, full-flavored apparition formed by the hands of a master. The weak and timid need not apply - Wicked yields a bold assortment of deep nuances and spicy undertones. Oak, leather, dark tobacco, roasted espresso bean, black pepper, red pepper. A feisty charisma that grows more intense with each puff. Diesel Wicked, the cigar you’ve been asking for. Open locks, whoever knocks....No, you’re not seeing things. Diesel Wicked is back. Due to the rare tobaccos required to craft each cigar, it was believed to be gone forever. But now, it’s returned for a limited, cameo appearance. Diesel Wicked is knocking…answer the call while you still can. ​",Full,['Torpedo'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Torpedo,No,Pennsylvania Broadleaf,Diesel
Djarum Black Ivory,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"A classic combination
An extension of the popular Djarum Black, these vanilla infused little cigars feature unique flavor by the shovelful. Crafted with premium tobaccos and cloves, each Djarum Black is rolled in a homogenized tobacco wrapper to create a slow-burning, super smooth experience. 
These were formerly known as Djarum Black Vanilla, but are now called Djarum Black Ivory. ",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,,True,No,More Details,Indonesia,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,HTL,Djarum Filtered Cigars
Djarum Black Ruby,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Guaranteed to turn a few heads
The uber-popular Djarum Black is a clove-infused cigar, perfect for those opportunities when you need to relax, but you’re short on time. Incredibly popular with the kretek loving crowd, Djarum Black Cherry cigars add a hint of cherry to the mix, to create a uniquely flavored mellow experience. Note: These used to be known as Djarum Black Cherry, but is now called Djarum Black Ruby. ",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,,True,No,More Details,Bahamas,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,HTL,Djarum Filtered Cigars
Djarum Black Sapphire,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Sapphire’s a gem! Djarum Blacks remind me of ACID cigars… those who like them, love them. Those who don’t… well, maybe check out one of the other products we carry. But let me shoot you straight — if you’re looking for a clove-infused cigar, Djarum Black Sapphire is the best around. Made in Indonesia, these incredibly smooth little cigars include just a bit of menthol to push them over the edge. ",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,,True,No,More Details,Indonesia,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,HTL,Djarum Filtered Cigars
Dominican Cream,Rated 4.05 out of 5, Based on 380 Ratings ,"So creamy, so good.We field constant inquiries from manufacturers asking us to carry their cigars, invitations to make cigars at every hole-in-the-wall factory in Central America with ‘best price,’ and we burn through sample after sample. People think it’s fun, but lighting up thousands of handmades that are glorified mulch ain’t fun at all. But now and then, one blend stands out. Here is one diamond in the rough. Dominican Cream boasts that famed Dominican profile: mellow character, subtle cedar, sweet cream, and a dash of spice. When you weigh the quality of these ‘Cuban sandwich’ treats against the price we managed to wrangle them at, there’ll no doubt be cheers from sea to shining sea.Note: These cigars have a very slightly sweetened cap. The slightest we've ever seen!​",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,
Don Carlos Edicion de Aniversario,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"It’ll have you seeking out a special occasion.Look, this is not an everyday cigar, not by any stretch. But when you experience those life-altering moments that leave you grasping for something absolutely spectacular to commemorate the occasion, this is the ultra-premium handmade that you should be reaching for. Hands down.Don Carlos Edicion de Aniversario was created to celebrate the 30th anniversary of Don Carlos, and true Fuente fans will recognize that this is not an event to be taken lightly. It features a well-aged sun grown Habano wrapper, which just happens to be the same type used for the ever-popular Opus X. Beneath the hood, a choice blend of 2-year-aged choice Dominican long-fillers rounds out this mix. The creamy, unique flavor profile is perfectly complemented by the excellent construction and even draw. And talk about limited edition....these beauties are released in small quantities, which makes them extremely hard to find. So go ahead, and fitfully honor your special occasion with a truly superior cigar experience.Don Carlos Edicion de Aniversario has received ratings as high as 94-points, noting: ""a tremendously intense and complex blend, especially in the Double Robusto size.""",Medium,"['Double Robusto', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Double Robusto, Robusto, Toro",No,Dominican,Arturo Fuente
Don Diego,Rated 4.31 out of 5, Based on 35 Ratings ,"A classic cigar, Don Diego is considered one of the world’s finest and most dependable premium brands.Don Diego is one of the most attractive and well-made cigars in existence. The extra smooth Connecticut wrapper lends a very pleasant, extremely mellow flavor - in fact, this is one of the mellowest cigars you can find, but with a creamy texture, pleasant aroma and nice balance.",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Lonsdale', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Lonsdale, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,
Don Felix,Rated 3.86 out of 5, Based on 305 Ratings ,"A new DonThere are so many Dons in this industry I can’t keep them straight anymore. We’ve got Rafael, Pepin, Diego, Jesus, Smith and on and on. Normally I’d dive in here and tell you the long story about the great Don Felix and how these cigars came to be. But honestly, I don’t know who Don Felix is so let’s just skip right to the nitty gritty.These cigars hail from the El Artista factory in the Dominican Republic, the same guys who brought you brands like Puro Ambar, Cimarron, and Big Papi. They utilize a Dominican binder and fillers, covered by a smooth and seamless Sumatra wrapper. Spark one up and you’ll be treated to notes of earth and hay with a slight cinnamon zest and just a touch of sweetness. Packaged in affordable dress mazos, this deal is ripe for the picking. ",Mellow-Medium,['Toro'],Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,Dominican,
Don Jesus,Rated 3.86 out of 5, Based on 147 Ratings ,"“7th Wonder of the World” indeed!Here’s a sad story with a happy ending. A few months ago, we purchased a closeout lot. A favor to friend kind of thing. As they say, no good deed goes unpunished. Here’s our punishment. Among some more decent brands was a gem labeled Don Jesus. Funny enough alone, but it gets better. Closer examination revealed the number of cigars on the bundle manually scribbled out with a Sharpie. Bearable, I guess. But it gets worse. The ‘Don Jesus’ label was obviously applied over another label to intentionally cover it up. Underneath? Another label of a brand called Desperado Seconds. A cigar described in print, on the sticker, by the manufacturer as, “These are not first quality cigars, not stemless, perfect, or spectacular in any way.” Good. Now that my cards are all on the table, here’s the happy ending. We burnt a bundle. They’re not that bad, and I want to wash my hands of this mess quickly. So my offer to you is this: I’m not going to make any money on these and you get a half-decent cigar or well under a buck a pop. Help me out, would ya? ​Your choice of Connecticut or Maduro wrapper.",Mellow,['Corona'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Corona,No,"Connecticut, Maduro",
Don Lino Africa,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Back from the Safari with a whole new look.Nestor Miranda of Miami Cigar Co. was inspired to create the Don Lino Africa after spending time traveling the African continent, and falling in love with the culture and scenery. The cigar was blended to capture the spirit of Africa, and became one of the brand’s most popular lines. Now, more than a decade after the original release, Don Lino Africa is being reimagined with a little help from AJ Fernandez.Made by hand at Tabacalera AJ Fernandez Cigars de Nicaragua S.A. in Esteli, the revamped Don Lino Africa blend starts with a hand-selected long-filler blend of Dominican Piloto and Nicaraguan leaves from Ometepe, Jalapa, and Esteli. The binder is sourced from Cameroon in Africa, covered by a sultry Habano 2000 wrapper grown in Ecuador. Medium-full in body, box-pressed, and smooth as silk, you’ll be greeted by a fantastic draw and notes of exotic spice, cedar, roasted nuts, and leather. Grab a box and experience a blend inspired by one of the most beautiful places on Earth, the African Savanna.",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Cameroon,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,
Don Lino Habanitos,Rated 4.7 out of 5, Based on 33 Ratings ,"Smooth, satisfying cigars from the Dominican.Don Lino is a classic brand made in the La Aurora factory, the oldest and best known factory in the Dominican Republic. It utilizes select, extensively aged Dominican long-fillers. The trimmings of these fillers are then used to create Habanitos, a golden-brown, Sumatra-wrapped cigarillo that's filled with creamy, crisp flavors delivered in a mellow, deliberate manner. Quick and satisfying, 50 Habanitos come packaged in beautiful replica tins, giving you a mass of delicious, 'tweener' smokes. ",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Cigarillos,No,Connecticut,
Don Pepin Garcia Blue,Rated 4.44 out of 5, Based on 104 Ratings ,"A beautiful, Cuban-esque gem. Jose Garcia, otherwise known as Don Pepin, is the man behind some of the industry's hottest cigars. My Father, DPG Cuban Classic, Tatuaje, and Flor de Las Antillas....to name a few. To create the Blue, a blend of 100% Nicaraguan tobacco is utilized. All Cuban-seed, this hearty mixture is made complete with a dark Nicaraguan Corojo wrapper. The cigar is full-bodied and full-flavored, boasting a rich, spicy bouquet of flavor with an assortment of earthy nuances. Eventful from start to finish and ultimately satisfying, Don Pepin Garcia Blue is a delicious, well-balanced cigar.In addition to being named among the World's Top 25 Cigars, number eight to be exact, Don Pepin Garcia Blue received a well-deserved '93' and '92' rating, noting: ""An almost perfectly constructed lancero with an exemplary pigtail cap. The draw is perfect, loading the palate with rich coffee notes well balanced by spice, chocolate, and a leathery finish.""",Full,"['Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Presidente', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Churchill, Cigarillos, Corona, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Presidente, Toro, Torpedo",No,Corojo,Don Pepin Garcia
Don Pepin Garcia Cuban Classic,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 72 Ratings ,"Pepin Garcia, a man on fire!Ready yourself for the strongest blend from 'Don Pepin' Garcia to date. The Black label is as inviting as it is delicious. Coated with a caramel-colored Corojo wrapper, this eventful blend of Cuban-seed tobaccos hails from the black, fertile soils of Nicaragua. The result is a full-tilt array of flavor swirling throughout your palate with undeniable hints of earth, toasted cedar and black pepper. The aftertaste and aroma are sweet and pleasant, completing an interesting experience that will leave you satisfied every time.Rated '92', the Cuban Classic blend - otherwise known as 'Black' - from Don Pepin Garcia has been named one of the Top 25 Cigars in the world: ""A lovely cigar that has an elegant draw and burn. The blend is pleasant, with a toasted almond flavor, notes of wood and touches of leather on the palate.""Quantities are limited.",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Corojo,Don Pepin Garcia
Don Pepin Garcia Series JJ,Rated 4.58 out of 5, Based on 43 Ratings ,"A wonderful cigar bearing the name of its world renowned maker.Don 'Pepin' Garcia is currently making some of the world's finest cigars. More often than not, the name Tatuaje comes to mind immediately upon hearing his name. This is just one of his masterpieces which are known to rival the flavor, character and experience of your finest Cuban cigars.Series JJ is another. Created by Pepin and his son Jaime, this fine handmade employs a wonderful blend of Nicaraguan Corojo and Criollo long-leaf tobaccos inside a flavorful Nicaraguan Corojo wrapper. The result is a full-bodied smoke layered with deep flavors. The aroma is earthy and spicy, complementing the rich, leathery flavors perfectly.Don Pepin Garcia Series JJ is handmade in Miami, in order to maintain a high level of quality control, making this a rare treat for the senses. Quantity is extremely limited.",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto', 'Salomon', 'Toro']",Corojo,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Robusto, Salomon, Toro",No,Corojo,Don Pepin Garcia
Don Rafael Brasil #57 Robusto,Rated 4.33 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Brasil… Spanish for “Brazil” Like fine meats at a Brazilian steakhouse, this handmade from Don Rafael delivers a full plate of flavors that just don’t stop. Yes, the second stop on the Don Rafael world tour is sure to be a favorite for those who like their cigars hearty. Add in the fact that you’re getting filet quality at burger shack pricing, and you’ve got a no-brainer on your hands. Let’s get the first question out of the way here — why is there an Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper on a cigar named Brasil. Well, dig in a bit deeper and you’ll find you answer. The Brazilian leaves in this blend come from the binder and filler, the right place for them to shine through. They add a nice “oomph” to the otherwise mellow wrapper leaf, resulting in a medium-bodied experience that’s got a perfect yin-yang of spicy, sweet, and tangy. Try Don Rafael Brasil for yourself, and you’ll quickly realize why they’re flying outta here so fast. ",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Robusto,No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Don Rafael Connecticut,Rated 4.36 out of 5, Based on 538 Ratings ,"Don Rafael cigars are premium mellow and smooth, built for Everyman’s everyday enjoyment at bargain basement prices.Don Rafael cigars, rolled by Jose Dominguez in the same boutique cigar factory that makes Victor Sinclair, is a well-constructed, mellow to medium-bodied blend from the Dominican Republic. Don Rafael is comprised of a Dominican binder, all-Dominican long-filler leaves, and a Connecticut Shade wrapper grown in Ecuador.SMOKE magazine says: ""Four out of five panelists agree: this is a cigar for everyone... subtle tones of spice and wood, bequeathed to the palate by the Connecticut broadleaf wrapper, make the Don Rafael an excellent all-day smoke for the novice and an excellent morning smoke. This is a perfect accompaniment to a glass of dry champagne or a mimosa, after you’ve finished off a heaping plate of huevos rancheros!""",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Salomon', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Salomon, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Don Rafael
Don Rafael Ecuador,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"A thrilling, No ifs, ands or buts — Ecuador is where it’s atOriginally known for their line of affordable, everyday blends, the Don Rafael name got a major addition in 2017. You see, the Don’s always been quite the traveler, and now that world knowledge is being put to use in the Don Rafael World lineup. Six different cigars, each highlighting tobacco’s from one of the world’s renowned cigar countries are offered up — every one delicious in its own right. At hand today is Don Rafael Ecuador. Never content to live with the status quo, the Don added a little “secret ingredient” to this sauce. Inside each Don Rafael Ecuador you’ll find a hand-selected Pennsylvania super ligero leaf. That, combined with the Dominican long-fillers, sets this one apart from your everyday Connecticut-wrapped cigars. Indeed, Don Rafael Ecuador measures in at a comfortable medium-body, dishing out the smooth, buttery experience you want from a Connecticut with a nice dash of pepper thrown in on top. ",Medium,['Robusto'],Sumatra,"Dominican, United States",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Robusto,No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Don Rafael Gold,Rated 4.56 out of 5, Based on 174 Ratings ,"Don Rafael cigars are premium mellow and smooth, built for Everyman’s everyday enjoyment at bargain basement prices.Don Rafael Gold is the newest addition to the Victor Sinclair family. Deliciously mellow to medium-bodied, with a slightly sweetened tip....the best kind of tip if you ask me....you could burn these long into the night. Made from all Dominican long-fillers, Don Rafael Gold is finished off with a pristine Ecuador wrapper. Smooth, mellow, and satisfying with a touch of spice. Enjoy it any time of day....and don't forget to stock up!​",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro",Yes,Ecuador Sungrown,Don Rafael
Don Rafael Italia,Rated 4.33 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"The Don kicks it up a notchWhen you hear cigar lover’s talk about tobacco, it always comes back to a few countries: Nicaragua, the DR, and Cuba. But those who have been around the block once or twice know there’s a spot in Europe that deserves to be in those talks too — Italy. Italian tobacco is criminally underutilized in the cigar industry, but now Don Rafael throws their hat in the ring to remind us all that Italy isn’t just food, wine, nonnas and soccer. Featuring a thick dose of Italian dark-fired tobacco from Tuscany in the filler, Don Rafael Italia is a medium-full bodied powerhouse. This strength in body isn’t normally what Don Raf is known for, but take a puff and you’ll wish every cigar he made tasted like this. Italia features notes of oak, hearty spice, and an indescribably rich sweetness. With all the brands on the cigar market today, it’s hard to innovate. But I promise you, there’s nothing quite like this one around. ",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],Sumatra,"Dominican, Italian",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Robusto,No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Don Rafael Maduro,Rated 4.17 out of 5, Based on 151 Ratings ,"'Don Everybody,' but darker.When the original Don Rafael burst onto the scene, we instantly knew there was a winner on our hands. Handcrafted in the Dominican Republic by Jose Dominguez, of Victor Sinclair fame, the Don Rafael brand represents the ultimate mix of luxury feel and premium tobacco... a cigar that retails for just a few bucks that easily stands up to those twice the price. Don Rafael Maduro is the ultimate every-dude cigar. A mellow to medium-bodied handmade comprised of aged Dominican long-fillers inside a Dominican binder, producing a classic Dominican flavor that's just plain enjoyable. And now, this timeless blend comes dressed in a dark and oily Connecticut Broadleaf maduro wrapper, making it absolutely irresistible. A richer, smoother, more flavorful Don Rafael without taking the strength up a notch. Expect rich, cedar flavors throughout with a nice sweetness on the finish. Enjoyable!",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Don Rafael
Don Rafael Nicaragua,Rated 4.15 out of 5, Based on 102 Ratings ,"‘The Don’ delivers a Nicaraguan.Don Rafael rules the arena in the Everyman’s every day enjoyment segment of the industry. Thousands of loyal fans swear by ‘The Don’s’ three preceding blends, and for Senor Rafael’s best trick yet, a hearty Nicaraguan is raring to please palates across the nation, while keeping the same Don Rafael value as all the others. Set you eyes upon, Don Rafael Nicaragua.Rich and medium-bodied, Don Rafael Nicaragua is crafted with a gorgeous Habano wrapper atop aged Nicaraguan long-fillers. Complex and boasting notes of coffee, pepper, and leather, this well-made premium has everything you look for in a Jose Dominguez-made stogie. And with CI's everyday low prices, you'll be able to enjoy this flavorful stick all day long.​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Habano,Don Rafael
Don Rafael Signature,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Don Raf lays down its John Hancock!Don Rafael, rolled by Jose Dominguez in the same boutique cigar factory that makes Victor Sinclair, is the People’s Champ of cigars. These tasty gems deliver other-worldly flavor at a price that any red-blooded cigar lunatic can get behind. And Don Rafael Signature? Well, these tasty little coronas are perfect for anytime of day. Here’s your new everyday cigar and it’s not even a debate.Smooth, creamy, and mellow…what’s NOT to love with a crisp, Dominican-made Connecticut-wrapped gem? Especially when it comes from the best-selling Don Rafael brand. The Signature blend offers the perfect stick to pair with your morning coffee and will never break the bank. Get this one into your rotation ASAP!",Mellow-Medium,['Corona'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,False,,Corona,False,,Don Rafael
Don Rafael Turquia,Rated 4.4 out of 5, Based on 10 Ratings ,"For the cigar lover who’s “had it all” A short list of topics we dominate in here at CI HQ — chugging beers, crushing competitors, and being the experts on all things cigar. Yet with our combined decades of cigar loving experience, I’d still be hard-pressed to name another cigar featuring Turkish tobacco. The only conclusion? Don Rafael has done it again, creating a delicious cigar that is guaranteed to feel unique whether this is your tenth cigar, or your ten thousandth. Inside each Don Rafael Turco is a perfectly crafted hit of Turkish Latakia. Beloved amongst pipe enthusiasts across the world, this leaf offers a dark, campfire smoky flavor that you simply won’t find in other cigars. The rest of this blend ensures things don’t stay one-dimensional, adding flavors of earth, wood, and a slight natural sweetness. If you’re content with the ho-hum, look elsewhere. But if you want to try something like no other, here’s your ticket. ",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],,"Dominican, Varied",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Robusto,No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Don Rafael USA,Rated 4.29 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"USA all the wayI don’t like picking favorites, but you all know me — I can’t root for anything other than the Red, White, and Blue. So with that being said, welcome the #1 Cigar of the new Don Rafael World lineup, Don Rafael USA. Some will save this cigar for the 4th of July, but don’t make that mistake: Don Rafael USA is priced for everyday enjoyment. And there’s nothing wrong with lighting one up for America every day of the week. The blend here is medium bodied, one that balances out easily. A Broadleaf wrapper and binder ensure a hearty experience, with Dominican Piloto, Cuban-seed Criollo, and Habano USA long-fillers inside. If that doesn’t sound like a recipe for deliciousness, you need to check your pulse. Toast the foot and you’ll find a charmingly smooth blend, with just enough body to keep things interesting down to the nub. ",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],Pennsylvania Broadleaf,"Dominican, United States",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Robusto,No,Pennsylvania Broadleaf,
Don Smith,Rated 4.11 out of 5, Based on 142 Ratings ,"Don Smith!Don Smith - Series D no less, actually ""Series Dee"" - is amazing. Not the cigar....the concept. Take Don. Here's a traditional start to a cigar name. Then combine it with the most common Gringo surname. Then, actually spell out the letter 'D' in Series Dee. This takes cheese to a whole new level. The amusement factor alone is worth the price. And you may be surprised to know the cigar actually ain't half bad. Made with Sumatra Ecuador wrappers and a mellow blend of Dominican long-fillers, these big Churchills are moderate in body and not overly dreadful.",Mellow,['Churchill'],,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Churchill,No,Ecuador Sumatra,
Don Tomas Clasico Maduro,Rated 4.89 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"Embrace the heritage! Don Tomas has long been manufactured in Honduras, and today it is one of the standards of a well-made Honduran handmade. With Don Tomas Clasico Maduro, the brand celebrates its Honduran origin, putting the tobaccos of the country on full spotlight beneath a seamless, oily Maduro wrapper leaf. The blend itself is no slouch, either - this cigar features the same blend as the original Don Tomas release, with just a few tweaks around the wrapper.Wrapped in a bold Connecticut Broadleaf overtop Connecticut Maduro binder and Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers, Don Tomas delivers tons of flavor without ever overwhelming. Toasting the foot, you'll find tons of charred wood, chocolate, black pepper, and a backing of natural tobacco sweetness - a combination that practically begs to be paired up with a few fingers of the good stuff. Sure, there's other brands out there today that are flashier than Don Tomas, but if you just want a solid cigar at a nice price... look no further.",Medium,"['Presidente', 'Robusto']",Honduran,"Dominican, Honduran",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Presidente, Robusto",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,
Don Tomas Clasico Natural,Rated 4.6 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"Five decades later... still going strong!Don Tomas got their start almost 50 years ago and has seen many changes throughout the years. Now owned by General Cigar, the Don Tomas blend was reworked in 2005 in an effort to get back to the brands roots as a no-nonsense, hearty cigar for a fair price. Eliminating blended tobaccos from all over the world, the reworked blend is now back to the original Honduran and Nicaraguan tobaccos that put this brand on the map.Don Tomas Clasico features a combination of select long-fillers and supremely superb construction giving way for an easy draw and even burn. Crafted with a silky smooth wrapper and Nicaraguan and Honduran fillers, This Don Tomas cigar is surprisingly complex, with toasty, woody and slightly sweet flavors. With an unbelievably low price tag attached, the Don Tomas Clasico is a great choice for an everyday cigar.Good news, Don Tomas Clasico Natural, a 2006 Top 25 cigar has earned as high as a 90-rating, noting: “This cigar gives off an excellent toasty aroma as it burns. Rich woody flavors and a chocolate note build to a nutty finish. An enjoyable smoke.”​",Medium,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Corona Extra', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Rothschild', 'Toro']",Honduran,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Cigarillos, Corona, Corona Extra, Presidente, Robusto, Rothschild, Toro",No,Honduran,
Don Tomas Nicaragua,Rated 4.29 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"Show the Don some respectWhen the Don speaks up, you best pay attention. Otherwise, you’ll miss one of the newest, best Nicaraguan handmades to pass through CI HQ in quite some time. Don Tomas Nicaragua is a beefy new offering from one of the classic names in the cigar industry. Those who have been around might recognize that this is a more affordable option that some of the other Don Tomas boxes — that’s just a plus. The cigar is just as delicious as its pricier brethren, ensuring maximum dollar to herf pleasure ratio.Handmade in Esteli, the cigar capital of Nicaragua, the smooth, shade grown Jalapa wrapper on this one is going to have you testing your willpower. I normally like to let a cigar rest in the humidor for a bit, but no one can resist lighting one of these up immediately when you crack the box. And you’ll be glad you did. Sweet, nutty aromas are mixed with wood and a leather note that’s full-flavored without being overpowering. Don Tomas Nicaragua is easily an everyday go-to. ​",Medium,"['Gigante', 'Robusto', 'Rothschild', 'Toro']",Brazil,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gigante, Robusto, Rothschild, Toro",No,Nicaraguan Jalapa,
Don Tomas Sungrown,Rated 4.86 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"Enter the new face of Don Tomas.The Sungrown variety of Don Tomas is a delightful medium-bodied blend hailing from Honduras. Made entirely of Honduran-grown tobaccos, this tasty cigar combines a top-notch mixture of aged long-fillers dressed in a leathery sun-grown wrapper from the Jamastran Valley of Honduras. The result is a buttery-smooth bouquet layered with earthy undertones, tobacco flavors, and sweet spices on the finish.",Medium,"['Gigante', 'Presidente', 'Robusto']",Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gigante, Presidente, Robusto",No,Sun Grown,
Double Happiness Cazadores,Rated 4.19 out of 5, Based on 47 Ratings ,"Double the happiness, for a fraction of the cost!If you enjoy cigars, you’ve had a Dominican cigar. You’ve probably also had some from Nicaragua, Honduras, the US, and maybe even Cuba (gasp!). But have you ever had a cigar from the Philippines? The island nation started cranking out premium handmade cigars about two decades ago, and they’re certainly making a mark with brands like Double Happiness!The Double Happiness Cazadores isn’t the fanciest cigar in the world. You won’t need to wear a white glove and cut it with a solid gold cutter. What it is, however, is a solid, great tasting golden Connecticut wrapped short-filler cigar that’s perfect with your morning coffee or yardwork. Sold in super economical 50 count bundles for just pennies a stick, there’s no better way to get such great mellow-bodied gems for such a low price.",Mellow-Medium,['Toro'],Habano,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Philippines,No,,Toro,No,Connecticut,
Drew Estate & Caldwell All Out Kings,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"All Out Kings? Far out, man! It’d be hard to name a cigar that caused more buzz in the cigar world than All Out Kings. When Willy Herrera announced the cigars would be postponed further (in order to give them more aging time), people were going blue in the face in anticipation. Well wait no longer. All Out Kings is here. Put simply: if you’ve ever enjoyed a medium to full-bodied cigar, this one should be quickly placed at the top of your wish list. All Out Kings is a collaboration project between three of the hottest names in the industry today — Jonathan Drew, Willy Herrera, and Robert Caldwell. Here DE consistency and quality meets Caldwell’s immaculate attention to detail and flashy packaging in a match made in heaven. As for the cigar itself? It’s a dark, stalk-cut Connecticut Habano wrapped dream. Indonesian Sumatra binder and long-fillers from Nicaragua and the Dominican Republic combine to create a complex profile of cedar, warm, nutty notes, thick, cherry-like sweetness, and dry coca. Complex, delicious, and entirely unique, you can’t afford to skip this soon-to-be legend.  ",Medium-Full,['Torpedo'],"Indonesian, Sumatra","Connecticut, Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Torpedo,No,Habano Connecticut,Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Deadwood Tobacco Co.,Rated 4.7 out of 5, Based on 123 Ratings ,"A trifecta of awesomeness from DESweet Jane? I’m not sure if we’re talking about an awesome Saturday night, or the newest releases from Drew Estate, but either way, I’m in! Drew Estate has been at the top of the cigar game for years now, and with their newest line of cigars the success continues. Originally dubbed the Three Yummy Bitches, this series of cigars has recently been released to the masses and we couldn't be happier. The names are crazy, the packaging is bizarre, the sizes are … well, less-than-traditional, but if you know Drew Estate you’re already well aware that these are on the must-try list. With a maduro wrapper that’s exotic and aromatic, these cigars deliver wave after wave of delicious Drew Estate flavor. After the success of Liga Privada, Undercrown, ACID, Natural, and many more cigars, would you really doubt that these sticks are anything less than stellar? ",,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Indonesian,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Cigarillos, Corona, Gordo, Pyramid, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,"Brazilian, Maduro",Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Factory Smokes Connecticut Shade,Rated 4.26 out of 5, Based on 100 Ratings ,"Smooooooooth to the coreWhen most brands put out bundled cigars, they make them from the leftover remnants of their more premium products… not Drew Estate. No sir, these aren’t seconds or fumas, Factory Smokes are a blend designed specifically for the bundled space, delivering the ultimate combination of value and excellence from one of the original innovators in the game – Jonathan Drew of Drew Estate fame. Wrapped in a sleek and smooth Connecticut wrapper leaf overtop Indonesian binder, this one should have you grinning from ear to ear if you love burning a cigar while you mow the lawn, man the BBQ, or just chilling on your porch after another long day. The burn and draw are as crisp as you’d expect from the DE brand, delivering a crisp, clean profile with slight cedar, the faintest hints of black pepper, and a creamy core of natural tobacco flavor. Grab yourself a bundle today, and don’t look back – this is the future of bundled enjoyment.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Indonesian,Indonesian,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Factory Smokes Maduro,Rated 4.48 out of 5, Based on 283 Ratings ,"Upgrade your bundle! If there’s one wrapper that Drew Estate undoubtedly knows how to work with, it’s Maduro. Featured on the original Undercrown, as well as their world-famous Liga Privada lines, these guys have been slinging full-bodied, Maduro wrapped blends for as long as I can remember… Today, a new contender for the DE throne enters the ring – Factory Smokes Maduro, a bundled product that delivers the excellent flavor you’d expect from a Jonathan Drew release at a most wallet-friendly price tag. Offered up in four different sizes, Factory Smokes Maduro features a dark and oily wrapper overtop Indonesian binder. And let’s get one thing clear — these aren’t 2nds or Fumas. This is a blend specifically designed and crafted to innovate in the bundled space. The best cigar I’ve found par none for yard work or BBQ’ing, each Factory Smokes Maduro delivers a nice balance of espresso, dark chocolate, and slight black pepper at one helluva nice bargain.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Indonesian,Indonesian,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Maduro,Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Factory Smokes Sun Grown,Rated 4.28 out of 5, Based on 104 Ratings ,"Blessed by the sunWhen I tell the people there are new Drew Estate cigars being released, you better be ready to act fast. Seriously, in all my years working here, I’ve never seen a more loyal or dedicated fanbase than that of Drew Estate… and for good reason. Each cigar Jonathan Drew releases, from ACID to Liga Privada, is an absolute winner. Today, we’re looking at a blend that’s most certainly going to break our warehouse and fly off shelves — Drew Estate Factory Smokes Sun Grown. Now before you get the wrong idea, let me get one thing across: these Factory Smokes aren’t cheapo 2nds. No sir. Instead, they’ve been specifically blended and designed to land at your doorstep at a most wallet-friendly price that should keep the ol’ lady off your back and your humidor filled to the brim. Factory Smokes Sun Grown feature an oily and rich Sun Grown wrapper leaf overtop Indonesian binder. Take a puff, you’ll find loads of natural sweetness, along with a rich syrupy flavor and hints of baking spices. Drew Estate’s already made some of the best infused cigars in the world with ACID, plus some of the best traditional blends with Undercrown and Liga Privada… now, they’ve got their eyes on the bundled throne, and they’re representing with a game that’s pretty damn strong.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Indonesian,Indonesian,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Sun Grown,Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Factory Smokes Sweets,Rated 4.57 out of 5, Based on 293 Ratings ,"Upgrade your bundle! Drew Estate was founded in 1996 in New York City, and it seems Jonathan Drew, the founder, hasn’t slept for the last two decades. I don’t know how you could when you release as many innovative, game-changing cigars as this guy does. From Undercrown to Herrera Esteli, from ACID to Larutan, the Drew Estate domain is wide and strong, offering up a premium option in almost every aspect of the cigar world. Today, they expand their boundaries a little more with the introduction of a new line of budget-friendly, uber-flavorful bundles… the Factory Smokes. Up first, we’re checking out Factory Smokes Sweet, an option that cigar enthusiasts with a little sweet tooth should snap up ASAP. Inside each bundle of 20 is a sweet-tipped Habano wrapper overtop Indonesian binder. The flavor is sweet without being overwhelming, offering up a mouthwatering profile of crisp tobacco, creamy coffee, and slight hints of vanilla. Top-shelf flavors, without the high price tag… what’s not to love? ",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Indonesian,Indonesian,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Robusto, Toro",True,Habano,Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Florida Sun Grown,Rated 4.85 out of 5, Based on 20 Ratings ,"Florida's best!Drew Estate Florida Sun Grown Cigars is a project that began way back in 2011 and it is finally ready to please the masses. For nearly 175 years Florida had a rich history of growing tobacco, but that all ended around 1977 when tobacco companies started to relocate to different regions. Jeff Borysiewicz of Florida Sun Grown Farms, along with the fellas at Drew Estate, is here to change that by pushing the American tobacco movement in hopes that people will be excited to bring American tobacco agriculture back to the forefront. He spent a whole lot of time analyzing the temperatures, sun-light, wind, humidity and altitude that would bring his farm as close to the conditions of Pinar del Rio, Cuba as possible. And 5 years into this project, we finally have beautiful cigar to show for it. Florida Sun Grown is a full-bodied and decadent treat, with uniquely sweet and savory flavors highlighted by the Brazilian Mata Fina wrapper.",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Habano, Honduran","Nicaraguan, Sungrown",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Brazilian,Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Frenchies,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"Now we’re speakin’ the language of love.Drew Estate’s mantra is ‘The Rebirth of Cigars” and boy do they live up to it. They’ve transformed herfs everywhere, giving anyone who sits down with one of their premium cigars a truly unique experience. But what happens when you don’t have time for a full-on herf? Your coffee breaks and take-5's deserve a lil' sweet bliss too, and that’s where the Frenchies come in.Packed in your choice of tearstrip or non-tearstrip packaging for your carrying convenience is the iconic flavors of ACID or Tabak Especial, in an extremely compact 3.7” x 20 size. Normally sticks this tiny are made by a cold, soulless machine, but not the Frenchies. They’re all handmade in true Drew Estate form just like their larger counterparts. The name comes from the fact that French is the language of love, and Jonathan Drew is confident that you’re going to love these, and he wouldn’t steer you wrong.ACID Frenchies: A rich Sumatran wrapper over Nicaraguan fillers, imbued with delectable flavorings to provide a sweet, unique experience. Tabak Especial Frenchies: Fine Nicaraguan fillers are draped in a smooth Ecuador Connecticut wrapper, producing sweet coffee notes perfect for the morning cup o’ Joe. Note: The difference between tearstrip and non-tearstrip packaging is the type of cellophane. The pack itself and the cigars will be exactly the same.",,['Cigarillos'],,Nicaraguan,Varies,False,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,Cigarillos,Varies,"Ecuador Connecticut, Sumatra",Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Herrera Esteli Brazilian Maduro,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Big Willy goes to Brazil, returns with a tanThe Drew Estate team has built up quite a massive portfolio of impressive blends, and the face behind it all – Jonathan Drew – has become somewhat of a celebrity in this industry for good reason. The infused line of ACID cigars is a perennial best seller. And their traditional cigars have been praised by all the critics. When Willy Herrera joined team DE in 2013, he created the Herrera Esteli line and then followed it up with Herrera Esteli Norteno. Both have landed on top 25 Cigar lists and earned impressive 94-point ratings. Now, we welcome Herrera Esteli Brazilian Maduro with open arms. It comes wrapped in a dark, plantation grown Brazilian Mata Fina wrapper – a leaf typically used as a binder or in the filler. Applied on top, it provides pronounced floral and earthy flavors. Underneath is a Connecticut Broadleaf binder and long-fillers from Nicaragua. Overall, it’s a medium to full-bodied cigar with great flavor. The original Herreras are a tough act to follow, but this one stacks very up nicely. Good news! The Drew Estate Herrera Esteli Brazilian Maduro received an impressive 90-point rating, noting: “Enrobed in a dark and oily cover leaf, this well-made cigar burns evenly. It's a floral, earthy smoke with hints of vanilla, cedar wood and rhubarb.”",Medium-Full,"['Lonsdale', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Connecticut Broadleaf,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Lonsdale, Pyramid, Robusto, Toro",No,"Brazilian, Maduro",Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Herrera Esteli Habano,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Big Willy Style....Welcome Herrera Esteli cigars, the newest addition to join the ranks of Drew Estate's massive portfolio. As with the Liga and Undercrown lines, Herrera Esteli further solidifies Drew Estate's presence in non-infused, traditional cigars. This time, the story starts with Willy Herrera. He was a tobacco guru at the famed El Titan de Bronze factory in Miami, responsible for some of the most sought after and highly-rated handmades around. And once he combined forces with Drew Estate, he took like a duck to water. What you see here is the result of sampling and tweaking dozens upon dozens of blends, and the final process is as close to perfection as you can get. From the vintage Cuban-esque bands to the cabinet style box, Herrera Esteli screams Cuba. And the glue sealing the whole thing together is the blend. Oh-so-creamy, yet highly representative of Cuban cigars of old. It's got some oomph, but the flavors are delivered in such a velvety fashion the power is beautifully masked. Crisp, clean notes of spices, cedar, cream, and roasted nuts are the backbone, as occasional hints of white pepper and semi-sweet vanilla weave masterfully throughout. Initial puffs foreshadow a medium-bodied profile, but the slow burn begins to unveil a different story, as it inches toward a medium to full-bodied crescendo. If the Liga Privada series is a cup of black coffee, Herrera Esteli is without a doubt the ""with cream"" option. A handmade of the highest caliber, Herrera Esteli is going to turn some heads.In addition to multiple 93-ratings, Herrera Esteli received a well-deserved 94-rating as well as Top 25 honors for 2014, #8 overall. The panel noted: ""medium body, with notes of spice—both earthy and sweet—and a long, long finish.""NOTE: This is the original, 94-rated ""Herrera Esteli"". Drew Estate has added ""Habano"" to the name to distinguish it from later Herrera Esteli releases. ",Medium-Full,"['Lancero/Panatela', 'Lonsdale', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Lancero/Panatela, Lonsdale, Pyramid, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Ecuador Habano,Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Herrera Esteli Miami,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"More Herrera from MiamiDrew Estate has an impressive portfolio of cigars. From the infused ACID line to the traditional wares like Liga Privada and Undercrown, everything coming out of La Gran Fabrica Drew Estate in Nicaragua competes with the best in the industry. One of their finest cigars is without a doubt the 94-rated Herrera Esteli. In 2016 we saw an offshoot of the blend produced at master Blender Willy Herrera’s former factory, El Titan de Bronze, in Miami in a tasty Corona Gorda size. At the 2018 IPCPR show the blend went full scale releasing four new sizes. The core of the blend consists of Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers that are bunched up entubar style – an old Cuban technique that is very labor intensive but provides a great draw. It’s all held together by leaves from Ecuador. A Sumatra-seed leaf is used for the binder while a dark Ecuador Habano Oscuro wrapper lays overtop, secured by a triple seam cap. It’s a smooth full-bodied blend with flavors sweet cedar, earth, and espresso. Whether you tried the original Corona Gorda or not, you should check out these new sizes. They’re only rolled by level 9 rollers from Cuba so you can count on high quality construction and the flavors are fantastic. Good news! Herrera Esteli Miami has earned an impressive 93-point rating, noting: ""A toothy toro with the rich qualities of semi-sweet chocolate, cedar and almonds. Hints of orange peel add a pleasant pop of citrus to the espresso bean finish.""",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Lonsdale', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Sumatra,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Lonsdale, Pyramid, Robusto, Toro",No,"Ecuador Habano, Oscuro",Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Herrera Esteli Norteno,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"Herrera Esteli’s sophomore effort lives up to the hype!Willy Herrera began his craft as a small manufacturer in Little Havana, Miami and his talents quickly landed him a job as Drew Estate’s master blender. Drafting off of the success of his first release under the Drew Estate umbrella, Herrera Esteli Norteno has finally arrived. This new release pays homage to Esteli, Nicaragua – the home of Drew Estate and Herrera Esteli. Norteno, meaning “northerners” in Spanish, was chosen as the name due to people from Esteli being referred to as ‘Nortenos.’This full-bodied firecracker is no joke, boasting long-fillers from the fertile Nicaraguan growing regions of Jalapa and Esteli, both known for producing bold n’ hearty tobaccos. A Honduran binder cloaks these leaves with an oily San Andres Maduro wrapper draped over top. This long-anticipated release delivers bold notes of pepper and chocolate that endure to the finish and are backed by hints of cashew, cocoa, and espresso. Powerful, ultra-flavorful, and satisfying to the last puff, the second Herrera is easily as good as the first. And if you’ve tried the original, you know that says a hell of a lot. Drew Estate Herrera Esteli Norteno landed at #7 on the 2016 Top 25 Cigar list and received a well-deserved 94-rating, noting: ""It’s also rich with notes of raw cocoa bean, refined milk chocolate and nougat, yet maintains its earthy qualities without becoming too sweet.""​NOTE: Drew Estate Herrera Esteli Norteno has undergone a packaging update. They are now available in 25-count boxes and new sizes that reflect the same sizes as the rest of the Herrera Esteli line. The blend has not changed. ",Full,"['Corona Extra', 'Lonsdale', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Corona Extra, Lonsdale, Pyramid, Robusto, Toro",Varies,"Maduro, San Andres",Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Isla del Sol,Rated 4.65 out of 5, Based on 779 Ratings ,"Isla del Sol cigars: The best of both worlds.Yet another gem from Drew Estate's creative genius, Isla del Sol combines a deliciously infused Nicaraguan premium with an everyday price that can't be beat. Each cigar comes loaded with a rich blend of aged Nicaraguan tobaccos inside a beautiful, chocolate-brown, 'Sun-Blessed' Sumatra wrapper. Each of the filler leaves in Isla del Sol has been carefully infused with the enticing nuances of premium, Sumatran Mandheling Bean Coffee, while the wrapper is finished with a delightfully sweetened cap. Expect a rich, creamy core with ample notes of mocha and coffee, complemented by a luxurious aroma. Best of all, at this price, it'll be easy to enjoy the scrumptious flavors of Isla del Sol cigars on a daily basis.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,True,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Cigarillos, Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Yes,Sumatra,Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Larutan,Rated 4.66 out of 5, Based on 32 Ratings ,"Outstanding!The Larutan cigar line by Drew Estate is a cigar you have to try. Each is handmade in Esteli, Nicaragua with a host of different gourmet long-leaf tobaccos from Syria, Haiti, Turkey, Dominican Republic and St. James Parish. Exceptional draw leading to incomparable flavor. These cigars impart a unique, distinctive taste which you won’t find anywhere else.Each size in the line is a different blend and therefore offers a very distinct flavor profile. Below is a quick summary of each different size:Larutan By Drew Estate:Big Jucy: an extra-big, extra-juicy, Jucy LucyClean Robusto: naturally sweet and richDark Angel: a chunky torpedo with a rich, sweet, and complex medium-full flavor.Dirt: black as night; delicately seasoned; hints of mochaDirt Torpedo: a bigger, dirtier version of the Dirt in a Torpedo sizeEnglish: medium to full with superior balance in richness and sweetnessEgg: an intriguing flavor, aroma, and rabbit-in-a-snake appearanceJucy Lucy: Cameroon wrapper; small size; hint of caramel, smoothMedusa: a funky culebra offering 3 rich, mocha-filled cigars in one.""NDB"": a 7""x44 lonsdale version of Dirt. Natural Dirt Blend.Root: mocha cappuccino taste; hearty flavorsRoot Deluxe: a 6""x50 version of the Root that comes individually tubedShorty: dark, slightly sweet, and rich. Hints of mocha and chocolate.Larutan LTD. by Drew Estate: A series of limited edition offerings designed to create unique experiences unlike anything else in the Larutan line. Click below to learn more about each blend. Ltd. Irish Hops: dark, rich, creamy, with a sweet finish; complex and medium in body.Ltd. Pimp Stick: Cameroon wrapper; medium-bodied, major flavor; exotic blend; rich, smooth, subtle",,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Figurado', 'Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Cigarillos, Corona, Double Corona, Figurado, Perfecto, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,"Cameroon, Connecticut Broadleaf, Indonesian, Sumatra",Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Larutan Ltd. Irish Hops,Rated 4.9 out of 5, Based on 39 Ratings ,"I heard they recently decided to add more ""Hops"" to it!The Larutan Ltd. Line is a series of small-batch additions to Drew Estate’s immensely popular Larutan line. Here, Jonathan Drew is able to be as creative as he wants, working with his best partners to create entirely unique blends that serve perfectly as limited-edition pieces. Here, we are proud to present Irish Hops, an exotic mixture of unique tobaccos. Irish Hops is a complex, medium-bodied cigar that’s rich, silky-smooth, creamy, sweet and booming with bold flavors. Produced in one vitola (a 6” x 52 Toro) Irish Hops utilizes Brazilian and Nicaraguan long-fillers that have been patiently aged, and masterfully blended together. On top, you’ll discover a dark and oily San Andres Negra wrapper leaf from Mexico. Toast Irish Hops and find notes of coffee, cream, and a rich tobacco core.NOTE: These cigars used to be called ""Natural"" instead of Larutan. The blend has not changed. Both old packaging and new packaging are available. ",Medium,['Toro'],Connecticut Broadleaf,"Brazilian, Nicaraguan, Varied",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,Yes,"Brazilian, Maduro, San Andres",Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Larutan Ltd. Pimp Sticks,Rated 4.78 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"Keep your Pimp Stick strong!Larutan Ltd. Is a small-batch extension of Drew Estate’s beloved Natural line that takes Jonathan Drew’s creative genius to the extreme. At play here are some of the world’s finest and most exotic tobaccos, expertly blended to generate a luxurious taste sensation unlike any other on the planet. First up in this limited edition series is Pimp Sticks, a blend that’s causing BIG waves with DE lovers.Pimp Sticks comes in one size, and one size only — a 6” x 52 perfecto that’s hand-rolled with various strains of Dutch tobaccos, long-fillers cultivated from the black soils of Esteli, Nicaragua, and a gorgeous, toothy Cameroon wrapper leaf. This cigar offers up an exotic blend and an unparalled burn. It’s incredibly rich, smooth and subtle, yet bursts out with a big bouquet of flavor.NOTE: This cigar used to be called 'Natural' instead of Larutan. The blend has not changed. Both old and new packaging are available. ",Medium,['Perfecto'],,"Nicaraguan, Varied",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Perfecto,Yes,Cameroon,Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Liga Privada No. 9,Rated 4.74 out of 5, Based on 121 Ratings ,"Drew Estate's finest, period.Liga Privada No. 9 is a cigar you must try. The wrapper alone will make your mouth water...a jet-black Oscuro leaf that's toothy, oily, and a marvel to look at. Underneath, aged long-fillers from seven different farms unite, creating a bold and complex bouquet. However, an extra year's worth of aging has morphed this tasty creature into a rich, meaty cigar with various notes of toast, coffee, and chocolate into a smooth, satisfying experience. Full-bodied but silky from start to finish, the Liga Privada No. 9 is a gem. Check out the reviews for your Drew Estate's Liga Privada No. 9 and try a sampler to get you started.Liga Privada No. 9 was honored with Top 25 honors for 2015 (#10 overall) and received a well-deserved 94-rating noting: ""complex range of strong earthy flavors, a sweet quality redolent of perique tobacco and a sweet tarry finish.""Note: Only the best rollers are used to ensure a perfectly constructed, utterly consistent product. For that reason, production is extremely limited and this product will be out of stock often. However, we work closely with Drew Estate to ensure availability is maximized. This cigar comes in both cellophane and non-cellophane packaging.",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona Extra', 'Double Corona', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Perfecto', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Brazil,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Cigarillos, Corona Extra, Double Corona, Lancero/Panatela, Perfecto, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Oscuro",Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Liga Privada T52,Rated 4.82 out of 5, Based on 49 Ratings ,"In a Liga of its own. The new Liga Privada T52 is the highly anticipated follow up to the coveted Liga Privada No. 9 by Drew Estate. The T52 employs a unique stalk-cut Sungrown Habano wrapper overtop a signature recipe of seven different varieties of tobacco. On the outside, the stalk-cut wrapper is exquisite....dark, reddish-brown and glistening with oils. After rolling T52 is aged one full year, resulting in a brilliant array of complex nuances. Bold, distinct and loaded with notes of leather, earth, spices and black pepper, T52 is robust and satisfying. Drew Estate Liga Privada T52 received a well-deserved 92-rating noting: ""A dark, oily robusto packed with full-bodied tobacco, though it burns and draws evenly. The smoke is bold with cedar and leather while touches of orange peel and acidity come through on the palate.""NOTE: Just like Liga Privada No. 9, only the best rollers are used to ensure a perfectly constructed, utterly consistent product. T52 production is extremely limited. Liga Privada T52 cigars come in both cellophane and non-cellophane packaging.",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona Extra', 'Double Corona', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Perfecto', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Brazil,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Belicoso, Cigarillos, Corona Extra, Double Corona, Lancero/Panatela, Perfecto, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,"Habano Connecticut, Sun Grown",Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Liga Privada Unico Series,Rated 4.74 out of 5, Based on 43 Ratings ,"A league of their ownIn an endless search for the perfect cigar, Drew Estate cranks out hundreds of different blends and vitolas of the Liga Privada line. While most samples are dismissed, only a select chosen ones are privileged enough to have that tacky red velvet rope unclipped and stroll past the bouncer into the Liga Privada (Private League). Such distinct blends are so rare, that they couldn’t be made into their own stand-alone line. And, thus Liga Privada Unico Serie was created, an exclusive league for these unique cigars that are perfect in flavor and aroma to call home. Each premium is different in size and blend From Dirty Rat and Feral Flying Pig to Papas Fritas. All are extremely limited and exceptionally delicious. ",Full,"['Corona', 'Corona Especial', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto']",Brazil,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Corona Especial, Lancero/Panatela, Pyramid, Robusto",No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Habano Connecticut, Maduro",Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate MUWAT,Rated 4.53 out of 5, Based on 289 Ratings ,"How much does your cigar weigh?Introducing Jonathan Drew's latest creation, MUWAT - a most excellent edition to Drew Estate's Subculture Studio. This joint project with Joya de Nicaragua is medium to full in body, and boasts a husky series of 60-ring vitolas booming with flavor. Dark and oily San Andres maduro wrappers conceal a hefty dose of Nicaraguan and Brazilian long-fillers secured by a smooth Connecticut 'Capote' binder. The cigar is hearty and rich, unveiling a deep series of bold yet balanced flavors from start to finish. Layered with complexity - earth, leather, pepper, sweetness, cocoa - the massive 60-ring frame is the ultimate vehicle to savor each of these complex intricacies throughout the slow and cool burn.",Medium,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",,"Brazilian, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Robusto",No,San Andres,Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate MUWAT Kentucky Fire Cured,Rated 4.6 out of 5, Based on 619 Ratings ,"Generally speaking, the offerings in the Drew Estate portfolio are pretty unique. That has a lot to do with why the brand is so damn popular to begin with. But now this latest line extension to MUWAT has taken things to a whole new level, taste-wise. This phrase gets thrown around a lot, but this time it couldn’t be more accurate – you’ve never tasted anything like this before.The biggest difference with Kentucky Fire-Cured is the inclusion of – you guessed it! – American fire-cured tobacco leaves from Kentucky and Virginia. While normally tobacco is air-cured, these special leaves are left to hang in specially-constructed curing barns, a process that dates back more than 200 years and that imbues each leaf with a rich, smoky, slightly sweet flavor that boasts exceptional balance and uniqueness. Notes of oak, hickory, and maple-laced sweetness explode on the palate. These leaves are joined by Nicaraguan and Brazilian Mata Fina long-fillers along with an oily San Andres maduro wrapper. This finished product is like nothing else on the market. Been looking for a totally uncommon taste experience that’ll blow your hair back? You just found it. Want something really special? The Kentucky Fire Cured Swamp Rat and Swamp Thang from Drew Estate offer a half-Candela experience for another fantastic addition to the DE profile. Learn more here. ",Medium,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Kentucky Fire-Cured, Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Cigarillos, Corona, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Perfecto, Robusto, Toro",No,Kentucky Fire-Cured,Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate MUWAT Kentucky Fire Cured Sweets,Rated 4.59 out of 5, Based on 22 Ratings ,"Sweet thangGenerally speaking, the offerings in the Drew Estate portfolio are pretty unique. That has a lot to do with why the brand is so damn popular to begin with. Their Kentucky Fire Cured Line took things to a whole new level. Taking fire cured tobacco grown in Hopkinsville, Kentucky and blending it with leaves from Nicaragua created a blend the premium cigar market had never seen before. And now, applying a sweet cap, Drew Estate MUWAT Kentucky Fire Cured Sweets add a whole new dimension to this fan favorite cigar. The fire cured tobacco used in this blend is a rarity in premium cigars. While normally tobacco is air-cured, these special leaves are left to hang in specially-constructed curing barns, a process that dates back more than 200 years and that imbues each leaf with a rich, smoky, slightly sweet flavor that boasts exceptional balance and uniqueness. Notes of oak, hickory, and maple-laced sweetness explode on the palate. These leaves are joined by Nicaraguan and Brazilian Mata Fina long-fillers along with an oily San Andres maduro wrapper. The sweetened cap provides a whole new mouthfeel to this cigar. Flavors of bacon, maple, bourbon and barbeque cling to the palate. In Jonathan Drew’s own words “You gonna freak out when you try this hometown hero.”",Medium-Full,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Connecticut Broadleaf,"Kentucky Fire-Cured, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Cigarillos, Corona, Robusto, Toro",Varies,San Andres,Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Nica Rustica,Rated 4.77 out of 5, Based on 113 Ratings ,"Rough ‘n’ ready.Some cigars pride themselves on balance and complexity. And some cigars crank the dial up to 11. Nica Rustica is firmly in the latter category. Blended specifically to deliver a huge blast of flavor on every single draw, Nica Rustica is a full-bodied cigar lover's dream come true.Nica Rustica utilizes a dark Connecticut Broadleaf Maduro wrapper that’s got real character. On the inside, a blend of Nicaraguan long-fillers from Esteli and Jalapa are nestled inside a Mexican San Andres Negro binder. The flavor is spicy and robust, contributing perfectly to the overall feel of rustic charm. Notes of spice and coffee linger on the palate, and that intense finish you notice is purely intentional. From the pigtail cap to the covered foot this handmade was crafted to be enjoyed time after time.Nica Rustica has recently earned a 90-rating, with the review stating, ""A blackish cigar applied with a sloppy pigtail cap. Its toasty coffee bean character also has an earthy quality enlivened by an herbal anise note.""",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro']",Mexican,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Short Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Tabak Especial,Rated 4.81 out of 5, Based on 1004 Ratings ,"​Half cigar, half coffee. All amazing.Drew Estate cannot be touched when it comes to top-caliber infused cigars with deliciously unique aromas. With Tabak Especial they’ve taken the coffee-infused cigar to bold new heights that thrill the taste buds. Jonathan Drew has carefully influenced Esteli-grown long-filler tobaccos with the robust nuances of Nicaragua’s finest coffee beans. The result is a rich tobacco core layered with savory espresso notes and a touch of milk chocolate, all perfectly balanced by by a sweet, velvety aftertaste.The regular Tabak Especial is available in:Dulce: a silky shade grown Connecticut wrapperNegra: a dark broadleaf maduro-wrapped beautyOr, enjoy the Limited Edition versions of Tabak:Cafe con Leche: a fusion of Connecticut and Dark BroadleafRed Eye: features three times the ligero of the normal blend",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Lonsdale', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,True,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Belicoso, Cigarillos, Corona, Gordo, Lonsdale, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",Varies,"Connecticut, Connecticut Broadleaf, Ecuador Connecticut, Maduro",Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Tabak Especial Limited Red Eye,Rated 4.83 out of 5, Based on 210 Ratings ,"The ultimate coffee infusion by Drew Estate.Drew Estate Tabak Especial is a fantastic infusion of Nicaragua’s best coffee beans and aged, Esteli-grown long-fillers. This infusion process leads to a uniquely sweet and satisfying coffee flavor that's rich beyond measure. Red Eye improves upon this blend even more, offering a stout-maduro wrapped version of this mastermind blend.Drew Estate Tabak Especial Red Eye is a serious handmade for serious cigar lovers. Here, the blenders at Drew Estate tripled the amount of ligero at play while maintaining a slight influence of rich coffee subtleties throughout the blend. A rich core of black tobacco flavors and bold earthy undertones is met with subtle hints of coffee and sweetness. Medium to full-bodied and savory with every last puff, Tabak Especial Red Eye is a work of art to be enjoyed by the conventional and unconventional alike.",Medium,['Robusto'],,Nicaraguan,True,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Robusto,Yes,Connecticut Broadleaf,Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Tabak Especial Ltd. Cafe Con Leche,Rated 4.81 out of 5, Based on 539 Ratings ,"​The ultimate coffee infusion by Drew Estate.Drew Estate Tabak Especial is a delicious infusion of Nicaragua’s finest coffee beans and aged, Esteli-grown long-fillers. This infusion results in a rich tobacco core layered by savory notes of espresso and milk chocolate, finished by a sweet, velvety aftertaste. So how do you make a masterpiece blend even better? You create some special edition, highly-sought-after versions of the famed cigar.The Cafe con Leche is a special, limited production size that employs two premium wrappers to generate a wealth of exquisitely satisfying nuances and aromas. Both the foot and head of the cigar are cloaked with a dark Connecticut Broadleaf maduro, while the center of the cigar utilizes a silky shade-grown Connecticut leaf. Complexity is an understatement, as this cigar unloads a bold series of rich and creamy sensations throughout the slow burn.",Medium,['Belicoso'],,Nicaraguan,True,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Belicoso,Yes,"Ecuador Connecticut, Maduro",Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Undercrown Dojo Dogma,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Doggone goodThe Drew Estate brand needs no introduction. Everyone is aware of this disruptive company with an expansive portfolio of top-notch cigars. The 91-rated original Undercrown blend is easily one of their best. In 2014 we saw an amped up, limited edition, offshoot of the blend that was only available in certain parts of the country. After a lot of success, Drew Estate has decided to take this special edition cigar full scale – enter Drew Estate Undercrown Dojo Dogma.  Dojo Dogma comes in one specially crafted size, a 6” x 56 box-pressed vitola packaged in soft packs of 10. The outer leaf is a dark Mexican San Andres wrapper. Underneath is a hearty core of Nicaraguan and Brazilian Mata Fina long-fillers, bound by a Connecticut Stalk Cut Habano leaf. It makes for a stronger, more full-bodied version of the classic Undercrown blend. The output is generous and provides rich flavors of chocolate, coffee, and a sweet vanilla finish. Whether you were able to get your hands on this generous cigar in previous years or not, be sure to try out a pack of these beauties ASAP. ",Full,['Gordo'],"Connecticut, Habano","Brazilian, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,Gordo,No,San Andres,Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Undercrown Maduro,Rated 4.65 out of 5, Based on 410 Ratings ,"A high-end cigar for the working man.Normally known for their infused cigars, Drew Estate’s made a huge splash with their traditional Liga Privada #9. A favorite amongst the factory’s rollers, Drew Estate had to tell the rollers to stop burning the blend because of the high demand of the cigar. So the working man had to adapt…And adapt they did. Created by the rollers of the Drew Estate factory, Undercrown uses tobaccos similar to the Liga Privada #9 but that are more readily available. While the Liga Privada #9 is full flavored treat, the Undercrown is a notch down in strength. Wrapped in a dark San Andres maduro wrapper, Drew Estate Undercrown starts with notes of coffee with a slight hint of spice that becomes more prominent as the cigar progresses. Even as it progresses, the cigar still manages to round out as a medium to full-bodied treat.Drew Estate Undercrown received a well-deserved 91-rating, earning a spot in the Top 25 Cigars of 2017. The reviewers noted, ""shows a strong oaky, leather character finessed by hints of vanilla and a roasted coffee bean finish.""",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona Extra', 'Double Corona', 'Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Connecticut, Habano","Brazilian, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Cigarillos, Corona Extra, Double Corona, Gordo, Perfecto, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",Varies,"Maduro, San Andres",Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Undercrown Shade,Rated 4.57 out of 5, Based on 131 Ratings ,"A smoother shade of Undercrown.Drew Estate Undercrown is the blue collar Liga Privada 9, created by the factory rollers when due to overwhelming demand, they were stopped from burning the Liga 9. Drew Estate’s master blender, Willy Herrera, challenged the rollers to come up with a Connecticut based blend that would satisfy his palate, and with his input and assistance, the Undercrown Shade came into being. Undercrown Shade is flavorful and balanced, with an Ecuadoran Connecticut wrapper atop a Sumatran binder and Dominican criollo 98’ and Nicaraguan corojo and criollo long-fillers. Mellow to medium-bodied, the blend is rich, complex, and balanced, bringing flavors of toast, nuts, subtle spice, and cream with an enjoyable sweetness with the finish. This is a mellow cigar that will surprise and fascinate the full-bodied enthusiast.Check out the new Suprema size of the Undercrown Shade in a 6"" x 54 perfecto shape! This limited edition release comes in boxes of 5, and produces slightly bolder flavors than the original.Undercrown Shade was recently honored as a fantastic cigar with a 91-rating. The review stated, ""It's a bright and creamy... zesty with touches of lemon peel and dried orange. It's also sweet, with a very prominent note of honey on the palate.""",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Sumatra,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Cigarillos, Corona, Double Corona, Gordo, Perfecto, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Ecuador Connecticut,Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Undercrown ShadyXX,Rated 4.75 out of 5,,"Will the real Undercrown Shady please stand up?Jonathan Drew and Eminem might hold very different occupations, but their stories share some important similarities. Neither one was born into their roles or took their place in a family dynasty. They both came from modest beginnings and through blood, sweat, and tears, rose through the ranks in industries that didn’t exactly lay out a welcome mat for them. Now that Drew Estate and Shady Records (Eminem and manager Paul Rosenberg’s record label) are both twenty years old, the time is right for a large-scale collaboration between these two legends.The blend should be familiar, a version of the famed Undercrown Maduro line, using the same anatomy and personally approved by Paul Rosenberg. Beneath a deep, dark Mexican San Andres wrapper lies a Connecticut Habano binder and fillers from Nicaragua and Brazil. This 5” x 50 box-pressed belicoso brings full bodied notes of chocolate, earth, and leather, with a nice amount of pepper to liven things up, and a lasting finish. This is actually the third collaboration between Drew Estate and Shady Records, but the first one to see regular production and national distribution. You used to have to live in Eminem’s home town of Detroit to get your hands on one of these, so don’t wait to grab a bundle of Undercrown ShadyXX. ",Full,['Belicoso'],Habano,"Brazilian, Nicaraguan",False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,True,,Belicoso,False,San Andres,Drew Estate Cigars
Drew Estate Undercrown Sun Grown,Rated 4.69 out of 5, Based on 71 Ratings ,"The Sun shines brightly on UndercrownWay back in 2011, Drew Estate released a cigar called Undercrown. This blend was created by the rollers in the factory after they were told they could no longer enjoy the Liga Privada #9 blend due to heavy demand. This Undercrown blend eventually made it into full production and we are glad it did. After claiming a mass of fans and a noteworthy 90-rating, Drew Estate decided to follow it up with the Undercrown Shade - a Connecticut wrapped lovely. This cigar too made big waves in the industry, claiming a well-deserved 91-rating. Now, Drew Estate delivers what we've all been waiting for - Undercrown Sun Grown, the third installment of the Undercrown line. This blend is a balancing act of natural sweetness, courtesy of the Sun Grown wrapper, paired with a power house blend of Nicaraguan fillers. The result is a spicy and robust cigar with a long complex finish. Full-bodied to the brim, and delectably flavorful, don't be surprised when you see Undercrown Sun Grown earning some 90+ ratings of its own in due time.Good news, Drew Estate Undercrown Sun Grown has received a well-deserved 92-rating, noting: ""Thick and hefty, this fat cigar has a lush draw and even burn that delivers rich notes of leather, spicy wood and espresso froth. The long finish hints of cinnamon.""",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Connecticut, Habano",Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Cigarillos, Corona, Double Corona, Gordo, Perfecto, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Sumatra,Drew Estate Cigars
Dunhill 1907,Rated 3.88 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"What were you doing in 1907?If your name happens to be Alfred Dunhill, then the answer to that question is simple: “Launching a tobacco brand that will stand the test of time.” With the release of Dunhill 1907, a nod to this all-important point in history, the past is well honored and the future has never looked brighter. Each medium-bodied handmade includes a fine blend of Dominican ligero and Brazilian Mata Fina filler, all encased in a Dominican binder and a smooth, blemish-free Honduran wrapper. Here’s your chance to experience a true legend for yourself.",Medium,['Rothschild'],Dominican,"Brazilian, Dominican",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Rothschild,No,Honduran,Dunhill
Dunhill Aged Maduro,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Experience the dark side of Dunhill...Crafted with the maduro lover in mind, Dunhill Aged Maduro is the deeper, more delicious counterpart to the top-selling Aged Dominican line. Featuring a Sun Grown Ligero Maduro wrapper surrounding a blend of Nicaragua and the Dominican's best leaf, this instant classic is topped off with a long cedar nap to create a harmonious, balanced taste. A long time coming from an industry icon. Go ahead and step into the dark side!",Medium,['Corona'],Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Corona,No,Ligero,Dunhill
Dunhill Heritage,Rated 4.26 out of 5, Based on 34 Ratings ,"A transcendent nod to Dunhill’s past.Where did Winston Churchill and King George VI buy their cigars? Dunhill. The name is legendary and their cigars are among the most sought after and respected in the industry. With their newest release, Dunhill Heritage, the company celebrates their hard earned status and pays homage to Cuban heritage. Dunhill Heritage is the 1st full-bodied cigar from the prestigious brand, and it doesn’t disappoint. Coming draped in an Ecuadoran Habano ligero wrapper, with a Nicaraguan Jalapa binder and a mix of long-fillers from Ometepe and Esteli, Nicaragua and the Jamastran Valley, Honduras, this tasty treat is a bona fide flavor bomb. Hearty essences of spice and pepper hit the palate upon lighting before flavors of graham cracker, cocoa, coffee, and cedar settle in. Don’t miss your chance to try this exquisite full-bodied cigar from a legendary brand. Dunhill Heritage received Top 25 honors for 2015 and an impressive 93-rating noting: ""covered in an Ecuadoran Habano wrapper, the rest of this cigar is full of meaty, peppery Nicaraguan and Honduran tobacco.""​",Full,['Toro'],Nicaraguan,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Toro,No,Ecuador Habano,Dunhill
Duque,Rated 3.8 out of 5, Based on 93 Ratings ,"Pronounced ""du-kay""When you think of delicious, everyday-value handmade cigars, I bet Duque isn't the first name to come to your mind. Hell, it might not even pop into your head at all. I certainly hadn't heard of it when I got a bundle on my desk to sample, but since burning a few of 'em down, it's a name I'll never forget. Is it my new favorite? Definitely not. Do I reach for them any time I just need something tasty to puff on while I do chores, or when I might not have time for a full stogie? You betcha! The Sumatra wrapper and Dominican Cuban-Sandwich style filler just manage to hit the spot time and time again, and once you give 'em a try, I'm sure you'll keep your humidor stocked with them too!",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,Sumatra,
Duque,Rated 3.67 out of 5, Based on 72 Ratings ,"Pronounced ""du-kay""Duque is a decent everyday cheapie handmade. Made with Sumatra wrappers and a 'Cuban Sandwich' blend of Dominican tobaccos, Duque is mellow in body and it sure beats a sharp stick in the eye.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Toro, Torpedo",No,Sumatra,
Dutch Masters,Rated 4.2 out of 5, Based on 30 Ratings ,"The masters!Dutch Masters have been sold in the United States since 1911, but let's be real - if you're here, you don't need me to tell you why people love Dutch Masters. You already know. Made with Cuban-seed tobacco leaves and released in a wide variety of wrappers and flavors, Dutch Masters have a rich, mature tobacco flavor and a relaxing, mellow aroma.",Mellow,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona']",,,False,No,More Details,United States,No,,"Cigarillos, Corona",Varies,Indonesian,
E.P. Carrillo 5th Year Anniversary,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Hats off to E.P. Carrillo While E.P. Carrillo has been in the cigar biz for nearly 50 years, his own brand of cigars E.P. Carrillo is a tad bit younger. Since its launch in 2009 with Ernesto’s children Lissette and Ernesto III, E.P. Carrillo has produced a successful portfolio of high-quality cigars. Marking the 5-year-anniversary of the premier line, Ernesto created a premium for the occasion. Celebrate with this strong profiled 5th Year Anniversary cigar. Cloaked in an oily Ecuadorian Sumatra wrapper this celebratory stick is filled with tobaccos from Esteli, Condega, and Jalapa, Nicaragua. Toast and light your cigar to E.P. Carrillo’s success, and experience a handmade full of notes of white pepper, creaminess, robust coffee, earthiness, and oak.  ",Medium,['Double Robusto'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Double Robusto,No,Ecuador Sumatra,E.P. Carrillo
E.P. Carrillo Capa de Sol,Rated 4.83 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"Soak up some rays with E.P. CarrilloWith a plethora of well-acclaimed cigars under his belt, E.P. Carrillo is recognized as a master of his craft. He continues to crank out successful premiums, and his latest release, E.P. Carrillo Capa de Sol cigars are hot. I don’t mean that figuratively, the name actually means ‘wrapper of the sun.’So naturally, the renowned Ernesto Carrillo, comprised this sun-kissed premium with an oily sun-grown Ecuadorian wrapper coating a blend of aged Nicaraguan fillers and binders. Rolled to perfection, this full-bodied Capa de Sol will entice your taste buds with notes of cashews, wood, leather, earth, and hints of cayenne spice. Pull up a chair…you’re gonna need it for this heavy-hitter…it’ll take you on a heck of a ride. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Pyramid, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,E.P. Carrillo
E.P. Carrillo Cardinal Impact Maduro,Rated 4.5 out of 5,,"A dark classic remasteredYou know the old saying if it ain’t broke don’t fix it? Well in Ernesto Perez-Carrillo’s case, it pays to not take good ol’ sound advice. The renowned master in the art of cigars threw that adage out the window and upgraded his entire portfolio including E.P. Carrillo Cardinal.  Behold the new E.P. Carrillo Cardinal Impact Maduro part of the Classic series. Upgrading to a box-pressed cigar, Cardinal Impact received brand spanking new banding and packaging. Get a glimpse, and indulge in the sleek Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper covering Nicaraguan filler and an Ecuadorian binder of the Cardinal Impact Maduro. ",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Robusto,No,Connecticut Broadleaf,E.P. Carrillo
E.P. Carrillo Cardinal Impact Natural,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Back better than beforeIt’s a pretty bold move to revamp your entire cigar line. If anyone can pull it off, Ernesto Perez-Carrillo is the man. Founder of the El Credito Cigar Company, a manufacturer of the famous La Gloria Cubana brand, and now head honcho of the EPC Cigar Company, Ernesto has certainly made a name for himself in the cigar industry. He’s shaking things up in his portfolio to stay on top of the game.Some of his changes for starters is upgrading the E.P. Carrillo Cardinal to Cardinal Impact as part of the Classics series. Now in a box-pressed offering, Cardinal Impact received new branding and packaging. Featuring an Ecuadorian Sumatra wrapper draped over Nicaraguan filler and binder that delivers a full-bodied profile of fig, earth, and cocoa, Cardinal Impact Natural is a great cigar with a great new look. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Ecuador Sumatra,E.P. Carrillo
E.P. Carrillo Core Plus Maduro,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"A better-balanced coreIt’s no secret that Ernesto Perez Carrillo of La Gloria Cubana and E.P. Carrillo can blend a fine cigar. And he’s done it again with the highly anticipated flagship line for E.P.C. cigars, Core Plus. Part of the Classics series, this Maduro is a great everyday cigar that’s easy on the wallet. Especially when you get these premiums from your friends at CI. Blended to produce a great flavor you can enjoy every day, Core Plus Maduro features an American Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper covering Nicaraguan fillers held together with an Ecuadorian binder. A perfectly balanced cigar to enjoy time and time again, Core Plus Maduro is a great selection for your humidor.Good News! E.P. Carillo Core Plus Maduro has earned an outstanding 93-point rating in 2019. The review noted: ""As this dark, toothy Churchill burns, chocolatey and nutty impressions unfold around a hearty core of wood. The draw is open, the burn, quite even.""",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,E.P. Carrillo
E.P. Carrillo Core Plus Natural,Rated 4.25 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"We want more E.P. Carrillo CoreCreator of the legendary La Gloria Cubana cigar brand, Ernesto Perez-Carrillo has evolved his E.P. Carrillo brand from the core. Building on the success of his original E.P. Carrillo Core cigar, Core Plus is a strong extension of the Classic series. Core Plus is carefully exercised to deliver a beautiful physique. Crafted from the finest two to five-year-old Nicaraguan filler tobaccos and flashing a three-year-aged Ecuadorian-grown Sumatra wrapper, this E.P. Carrillo cigar is in top shape. A masterpiece blend, Core Plus offers flavors of cream, coffee, chocolate, and woody notes paired with a sweet and spicy aroma. ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Sumatra,E.P. Carrillo
E.P. Carrillo Dark Rituals,Rated 4.33 out of 5, Based on 57 Ratings ,"A masterpiece returns. In 2011, Dark Rituals quickly made plenty of fans during its very brief time in E.P. Carrillo’s Edicion Limitada series. And then it was gone, sold out and leaving everyone clamoring for more...Now, the brand is back and burning better than ever. Known as Dark Rituals, this rich and powerful handmade comes dressed in an absolutely gorgeous Connecticut Broadleaf maduro wrapper extra-fermented to achieve a pitch-black hue and oily sheen. Beneath the hood, a robust blend of Nicaraguan long-fillers is combined inside a feisty Ecuadorian binder. The cigar is exceedingly complex and eventful, unveiling expertly balanced notes of dark tobacco, roasted coffee bean, and leather with a hefty dose of hearty but semi-sweet spices throughout the chewy bouquet. ​",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Sumatra,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Maduro",E.P. Carrillo
E.P. Carrillo Dusk,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Have an E.P. Carrillo from dusk to dawnThe man responsible for some of the most sought-after premium cigars on the market today, Ernesto Perez-Carrillo has revamped his superb portfolio and crafted another masterpiece. Classified in his new Classic series Dusk features a dark brown United States wrapper enveloping a collection of handpicked aged filler tobaccos. A milky way of creamy smooth richness, Dusk sets dark coffee, cedar, nut, sweet raisin, mocha, and a pinch of pepper on your palate. Plan your evening right with this superb Maduro. Dusk is a delightful cigar for beginner and experienced cigar enthusiasts alike. E.P. Carrillos Dusk has received a 92-rating with a spot in the Top 25 Cigars of 2017. The reviewers noted, ""Its three country blend elegantly transitions from notes of black pepper and salted nuts to sweeter sensations of graham cracker and raisins."" ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,E.P. Carrillo
E.P. Carrillo Elencos,Rated 4.63 out of 5,,"E.P. Carrillo Limitada 2010 is back....kind of.
Wish you had gotten your hands on more of the E.P. Carrillo Limitada 2010? Or maybe you’re kicking yourself for not trying one? You can put those worries to rest because the new E.P. Carrillo Elencos, is the same blend as the famed E.P. Carrillo Limitada 2010. That’s right; the blend is the exact same previously found in the cigar that garnered a 94 rating from Cigar Aficionado, systematically earning a spot in the magazine’s illustrious Top 25 Cigars of the Year for 2010. (Number eight to be exact, for all the sticklers out there) Crafted by industry great Ernesto Perez-Carrillo, originally of La Gloria Cubana fame, the Elencos is a welcomed fixture in the great portfolio that is E.P. Carrillo. 
E.P. Carrillo Elencos is a full-bodied, full flavored handmade that picks up right where the Limitada left off. This lovely handmade features a Brazilian Habano wrapper oozing with oily goodness. This succulent leaf is dark and inviting, sitting atop a well-aged selection of Nicaraguan long-fillers and Dominican binder. The smoke is rich and complex, projecting a satisfying bevy of flavors to the palate. Shining through the rich smoke are meaty notes of cedar and dried fruit complemented by a seamless balance of spice. Highly enjoyable, and a pleasure to smoke, the new Elencos is a beautiful representation of Ernesto Perez-Carrillo’s talents. ",Medium-Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Brazilian,E.P. Carrillo
E.P. Carrillo Encore,Rated 4.86 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"Can I get an encore, do you want more? Way back at the IPCPR in 2016, E.P. Carrillo teased the second release in their Family line, the Encore. Since then, we’ve been waiting. Here’s a quick refresher course for those lagging behind: the first release in Carrillo’s Family Series, La Historia, was named the #2 Cigar of the Year and received an astounding 95-rating. Needless to say, Encore’s got some big boots to fill.Here’s the good news: we most eagerly sampled a batch of Encores a few weeks back, and the feedback was unanimous. This cigar is an instant classic. The secret’s in the sauce: Encore features all Nicaraguan tobacco that’s been aged and married in tercios together for two years. The result is a balance and elegance unrivaled in the industry. Encore encapsulates complexity, delivering a luscious profile ripe with soft tobacco notes, slight cedar, baking spices, and hints of sweetness. Destined for 90+ ratings, get aboard Encore now.We told you this one was destined for greatness! E.P. Carrillo Encore has received an unrivaled 96-point rating and was named the #1 Cigar of 2018, noting: ""It’s elegant, refined and nuanced from first puff to last, but is also the culmination of a long career in tobacco and the result of a man who was never afraid to follow his instincts.""",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Toro, Torpedo",No,Nicaraguan,E.P. Carrillo
E.P. Carrillo INCH Colorado,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"An inch richerAs the third installment in the Dimension Series, E.P. Carillo presents INCH Colorado. As a follow up to the 90-rated INCH Natural, INCH Colorado comes dressed in the same ruler themed bands and boasts another assortment on jaw breaking sizes. E.P. Carrillo has a slew of 90+ ratings under his belt and the INCH Series proves he’s more than capable of blending premium cigars in the popular large ring format.Produced in the La Alianza factory in the Dominican Republic, INCH Colorado comes dressed in a dark brown Ecuadorian Colorado Wrapper that is picked from a higher priming from the INCH Natural’s wrapper to provide a rich and robust taste. Carrillo incorporates a core of Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers held by a Nicaraguan binder. The result is full-bodied, full-flavored cigar with smooth notes of earth, spice, cedar and a touch of sweetness on the finish. If you are into full-bodied big rings, Inch Colorado will not disappoint. ",Full,['Gordo'],Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Gordo,No,Ecuador Habano,E.P. Carrillo
E.P. Carrillo INCH Maduro,Rated 4.35 out of 5, Based on 20 Ratings ,"INCH Maduro - one thick stick. When you’re Ernesto Carrillo you know the craft of cigar making to a ‘T’. With esteemed brands like La Gloria Cubana, and E.P. Carrillo under his belt, his bench of 90+ ratings is long and deep. And in the midst of creating top-notch cigars year after year, he also keeps his ear turned to the crowd, listening to every critique and request. Due to popular demand, E.P. Carrillo has released a new premium cigar line that weighs in against some of the thickest in the industry. Without further ado, enter INCH Maduro by E.P. Carrillo, monstrous slow burning jawbreakers.Whoa - now this is what I call an impressive cigar. Dark, oily, and downright thick the INCH Maduro brings a mouthful of flavors in spades. Carefully crafted under Ernesto's watchful eye, each INCH Maduro comes cloaked in glistening Connecticut Broadleaf maduro wrapper, and hugs a long-filler blend of Nicaraguan and Dominican tobaccos. Blended specifically to cater to the bulbous size of INCH, each puff reveals Ernesto's remarkable blending talents. Copious flavor coats the palate, as strong yet smooth notes of black pepper, roasted coffee, and earth mingle with an undeniable sweetness. Medium to full in body, the INCH Maduro delivers truckloads of flavor behind an outstanding, well-balanced bouquet. Go ahead and pat yourself on the back E.P. Carrillo, you deserve it.",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Presidente']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Presidente",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,E.P. Carrillo
E.P. Carrillo INCH Natural,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 27 Ratings ,"INCH Natural - Every inch counts.When you’re Ernesto Carrillo you know the craft of cigar making to a ‘T’. With esteemed brands like La Gloria Cubana, and E.P. Carrillo under his belt, his bench of 90+ ratings is long and deep. And in the midst of creating top-notch cigars year after year, he also keeps his ear turned to the crowd, listening to every critique and request. Due to popular demand, E.P. Carrillo has released a new premium cigar line that weighs in against some of the thickest in the industry. Without further ado, enter INCH by E.P. Carrillo, monstrous slow burning jawbreakers.If you’re lookin’ for a big and chunky handmade from one of the best in the biz, you’re in the right spot. INCH by E.P. Carrillo is one of the finest big ring beauties I’ve ever encountered. Carefully crafted under Ernesto’s watchful eye, each INCH Natural is draped in a Ecuador Sumatra wrapper, and packed to the gills with Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers. Blended specifically for hefty ring gauges, E.P. Carrillo’s talents shine brightly, as each puff reveals notes of sweet cedar, coffee, gentle spices, and a smooth creamy finish. Backed by an easy draw, and steady burn, these bulbous medium-bodied creations perform like a champ. Go ahead and add another feather in E.P. Carrillo’s over stuffed cap, INCH is a slam dunk.Great news everyone! Inch Natural has been recognized with a 90-rating stating, ""Big and veiny, this hefty cigar burns a bit unevenly, but offers a smoke that is sweet with maple syrup and toasted coconut with woody, oaky undertones."" ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Presidente']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Presidente",No,Ecuador Sumatra,E.P. Carrillo
E.P. Carrillo New Wave Reserva,Rated 4.27 out of 5, Based on 11 Ratings ,"E.P. Carrillo’s 91-rated New Wave gets a welcomed addition.The man behind countless 90-rated blends, Ernesto-Perez Carrillo knows tobacco front to back. Back in early 2011 he released the fan favorite New Wave line to critical acclaim, garnering a 91-rating and creating constant inventory headaches for us here at CI. Now, the time has come for another addition to this stellar performer dubbed, New Wave Reserva. This addition utilizes the same attractive Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper leaf as the original, but is distinguishable by its sharp secondary band. The big difference in New Wave Reserva is its Connecticut Broadleaf binder which adds ample complexity to the Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers. Upon lighting you are immediately met with bold notes of cocoa, espresso, and a pleasing natural sweetness. Get ready for a balanced, medium-bodied journey with this Cuban-esque blend from one of the most respected names in the industry.​Good news, E.P Carrillo New Wave Reserva has received an awesome 92-rating, noting: ""The smoke of this tawny-colored torpedo is rich and luxurious, layering the palate with a chocolate and graham cracker quality and a sweet, honey finish.""",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Connecticut Broadleaf,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Ecuador Connecticut,E.P. Carrillo
E.P. Carrillo Rebel Maverick,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"The leader of the pack from E.P. CarrilloFrom La Gloria Cubana to E.P. Carrillo cigars, Ernesto Perez-Carrillo has climbed the ladder of success in strides. He is a master cigar maker by far with blends like the 94-rated Seleccion Oscuro and the 95-rated La Historia in his repertoire. The next best cigar to fill his portfolio is Rebel Maverick of the Dimension series. This medium to full-bodied blend stands out from the pack with its hearty, chewy, and dense profile. Rebel Maverick dons a rich Ecuador wrapper hugging Nicaraguan long-fillers delivering a sophisticated and balanced flavor of earthy, sweet, woody, and spicy notes. Along with a cool draw from its larger ring size, Maverick is a cigar that will satisfy from first light all the way down to the nub. Indulge in this handcrafted gem by E.P. Carrillo.",Mellow-Medium,"['Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Presidente, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Sumatra,E.P. Carrillo
E.P. Carrillo Rebel Rebellious,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Radical additions to E.P. CarrilloErnesto Carrillo has taken the cigar industry by storm with his E.P. Carrillo brand. Recently E.P. Carrillo underwent an overhaul. The existing lines got a makeover, while a lot of new faces also popped up. This is one of those new blends, Rebel Rebellious.If college ever taught me anything, other than sleeping 101, it’s that rebelling can be a good thing. Luckily, E.P. Carrillo managed to push just the right amount of buttons. In the end, you’re left with a cigar filled with Nicaraguan tobaccos and secured with an Ecuadorian binder. The medium to full-bodied Rebellious boasts a dark Connecticut Broadleaf Maduro wrapper. Your palate won’t protest the flavors of earth, wood, cocoa, and toast from this satisfying Rebel Rebellious cigar by E.P. Carrillo. ",Medium-Full,"['Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Presidente, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,E.P. Carrillo
E.P. Carrillo Seleccion Oscuro,Rated 4.78 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"E.P. Carrillo is batting a thousand                E.P. Carrillo is an acknowledged master of his craft with his long track record of successful cigars from La Gloria Cubana, to the #2 cigar of 2014, La Historia, to well-deserved #1 Cigar of the Year honors going to the 96-rated Encore in 2018. His newest release, E.P. Carrillo Seleccion Oscuro, marks the first time he has used a San Andres Oscuro wrapper in one of his blends.Seleccion Oscuro features a luscious, flavorful Mexican San Andres Oscuro wrapper encasing an Ecuadoran binder and Nicaraguan long-fillers. The blend is balanced, complex and packs a treasure trove of spice, pepper, wood, and sweet notes. E.P. Carrillo Seleccion Oscuro is a slow burning, perfectly constructed medium to full-bodied blend that will captivate you and have you returning time and time again.Great news, E.P. Carillo Seleccion Oscuro was honored as the #4 cigar on the 2016 Top 25 Cigars list and received a well deserved 94-point rating, noting: ""This cigar is not only full of dried-fruit notes and a chocolate-covered raisin sweetness, but is an exercise in restraint and balance.""",Medium-Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,San Andres,E.P. Carrillo
Edgar Hoill,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Edgar who?!Edgar Hoill is a photographer who is known as one hell of a crackshot with a camera. When he takes aim, he hits his mark. That's how he got the name One Shot One Kill. (O.S.O.K.) Now, he and Christian Eiroa of Camacho fame combine muscle to present Edgar Hoill cigars. To craft Edgar Hoill, only a blend that could truly personify Hoill's reputation would do. Fitting that bill, is an all-Nicaraguan medley of rich, potent, patiently fermented tobaccos. On the outside a feisty Habano wrapper, chocolate-brown and teeming with natural oils. Just beneath, a robust long-filler core. Together, this ensemble wrangles up a meaty and bold profile loaded with spicy-sweet nuances. And what truly adds a level of intrigue here are the unique sizes. Each one provides a bit of sizzle each its own. All full-bodied, and all quite tasty, this one hits its mark dead center.",Full,"['Corona', 'Perfecto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Corona, Perfecto",No,Habano,
Edgar Hoill Everyday Hustle,Rated 4.73 out of 5,,"Everyday I’m Hustlin’.Edgar Hoill was a crack-shot photographer known best for capturing the real life drama that occurs in urban environments. The shots don’t just come to him, he has to hustle…every day, and he brings that same hustle to craft the cigars that carry his name.Edgar Hoill Everyday Hustle is the brand’s first Honduran puro and hails from the El Aladino factory in Honduras. This stick is a beefy medium to full-bodied blend with notes of earth, cinnamon, and spice, and will please both grizzled cigar vets and noobs. Everyday Hustle comes in traditional shapes and does not include the perfecto sizes that dominate Hoill’s other lines. ​",Medium-Full,['Corona'],Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Corona,No,Honduran,
Edgar Hoill O.S.O.K. (One Shot One Kill),Rated 5 out of 5,,"Like shootin’ fish in a barrel!Edgar Hoill fans come in all forms....cigar aficionados, art fanatics, photography enthusiasts....long story short, the brand is more than just a brand, it’s a lifestyle. This Hollywood photographer turned cigar maker captures powerful photos riddled with meaning. In the same breath, his cigars are full of passion and feel totally authentic, resulting in some of the most unique cigars on the market.Offered in 10-count boxes, O.S.O.K . (One Shot One Kill) cigars are complex, Nicaraguan puros loaded with personality. The result of a combined effort between Edgar Hoill and Christian Eiroa (of Camacho fame), you can expect very big things. But it should come as no surprise that at the end of the day this duo crafted a cigar serving up a big, bold, spicy profile. Full-bodied and filled to the brim with rich nuances, O.S.O.K. shoots....and scores. Plus, each vitola in the line boasts a distinct shape for an experience all its own.",Full,['Corona'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Corona,No,Nicaraguan,
Edgar Hoill OG O.S.O.K.,Rated 5 out of 5,,"One Hoill of a cigar.O.S.O.K. stands for “One Shot One Kill,” which is the nickname photographer Edgar Hoill earned for his sniper-like knack for taking a picture at just the right moment, and in one attempt. This photographer turned cigar maker has been turning heads with some of the most unique cigars available today.Edgar Hoill O.G. O.S.O.K. is a new addition to the fan-favorite O.S.O.K. line. This blend is the first Honduran puro in the O.S.O.K. lineup and all sizes are rolled in the figurado shape. Coming from the El Aladino factory in Honduras, this medium to full-bodied stick is bold with rich flavors and balance. O.G. O.S.O.K. is strong without becoming overpowering and is a solid addition to the O.S.O.K. line. ​",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Robusto,No,Honduran,
Eiroa by Christian Eiroa,Rated 4.93 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"Named after the man himself!A Honduran puro, Eiroa cigars hail from the company's brand new El Aladino factory in Honduras. Each carefully crafted cigar pays tribute to the Eiroa family, a cigar brand with a legacy 100 years in the making. They come packed in unique lift-top boxes wrapped in a leather ribbon, which represents Christian Eiroa's grandfather and his habit for keeping cigars stashed at the foot of his bed in a trunk (that's old school). Each box and each cigar features the old Spanish saying, “Salud, Amor y Pesetas” which means, “Health, Love and Money.” His motto for a successful life.Medium to full-bodied, Eiroa starts out with a hints of leather and pepper. The flavor is distinctive, with definite undertones of salty-sweetness. The second third begins to intensify with amplified character and flavor. The finish is just right, with helpings of cocoa, coffee, and cream clinging to the palate. Boasting an even draw, solid construction, and an incredibly unique taste, Eiroa fully honors the family name.   Eiroa by Christian Eiroa received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""layering the palate with chewy, dense smoke redolent of spicy black pepper and wood.""",Medium-Full,"['Corona Extra', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Corona Extra, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Honduran,CLE
Eiroa CBT Maduro,Rated 4.94 out of 5, Based on 16 Ratings ,"Oh so rich!Eiroa CBT Maduro: capa, banda, tripa maduro. Or, en inglés: maduro wrapper, binder, and filler. That’s 3 times maduro. A triple, if you will. Think about Christian Eiroa’s past. You feel me yet? If not, don’t worry, this is one helluva cigar that needs no back story. ​Hailing from Eiroa’s El Aladino factory in Honduras, CBT Maduro makes use of 100% maduro leaves – the wrapper, binder, and filler are all maduro leaves harvested from only the plant’s top primings. An extremely difficult-to-blend combination, but Eiroa nailed it…again. CBT Maduro is smooth and ultra-rich with hearty, charred notes of wood, pepper, espresso, dark chocolate, and a long, bold, and meaty finish. It’s unique, it’s complex, it has flavor to spare. Indeed, if you like rich n’ bold cigars, Eiroa CBT Maduro easily sits at the top of the list. ​",Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Maduro,CLE
Eiroa the First 20 Years,Rated 4.88 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"An occasion worth celebrating.The Eiroa family purchased Camacho cigars in 1995, giving Christian Eiroa his start in the industry. Under the family’s guidance, Camacho cigars became a juggernaut and became world famous for their stout and potent lineup of cigars. Now with his new brand CLE cigars, formed after Camacho was sold to Davidoff, Christian is celebrating his 2 decades in the cigar industry with a special release, Eiroa the First 20 Years. Hailing from Honduras, Eiroa the First 20 Years is a box-pressed Honduran puro containing a special type of tobacco in the binder and filler that hasn’t been used in a cigar in over 50 years. With a strength and flavor profile that will have you smacking your lips with fond memories of great Camacho blends of the past, Eiroa the First 20 Years will captivate you from first light. Full-bodied and packed with a full boat of pleasing flavors, expect nuances of dark chocolate, espresso, baking spices, nuts, earth, and leather to provide a well-balanced and complex experience. Give this stellar blend a try and enjoy the fruits of a master-blender at his best. Eiroa the First 20 Years received a well-deserved 92-rating noting: ""Pressed and oily, this dark maduro delivers a chewy, concentrated smoke fortified with notes of nougat, cloves and sweet star anise. The finish resonates with leather and wood.""​",Full,"['Corona Extra', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,Yes,,"Corona Extra, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Honduran,CLE
Eiroa: The First 20 Years Colorado,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Here's to many decades moreChristian Eiroa has been in the cigar business for over two decades, and all of that experience has made him one of the most talented master blenders in the world. To commemorate his achievements, Christian released his Eiroa the First 20 Years line, with his first blend receiving a well-deserved 90-point rating.His follow up, Eiroa the First 20 Years Colorado combines a leathery Honduran Corojo wrapper with long fillers from Honduras - all put together in a box-pressed package. Medium to full-bodied with a delightful array of espresso, oak, and cinnamon. Here’s to 20 years Mr. Eiroa, and many, many more.",Medium,"['Corona Extra', 'Gordo', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,Yes,,"Corona Extra, Gordo, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Honduran,CLE
El Baton,Rated 4.68 out of 5, Based on 22 Ratings ,"El Baton....the original nickel stick.​Introduced in 1914 and rolled with genuine Cuban tobacco leaves, this legendary little gem was the pick of the litter, especially at a nickel a piece. The good news is that the brand is back! With a new blend, a 93-rating, and a Top 25 appearance under its belt, El Baton is beginning the assent again.El Baton is a Nicaraguan puro being offered by J.C. Newman. Complex and full in body, this cigar features carefully selected long-fillers harvested from the highly fertile soils of Nicaragua. It’s bold and potent, featuring generous notes of nuts, coffee, spice, raisins, and sweetness. Well-made, and steeped in tradition, this is one handmade you won’t want to miss. El Baton's well-earned 93-rating notes, ""The cigar is big on flavor, leaving bold impressions of coffee, spice and raisins on the palate... it's back and probably better than ever."" ",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Robusto, Torpedo",No,"Corojo, Nicaraguan",
El Centurion by My Father Cigars,Rated 4.7 out of 5, Based on 43 Ratings ,"Allow me to re-introduce...El Centurion.​No doubt you’ve heard of Jose “Pepin” Garcia, one of the great cigar makers of our time. And chances are you’ve sampled some of his work, but I can guarantee you’ve never seen anything like this before. Originally a limited-edition cigar, El Centurion is back and here to stay.Staying true to the original blend, Pepin packs the El Centurion with all well-aged Nicaraguan tobaccos. The kicker here is he incorporates the super-unique Sancti Spiritus leaf which morphs this blend into a spicy-sweet beast with notes of pepper and leather. Medium to full in body, El Centurion is tasty right out of the box and after a few months of diligent aging, the real fireworks begin!El Centurion is available in two different wrapper varieties. The H-2K version comes wrapped in a top secret Connecticut sun grown wrapper from a hybrid Havana 2000 seed that produces an intensly flavorful cigar. The others come wrapped in an oily sun grown Criollo '98 leaf.Good news, El Centurion by My Father Cigars has received a well-deserved 90-point rating, and the H-2K version has scored as high as 93-points, noting: ""Covered in a toothy, oily wrapper, this cigar delivers a flavorful balance of cedar and tobacco spiced with some pepper notes.""",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Criollo '98,My Father
El Credito,Rated 4.14 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"Credit where credit’s due.This 3-country blend snagged a 90-rating years back, and now we got a solid chunk of ‘em on the low low! El Credito comes to you from the Dominican Republic and features a well-aged wrapper from Ecuador. Finished off with long-fillers from the Dominican Republic and Nicaragua, and a Nicaraguan binder, El Credito reveals a suspenseful medium to full-bodied character. Beginning with a bold, meaty flavor, El Credito gradually moves into hearty notes of hickory with a spicy-sweet undertone. Check out what the panel has to say:El Credito received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: “This toro has spicy flavors with a touch of floral notes. It produces a toasty, earthy aroma. The finish is bready with subtle notes of spice.”",Medium-Full,['Cigarillos'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Cigarillos,No,Ecuador Sumatra,
El Duque Cognac,Rated 3.97 out of 5, Based on 36 Ratings ,"Treat yourself to a soothing, unique cigar-burnin' experience.El Duque Cognac is a robust mix of aged Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers. Wrapped in light brown Sumatra wrappers, it delivers a medium to full flavor that's rich and extra smooth. The infusion of premium cognac soothes the palate with a rich, creamy blend and offers enjoyable hint of sweetness. Production was limited to one size only - a hefty Double Corona that measures 6.5""x50, giving you well over an hour of non-stop cigar pleasure.",Medium,['Churchill'],,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Churchill,Yes,Sumatra,
El Galan Semilla Cubana Habano,Rated 4.45 out of 5,,"Premium in every way except for the price tag.Before you lies a rare handmade indeed. El Galan Semilla Cubana Habano offers everything you’d expect from a premium blend, but is offered at a price that will have you doing a double-take. The man behind the scenes is a true legend in the making, Cuban born master blender Felix Mesa. Mesa was raised in the Cuban tobacco industry with 3 generations of his family working tobacco fields in Cuba’s famed central region, and his affordably priced, richly flavored blends are an homage to his family’s legacy.Crafted at Mesa’s El Galan factory in Esteli, Nicaragua, this blend is medium to full-bodied and features Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers tucked beneath a spicy Habano wrapper. Perfectly balanced and revealing a deft blending touch, expect to taste notes of earth and wood with a light spice settling in the background. Featuring meticulous construction and a complex evolution in the flavor profile, once you try this gem we’re sure you’ll be replenishing your supply over and over again. ​",Medium-Full,['Toro'],,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Habano,
El Gueguense,Rated 4.71 out of 5, Based on 21 Ratings ,"A wise choice.If you’re anything like me, your first thought is how in the hell do you say this cigar’s name. It’s pronounced - el wah-when-say - meaning “the wise man,” and it’s also one of the oldest known Nicaraguan plays. El Gueguense is the debut blend for Foundation Cigar Company, which was begun by Nicholas Melillo after he left Drew Estate. The cigar’s packaging and bands pay tribute to the play and reflect Melillo’s love for Nicaragua. El Gueguense is a Nicaraguan puro outfitted with a Corojo ’99 wrapper and binder, and a blend of Corojo and Criollo long-fillers from 2011 and 2012. The blend has been additionally aged in cedar before release and is an elegant, complex, and well-balanced cigar. Expect a full-bodied treat with your palate dancing to notes of cedar and spice with a touch of sweetness.El Gueguense received an impressive 92-rating and Top 25 Cigars of 2016 honors. The review noted, ""The combination of different varietals from diferent regions make this an interesting, tasty melange of Nicaraguan tobacco."" ",Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Corojo,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Corojo,Foundation Cigar Company
El Mejor Espresso,Rated 4.1 out of 5, Based on 143 Ratings ,"Trust me, my friend.El Mejor Espresso is a home run of a blend. Crafted in the esteemed Plasencia factory, these soft-pressed beauties come draped in positively gorgeous, coal-black wrappers. Frankly, it looks like a candy bar....just looking at it gets me salivating, glands pumping and all. The Espresso has a rich, creamy taste with noticeable hints of subtle cocoa and coffee-like flavors. It burns slowly and deliberately, leaving a firm, crisp ash and satisfying finish. Outstanding.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,San Andres,
El Rey Del Mundo,Rated 4.79 out of 5, Based on 89 Ratings ,"From the creators of Punch and Hoyo de Monterey, CI presents El Rey Del Mundo cigars: Handmande premiums that feature Honduran binders, and rich, oily Sumatra wrappers. Inside, the El Rey Del Mundo holds combinations of Dominican, Honduran, and Nicaraguan fillers for a rich and spicy flavor. All of this from a brand that is rated as high as 91 by Cigar Aficionado magazine.Good news! El Rey Del Mundo has earned a slew of 90+ ratings, including a 91-rating, noting: ""It has a great draw, rich with cocoa and coffee bean flavor. It finishes with a nice kick of spice.""",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,"Oscuro, Sumatra",
El Rico Habano,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"This is where flavor and price come to live in harmony.Yes, El Rico Habano – literally, “the rich one” – fully satisfies from start to finish, with its can’t-miss combination of mellow notes of spice and a smooth, fluid draw. This well-crafted handmade is produced by E.P. Carrillo, the same brilliant mind who brought you La Gloria Cubana. The El Rico Habano line is one of the most robust premium cigars on the market, with a delicious, exquisite Havana-like flavor. The blend is offered with your choice of two wrappers – the lush Ecuadorian Sumatra natural option or a dark and appealing Connecticut Broadleaf maduro leaf. Each one is overflowing with a potent blend of Nicaraguan long-fillers beside a Nicaraguan binder, delivering full-flavored, full-bodied goodness time after time. When you’re looking for the ultimate in flavor, look no further than this classic concoction. But best not to wait around, because my sources say that El Rico Habano isn’t always easy to come by. Get it while you can and keep it on hand for any night of the week.El Rico Habano received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""An excellent cigar. Thre is good balance of earthiness and spiciness on a full-bodied smoke. There is a hint of leather on the finish.""",Full,"['Double Corona', 'Presidente', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Double Corona, Presidente, Toro",No,"Habano, Habano Maduro",
Embassy by Cult,Rated 4.67 out of 5,,"A cigar even an ambassador can get behindEmbassy by Cult is a superior addition to the already high-quality and flavorful portfolio the boutique brand has compiled. A brand built on delivering anything but ordinary, you can be sure of it that these premiums are good enough for an embassy. These beauties are chock full of Nicaraguan long-fillers held together with a blend of binders from Indonesia, Nicaragua, and Mexico and dressed in an Ecuador Habano wrapper. If any ambassador is lighting up one of these bad boys, you can be sure Embassy by Cult is a must-try.",Medium,['Toro'],,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Ecuador Habano,Cult
Erin Go Bragh,Rated 4.25 out of 5, Based on 125 Ratings ,"Irish eyes are smiling!Erin Go Bragh is a uniquely infused premium long-filler handmade with a gourmet blend. Erin Go Bragh soothes the palate with an enticing infusion of Irish whisky mellowed by creamy nuances and a slightly sweetened cap. These unique flavors gel nicely, further enhancing a fine recipe of aged Cuban-seed Dominican tobaccos and beautiful Connecticut shade wrappers. The result is a palate pleasing flavor and luxurious aroma. Click here to shop Erin Go Bragh Cigarillos!",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,True,No,More Details,Europe,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro",Yes,Connecticut,
Erin Go Bragh Cigarillos,Rated 4.4 out of 5, Based on 111 Ratings ,"Take a look at these lucky charms!Check out the new Erin Go Bragh Cigarillos. Packaged in convenient 50-count boxes, these little suckers offer a smooth and satisfying smoke filled with mellow flavors and pleasant aromas. The Irish Creme offers an especially nice experience with a sweet, creamy, crowd-pleasing aroma.Click here to shop Erin Go Bragh full sized cigars!",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],Dominican,Dominican,True,No,More Details,Europe,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,Indonesian,
Erin Go Bragh St. Patrick's Day Edition,Rated 3.9 out of 5, Based on 21 Ratings ,"Time to kiss the Blarney Stone!Spice up your St. Patty's Day this year with Erin Go Bragh's limited release, the Erin Go Bragh St. Patrick's Day edition. This takes Erin Go Bragh to new heights, delivering subtle notes of sweet grass. Irish eyes are smiling on this delicious little treat made on the Emerald Isle. These rich and sweet cigarillos are a welcomed 10 minute intermission between pints of Guinness. This unique blend was released in extremely limited quantities, so it is best to strike while the iron's hot and be prepared for another memorable St. Patty's Day. Available in either 50-ct boxes of five 10-ct wooden pocket packs. ",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],Dominican,Dominican,True,No,More Details,Europe,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,Indonesian,
Espinosa 20th Anniversary,Rated 4.2 out of 5,,"Cheers to Erik Espinosa! At this point, it’s practically a rule that you must release a cigar to celebrate your anniversary in the industry. But don’t get me wrong – I’m stoked that Erik Espinosa didn’t buck the trend. After working in the sales end of the industry for years, Espinosa went on to collaborate with Eddie Ortega and EO brands, before finally opening up the La Zona factory and manufacturing his own line of premium cigars. But along the way, Espinosa has consistently put his work into some of the finest cigars in the ‘biz. The Espinosa 20th Anniversary is produced at Erik’s own factory in Esteli, Nicaragua, and contains potent and flavorful Nicaraguan long-filler tobaccos underneath a gorgeous Habano Rosado wrapper. This production is limited to just 500 boxes, and believe me, you don’t want to miss out. Burning an Espinosa 20th, you’re going to find hearty notes of pepper, chocolate, and an awesome flavor that only Nicaraguan tobacco can produce.",Medium-Full,['Corona'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Corona,No,Habano,Espinosa
Espinosa Alpha Dawg,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Let the big dawg eat! Those who have attended an Espinosa event already know all about the Alpha Dawg. For those who don’t, let me give you a brief backstory. This uh… interestingly named cigar used to be an event only cigar for Espinosa’s biggest fans. Word and demand quickly spread though, and people wanted to get their hands on this awesome handmade. Well, luckily, Espionsa is letting the Dawgs out, and has pushed Alpha Dawg into regular production for all to enjoy. Offered in lovingly dressed boxes of ten, Espinosa Alpha Dawg uses a Habano Rosado Oscuro wrapper over Nicaragun binder and long-filler in order to create a cigar that will satisfy even the biggest appetite. The wrapper itself is special, bringing tons of rich dark chocolate, espresso, earthiness, and a big of dark fruity flavors with each puff. It’s complex and chewy, as dense peppery spice works its way in and out of the profile. Alpha Dawg is a medium to full-bodied treat, and after trying one you’ll be howling for more. Alright, that’s enough dog jokes for one day. ​",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Toro",No,Habano,Espinosa
Espinosa Crema,Rated 4.2 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"Another Connecticut winner from EspinosaI’ve said it before, and I’ll say it again. Despite all the hype around the next full-bodied, powerhouse cigar, mellow, Connecticut wrapped gems are still the best-sellers in the cigar world by far. And with awesome, creamy cigars like Espinosa Crema coming out, it’s easy to tell why. Espinosa is a boutique cigar manufacturer you should all be watching, and if you haven’t tried them yet, Espinosa Crema is the perfect introduction. Now if you’re gonna name a cigar Crema, you better deliver creaminess. And I’m happy to report that it’s here in spades. An silky-smooth Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper delivers a super-smooth experience with slight cedar, hay, and tons of baked bread. It’s a buttery, delicious cigar that rounds out the Espinosa portfolio and ensures this boutique company has something for everyone. ​",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Espinosa
Espinosa Dread,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"This premium stick makes every little thing alrightEspinosa brings another carefully crafted premium cigar to the table, and it doesn’t disappoint. Sporting pigtail caps reminiscent of the hairstyle made famous by reggae greats the world over, the Dread delivers premium cigar taste at a great price. This is a medium-bodied and complex smoke with several different flavors taking their turns dancing on the palette. You’ll experience layers of leather, cocoa, toasted almonds, sweet apple and cinnamon. All of these blend with a flowery sweetness for an intense but balanced and delicious smoke.
",Medium,['Toro'],Nicaraguan,"Honduran, Jamaican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Ecuador Habano,
Espinosa EO no. 21,Rated 4.22 out of 5, Based on 23 Ratings ,"E-O-So good!Back in the days before Eddie Ortega brought us delicious sticks of entirely his own creation, he collaborated on great blends that are still around today, with some of the best in the industry, like the EO No. 21. EO stands for Espinosa y Ortega (not the sound you make when you realize how delicious these are), and the blend is an excellent expression of the skills of the two blenders in a budget-friendly format.The EO No. 21 features a smooth, rich Corojo wrapper brimming with well-balanced complexity, carefully applied to a delicious blend of Nicaraguan long-fillers. This fantastic blend is pleasantly spicy, with rich notes of wood, earth, and leather. Grab a budget-friendly bundle for as low as $1.99 per stick, and enjoy the efforts of one of the greatest collaborative forces in the industry.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",False,Corojo,Espinosa
Espinosa Habano,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"Heavenly Habanos.The name Erik Espinosa might not ring a bell, but you've probably already encountered at least one of his top-notch brands. He's been behind the wheel of brands like Cubao, 601, Murcielago, La Bomba, and a handful of others. Recently, he opened his own factory in Esteli, Nicaragua, called La Zona. As part of his plan to release a new portfolio of top-notch boutique handmades, the Espinosa Habano boldly leads the charge.Introducing the Espinosa Habano. A lovely medium-bodied handmade that dishes out wave after wave of handmade goodness. Carefully crafted under Erik Espinosa's watchful eye, each cigar starts with a leathery and flavorful Nicaraguan Habano wrapper. This leaf sits atop a long-filler bouquet of proprietary tobaccos, secretly blended, for a rich well-balanced smoke. Together, these tobaccos strike up a savory array of smooth, soothing flavors. Prominent notes of pepper, cedar, cocoa, and a creamy semi-sweet finish, all round out this highly satisfying handmade. Erik Espinosa hit all the right keys with this one, and it shows.Espinosa Habano received a well-deserved 93-point rating, noting: “The leathery core of this well-made cigar is framed by a rich, complex procession of vanilla, baking spices and raw cookie dough notes. The finish is long.”",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,Espinosa
Espinosa Laranja Reserva,Rated 4.47 out of 5, Based on 66 Ratings ,"My favorite color!2014 seemed to be the year of Erik Espinosa, and 2015 seems to be heading down the same road. His La Zona factory in Nicaragua is producing some of the top blends to hit the marketplace, one tastier than the other. This next addition to his arsenal may just be the tastiest to date. The wrapper leaf, grown in the Reconcavo region of Bahia, Brazil, sports an orange hue which draws you in from first glance. Hence its name, Laranja, meaning orange in Portuguese. Below this stunning wrapper leaf, a bevy of bold and refined Nicaraguan long-fillers await. Laranja Reserva is one of the most complex blends you will come across. Cuban-esque would be an understatement, this concoction features master blending at the top of its game. Laranja Reserva offers ample notes of spice, pepper, citrus, nuts, cedar, and an impressive natural sweetness. All the while, this gem remains perfectly balanced. A true cigar experience, do yourself a favor and grab a box while you still can. Espinosa Laranja Reserva received Top 25 honors for 2015 (#13 overall) and a well-deserved 94-rating noting: ""The Toro serves as a bright and flavorful showcase for the wrapper, offering plenty of graham cracker flavor. But, as the wrapper and name suggests, we also detected a distinctly citrus-like quality and zest.""​",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto Extra', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto Extra, Toro",No,Brazilian,Espinosa
Espinosa Laranja Reserva Escuro,Rated 4.47 out of 5,,"What a difference a wrapper makes!Unlike all of the other lines of Espinosa Premium Cigars, this cigar is manufactured in the San Lotano factory in Ocotal, Nicaragua but offers no difference in the quality and refinement that the Espinosa name represents. Following the trend of naming the original cigar line based on the appearance of the wrapper, the new addition to the line Escuro is named using the Portuguese word for dark and it is well-fitting! 2018 marked the start of an ingenious line extension by Espinosa Premium Cigars. The Laranja Reserva Escuro utilizes the same bevy of bold and refined Nicaraguan long-fillers and binder of the original Laranja Reserva, but is wrapped in a beautifully dark Brazillian Mata Fina wrapper. This cigar is a smooth box-pressed masterpiece that brings with it a fuller-flavored profile filled with notes of leather, earth, natural sweetness, espresso, cocoa, and nuttiness. The solid construction and even burn throughout only compliment the enjoyable medium-full bodied experience. Go ahead, get drawn into the dark side of Espinosa's Laranja Reserva Escuro line, your palate will thank you!   ",Medium-Full,"['Corona Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,,More Details,Nicaragua,True,,"Corona Gordo, Robusto, Toro",False,Brazilian,Espinosa
Espinosa Reggae,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"A rare, spicy gemThe Espinosa Reggae uses rare, exotic Jamaican tobacco leaves that are renown for being as close to the quality of Cuban leaves are you can get. A spicy Ecuadorian rosado wrapper holds together a delicious combination of Nicaraguan fillers and binders and a rare tobacco unique to the region called lengua de vaca. The full-bodied Reggae is guaranteed to fill your mouth with sweet, unique flavor on every puff. Trust us. This is one cigar that you do not want to miss. One or two puffs and you'll be swaying right where you stand to the sounds of your own reggae band.Espinosa Reggae received a well-deserved 90-point rating in 2018, noting: ""The smoke of this well-rolled cigar has spicy, woody qualities that meld pleasantly with hints of clove, fruit and chewy nougat. The burn is clean and even."" ",Medium-Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Honduran, Jamaican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Espinosa
Espinosa Wasabi,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Hot like Wasabi, when I bust rhymesErik Espinosa has long been one of the most unique names in the cigar industry. From the 601 series, to Alpha Dawg, to Comfortably Numb, this guy covers the full range of style and presentation… Hell, the last meeting I had with him, he was smoking cigars in a bathrobe! Which brings us to Wasabi, a Candela wrapped blend coming from the La Zona Cigar Factory. At first glance, you may think this thing is a marketing gimmick but not so fast my friend! Just ask anyone who’s familiar with La Zona’s work, and you’ll know this thing is legit. Up top, you’ve got the green and smooth Candela wrapper leaf (that’s certainly reminding some of you out there of the cigars of yesteryear) capped by a dark brown Habano leaf. The binder and filler are undisclosed, but believe me, they make their presence known immediately — this cigar packs a punch! Tons of earth and black pepper boom forth from this blend in a most unexpected way, proving this one ain’t your Daddy’s candela. Believe me, this is a cigar that’s straight up legit: even the uppity up cigar bloggers rated it highly.",Medium,"['Corona Gordo', 'Robusto']",,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Corona Gordo, Robusto",Varies,Candela,Espinosa
Exactus Clasico,Rated 3 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"​Exactly what you’ve been looking for.Every now and then a cigar comes along, and everything about it is just right. Right blend...right flavor...right look. That’s what we’ve got here with Exactus Clasico, a visually stimulating and deliciously nuanced handmade from a boutique cigar company. Exactus is a business of humble beginnings that dates back to 1955. Headed up by Osvaldo Rodriguez, the son of company founder Don Pulita, it’s also a brand that has serious staying power. Clasico is rich and creamy in flavor, with surprising yet delightful nuances of fruit thanks to a very deliberate blending technique. An Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper sits atop a blend of Dominican Criollo ’98 fillers. The unique piece here is the Dominican wine fermented Criollo ’98 binder, which contributes those fruit notes we were discussing earlier. Mellow to medium in body, this one would be ideal for the first smoke of the day. The construction is excellent and the taste is wholly unique. Give one a try, you won’t be sorry.​",Mellow-Medium,['Torpedo'],"Criollo '98, Dominican",Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Torpedo,No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Excalibur,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 401 Ratings ,"Full in flavor, the Excaliburs are a world-class cigar.Hand-rolled by the same makers as Hoyo De Monterrey, Hoyo De Monterrey Excalibur cigars are made using the top 10% of the factory’s tobacco from Honduras and Nicaragua.In addition to a sterling, '92' point rating, Hoyo de Monterrey Excalibur is a member of Cigar Aficionado's top 25 cigars of the year.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Lonsdale', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Connecticut Broadleaf,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Lonsdale, Presidente, Robusto, Toro",Varies,"Connecticut, Connecticut Broadleaf",
Excalibur Cameroon,Rated 4.68 out of 5, Based on 41 Ratings ,"Cameroon beauties from the makers of Hoyo de Monterrey and Excalibur.Excalibur Cameroon is an extension of the popular Hoyo Excalibur line. The Cameroon features an utterly smooth and complex blend of Dominican, Honduran and Nicaraguan filler tobaccos along with absolutely beautiful true Cameroon wrappers.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto']",Connecticut Broadleaf,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto",No,Cameroon,
Excalibur Dark Knight,Rated 4.87 out of 5, Based on 30 Ratings ,"A delicious step up from the traditional Excalibur 1066.Within the legendary Excalibur 1066 line of Hoyo de Monterrey, one will find the beautiful Dark Knight. This enticing handmade is built with a dark and oily natural Connecticut Havana wrapper. This leaf is thick and chewy, hugging a complex mixture of Dominican, Honduran, and Nicaraguan long-fillers. The result is a bold, medium to full-bodied smoke layered with rich, complex flavors. Expect a chewy, leathery core with hints of coffee, cocoa, and sweet, peppery undertones. When it comes to Excalibur, the Dark Knight is as good as it gets!Produced in four limited production vitolas.",Medium-Full,['Toro'],Connecticut Broadleaf,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Toro,No,Connecticut Broadleaf,
Factory Throwouts,Rated 4.31 out of 5, Based on 523 Ratings ,"No need to throw these out!These Factory Throwouts are so darn tasty, you’ll be left scratching your head and wondering what makes them throwouts anyway. Slight discoloration, sun spots, minor and miniscule blemishes....that’s it. The good part is that they are a fraction of their full-priced counterparts. Straight from J.C. Newman’s Florida factory, here you’ll find tasty treasures in a variety of sizes. Each is wrapped in an Ecuadorian sun grown wrapper and then filled Cuban-sandwich style with Dominican tobaccos. No bands, no labels, no boxes, no frills – just pure, unadulterated goodness that the money-minded should be stocking up on, and often.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Lonsdale', 'Robusto']",,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,United States,No,,"Churchill, Lonsdale, Robusto",Varies,Ecuador Sungrown,
Fallen Angel,Rated 4.55 out of 5, Based on 77 Ratings ,"A slice of heaven from AJ Fernandez.Fallen Angel. Dark. Mysterious. Powerful. And above all else: delicious. It's also the latest masterpiece from AJ Fernandez. Rolled with care at the legendary Tabacalera Fernandez factory in Esteli, Nicaragua, Fallen Angel is gonna make a believer out of you fast. Real fast.Beating around the bush just isn't in my nature, so I'm going to cut right to it. This cigar is friggin' fantastic. One of the best I've had from AJ....perhaps ever. Yeah, it's that damn tasty. Just looking at the one perched on my desk gets me all warm and fuzzy. But enough about that, time to get to business. First the wrapper. A dark and glistening Sumatra Ecuadorian Oscuro leaf. Simply stunning. Seamless, soft, and even in color this rare leaf has been cultivated from the plant's highest, most flavorful priming (known as 7th cut). Beneath this impressive leaf, a bold bouquet of AJ's finest Nicaraguan ligero long-fillers are hugged by a rich Habano binder from Ecuador. But the real icing on the cake is a gorgeous box-pressed finish, providing a cool, slow burn. Expect a rustic core of toasted tobacco to complement nuances of black pepper, oak, and leather, as a caramel-like sweetness smacks on the finish. If that wasn't enough, check out the packaging. Each box features a hand-cast Fallen Angel pewter emblem. Magnificent.​​",Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Habano,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Sumatra,
Felipe II Fat-Boy Extra,Rated 3.25 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"La Aurora’s Manhattan Project.Felipe Gregorio was founded by Philip Wynne in 1990, and despite having been around for almost 30 years, has managed to stay pretty under the radar. We’re not sure how, though, because he pumps out some seriously good sticks, with the storied La Aurora factory, the first established cigar factory in the Dominican, handling production. Any project La Aurora gets its hands on is going to turn out great, and these Filipo II Fat-Boy Extras are certainly no exception. These chunky little gems come with a unique Indonesian Maduro wrapper, over an Indonesian binder and two different long-filler leaves from the Cibao Valley in the Dominican Republic. The result is a smooth, satisfying experience with robust earth, leather, and wood notes, and a touch of pepper. The Felipe II Fat-Boy Extra will look great in your humidor, and even better burning in your fingers. ",,"['Robusto Extra', 'Short Robusto']",Indonesian,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,False,,"Robusto Extra, Short Robusto",False,Maduro,
Felix Assouline EGO Red Habano BXP,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Check your EGO at the door! Beginning in 1997, Felix Assouline has been heavily involved in the cigar industry. Originally running a few retail shops down in Florida, Felix has taken his knowledge of the industry and applied it to running his own boutique brand. Now, over a dozen years later, Assouline has numerous blends handmade for him in Danli, Honduras, including today’s choice selection: the EGO Red Habano ’98. Up top, you’ll find a gorgeous red Habano Criollo ’98 wrapper leaf overtop prime Indonesian binder, and Honduran and Nicaraguan long-fillers. Presented in a soft box-press, these tobaccos are allowed to marry together most harmoniously in the aging room before arriving at your doorstep. Toasting the foot on the EGO Red, you’ll find bold notes of coffee, earth, and a hint of black pepper on the finish. A true up-and-coming brand, EGO Red is a great choice for the cigar lover who wants to try something new and exciting. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Perfecto']",Indonesian,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Perfecto",No,Criollo '98,
Felix Assouline II Saints,Rated 4.92 out of 5,,"Count II Saints Among Your BlessingsHandrolled in Esteli, Nicaragua under the eye of Felix Assouline, head of his own boutique cigar brand, II Saints I a collaboration with the popular French accessory brand. For those not in the know, Felix has been in the industry for over two decades at this point. Getting his start as a retailer, Assouline is incredibly knowledgeable on what cigars people buy and love… a knowledge he applies expertly to his own blending process. Presented in five delectable vitolas, II Saints presents a full-bodied profile that any cigar lover can easily get behind. Featuring most of its tobacco from the Jamastran Valley in Honduras, II Saints also includes some Nicaraguan long-fillers. Jamastran tobacco is grown right on the border of Honduras and Nicaragua, and you can taste it in the flavor profile — the earthy richness of the Honduran tobacco features just a hint of the spice and power that Nicaraguan leaf is known for. In all, it’s an extremely polished blend, with way more than II reasons to try it. ",Full,"['Figurado', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Figurado, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Criollo '98,
Fernando Leon Family Reserve,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"The secret family recipe.Like a well-oiled machine, La Aurora has been pumping out top-notch handmades for generations. Thanks in large part to the foundation laid by Don Fernando, Guillermo Leon’s father, the company has made impressive strides forward. But Don Fernando didn’t just love tobacco, he lived it. Now one of his ‘secret’ blends, at one point reserved exclusively for family and friends, is available to the masses. Without further ado, enter Fernando Leon Family Reserve.Released by Guillermo Leon in honor of his father, Fernando Leon Family Reserve cigars are truly a special creation. Carefully handcrafted, each cigar employs a feisty Dominican Corojo wrapper overtop an equally hearty Corojo binder. This double Corojo combination conceals a complex bouquet of long-fillers from Brazil, Peru and the Dominican. The end result is a medium-bodied cigar brimming with intricate nuances. Hints of cedar, spice, citrus, coffee, and leather show up for the big dance, as the slow burn unleashes a continual medley of flavors. Exceptionally well made, Fernando Leon smokes as good as it sounds, and is a fine tribute to one of the industry's greats.Fernando Leon Family Reserve received several 90-ratings, including a well-deserved '93,' which noted, ""Delicious combinations of raisin, hearty leather and spice flavor are buttressed by rich cocoa and mineral notes. A complex and balanced cigar.""",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Corojo,"Brazilian, Dominican, Peruvian",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Corona, Gordo, Perfecto, Robusto, Toro",No,Corojo,La Aurora
Fighting Cock,Rated 4.2 out of 5, Based on 166 Ratings ,"Cock-a-doodle-do! Time to wake up and realize what you're missin'!An angry rooster is nothing to mess with. Trust me, a battle with one will definitely bruise more than just your ego. Now a Fighting Cock...if you're looking for an affordable cigar in a box that can go toe-to-toe with stuff twice the price, this is one bird you'll want to flock to. Fighting Cock cigars are entirely handmade in Nicaragua with a silky, golden-brown Habano wrapper and a mellow blend of Nicaraguan long-fillers, Fighting Cock cigars deliver a smooth, but very flavorful, medium bodied experience. Combining the creamy texture of much calmer blends with the complexity and flavor of Habano wrappers, Fighting Cock has developed an impressive formula. Notes of cream, oak, earth, coffee, and pepper are backed by hearty tobacco nuances. Taking these home any day of the week at under $2 a pop, in a box, right here at CI, is a value worth fighting for.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Habano,
Flor de las Antillas Maduro,Rated 4.73 out of 5, Based on 22 Ratings ,"For a limited time, receive FREE shipping on your entire order with purchase of select boxes of My Father Cigars!Not your father’s maduroThere’s few things that get our hearts pumping over here at CI HQ more than new cigars. Especially when the blend being introduced is the follow-up to a former #1 Cigar of the Year, that was rated ‘96’ and given ‘90’+ ratings eight different times. Those who have done their homework (or who looked at the picture to the left) will know I’m talking about Flor de Las Antillas Maduro by My Father. A medium to full-bodied maduro of the highest caliber, Flor de Las Antillas Maduro proves that My Father Cigars really can catch lightning in a bottle. Twice. Things pop off with this one from the word go. A sharp box-press highlights the natural oils of the Ecuadorian Habano Sun Grown Oscuro wrapper, and an expertly rolled Nicaraguan binder and filler underneath give off aromas of cedar, spice, and earth. Drawing on the Flor de Las Antillas Maduro, you’ll find nuttiness, earth, classic Pepín spice, and a hearty oakiness. It’s full-flavored, it’s rich, it’s incredibly chewy, and it’s a cigar that needs to find its way to your humidor today. ​Good news! Flor de las Antillas Maduro has earned an impressive 92-point rating, noting: ""Every puff of this dark, box-pressed cigar layers the palate with a rich combination of toast and chocolate balanced by hints of baking spice over a warm, woody base.""",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Maduro,My Father
Flor de Oliva Corojo,Rated 3.5 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Go coco for CorojoOliva is certainly best known for their award-winning, top-shelf blends like Serie ‘V’ and Melanio. But don’t forget, these guys know how to rock the bundled world too. Yes indeed, the Flor de Oliva line means you can enjoy Oliva tobacco day in and day out without breaking the bank. And now, we welcome the Flor de Oliva Corojo to the family, to bump things up for those flavor fiends out there.  Weighing in right around a medium body, the Flor de Oliva Corojo features a 100% long-filler blend of Nicaraguan tobaccos cloaked by a charming Corojo leaf. Toasting it up, you’ll find a robust and satisfying profile, featuring toasty notes of cedar and slight baking spices. Easy to enjoy, easy to justify, Flor de Oliva Corojo is a winner all around. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Corojo,Oliva
Flor de Oliva Gold,Rated 4.47 out of 5, Based on 161 Ratings ,"The lighter side of Oliva.Flor de Oliva Gold is a smooth flavorful cigar that is 100% about value. The more tame cousin of the original Flor de Oliva, this beauty utilizes a sleek Connecticut-shade wrapper.  Inside, a blend of all Nicaraguan long-fillers to give it a nice sweet nutty note. Geared toward the smoker who enjoys a cigar that's lighter on the palate with a short finish, this is an option that won't empty your wallet.",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,Oliva
Flor de Oliva Maduro,Rated 4.11 out of 5, Based on 72 Ratings ,"All the quality you expect from Oliva, at dog-walking prices.Gilberto Oliva and his family are a tobacco powerhouse. It seems like everything they touch turns to gold, and this value-priced Maduro beauty is certainly no exception. Utilizing a deep, oily Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper over long-fillers from Nicaragua and the Dominican, this isn’t like the other, lesser bargain brands you’ve tried. You’ll get notes of earth, coffee, and spice, with a satisfying finish and a consistent burn. You might get these for yard work, but don’t be surprised if they make it into your regular rotation!",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Oliva
Flor de San Andres Black by Rocky Patel,Rated 4.4 out of 5, Based on 10 Ratings ,"The Flor de San Andres, en la noche.When you think of Mexico, you probably think of Mariachi, Pina Coladas on the beach, and that one embarrassing thing you did on spring break in Cancun (don’t worry, we won’t tell anyone). But when us folks at CI think of Mexico, we think of the delicious, feisty wrapper leaves grown in San Andres. And those of us in the know reach for a Rocky Patel Flor de San Andres when we want the best of what the deep, dark leaves can offer. The only problem for me was that sometimes they weren’t quite heavy enough for enjoying later in the day. Well Rocky must be a mind-reader, because he brought us exactly what I was looking for with the Flor de San Andres Black.Brimming with notes of dark chocolate, leather, spice, and deep earth, this cigar is definitely on the medium to full-bodied spectrum. The fillers are all Nicaraguan, the wrapper is a special San Andres leaf called Morrón, the body is medium-full, and the experience is out of this world. If you’re a fan of bold profiles and great construction, join the dark side and Flor de San Andres Black a try. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Yes,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Maduro,Rocky Patel Cigars
Flor de San Andres by Rocky Patel,Rated 4.49 out of 5, Based on 102 Ratings ,"Dia de Los RockyEvery year people make resolutions, and every year they stop doing them by the middle of February. Or maybe that’s just me. Well, regardless, Rocky Patel sets one goal every year and sticks to it: to create the very best cigars on the market. The time and dedication this man puts into his craft is evident in each cigar that bears his name, and Rocky Patel Flor de San Andres is no change on that front. Dark, spicy, and delicious, Flor de San Andres is an everyman’s cigar that we can all get behind. Light the foot and you’ll find immediate hints of dark chocolate, leather, nutmeg, and dense clouds revealing a stark white ash. San Andres Maduro has been an incredibly popular wrapper leaf lately, but this box-pressed Rocky Patel version is easily in the shortlist of the best San Andres offerings I’ve ever had.  Dive in deep on this one, and soon you’ll be swimming in pure cigar paradise. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,Yes,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,San Andres,Rocky Patel Cigars
Flor del Todo,Rated 3.98 out of 5, Based on 82 Ratings ,"A delicious and modestly priced gem from Puros Indios.If you enjoy Puros Indios cigars, then Rolando Reyes Sr.'s Flor del Todo is the perfect everyday cigar. Indeed, this brand is one of the best values on the market. A classic ""Cuban sandwich"" cigar, it's densely packed with Brazilian, Dominican and Nicaraguan fillers, and draped in a thick Ecuador Colorado wrapper leaf - one so hearty you could practically chew on it all day. It's medium-bodied with a pleasant, gratifying aroma, and mouth-watering, creamy, nutmeg taste. Loaded with flavor....and less than a buck each! That's why Flor del Todo is the top volume brand on our regular monthly ""auto-ship"" program. A good cigar at an even better price!",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Ecuador Habano, Habano Maduro",
Flores y Rodriguez 10th Ann. Reserva Limitada,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"It’s a celebration!The gem of the Dominican, the Pinar del Rio factory is responsible for producing countless 90+ rated blends. Finally, this legendary factory is hitting the decade mark of crafting some of the most enjoyable handmades on the market. To kick this party off right, a 10th anniversary release is ready to hit the scene. For ten years in operation, only the best blend will suffice, and Flores y Rodriguez 10th Anniversary Reserva Limitada hits the mark.Bold notes of leather, pepper, and a lingering sweet spice become more pronounced the further you dive into this prize. Complexity abound, Reserva Limitada houses a mix of Nicaraguan and 7-year aged Piloto Cubano long-fillers. A Dominican Olor binder is hugged by an attractive Ecuadorian Habano wrapper leaf that gives off the slightest reddish hue. If you are looking for a real treat, look no further than Flores y Rodriguez 10th Anniversary Reserva Limitada. ​",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto']",Dominican,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto",No,Ecuador Habano,
Flores y Rodriguez Connecticut Valley Reserve,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"The apex of boutique.PDR cigars are the hottest manufacturer of boutique cigars in the industry. Using old-world Cuban techniques married with modern technology, PDR crafts some of the most richly flavored and satisfying blends on the market.Flores y Rodriguez Connecticut Valley Reserve is truly a special cigar. Dressed to the nines in a 7 year old, oily Connecticut Broadleaf maduro wrapper, a peek under the sheets reveals Ecuadorian Corojo and Nicaraguan Habano binders and long-fillers from the Dominican Republic and Nicaragua. Medium-bodied with flawless construction, expect a complex rollercoaster ride upon lighting. You’ll be met with flavors of baking cinnamon, nutmeg, cedar, leather, dark chocolate, and hay, with each flavor progressing in perfect balance. Try this latest super-premium offering from PDR cigars and experience for yourself the pinnacle of a boutique blend. ​Good news, Flores y Rodriguez Connecticut Valley Reserve has earned an awesome 91-point rating, noting: ""Gleaming with oils, this dark belicoso, draws and burns evenly, producing a very white ash. Notes of licorice and anise are balanced by a cocoa sweetness and a woody finish.""",Medium,['Robusto'],"Corojo, Habano","Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Robusto,No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Pinar del Rio
Flores y Rodriguez Connecticut Valley Reserve Azul,Rated 5 out of 5,,"PDR Cigars operates out of a factory in Tamboril Dominican Republic and produces some of the best boutique cigars in the industry combining modern technology with old-world Cuban techniques. They create some of the most richly flavored blends on the market using complex rolling techniques to packing more tobacco in each cigar, while maintaining a consistently desirable draw. The first cigar in PDR’s ultra-premium Connecticut Valley Reserve line, the maduro, has had great success, receiving a 91-rating, as well as constant demand here at CI. Now enter Flores y Rodriguez Connecticut Valley Reserve Azul.The incredibly complex and full-bodied cigar is draped in a pleasing Connecticut Broadleaf Rosado wrapper. A Jalapa binder and complex blend of Dominican Corojo and Nicaraguan Condega Criollo long-fillers create an experience unlike any other. Have a seat and take some time to enjoy the slightly peppery start followed up with espresso, dark chocolate, berries, and a satisfying natural sweetness, you won’t regret it. ",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Figurado']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Figurado",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,
Fonseca,Rated 4.35 out of 5, Based on 17 Ratings ,"A wonderful rendering of Cuba's great Fonseca.Originally, the Fonseca brand was only sold in Cuba, and remains one of today’s most respected brands from the mother land. However, it is also made in the Dominican Republic by Manuel ‘Manolo’ Quesada, a master at his craft with the uncanny ability to create a cigar that rivals (and out performs) those of Cuba. Wrapped in a beautiful, light-colored Connecticut shade wrapper, the Domincan Fonseca combines a superior, well-aged mixture of Dominican long-fillers bound by a tasty Mexican leaf. The result is a smooth and deliciously creamy smoke delivered in an enjoyable, well-balanced fashion.Fonseca Vintage: an exquisite cigar that employs a Dominican blend of tobaccos that have been aged in Tercio bales for a minimum of 5 years. This aging process allows the tobaccos to retain their natural oils, which in turn promotes a bouquet of smooth natural flavor and aroma. Smooth, creamy and made of the highest quality.",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Lonsdale', 'Robusto']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Lonsdale, Robusto",No,Connecticut,Fonseca
Fonseca Cubano Exclusivo,Rated 3.92 out of 5,,"Fonseca steps it up once again.Fonseca Cubano Exclusivo was crafted for one, sole mission. To provide an amplified Fonseca experience, while maintaining renowned Fonseca smoothness. The good news to report is, it was a success. This medium to full-bodied blend starts with a rare Dominican Habano Vuelta Arriba sun-grown wrapper (phew that's a mouthful). Tucked just beneath this exclusive leaf awaits a bevy of robust Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers. The end result is a cigar that touches nicely on both strength and flavor. Notes of cedar, toasty tobacco, spices, and a light pepper influence round out this medium to full-bodied handmade. It's definitely a beefier cigar compared to traditional Fonseca offerings, but does so with just enough finesse to keep you interested throughout. Manuel Quesada knows how to make a fine cigar, and the Cubano Exclusivo further solidifies his resume.Great news! Fonseca Cubano Exclusivo earned an impressive 91-rating, noting: ""The smoke is rich and nutty with a cocoa sweetness that overlaps subtly spicy ground red pepper notes and a hint of cedar.""​​",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Yes,,"Corona, Gordo",No,Dominican,Fonseca
Fonseca Cubano Limitado,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Fonseca, amplified.Carefully blended by cigar legend Manuel Quesada, Fonseca Cubana Limitado employs a bold combination of tobaccos including a Honduran Habano wrapper, Nicaraguan ligero binder, and a robust blend of Dominican long-fillers. Indeed, this is far from your ordinary Fonseca. Expect a bold, Cuban-esque profile that's well-balanced and layered with notes of earth, pepper, coffee, sweetness, and a somewhat 'twangy' finish. This one's a hidden gem.Fonseca Cubano Limitado received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""Covered in a notably oily wrapper, this attractive cigar has a lush draw that delivers rich earthy notes matched by molasses and nougat sweetness and a tangy finish.""",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela",No,Habano,Fonseca
Foundation Menelik,Rated 4.92 out of 5,,"A royal release, and a wise follow-up.Menelik. Son of King Soloman and the Queen of Sheba. Ruler of Ethiopia. Also known as Ebna la-Hakim, which translates to ‘Son of the Wise’. Sound familiar? The El Gueguense and The Wise Man Maduro are two boutique releases from Foundation, and some of the most complex and delicious in their portfolio and on cigar store shelves everywhere. The Menelik was originally released as an event-only follow-up in 2017, but now in 2019, it’s finally ready to take its place on the throne at the head of Foundation’s limited production lineup.Coming in just one pigtail capped, box-pressed 4.5” x 52 petite robusto size, the Menelik wears a San Andres wrapper over a Jalapa Corojo 99 binder, and Nicaraguan fillers grown in Condega, Esteli, and Jalapa. Bursting forth with complex flavors fit for a king, the full-bodied profile is driven by spicy red-pepper notes backed by earth, leather, and oak. The cigar world anxiously awaited news of a full-scale release of the Menelik, and that day has finally arrived. Production is limited, so act fast so you don’t have to wait for the next round of shipments to try the newest cigar from the wisest blenders in the game.",Full,['Short Robusto'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,True,,Short Robusto,False,San Andres,Foundation Cigar Company
Four Kicks Mule Kick LE 2018,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"A kick in the… uh, palateThe original Four Kicks is a 91-rated bombshell, often used as a shining example of the success of boutique blends. And believe me, it is most delicious, offering up a complex profile of semi-sweet baking spices, nuttiness, and a steady dose of pepper joining a core of creamy goodness. But I’m not here to sing the praises of Four Kicks today. No sir, instead, I’d like to draw your attention to the newest release in a long line of LE’s from Jon Huber — the Four Kicks Mule Kick 2018. Below the belt, Mule Kick reads the same as the regular line. Nicaraguan binder, check; Nicaraguan filler, check. But up top, the master blender at Crowned Heads has swapped the traditional Ecuadorian Habano wrapper leaf for an oily, thick Connecticut Habano, adding an all new dimension of flavor. Moving a notch up in intensity as well, Mule Kick offers the regular bevy of flavors you’d expect from a Four Kicks in a more concentrated flavor. But be warned – we’re only getting one shipment of these, and once we sell out, it’s over!",Medium,['Toro'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Habano Connecticut,
Four Kicks Mule Kick LE 2019,Rated 4.5 out of 5,,"The mule is back, with a saddlebag full of flavor.The original Four Kicks was a highly anticipated release that took the boutique market by storm in 2011, earning a 91-point rating and immediately securing Jon Huber’s new Crowned Heads brand a place in humidors everywhere. The flavors were complex and rich, and inspired Huber to craft a series of limited editions based on the original blend, but with the goal of innovating and taking the flavors a step further. This is the fourth Mule Kick release, and the first to feature an Ecuador Sumatra wrapper over the familiar blend of Nicaraguan fillers & binder from the previous releases. The wrapper adds an extra layer of complexity and kicks the flavor up a notch, with spicy notes of cedar, citrus, and nuts. They say a mule will give you ten years of faithful, patient labor for the privilege of kicking you once. But I’d happily labor for twenty just for a good supply of Mule Kicks from Crowned Heads!",,[],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,,False,Ecuador Sumatra,
Fratello,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Try this cigar, brother!Italian for brother, Fratello cigars welcomes you to join the brotherhood of superbly crafted, boutique blends. Owner Omar de Frias grew up next door to a cigar shop in the Dominican and his love of the leaf was instilled at an early age and followed him through stops as a pro basketball player in the Dominican Republic and working for NASA. Fratello cigars represent the fulfillment of a lifelong dream for de Frias. Fratello hails from the Joya de Nicaragua factory in Esteli, Nicaragua and is instantly recognizable with its innovative, attention-grabbing angled cigar band. Sporting a Cuban-seed Nicaraguan Habano wrapper sitting atop a blend of Nicaraguan, Ecuadorian Sumatra, and Peruvian long-fillers. The flavors all complement each other, with the peppery nuances of the wrapper interplaying with the creamy and earthy notes of the fillers. This blend is medium to full-bodied and displays a complexity and balance that will please even the pickiest of enthusiasts. Try Fratello and see for yourself why this is one of the most hyped cigars in the industry.Fratello received an impressive 91-rating noting: ""Made with a dark wrapper and lumpy cap, this cigar offers notes of wood and toasted marshmallow, balanced by tea-like intonations and a savory leather finish.""​",Medium-Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,"Ecuadorian, Indonesian, Nicaraguan, Peruvian",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Habano,
Fratello Bianco I,Rated 4.76 out of 5,,"A brother from another mother.Fratello cigars are one of the most hyped brands in recent memory. The brainchild of Omar de Frias, an interesting fellow who previously was a pro basketball player in the Dominican Republic and who worked for NASA, Fratello cigars represents the fulfillment of a lifetime dream. Fratello Bianco is the second offering from the boutique brand and is the company’s first maduro cigar. Hailing from the renowned Joya de Nicaragua factory in Nicaragua, this gem comes dressed in a dark and oily San Andres maduro wrapper hugging a potent blend of Dominican, Nicaraguan, Peruvian, and Pennsylvania Broadleaf long-fillers. Fratello Bianco is medium-bodied with full flavors including raisin, pepper, coffee, and chocolate, with a subtle sweetness playing in the background. Pick up Fratello Bianco and experience a perfect sample of a maduro cigar done right. ​Note: This listing is for a Fratello Bianco I (6.2""x44) Pack of 5, not the full box shown.",Medium,['Corona'],,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, Peruvian, United States",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Corona,No,Maduro,
Fratello Navetta,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"One small step for man - one giant leap for your palate. Fratello Navetta was crafted to say, “thanks” to the brave men and women at NASA. For those who don't know, Fratello founder Omar de Frias actually worked at NASA for over a decade, and he wanted to pay homage with a cigar that really captures the elation of a successful mission. Plus, now we all can definitely say cigars are not rocket science. Handmade at the Joya de Nicaragua Factory in Nicaragua, Navetta - which means shuttle - is wrapped with an Ecuadorian Oscuro wrapper with Nicaraguan fillers. This blend really does capture pure euphoria with its notes of roasted coffee, almonds, and hay. Hats off to Mr. de Frias for this beautifully blended cigar!",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],Dominican,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Robusto,No,"Ecuador Habano, Oscuro",
Fratello Oro,Rated 4.43 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"Omar's goldFratello was born in 2013 - and to say the brand hit the ground running would be a ridiculous understatement. Brand owner Omar de Frias pays close attention to every aspect of his cigars - from the tobaccos to the signature slanted bands - everything is carefully planned out. The hard work has definitely paid off, and Fratello is often called the fastest growing cigar company on the market.You can definitely expect big things from the one of brand’s newest offerings, Fratello Oro. Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers are nestled in an Ecuador Connecticut wrapper for an explosion of mellow flavor you won’t find anywhere else. Notes of leather, cream, dried fruit, and hint of spice make this blend yet another fantastic cigar crafted by the fine folks at Fratello. ",Mellow-Medium,['Robusto'],Cameroon,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Robusto,No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Free Cuba,Rated 4.11 out of 5, Based on 209 Ratings ,"Free Cuba cigars so cheap, you’ll feel guilty.Today the Free Cuba brand is better than ever. Handmade in the Dominican Republic, Free Cuba cigars are quite simply a winner. The proof is in the pudding. Superior wrappers and premium long-fillers, quality tobaccos and excellent construction, traits clearly evident puff after puff. Indeed, a Connecticut shade wrapper leaf is married with a combination of patiently aged Cuban-seed Dominican long-leaf tobaccos. Not overly calm, but certainly not powerful, either. This mellow to medium-bodied concoction yields a pleasant yet eventful cigar that teems with flavor. Come see why Free Cuba cigars have once again become a top seller – a long-filler cigar for just over a buck a stick is almost unheard of, so get on these while the getting's good. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,
Free Cuba Maduro,Rated 4.14 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"A darker, richer Free Cuba.Free Cuba has been a sales monster for over a decade. This top-selling blend is an everyday horse, providing hours of enjoyable, high-quality handmades for pennies compared to other similar quality brands. So after years of requests, they've finally caved and added a maduro version to the lineup. It's a touch stronger, a bit richer, and definitely darker. But the smoothness and ridiculously low price that put Free Cuba on the map remain.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Torpedo",No,Maduro,
Fuente Fuente Opus X Lost City,Rated 4.7 out of 5, Based on 20 Ratings ,"A rare offering from Fuente.Unless you've been holed up underneath a rock, there's no doubt you've heard the words 'Opus X' at least a billion times. Hype or not, the Fuente Fuente Opus X is one of the rarest, and most heavily sought cigars the world has to offer, and CI holds the key.The Opus X Lost City was made with rare tobaccos grown on Chateau de la Fuente during the off-season for crop production - tobaccos that have been aging for 5 years prior to production. Made with 100% Dominican-grown tobaccos, this Puro features dark Dominican wrappers and an eventful blend of Dominican long-fillers. The result is a bold, creamy smoke with robust flavors delivered in a mellow, and smooth fashion complemented by a deep, cedary aroma. Rare, no doubt. Pricey, but worth it. Special, absolutely. Fuente Fuente Opus X Lost City received a well-deserved 93-rating , noting: ""An earthisness emerges along with notes of caramel and almond. Complex and delicious."" ",Full,"['Double Robusto', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Double Robusto, Robusto, Toro",No,"Corojo, Dominican",Arturo Fuente
G.A.R. by George Rico,Rated 3.96 out of 5, Based on 24 Ratings ,"A tasty, powerhouse blend.G.A.R. is a medium to full-bodied, full-flavored treat from George Rico that captures the bold nuances of his earlier creations, including Gran Habano and the top-rated 3 Siglos. Each cigar is carefully hand-crafted using beautiful Ecuadorian Corojo wrappers and a vintage (but robust) mixture of Nicaraguan long-fillers. Construction is top-notch: the cigar is heavy in the hand and boasts a lovely Spanish box-press finish. The smoke is rich with roasted coffee flavors supported by a creamy core of tasty tobacco flavors. Smooth down to the nub, G.A.R. becomes more intense throughout the burn, becoming quite complex and ultimately satisfying.",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Robusto,No,Ecuador Habano,
Game Cigars by Garcia y Vega,Rated 4.47 out of 5, Based on 68 Ratings ,"Shop for the many different flavors of Garcia y Vega Game Cigars introduced in 2007 and choose your favorite. Enjoy the rich mellow taste of Game White Grape, Grape, Vanilla and Peach Cigars. Game Cigars are also known as Game blunts because of the way it's created with an inner leaf wrapped around a thicker outer leaf into a spiral motion. In the 1800's the blunt got its name from being created with a rounded or broad tip and it burns a lot faster than other cigars. Browse through our inventory and buy the best Garcia y Vega cigars or cigarillos online at Cigars International. Get your Garcia Vega Game Cigars for sale at a low price from the number one cigar Shop. ",Mellow,"['Cigarillos', 'Lonsdale']",,,False,No,More Details,United States,No,,"Cigarillos, Lonsdale",Yes,Sumatra,
Game Leaf by Garcia y Vega,Rated 4.17 out of 5, Based on 18 Ratings ,"From the uber-popular crew at Garcia y Vega comes the next line of delicious. Clint Eastwood-esque ropes to hit the market. Game Leaf comes in a variety of tantalizing flavors and have a rugged appearance that burns smooth down to the nub. Featuring a natural wrapper and packaged in fresh sealed foil sleeves, this is one inexpensive offering that has all the flavor you could ask for in a cigar. ",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,,True,No,More Details,United States,No,,Cigarillos,No,Sumatra,
Garcia y Vega 1882,Rated 4.46 out of 5, Based on 41 Ratings ,"Providing quality cigars since 1882, Garcia y Vega delivers an affordable natural leaf cigarillo in the new 1882. This sweet mellow-bodied little guy yields a rich, smooth flavor and is accompanied by nice pleasant aroma.  Perfect for a quick flavorful smoke!",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,Indonesian,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Cigarillos,Varies,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Indonesian",
Garcia y Vega Cigars,Rated 4.46 out of 5, Based on 61 Ratings ,"Enjoy the smooth taste of your Garcia y Vega cigars for all cigar smokers to enjoy. Garcia y Vega comes in many different styles like the Garcia y Vega Game cigars, Game leaf cigars, and 1882 Cigars. These cigars have a very pleasant smell to them providing a very mellow taste. Garcia Vega cigars are also known as Garcia Vega blunts because of the way it is made with an inner leaf wrapped around a thicker outer leaf into a spiral motion. The blunt got its name due to its rounded or broad tip back in the 1800's. Buy low-priced Garcia Vega cigarillos, cigars, and blunts in different flavors here at Cigars International.",Mellow,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Presidente']",,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Cigarillos, Corona, Lancero/Panatela, Presidente",No,"Candela, Indonesian",
General Grant,Rated 4.11 out of 5, Based on 311 Ratings ,"America....hell yeah!Few things scream America like this new red, white, and blue beauty by the name of General Grant. These handcrafted, freehand-style cigars pay homage to old American traditions of cigar making. This shape, when crafted with rich Central American tobaccos leads to a smooth flavorful smoke that's perfect for any time of day. If you're looking to impress your buddies on the golf course, keep looking. But if you're in search of an everyday handmade with great flavor and a ridiculously low per-stick price, General Grant's right in your wheelhouse.",Mellow-Medium,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona']",,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Cigarillos, Corona",No,Sumatra,
Generations by Nestor,Rated 4.54 out of 5,,"Generations by Nestor are top-notch, premium cigars handmade by the legendary Plasencia family to honor specific members from their long and storied lineage. With three blends to choose from, see why the cigars made to honor their own family is one of the finest choices from this celebrated industry leader. ​",Medium,['Churchill'],,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Churchill,No,Nicaraguan,
Gerant's Golden Siesta,Rated 4.18 out of 5, Based on 88 Ratings ,"An airball of the highest order.Gerant, like Rip Van Winkle, should have stayed asleep much longer, for smoking this offering will make you wish you were unconscious. Frankly, in comparison with other legendary sleepyheads Gerant is downright Olympian. Indeed, he must have been taking a Golden Siesta at the blending table because these 7""x50 Churchills are so mellow and straightforward as to lack any hint of flare. If airballs that are so calm and mellow as to be void of any complexity are what you're looking for - or you want to glom something off that looks good to your moocher buddies...then these Connecticut-wrapped cigars will fit the bill. If you are looking for actual taste, try something else.",Mellow,['Churchill'],,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Churchill,No,Connecticut,
Gilberto Oliva Reserva,Rated 4.2 out of 5, Based on 187 Ratings ,"You'll wanna reserva some a these.Over the past 20 years, Oliva has emerged as one of the finest cigars makers in Nicaragua. Their humble beginnings went from producing inexpensive bundled cigars to year after year landing high ratings and well-deserved spots on many Top 25 lists. Gilberto Oliva was a man who greatly influenced the transformation of this company into outstanding tobacco growers and cigar makers. This new blend, Gilberto Oliva Reserva, honors that patriarch with their first release since 2012. This cigar has been highly anticipated by the true enthusiasts, and after my first taste, it is just as impressive as you may have hoped.Gilberto Oliva Reserva comes wrapped in a dark Indonesian Sumatra wrapper – a real pleaser if you ask me. The wrapper itself normally produces a mellower profile, but paired up with an Ecuadorian binder and rich Nicaraguan long-fillers you can expect a zesty medium-bodied cigar with smooth notes of earth, leather, and spice. I normally avoid the hype behind new releases to give every cigar the same chance, but this is one you cannot deny, it’s every bit as good as the hype behind it.  Gilberto Oliva Reserva has received two 90-ratings, and was named a ""Best Buy"" by Cigar Insider. The reviewers noted, ""shows notes of oak, earthy, and spicy gingersnap cookie before a rich, chocolatey finish.""",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Habano,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Indonesian, Sumatra",Oliva
Gilberto Oliva Reserva Blanc,Rated 4.39 out of 5, Based on 176 Ratings ,"Olivas newest premiumThe Oliva Cigar Company has emerged as one of the finest cigar makers in Nicaragua over the past 20 years. They have done this by producing premium blends with superb construction that year after year claim 90+ ratings. Every true enthusiast is well acquainted with the brand, but in recent years they have been looking forward to something new to try. Finally, that wait is over and for their first release since 2012, they are launching two new blends to honor Gilberto Oliva – the man responsible for transforming the company into outstanding tobacco growers and cigar makers. Coated by a golden brown Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper, Gilberto Oliva Reserva Blanc is expertly constructed as you may expect. An Ecuador binder and Nicaraguan fillers team up underneath in this mellow to medium-bodied gem. Loaded with creamy flavors, you’ll also notice hints of cedar accompanied by a long, enjoyable finish. We were fortunate enough to sample some of these at the office, mine was paired with a cup of coffee. I savored it down to the nub and you can bet your britches I secured a box as soon as they hit the docks.Good News! Gilberto Oliva Reserva Blanc has received an impressive 92-point rating, noting: ""A beautifully constructed corona with a superb draw and even combustion. Base notes of cedar and earth are a rich foundation for the cigar's sweeter elements of baking spices and cocoa powder.""",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Habano,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Oliva
Gilberto Oliva Reserva Noir,Rated 4.56 out of 5, Based on 32 Ratings ,"A Darker ReservaOliva is one of the finest cigar makers out there. From their Nub line to the fan favorite Oliva Serie V, critics and enthusiasts alike agree that they make top-notch products. And the Gilberto Oliva Reserva series is their newest line of products to hit the market. We first saw the Reserva and Reserva Blanc in 2017 and both have claimed 90+ ratings and some “Best Buy” awards in 2018 for their high quality and attractive price points. Gilberto Oliva Reserva Noir is the newest on the scene. The two previous Gilberto Oliva’s were on the mellower side of the spectrum but Noir cranks it up a notch. It comes dressed in a dark and oily Honduran Jamastran wrapper with a Honduran binder and a core of hearty Nicaraguan long-fillers. It gives the Gilberto Oliva Reserva line and rich, hearty option to suit the maduro fans out there. Light it up and be greeted with pleasant notes of roasted nuts, dark chocolate and a slight sweetness in a full-bodied format. The pricing is just the icing on the cake.",Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']","Honduran, Honduran Broadleaf",Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,Honduran,Oliva
Gispert,Rated 4.52 out of 5, Based on 69 Ratings ,"Gispert cigars - say what?You don't have to spend your whole inheritance to enjoy a simultaneously calm yet full-flavored cigar. Need proof? Look no further than Gispert cigars. The peculiar, French-inspired name is hard to say, but enjoying one is easy peasy lemon squeezy. Gispert hails from Honduras and features a creamy, mellow sweetness with hints of cedar throughout. The mellow blend of Honduran and Nicaraguan long-fillers wrapped in a golden Connecticut-seed wrapper will please your palate from start to finish. For the price, you simply can't go wrong....unless you’re horrible at pronouncing it.Gispert received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""A blonde cigar with a very nice burn and a lush, full draw. It has light cream and dry wood notes, with a toasty, bready quality and a hint of white chocolate.""",Mellow-Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Gispert
Gispert Intenso,Rated 4.81 out of 5, Based on 16 Ratings ,"Mellow gets IntensoIf there’s a poster-child for consistency in the cigar industry, it’s Gispert. The original 90-rated blend is mellow, smooth, and has been around since the original Cuban cigar version pre-Revolution. But now, a new blend emerges with the Gispert name. Gispert Intenso. This handmade cigar is the first Nicaraguan addition to the Gispert brand. And it’s a dark, full-bodied one at that. Blended by the Grupo de Maestros and A.J. Fernandez, Intenso is made with the medium to full-bodied cigar lover in mind. Each cigar that passed through our office burnt without a problem, dishing out leather, rich chocolate, and sweet spice. The blend is a simple recipe. A Connecticut broadleaf wrapper is met with Nicaraguan binder and Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers. But the Grupo de Maestros an AJ are some of the best in the biz, making Gispert Intenso anything but typical. ",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Corona', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Corona, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Gispert
God of Fire Serie Aniversario,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"A special limited edition release from Fuente.God of Fire refers to Prometheus, who stole fire from the Gods to give to mankind. Unfortunately, things didn’t work out too well for Prometheus after his act of larceny ,and he was subjected to perpetual torture. Made by Arturo Fuente cigars in the Dominican Republic , the God of Fire line is one of the most sought after and collected cigars in the world. God of Fire Aniversario comes draped in an Ecuadoran wrapper hugging a blend of Dominican long-fillers. This limited edition cigar is mellow to medium-bodied and features a nutty flavor that gradually progresses into some smooth, creamy nuances. The profile is balanced, complex, and consistent throughout the duration of the smoke.  This is a subtle, savory, and refreshing cigar that can be enjoyed any time of day. ​",Mellow-Medium,['Salomon'],,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Salomon,No,Ecuador Sungrown,Arturo Fuente
God of Fire Serie B,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"The fire burns hotter.It's no secret that God of Fire is one of the finest super-premium cigars on the market. Released annually in small-batch fashion, the brand seems to attract more and more enthusiasts with each passing year. But this isn't your everyday God of Fire. The Serie B is the result of twenty impressive years in the cigar industry. Carefully crafted by Arturo Fuente, each Serie B has been masterfully blended to serve up the boldest and richest God of Fire yet. This time around, a choice selection of Dominican long-fillers accompanies two different hand-selected wrappers.Ecuadorian Sun Grown - medium to full-bodied. Hearty, bold notes of pepper, leather, natural sweetness, earth, and coffee. Connecticut Broadleaf maduro - medium to full-bodied. Rich, smooth notes of espresso, cocoa, spices, and dried fruit. note - each box is serial numbered and comes with a certificate of authenticity.",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto",No,Ecuador Sungrown,Arturo Fuente
Good Times 4Ks Cigarillos,Rated 3.71 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"Good Times 4Ks Cigarillos- Aromatic and satisfying smoke- Available in a number of popular flavors- Sweet, rich flavor and reliable construction- Foil-wrapped for freshness- Available in 4 packs of 15 (60 Cigars)",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,"Connecticut, HTL",
Good Times Cigarillos,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Good Times Cigarillos- Mellow, aromatic, and satisfying smoke- Available in a number of popular flavors including blueberry cigars- Sweet, rich flavor and reliable construction- Foil-wrapped for freshness in packs of 3",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,Ecuador Habano,
Good Times Cigarillos,Rated 4.39 out of 5, Based on 56 Ratings ,"Good Times Cigarillos- Calm, aromatic, and satisfying cigar- Available in a number of popular flavors like blueberry cigars- Sweet, rich flavor and reliable construction- Foil-wrapped for freshness",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,HTL,
Good Times Country Man,Rated 4.38 out of 5, Based on 378 Ratings ,"Country Man by Good Times- A highly-affordable, quality cigar- Very mellow in body- Creamy, smooth, slightly sweet flavor- Available in natural or maduro- Economically packaged in cases of 50 cigars",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,"Maduro, Sumatra",
Good Times HD Cigarillos,Rated 4.29 out of 5,,"Good Times HD Cigarillos- Natural, Connecticut shade wrapper leaf- Mellow, aromatic and satisfying smoke- Available in a number of popular flavors- Sweet, rich flavor and reliable construction- Foil-wrapped for freshness in packs of 3",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,Connecticut,
Good Times Little N Wild,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 40 Ratings ,"Good Times Little N Wild- Pipe tobacco infused for a variety of pleasing tastes- Mellow, aromatic, and satisfying smoke- Sweet, rich flavor and reliable construction deliver in each cigarillo including the blueberry cigars- Tipped end for an easy, cool draw- Smooth on the palate for enjoyment any time of day",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,,True,No,More Details,United States,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,HTL,
Good Times Sweet Woods,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Good Times Sweet Woods- Mellow, aromatic, and satisfying smoke- Available in a number of popular flavors- Sweet, rich flavor and reliable construction- Foil wrapped for freshness",Medium,['Cigarillos'],,,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,Connecticut Broadleaf,
Gran Habano #1 Connecticut,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 14 Ratings ,"Numero uno for a reason.This mellow to medium-bodied blend was crafted to deliver delicate, smooth flavors in droves. Designed to compete with brands Macanudo and Ashton, the #1 Connecticut lays to rest the myth that mellow cigars can't pack a lot of flavor. At play you'll find a silky Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper, sitting atop a core of Nicaraguan long-fillers and binder. This recipe serves up predominant notes of cream and toast, before additional hints of nuts, leather, and a touch of coffee enter the fray. Highly enjoyable, the #1 Connecticut dances between mellow and medium-bodied during a slow, gradual burn. The blend has even received an impressive ’4.3’ rating from SMOKE Magazine.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Rothschild']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Pyramid, Robusto, Rothschild",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Gran Habano
Gran Habano #3 Habano,Rated 3.88 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"More like 'Grand' Habano.The Gran Habano # 3 Habano comes dressed in a toothy and leathery Nicaraguan Habano wrapper. This oily and supple leaf encases a well-aged blend of Costa Rican, Nicaraguan, and Mexican long-fillers to promote a smooth, medium to full-bodied smoke that’s quite complex, yet incredibly well-balanced. Hearty notes of cedar, spices, coffee, and roasted nuts make an appearance behind billows of cool, dry smoke. Rated ’4.5’ by SMOKE Magazine, the Gran Habano #3 is a must try.Good News! Gran Habano #3 just landed on Cigar Aficionado's Best Buys of 2019 list and earned a 90-point rating, noting: ""Primary notes of earth and cedar carry nutty hints of leather. The sweet finish smacks of honey and salted caramel.""",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Rothschild']",,"Costa Rican, Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Pyramid, Robusto, Rothschild",No,Habano,Gran Habano
Gran Habano #5 Corojo,Rated 4.77 out of 5, Based on 22 Ratings ,"A classic. Compliments of Gran Habano.The Gran Habano #5 Corojo utilizes a thick, red Corojo leaf paired with rich long-fillers from Mexico, Nicaragua, and Costa Rica. The result is a full-bodied smoke that issues a powerful bouquet of spices and complex, rich flavors. One of Gran Habano's finest creations, the #5 Corojo should be a regular member of your rotation. Gran Habano #5 Corojo received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""A dark, attractive smoke with an elegant draw and burn. It’s salty and rich. There are creamy, coffee notes and a touch of nuts and earth, and the finish is long.""",Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Pyramid', 'Robusto', 'Rothschild']",,"Costa Rican, Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Pyramid, Robusto, Rothschild",No,Corojo,Gran Habano
Gran Habano #5 Corojo Maduro,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"#5 goes dark.The classic Gran Habano #5 Corojo gets the dark treatment. The original blend is a fan favorite and received high-ratings from industry publications, and we couldn’t wait to see the results of this blend with a maduro wrapper. Gran Habano #5 Corojo Maduro doesn’t disappoint. Featuring the hearty blend of long-fillers from Nicaragua, and Costa Rica, the cigar is topped off with a delectable Corojo maduro wrapper. Full-bodied and brimming with flavor, expect notes of coffee, baking spice, nuts, chocolate, and earth to embrace you and draw you in. One of the tastiest cigars to come from Gran Habano, pick up this dark gem and we’re sure it’ll become a part of your regular rotation. ​",Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto']",Costa Rica,"Costa Rican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto",No,Corojo,Gran Habano
Gran Habano 3 SLS,Rated 3.98 out of 5, Based on 116 Ratings ,"An incredible CI deal, period.Some prefer their whiskey strong and their women tame. But this pretty lady is both lovely and packs a punch. Gran Habano’s 3 Siglos blend is gorgeous....its cedary pre-light aroma and its flawless wrapper are mesmerizing. But wait until you toast the foot: layers of rich, smooth flavors coat the palate while dashes of pepper finish each puff. A medium to full-bodied, 92-rated gem of a smoke. Here's the best part, due to a trademark dispute, 3 Siglos is being phased out. I've got a ton of inventory remaining and I'm offering them up to you for a song. Trust me: if this kind of cigar is up your alley, order it up asap. Then if you like it, come back and buy them in droves while they last because this price down below is a remarkable bargain. Just be light on your feet and move expeditiously buckeroo because these are gonna move.3 Siglos received a sterling 92-point rating: ""This rich, alluring cigar has an even draw and burns with a spicy aroma. There are peppery notes, a touch of grain and a long, leathery finish. A full-bodied cigar with considerable flavor.""",Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,"Costa Rican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Habano,Gran Habano
Gran Habano Gran Reserva #5 2011,Rated 4.16 out of 5,,"Gran Habano Gran Reserva #5 2011 continues the tradition of the well-aged Gran Habano Gran Reserva line. This version was rolled three years ago - back in 2010 - using a rich blend of vintage tobaccos aged 7 to 8 years prior. But what's most different about this installment is the strength, a full-bodied handmade with plenty of power. Additionally, some chunky big-ring size options are present and relatively affordable considering the healthy amount of costly vintage tobaccos rolled within.",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",,"Costa Rican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Robusto",No,Nicaraguan,
Gran Habano La Conquista,Rated 3.88 out of 5,,"Conquer your humidor!From the uber-popular Gran Habano Vintage 2002 to the rich and spicy Gran Habano Corojo #5, George Rico’s famous brand has been pleasing cigar connoisseurs across the country for years now. And with La Conquista, he loads one more awesome blend into the chamber. Sure to earn Rico even more fans, each La Conquista is handmade with the utmost care and precision. From first glance, this cigar is dressed to kill. Remove the cedar outer wrap, and you’ll find a lush and oily Nicaraguan Corojo wrapper. On the first few effortless puffs, there’s plenty of spice and pepper, but as the cigar progresses things mellow out, with cedar, leather, and natural tobacco sweetness entering the mix. The tri-country filler blend (Nicaraguan, Colombian, and Costa Rican) keeps things enticingly complex, and the everyday asking price is just the icing on the cake. Jump on this one swiftly, lads. Great news, Gran Habano La Conquista has received a well-deserved 93-rating. The review noted, “There's a coppery gleam to this oily cigar, whose cedary, nutty core is beautifully accented by spicy notes of caraway seed, cinnamon and graham cracker.""",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],Nicaraguan,"Colombian, Costa Rican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Robusto,No,Nicaraguan,Gran Habano
Gran Habano Minis,Rated 4.38 out of 5, Based on 26 Ratings ,"Gran Habano goodness. Fraction of the size.For starters, Gran Habano Minis deliver the same handmade attention to detail as their full-sized brethren, including the same wrappers and fillers. They also happen to be some of the tastiest cigarillos I've had in some time. Each is rich, enjoyable and well made. One thing is for sure, if you fancy the full-sized Gran Habano line, you’ll go bananas for the minis. And best of all, they’re packaged in convenient pocket-sized cardboard tins. These tasty buggers have quickly become my new go-to cigarillos at the local water hole. Available in the following varieties:#1 Connecticut - Mild to medium-bodied. Ecuador Connecticut wrapper atop Nicaraguan fillers for a creamy, mellow profile. #3 Habano - Medium to full-bodied. Nicaraguan Habano wrapper meets with Costa Rican, Mexican, and Nicaraguan fillers. Boasts hints of cedar, spices, coffee, and roasted nuts.#5 Corojo - Full-bodied. A Corojo wrapper joins forces with Costa Rican, Mexican, and Nicaraguan fillers. Spicy, chewy, and bold. ",Full,['Cigarillos'],,"Costa Rican, Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Cigarillos,No,"Corojo, Ecuador Connecticut, Habano",Gran Habano
Gran Habano S.T.K. Black Dahlia,Rated 3.98 out of 5,,"Stop & smell the Dahlias.As undeniably delicious and well-made as regular production Gran Habano cigars are, every once in a while they surprise us with something a little extra special. Company president George Rico is a master of cigars, and proves it time and time again with boutique, small-batch releases under the S.T.K moniker. Now’s your chance to get your hands on one of these extra-special releases - The Gran Habano S.T.K. Black Dahlia.When you open up a box of Black Dahlia, you’ll be smiling ear-to-ear. The beautiful and tastefully ornate band enhances the look of the golden Nicaraguan Shade-Grown Corojo wrapper, which hugs a Nicaraguan Habano binder and long-fillers from Colombia, Nicaragua, and Costa Rica. Unabashedly full-bodied, S.T.K. Black Dahlia starts with well-balanced notes of bread and pepper, with a backbone of cream and cedar. Light this one up when you have the time to truly savor the tasting notes, and you’ll be reaching for another one before you know it.",Full,"['Corona Gordo', 'Double Robusto', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,"Colombian, Costa Rican, Nicaraguan",False,,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Corona Gordo, Double Robusto, Robusto",Varies,"Corojo, Nicaraguan",
Gran Habano Vintage Connecticut 2004,Rated 4.42 out of 5, Based on 26 Ratings ,"A fine VintageGran Habano's fan-favorite Vintage line gets a new, Connecticut wrapped version. Boasting a light brown, Shade-grown wrapper cultivated in 2004, this blend is supremely smooth while still maintaining the intensity Gran Habano is well known for. Full-flavored, yet balanced, this will be your new favorite 'anytime' cigar. The price is the icing on this Connecticut cake. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",,,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto",No,Connecticut,Gran Habano
Gran Habano Vintage Corojo 2002,Rated 4.16 out of 5, Based on 847 Ratings ,"A CI Fan-Favorite!The right hand giveth one of the industry's tastiest under-the-radar blends from Gran Habano cigars. The left hand taketh away fears you'd never see a super-premium blend at such a deeply discounted price again.So rest easy, my man. This is the 90-rated Gran Habano Corojo #5 blend composed of full-bodied, Habano-seed long-fillers from Nicaragua and Dominican but it boasts a juicy Nicaraguan-grown Corojo wrapper leaf cultivated back in 2002, one which has enjoyed an extended cedar-nap for the past 8 years. The outcome is virtuous: a deep series of rich, creamy flavors smacking of coffee, nuts, and earth tamed by the smooth, Cuban-esque qualities of a well-aged Corojo leaf. The Gran Habano Vintage 2002 cigar remains medium to full-bodied but maintains a wonderful balance and long, elegant finish.The price is out of this world. Nothing short of monumental.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto",No,Corojo,Gran Habano
Gran Habano Vintage Habano 2006,Rated 4.05 out of 5, Based on 151 Ratings ,"The view from '06It's here! Loud and proud, ready for the Habano lovin' crowd. Gran Habano's new Vintage 2006 features an oily, glistening Habano wrapper cultivated back in - you guessed it - 2006. T'was a great year for me, almost out of college after 6 short, Natty Ice soaked years. It was also a great year for tobacco, as this is one of the nicest looking, best tasting wrappers we've encountered in a long time. Full-flavored with a long finish, you'll see why Gran Habano Vintage is a powerhouse brand, as the 2006 significantly bolsters its portfolio.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",,"Costa Rican, Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto",No,Habano,Gran Habano
Gran Habano Zulu Zulu Black S.E.,Rated 4.25 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"Mas good.The first thing you’ll notice is the beautiful box with a line drawing by Washington, DC based street artist Maz Paz. Gran Habano Zulu Zulu is an extremely limited release with a portion of proceeds donated to a charitable cause – this release supports the renovation of the La Casa de la Madre y el Nino orphanage in Bogota, Colombia. Gran Habano Zulu Zulu Maz Paz Edition is available in 2 blends. Black comes with an Ecuadoran Connecticut wrapper, Nicaraguan Habana binder, and Nicaraguan long-fillers, and White with a Nicaraguan Habano wrapper and binder, and Nicaraguan long-filler.Black: Medium-bodied with soothing notes of vanilla, cream, cedar, earth, and a sweet cream. This cigar is perfect for any time of day and balanced and complex without becoming overwhelming.",Medium,['Toro'],,,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Toro,No,Ecuador Connecticut,Gran Habano
Grand Marnier,Rated 4.6 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"Oui, Oui. It is good!I don’t speak a lick of French, but I do know that when you combine one of the best French liqueurs with premium tobaccos, good things happen. On one hand, you have Grand Marnier, a delicious orange-flavored liqueur. On the other, you have premium tobaccos grown in the Dominican draped in a Corojo wrapper. After carefully combining the two through an imbuing process, you're left with a one-of-a-kind cigar. It smells like heaven, and that's just the preview. Expect gentle notes of orange to shine through as a sort of array of toasty, semi-sweet tobacco mingles quite nicely. It's not everyone’s cup of tea, but for those that like a smooth, slightly sweet infused cigar, Grand Marnier more than takes care of business.",Mellow-Medium,['Torpedo'],,Dominican,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Torpedo,Yes,Corojo,
Grand Prize by EP Carrillo,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Winner winner, chicken dinner!When you feast your eyes on this selection from EP Carrillo & Tabacalera La Alianza, you’ll feel like a lucky winner for sure. Ernesto Perez-Carrillo spares no expense in producing some of the finest cigars on the market, and still manages to keep prices affordable enough for any connoisseur. Unique tobacco and rigorous quality control ensure satisfaction of the senses, and our signature low prices ensure satisfaction of the wallet, too!Straight out of Ernesto’s Dominican cigar factory comes a decidedly unique blend utilizing tobacco from five different countries! On the outside, you’ll find an Ecuador wrapper & binder, concealing a meticulously blended mix of Dominican, Nicaraguan, Ecuadorian, Mexican, and USA fillers, all hand-selected by Ernesto himself. The profile is medium in body and big on complexity, and makes an excellent addition to EP Carrillo’s factory series. Grab a box, and see what can be accomplished when true dedication meets great value.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Ecuador,"Dominican, Ecuadorian, Mexican, Nicaraguan, United States",False,False,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,E.P. Carrillo
Graycliff 10 Year Vintage Maduro,Rated 4.64 out of 5, Based on 98 Ratings ,"A decade in the makingNew. Graycliffs. Those ripples created by those two words could flip a boat. Graycliff has long been known for producing top-shelf cigars of exceptional quality. Born in a small factory in the Bahamas, Graycliff has gone on to become one of the biggest and best in the biz. From their economically priced G2 series to the stellar 30 Year Vintage, they’ve got a full profile of grade-A beef. And 10-Year Vintage Maduro is another filet in this collection of steaks. So, uh, meat metaphors aside, let’s break this blend down a bit. We’re looking at an oily Connecticut Broadleaf Maduro wrapper over aged long-fillers from Nicaragua and Honduras. It's a rich, medium-bodied blend that's incredibly consistent from cigar to cigar. Expect notes of rich cedar and cocoa, with a creamy, earthy core. This new release is a Graycliff you don’t want to miss out on, so act fast!​",Medium,"['Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Honduran,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Presidente, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Graycliff
Graycliff 1666,Rated 4.65 out of 5, Based on 34 Ratings ,"An unrivaled historyFounded by Graycliff resort owner, Enrico Garzaroli, the Graycliff cigar brand has easily established itself as one of the premier luxury choices among aficionados worldwide. Today, we welcome back Graycliff 1666, a blend originally crafted to celebrate the year that Graycliff’s main building was constructed. Known as the “Pride of the Bahamas,” this iconic piece of cigar history is a must-see for anyone visiting Nassau. As for the cigar itself, it’s nothing short of fantastic. Handcrafted in Honduras, this dark and oily treat is cloaked in a near-perfect Costa Rican maduro leaf. Underneath, a rich and chewy tri-country blend of Honduran, Dominican, and Nicaraguan long-fillers marry together beautifully to deliver a profile that’s powerful, but smooth. Each puff reveals initial hints of black pepper, before mellowing out into a chocolate and cedar based profile that pairs perfectly with your favorite scotch or whiskey. ",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Maduro,Graycliff
Graycliff 30-Year Vintage,Rated 4.45 out of 5, Based on 177 Ratings ,"Glorious 30-year old wrapper.Graycliff. A name synonymous with top-notch boutique handmades. Crafted in true small-batch fashion, by a handful of elite rollers, each and every cigar bearing the Graycliff name is a masterpiece in its own right. In fact, few can hold a candle to the methods and traditions contained within the factory's walls. But this here, is no doubt Graycliff's finest creation to date.The Graycliff 30th's piece de resistance is the genuine 30-year old African Cameroon wrapper. Painstakingly aged for over three decades, this stunning leaf is nothing short of a work of art itself. But there's more to this succulent creature than just a vintage wrapper. Perfectly nestled beneath this extensively aged leaf awaits a 3-country blend of impressive long-fillers hailing from the Dominican, Nicaragua, and Honduras. This remarkable bouquet is tied together by a bold San Andres binder. Upon taking flame to foot, the real fireworks begin. A mellow barrage of chewy, soft notes coat the palate in striking fashion. Nutty, creamy, and slightly sweet, the 30-year inches toward a medium-bodied profile that only gets better with each satisfying and remarkable puff. Oh yes, epic indeed, this handmade should be savored....slowly.",Medium,"['Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Mexican,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Presidente, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Cameroon,Graycliff
Graycliff Chateau Series,Rated 4.45 out of 5,,"A taste of the good lifeThe Graycliff line of cigars is perhaps one of the best-known boutique brands in the world. Founded by the Garzaroli family, owners and operators of the renowned Graycliff Hotel and Restaurant, Graycliff is one of the only brands with cigars handmade in the Bahamas. Born in a small factory with a ton of spirit, Graycliff cigars have stood the test of time thanks to painstaking tobacco curing, fermentation, and rolling methods. Today, we’re focusing on the Graycliff Chateau Series, a hand-rolled super-premium produced in the Graycliff Cigar Company’s factory in Nassau, Bahamas. Rich and overloaded with full-bodied flavor, this Costa Rican charmer is equipped with an oily and smooth wrapper leaf. Underneath, an Ecuadorian binder and Costa Rican, Nicaraguan, and Honduran long-fillers combine to create a luxurious profile with wood, earth, grassiness, and a rich sweetness. ",Medium,['Presidente'],,,False,No,More Details,Bahamas,No,,Presidente,No,Habano,Graycliff
Graycliff Crystal Series,Rated 5 out of 5,,"The epitome of 'boutique'.The Graycliff name represents one of the industry’s most prestigious brands in handmade cigars. This veritable ultra-premium is carefully hand-crafted by a tiny team of 12 master-rollers, under the strict and watchful eye of Avelino Lara - the genius behind Cuba’s original Cohiba. Made in true boutique fashion, each Graycliff cigar is composed of exquisite, patiently aged tobaccos and offers the highest standard in quality, taste, and satisfaction.Often compared to the beloved Ashton VSG, the Crystal Series is a bold, medium to full-bodied gem. Rated 90+ on more than one occasion, in addition to “Best of the Best” honors from Robb Report, this flavorful lovely combines a thick and oily Ecuadorian sun-grown wrapper with a complex mixture of supremely aged long-fillers from Brazil, Nicaragua, and Honduras. As an added bonus, a rare strain of Grecian tobacco was carefully blended into this cigar, adding a lovely spice to the fray. After significant box-aging, the Crystal Series blankets the palate with bold, yet elegant flavors, including leather, earth, pepper, and a sweet aftertaste that complements the cigar’s rich core perfectly.This just might be Graycliff’s most sophisticated handmade.The Graycliff Crystal received a well deserved '90' point rating, noting:""A soft, oily pyramid with a loose, easy draw. It has earthy notes of honey, caramel and espresso, with a long spicy finish. A medium-bodied cigar that will improve with age.""",Medium-Full,"['Presidente', 'Salomon', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,"Brazilian, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Bahamas,Varies,,"Presidente, Salomon, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,Ecuador Habano,Graycliff
Graycliff Double Espresso Series,Rated 4.76 out of 5, Based on 17 Ratings ,"Double the Espresso, double the funEnrico Garzaroli has said that he has one simple goal with Graycliff cigars: to create the ultimate cigar. I’m not sure that a perfect cigar exists, but Graycliff Double Espresso gets pretty damn close. The Graycliff Espresso line has been a best-seller for years, and with this follow-up, Graycliff has released a single-size extension that brings the blend to bold new places. Let’s get one thing out of the way: this is a full-bodied blend with a high-octane kick. If that’s your cup of tea, stick with me. We’ve got a dark, oily Pennsylvania Broadleaf wrapper with a core of Dominican, Honduran, and Nicaraguan long-fillers. Light it up and you’ll be greeted with coffee, chocolate, spice, earth, and a natural sweetness. Double down your Espresso game, and get this cigar in your life.  ​",Full,['Robusto'],Sumatra,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Robusto,No,Pennsylvania Broadleaf,Graycliff
Graycliff Espresso Series,Rated 5 out of 5,,"The epitome of 'boutique.'A tiny team of one dozen master rollers quietly craft cigars in Nassau, Bahamas under the supervision of Avelino Lara, creator of the original Cuban Cohiba. Using some of the world's finest tobaccos, these rollers produce Graycliff, a luxury handmade brand that essentially defines what a boutique cigar is all about. Among the Graycliff blends produced here is the Espresso series. This blend has been described as ""nearly hallucinogenic"" by Robb Report magazine....although it is rich and full in flavor it is far from full-bodied. In fact, it's really more of a middleweight in the strength department. Cloaked in a super-dark Costa Rican wrapper, a bold combination of Cuban-seed Corojo, Ecuadorian ligero, and Nicaraguan tobaccos is aged 6 years, making the Espresso the fullest of the Graycliffs. Deep, rich notes of chocolate and coffee coat the palate, and are complemented by a robust note of toast and spice on the finish. Simply delicious.",Full,"['Presidente', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,"Ecuadorian, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Bahamas,No,,"Presidente, Toro, Torpedo",No,Costa Rican,Graycliff
Graycliff G2,Rated 4.37 out of 5, Based on 211 Ratings ,"​Graycliff is well-versed at creating bold, complex blends - cigars that earn top honors and top ratings. But a mellow, medium-bodied blend was never an arrow in the Graycliff quiver....(cue dramatic music, release doves).....until now! Behold, Graycliff G2. This lovely little Graycliff has it all: it’s got substance (not just a pretty face you see) and it’s an astonishingly cheap date to boot (more on that later). The G2 begins with a seamless, Ecuadorian-grown Connecticut wrapper, silky-smooth and an oily sheen. The aged mixture of long-fillers from Nicaragua are carefully blended with Cuban-seed Dominican tobaccos to promote a rich bouquet finished by creamy nuances. Notes of nuts and toast are noticeable along with a pleasant touch of leather and sweet elements plus a unique doughy aroma. Its richness becomes more present as it burns, bringing this mellow array of flavor builds from calm to medium in body toward the nub. Complex, yet sophisticated and well-balanced, the G2 is Graycliff’s ultimate anytime cigar. Topped off with an absolutely killer price point - this cigar is the gateway to Graycliff if ever there was one.",Mellow-Medium,"['Gordo', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Presidente, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Graycliff
Graycliff G2 Habano,Rated 4.29 out of 5, Based on 166 Ratings ,"​A spicy addition.Graycliff G2 is an affordable extension of the luxury brand. Known for their super-premium blends and their higher price points, G2 offers the same quality and richness of flavor that’s come to define the brand but at a price that’s accessible for the masses.G2 Habano features the same blend of Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers, but with this incarnation adds a feisty Habano wrapper to the mix. This medium-bodied morsel offers up hearty flavors of spice, pepper, cedar, earth, and cream and is priced just right for everyday enjoyment. ",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Presidente, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Habano,Graycliff
Graycliff G2 Maduro,Rated 4.17 out of 5, Based on 114 Ratings ,"​It’s time to welcome G2’s newest addition to the family.Graycliff G2 managed to bring an upper echelon brand down to the masses, and for this reason it gained a massive following. That’s certainly easy to do when you offer a top-notch cigar at a palatable price point. Those die-hard G2 fans had some requests, and as it turns out, the crowd pleasers at Graycliff were listening. In order to appease the demands of their consumers, Graycliff introduced the next extension in the G2 portfolio: Graycliff G2 Maduro.G2 Maduro utilizes the same Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers as its older brother, but this time the wrapper leaf adds a welcomed twist into the equation. Adorning this beauty is a Pennsylvania Broadleaf maduro wrapper, which gives G2 Maduro additional body and complexity. Brimming with notes of cocoa, spice, and cream, G2 Maduro is sure to become a new staple pick in your rotation.",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Presidente, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Maduro",Graycliff
Graycliff Heritage Royale,Rated 4.45 out of 5,,"Welcome the boldest Graycliff yet.Ahh the Bahamas. Home to crystal clear water, scantily clad ladies, drinks on the beach....I’ll just stop now. Man, I need a vacation. Anyway....besides being a beautiful place, it’s also the home of Graycliff. A boutique brand rolled by a team of a dozen or so rollers responsible for carefully crafting each and every cigar. This prestigious factory uses only the best, most patiently aged tobaccos to deliver the highest quality standards of taste and construction. Full-bodied and well-balanced, Heritage Royale is hands down one of Graycliff's strongest blends to date. By combining a well-rounded mixture of tobaccos from Ecuador, Honduras and Nicaragua inside a golden Costa Rican wrapper, there's a lot to look forward to. Complex nuances of chocolate, earth, and coffee offer a bold, flavorful profile from first light down to the nub. Firm in the hand, this well-made cigar not only offers a nice change of pace, it's damn hard to resist.",Full,"['Robusto', 'Salomon', 'Torpedo']",,"Ecuadorian, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Bahamas,No,,"Robusto, Salomon, Torpedo",No,Costa Rican,Graycliff
Graycliff Profesionale Series,Rated 4.65 out of 5, Based on 54 Ratings ,"A “profesionale” blendDamn, Graycliff. Back at it again, with the top-shelf cigars. Graycliff Profesionale Series is another top notch blend from Enrico Garzaroli’s brand. Now let’s be honest, for a cigar like this to justify the price point, it’s gotta be better than good. And that’s exactly what you get — a stogie that performs like a champ, and tastes even better, day in and day out. Graycliff Profensionale is a welcome addition to the Graycliff line. Some of you may remember this cigar from back in the day, and I’m happy to report that it's back, and better than ever.  An Ecuador Sumatra wrapper lays atop a four country blend of long-fillers, for a complex and unforgettable blend. A semi-sweet flavor of bready, earthy tobacco coats the palate, delivering wave after wave of flavor. I burnt this down to the nub, and I’m sure you will too.​",Medium,"['Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Sumatra,"Brazilian, Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Presidente, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Sumatra,Graycliff
Graycliff Silver Series,,,"Silver takes the gold!Handmade in the world-renowned Graycliff Cigar Factory in Nassau, Bahamas, and aged an extensive five years after they’re rolled, Graycliff Silver Series cigars are truly some of the most sophisticated and luxurious cigars on the market. Hell, if I were naming these I’d go Platinum or Gold, Silver seems a little too lowly, but either way, the cigars are off the charts. Featuring a stunning Ecuador Habano wrapper leaf, each Graycliff Silver Series cigar contains an Ecuadorian binder leaf and a four-country combination of Costa Rican, Honduran, Philippian, and Nicaraguan long-fillers. Toasting the foot, you’ll find a robust but balanced medium-bodied profile, featuring hints of sweet cream and earthiness alongside a nice, woodsy note. ",Medium-Full,"['Toro', 'Torpedo']",Ecuador,"Costa Rican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Bahamas,No,,"Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Habano,Graycliff
Graycliff Turbo Edicion Limitada,Rated 4.45 out of 5, Based on 121 Ratings ,"Graycliff + Turbo + Edicion Limitada = cigar-burning bliss.First there was Graycliff Turbo. A full-bodied, full-flavored treat unlike any Graycliff handmade the world has seen. A roaring success, paving the way for an exclusive, high-end treat worthy of praise. Graycliff Turbo Edicion Limitada is here....for a limited time only.Graycliff Turbo Edicion Limitada is a rare treat. The first Graycliff to boast Ecuador's famed Habano wrapper. This redolent wrapper is oily and thick, promoting an exceedingly rich and hearty influence throughout the slow burn. Underneath, a well-aged blend of Habano-seed long-fillers from Nicaragua and Honduras unite. After extensive post-roll aging, each Turbo EL unveils a deliciously complex bouquet layered by leather, oak, rich tobacco and a long, zesty finish with syrupy-sweet nuances. An amazing Graycliff experience.",Full,"['Gordo', 'Toro']",,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Toro",No,Habano,Graycliff
Guardian of the Farm,Rated 4.88 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"Warped’s best cigar yet? 
Guardian of the Farm is the second collaboration between Warped’s Kyle Gellis and Max Fernandez from AGANORSA. A spiritual successor of sorts to the Warped Futuro, Guardian of the Farm fits right into the Warped portfolio.
A Nicaraguan puro of the highest-caliber, Guardian of the Farm utilizes a Corojo ’99 wrapper leaf grown in the Jalapa valley, and a mixture of Corojo ’99 and Criollo ’98 long-fillers. Each puff from this Warped handmade delivers a balanced profile, featuring notes of sweet cream, black pepper, woodiness, and cream. But don’t just take our word for it, Guardian of the Farm was also named the #8 Cigar of 2017.
Earning an esteemed 93-rating, the critics noted: “profoundly nutty in character, showing almond and nutmeg qualities along with hints of cinnamon.”
",Medium,"['Lonsdale', 'Robusto', 'Rothschild', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Lonsdale, Robusto, Rothschild, Torpedo",No,Nicaraguan,Warped
Guardian of the Farm Nightwatch,Rated 4.25 out of 5,,"“The better I get to know men, the more I find myself loving dogs.” - Charles de GaulleMankind owes a lot to our four-legged furry friends. Dogs have been with us for centuries, providing loyalty, companionship, and in Aganorsa’s case, security for their massive tobacco fields. The original release of Guardian of the Farm paid tribute to the American Bulldogs that keep the prized leaves safe, and the newest line extension, Guardian of the Farm Nightwatch, honors all canine companions everywhere.The Nightwatch is wrapped in a shade-grown Corojo maduro wrapper that owner Eduardo Fernandez had dreamt of producing for a number of years, and has finally perfected at his farm in Jalapa Nicaragua. Beneath this is a Jalapa Corojo binder and Corojo and Criollo long-fillers from Esteli and Jalapa. A Nicaraguan puro all the way, this stick produces rich notes of leather, spice, toast, wood, and earth, and features a cool burn & pleasant finish. Dogs are so great it’s almost like mankind doesn’t deserve them, but they deserve to be honored with a cigar as good as Guardian of the Farm Nightwatch.",Medium,"['Lonsdale', 'Robusto', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Lonsdale, Robusto, Short Robusto, Toro",No,"Maduro, Nicaraguan Jalapa",Warped
Guillermo Leon,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"La Aurora's newest creation.Guillermo Leon is the owner of La Aurora cigars, and now the proud owner of his own eponymous cigar. Guillermo Leon cigars are crafted with a pretty impressive blend of tobaccos - a dark Ecuadorian Habano Vuelta Arriba wrapper, two binders (Cameroon and Dominican Corojo), along with long-fillers from Peru, Brazil, Nicaragua, and the Dominican Republic. Oh my, that's a complex blend! But in the end, it's worth it. A medium-bodied blend that's smooth, rich, and brimming with complex notes of earth, pepper, cedar, coffee, and a hint of sweetness on the finish. A lovely top-shelf addition to the impressive La Aurora line-up.Guillermo Leon received a well-deserved 92-point rating, noting: ""Solidly rolled with a richly colored wrapper and slightly uneven burn. It's a cedary cigar balanced by plenty of leather and spice on the palate.""",Medium,"['Perfecto', 'Robusto']",,"Brazilian, Nicaraguan, Peruvian",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Perfecto, Robusto",No,Habano,La Aurora
Gurkha 125th Anniversary,Rated 4.45 out of 5, Based on 153 Ratings ,"Gurkha's milestone blend.Celebrating 125 years is quite the accomplishment. When you think about it, not much of anything makes it that long, let alone a cigar brand. But Gurkha is still chuggin' strong thanks to a diverse portfolio of tip-top blends. And within the mighty Gurkha lineup, it would be difficult to crown only one as the best, but the Gurkha 125th Anniversary is undoubtedly in the running. Dressed in an oily, and beautiful Cuban-seed Brazilian Habano wrapper, you'll be fighting the urge to sink your teeth in. But that's just the appetizer, as the real meat to the meal lies beneath. A complex array of bold Dominican, Nicaraguan and Brazilian long-fillers unite to create a savory core. This recipe yields a medium to full-bodied profile as the cigar is smooth and balanced. Nuances march in one by one as rich tobacco, sweet spices, vanilla, coffee, and roasted nuts all make a welcomed cameo. But the real cherry on top, if I've ever seen one, is the stunning band. Winner of the 2012 Golden Label Printing Award, it's no doubt one of the most eye-catching and extravagant bands I've ever seen. A fitting band for such a remarkable handmade. Gurkha 125th Anniversary received an impressive 94-rating noting: ""It has a lovely flavor of dried orange peel, some leather and cedar, and is a balanced smoke with no shortage of elegance.""​​​",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Habano,"Brazilian, Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Brazilian, Habano",Gurkha
Gurkha 130th Reserve,Rated 4.26 out of 5, Based on 69 Ratings ,"Gurkha’s Milestone BlendGurkha 130th Reserve is, quite simply, one of the finest cigars under the Gurkha brand. And that’s saying something when you’re comparing it to a massive portfolio, including best-selling blends like Gurkha Beauty, Beast, Titan, Centurian, and Warlord. Styled in the model of the Gurkha Private Select Abuelo and HMR, Gurkha 130th is beautifully presented in collector’s edition glass tubes. For the blend itself, the strictest quality control protocols ensure only the best leaves make it into each Gurkha 130th Reserve. Up top, a beautiful and flawless Ecuadorian Habano wrapper leaf graces Dominican long-fillers. Gurkha 130th is an absolute must-try for any fan of premium cigars. In short, this luxurious blend is near magical. ",Medium-Full,['Churchill'],,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Churchill,No,"Ecuador Habano, Habano",Gurkha
Gurkha Aged Cabinet,Rated 4.2 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"A Well-Aged BeautyGurkha, simply put, is a brand known for its extravagance. But with their latest endeavor, they took a step away from the fluff and focused on premium aged tobaccos. Gurkha’s Aged Cabinet features lush, genuine long-filler tobaccos from 2001 and covers them in a silky smooth Ecuadorian Connecticut or a hearty Habano wrapper. Both Gurkha Aged Cabinet blends offer ample flavor and are incredibly smooth. Looking for a fancy box to hold your trinkets? Won’t find that here. Gurkha has cut out the fluff on this one and delivered two meticulously aged beauties any cigar lunatic can get behind. Add in a dash of CI’s patented industry-leading discounts, and you have a perfect storm of well-aged premiums discounted to the bone.",,['Robusto'],Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Robusto,No,"Ecuador Connecticut, Ecuador Habano",Gurkha
Gurkha Archive,Rated 4.05 out of 5, Based on 85 Ratings ,"A nod to 20 years of successA 2010 release, the Gurkha Archive was a hats off and congratulations for 20 years of delectable handmades. Flourishing for 20 years in the cigar business is no easy feat. Many great brands have risen to fame, only to witness their own demise shortly thereafter. Well, Gurkha has thrived for over two decades now, and is still pumping out top shelf blends to this day. The Archive took two full years and countless blending and re-blending to finally develop. This gorgeous, milky-brown cigar comes draped in a silky smooth 6-year aged Connecticut Maduro wrapper. Bursting from its core are Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers accompanied by a genuine Cameroon binder. Expect an eventful, medium to full-bodied bouquet intertwined by notes of spice, coffee, sweet tobacco, and nuts finished by a toasty crescendo. Box-pressed and primed for the ultimate experience, the Archive exemplifies Gurkha’s rich cigar-making history.Good news, Gurkha Archive has received a well-deserved 90-point rating, noting: “creamy, woody flavors balanced by cocoa powder and spice.”",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Cameroon,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Connecticut, Maduro",Gurkha
Gurkha Avenger G5,Rated 4.42 out of 5, Based on 55 Ratings ,"Fly Like a G5Gurkha Avenger G5 is here to take revenge on all lesser blends. By now, anyone who is familiar with the Gurkha name knows that they can craft a blend like no other, and Gurkha Avenger G5 is just more proof in the Gurkha pudding. A potent, medium to full-bodied mixture of Nicaraguan long-filler leaves comes together under a smooth, Habano binder and a Connecticut Maduro wrapper that glistens with oil. The result is a complex cocktail of a blend that will completely satisfy your palate. A razor-sharp burn complements the complexities of earth, cocoa, pepper, and leather that billow from this premium handmade. If there’s one thing Gurkha cigars are known for beyond their superior sense of construction, it’s their pricetag: luckily, Gurkha Avenger G5 comes with economical bundles of 20 as options to cut the legs off the MSRP.  ",Medium-Full,['Torpedo'],,,False,No,More Details,Honduras,Yes,,Torpedo,No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Gurkha
Gurkha Barracuda,Rated 4.4 out of 5, Based on 62 Ratings ,"Oooo, Barracuda.All Heart references aside, here are some poignant facts that’ll get the mouth-a-watering for Gurkha’s latest and greatest. First, the blend oozes everything Gurkha. Vintage, carefully-selected tobaccos – check. Long-fillers from Central America’s most respected growing regions – check. A gorgeous, dark, and oily wrapper leaf – check. The formula is right, the cigar feels good, let's give this cap a clip and test it out. From the word go, Barracuda impresses. Weighty in the hand, the draw and burn line on this one are just as good as you'd expect from a name brand like Gurkha. Taking a few puffs, this Double Perfecto booms out thick, chewy clouds of earth, natural tobacco notes, and slight cedar. Barracuda is a great example of why Gurkha is so popular, so if you haven't done it yet, I'd recommend checking this one out ASAP. ​",Medium-Full,['Double Perfecto'],Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,True,,Double Perfecto,No,"Habano, Honduran",Gurkha
Gurkha Beast,Rated 4.3 out of 5, Based on 80 Ratings ,"Unleash the Beast!Known for offering some of the most prestigious and highly-rated blends in the world, Gurkha (the ""Rolls Royce of cigars"") continues to provide us with luxurious experiences. They will never sacrifice quality for price, and each cigar within his extensive arsenal further establishes Gurkha as one of the premier boutique brands on the market. Based on size alone, the Beast instantly grabs your attention. Crafted into a monstrous 6”x58 ‘beast,’ this intimidating handmade is a sight to behold. Grown in Costa Rica, the wrapper is one of the most elusive of its kind. Aged for an absolute minimum of 8 years, this dark leaf is oily and toothy, cloaking a luxurious blend of Dominican, Honduran, and Colombian long-fillers bound by a flavorful Nicaraguan leaf. The result is an array of flavor, including hints of cocoa and wood, with a smooth, sweet finish that lingers after each puff. A soothing, satisfying cigar that burns slow and cool emitting a rich, crowd-pleasing aroma. Medium to full-bodied, the Beast is waiting.",Full,['Gordo'],,"Colombian, Dominican, Honduran",False,No,More Details,Costa Rica,No,,Gordo,No,Costa Rican,Gurkha
Gurkha Beauty,Rated 4.43 out of 5, Based on 191 Ratings ,"B-e-a…utifulGurkha Beauty — a phenomenon that many of you cigar lovers have surely heard of. One of the finest examples of the ultra-premium wares in the Gurkha house of brands, Beauty reigns supreme as the smoothest, most luxurious Gurkha on the market. Each patiently crafted cigar in this box comes attractively packaged inside a heavy glass tube, but the presentation is just the beginning. Expertly showcasing an ultra-rare blend of 5-year-aged tobaccos and a superior Connecticut-seed wrapper of only the finest grade, this cigar might just bring a tear to your eye. A divine experience is offered on each and every cigar that’s deep in rich and luxurious flavors. A sweet mixture of cream, toasted nuts, and slight cedar gently greets the palate with each sip, inviting you to continue indulging until the nub. Pick up Gurkha Beauty today, and experience cigars at their finest. Note: Only box purchases will come with the cigars in glass tubes. Five and ten pack purchases are simply packaged in cellophane.",Mellow-Medium,['Gordo'],Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Gordo,No,Ecuador Connecticut,Gurkha
Gurkha Black Dragon,Rated 4.22 out of 5, Based on 74 Ratings ,"Behold, the Black Dragon.Few cigars can match the caliber of Gurkha handmade cigars. Considered to be some of the world's finest and most prestigious super-premiums, the Gurkha brand represents a small-batch selection of ultra-elusive cigars that routinely receive top ratings in addition to 'Best of the Best' honors from the Robb Report.Always pushing the envelope with exotic, high-end blends, Gurkha got another trick up its mighty sleeve, and it's called the Black Dragon.Dressed in a dark and toothy, 5-year old Connecticut Broadleaf maduro wrapper, the Black Dragon hails from Honduras and combines a vintage mixture of Dominican long-leaf tobaccos secured within a Cameroon binder. The smoke is thick and chewy, with a rich, leathery core and elegant hints of earth, complemented by an assortment of sweet spices on the finish. Medium in body and complex, yet buttery smooth, the Black Dragon is unlike any Gurkha you've tried before.​​",Medium-Full,['Presidente'],Cameroon,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Presidente,No,Connecticut Broadleaf,
Gurkha Black Ops Berserker,Rated 4.25 out of 5, Based on 73 Ratings ,"An uncontrollably full-bodied attack!Refined. Intense. Delicious. And loaded to the brim with high-quality Nicaraguan long-fillers. That’s Black Ops Berserker in a nutshell. The ​Gurkha Black Ops​​​ brand has made it no secret that their objective is to bring you the best bang for your buck on the market, and Berserker pushes this to the absolute extreme, delivering you a delectable boutique blend that could easily demand three times the price.Puros (cigars with tobaccos from all one country) always run the risk of being one-dimensional, but that’s not the case here. Berserker is a non-stop onslaught of toasty tobaccos, zesty hot pepper spice, rich dark chocolate, and salty leather that’s ready to pillage your palate all the way down to the nub. This wild frenzy of a blend is topped off with flawless construction, the highest quality control standards, a steep CI discount, and one Hell of a badass band. In short, get hyped, get to shoppin’, and get Berserker. ​Note: Accessories shown in picture are included FREE with Packs of 20. Packs of 5 will not receive the accessories. Color and style of knife included may vary.",Medium-Full,['Toro'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Habano,Gurkha Black Ops Cigars
Gurkha Black Ops Connecticut,Rated 4.51 out of 5, Based on 130 Ratings ,"Suited up and ready to go.Black Ops Connecticut ventures into territory that by now seems all too familiar for a mellow cigar, the value arena. But Scout’s honor, Black Ops Connecticu​t is one of the best mellow cigars I’ve encountered in quite some time, period. I handed one to a buddy and the result was nothing less than expected. He thought it was a five to seven dollar cigar. My thoughts exactly. Big on flavor, but tame in demeanor, Black Ops Connecticut puffs with the best of them. Let's take a closer look at the cigar shall we? Black Ops Connecticut features a silky-smooth Ecuadorian Connecticut shade wrapper gracing a mellow blend of Cuban-seed tobaccos. This combination yields a deliciously creamy and crisp profile layered with nuances of oak, cream, pepper, and cocoa. Delivering ample flavor and enough strength to keep you interested, it's without a doubt the bowl of porridge that's just right.​​",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Gurkha Black Ops Cigars
Gurkha Black Ops Habano,Rated 4.34 out of 5, Based on 130 Ratings ,"Armed to the teeth.If you bring a knife to a gunfight, good luck, because chances are things won’t turn out so well for you. Luckily, Black Ops Habano makes its debut fully equipped. Boasting top-notch tobaccos, slick packaging, and a price that will have you singing Two by Two, there’s a lot to get stoked for. I’m willing to bet these are going to turn into a celebrity overnight. Black Ops Habano comes dressed in an oily, golden-brown Ecuadorian Habano wrapper and is generously filled with aged Nicaraguan long-fillers. This recipe results in a medium to full-bodied blend overflowing with flavor. Expect rich, Cuban-esque notes of earth, coffee, and nuts before a peppery, slightly sweet finish.​​",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Habano,Gurkha Black Ops Cigars
Gurkha Black Ops Maduro,Rated 4.46 out of 5, Based on 197 Ratings ,"The best of the best, sir!If you’re eyeballing these wondering if you should pull the trigger, let me ease thy mind a bit. For the price, it don’t get a whole lot better. Perfectly fermented wrappers, well-aged fillers, and packaging that’s as unique as they come, all awaits for south of 50 bucks. If I were you I’d jump on these ASAP, because the compliments from around the office have already started pouring in. Black Ops Maduro is an uber-dark specimen that's brimming with dense, rich flavors. This maduro-wrapped blend comes chock full of Cuban-seed long-fillers resulting in a medium to full-bodied profile that is notably smooth. Hints of chocolate, espresso, honey, and pepper are found within each thick puff. A scrumptious blend that you can afford to burn through again and again. ​Even more importantly, it's a blend you'll want to keep stocked in your humidor for a very long time.​",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Gurkha Black Ops Cigars
Gurkha Black Ops Rubicon,Rated 4.48 out of 5, Based on 187 Ratings ,"Rubiconnoun Ru·bi·con \'rü-bi-kän\: a bounding or limiting line; especially: one that when crossed commits a person irrevocably.Black Ops Cigars have had this same effect on many-a-connoisseur since arriving on the scene not too long ago, but with their newest, and quite possibly best release yet, the line will be crossed, and everyone who dare cross it will be committed for life. There will be no turning back, but the silver lining is, when you cross this line, you’ll never want to. Black Ops Rubicon is a bold statement, one you will have to try to believe. Coming in rugged, military-grade ammo cans with a Gurkha knife, these limited edition gems are a rare collector’s item you won’t want to be without. The pristine quality of the cigars only puts the cherry atop this cigar sundae of goodness.Rubicon, the blend that will have you committed from the very first draw, looks tasty enough to eat. Arriving with guns blazing in a Sun-drenched Pennsylvania Broadleaf maduro wrapper, Rubicon is easy on the eyes to say the least. Lying just beneath, a refined Brazilian binder hugs long-leaf fillers from the Dominican, Honduras, and Panama. If you weren’t counting, that’s a 5-country onslaught on flavor that you can only hope your palate will be prepared for. Complex notes of sweet cream, coffee, oak, and black cherry all make appearances throughout the duration of this medium to full-bodied treat. With a blend as rare as this, it should go without saying that quantities are extremely limited. My recommendation…hop on these bad boys early, before this gravy train comes to a halt.Note: Knife included may vary. Must purchase box of 28 to receive ammo can and knife.",Medium-Full,['Torpedo'],Brazil,"Dominican, Honduran, Panamanian",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Torpedo,No,Maduro,Gurkha Black Ops Cigars
Gurkha Black Puro,Rated 4.42 out of 5, Based on 19 Ratings ,"Pure quality and flavorBlack Puro is beefy, spicy, chocolatey, and oh-so satisfying. Sure, Gurkha's got more blends than you can count on all your fingers and toes (even if you have some extra!) but Black Puro is set to quickly rise to the top of the dogpile here. Featuring a jet-black Pennsylvania Maduro wrapper and tobaccos from Pennsylvania, Jalapa, and Esteli held together with a Habano Ecuador binder, this is the medium to full-bodied cigar you’ve been waiting for. Hunker down with this hefty cigar after feasting on a steak fit for a king, and enjoy the great flavors of this behemoth with a glass of cognac in hand. ",Medium,['Churchill'],Habano,"Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Churchill,No,Pennsylvania Broadleaf,Gurkha
Gurkha Bourbon Collection,Rated 4.69 out of 5, Based on 13 Ratings ,"A match made in heaven… or KentuckyTo say we enjoy bourbon around these parts would be an understatement. So when I heard we were getting Gurkha Bourbon cigars, I nearly fell out of my chair. And they didn’t disappoint. A collaboration between Kentucky-based Hartfield & Co. and Gurkha, these premiums are the absolute pinnacle of cigar perfection. Break the wax seal on these high-end glass tubes, and your nose will be immediately greeted with warm bourbon notes, and earthy cigar goodness. To make these cigars even more unique, each size comes with a different wrapper. The Toro features a silky smooth Connecticut Shade leaf that pairs up nicely with a rye-heavy pour. On the Churchill, you’ll find a Connecticut Broadleaf maduro wrapper that promises to be the perfect pairing for your favorite top-shelf booze. ​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Toro']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Toro",No,"Connecticut, Connecticut Broadleaf",Gurkha
Gurkha Cask Blend,Rated 4.45 out of 5, Based on 55 Ratings ,"A cask-ade of flavor.Gurkha’s portfolio of blends may resemble the Los Angeles phone book, but the Gurkha Cask Blend is unlike any cigar they’ve released previously. Gurkha has built its legend by producing a steady stream of best-selling cigars, from their super premium blends like His Majesty’s Reserve to their more modestly priced fan favorite Park Avenue Series. Hand rolled in the Dominican Republic and available in colossal 200 count artisanal cabinet boxes, Gurkha Cask Blend is described as a “signature” cigar. This handmade is mellow to medium-bodied with rich cedar and sweet spice nuances and consists of a top-secret blend of long-fillers. With superior construction, rich and deep flavors, and exceptional packaging, step up and see why this may be the best Gurkha cigar ever released. ​",Medium,['Perfecto'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Perfecto,No,Habano,Gurkha
Gurkha Castle Hall Connecticut,Rated 3.78 out of 5, Based on 120 Ratings ,"King in the Castle. Castle Hall was an old Cuban brand, revitalized by the team at Gurkha. This cigar truly pays heritage to the classic Cuban version. Gurkha’s revival features a ‘Cuban-sandwich’ style blend of aged Dominican tobaccos, wrapped beneath a gorgeous Connecticut leaf. Lighting these up, there’s a balance of sweet clove notes and a classic cedar, tobacco flavor. And with the Gurkha name behind it, you know the construction is top-notch all day, every day. All that sounds nice, but with these elegant bands and the flashy story behind it, I’m sure you’re expecting to a big ol’ price tag next to these handmades. Well, luckily, Castle Hall is priced for everyday, no-stress enjoyment. I’d recommend stocking up on these sticks before the vultures grab them all.  ",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Double Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Sumatra,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Double Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,
Gurkha Castle Hall Habano,Rated 4.03 out of 5, Based on 64 Ratings ,"No-brainer #17,543.This is one helluva good deal of hand–crafted happiness helping to maintain the harmony between palate and wallet. Castle Hall contains aged Dominican 'Cuban Sandwich' tobaccos that are held snuggly together by a dual binder from Ecuador and Indonesia. Presented in a Habano-seed wrapper leaf, Castle Hall has an option for every preference under the sun when you factor in the Sumatra and Connecticut varieties. Hints of earth, cedar, and nutmeg each make an appearance, all the while maintaining spot-on construction.  At a budget price for economically-minded enthusiasts, these puppies are sure to fly off the docks.  ",Medium,"['Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Sumatra,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Habano,
Gurkha Castle Hall Sumatra,Rated 3.47 out of 5, Based on 32 Ratings ,"A royally good deal.I love new cigars. I love Sumatras. And I love getting stuff on the cheap. So Castle Hall Sumatra from Gurkha and I are a match made in cigar paradise. These ‘Cuban-sandwich’ style blends from Gurkha are a reliable, every day cigar that I haven’t been able to stop burning since they hit our docks. Each one is presented with a classy, vibrant band (like most Gurkha creations). Underneath, you’ll find a Sumatra wrapper, with aged Dominican fillers. Notes of cedar, leather, earth, and cocoa come through, with a razor-sharp burn line. And like I mentioned earlier, these guys are available at budget prices. If you’re looking for a new everyday blend, and you like a rich Sumatra, you can’t do much better than Castle Hall. ",Medium,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Sumatra,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Sumatra,
Gurkha Cellar Reserve,Rated 4.37 out of 5, Based on 87 Ratings ,"Some things get better with age.You’ve heard the shtick before. Gurkha cigars are great because of X, Y and sometimes even Z. The Cellar Reserve, however, represents an amazing chapter in the Gurkha line, truly capturing the essence of the company’s roots. Using exceedingly rare tobaccos, the Cellar Reserve is one of the most complex and unique cigars to bear the Gurkha name.The Gurkha Cellar Reserve is truly a horse of a different color. Elegantly blended using 15-year old Dominican long fillers and hugged by an oily and stunning 15-year old Criollo 98’ wrapper, the Cellar Reseve epitomizes vintage tobacco blending. Never rushing the hands of time, Gurkha's master blenders spent countless hours creating and perfecting this elusive and satisfying blend, and it shows. Upon lighting, the Cellar Reserve immediately asserts a rich and smooth bouquet beautifully displaying the tobaccos at hand. Pay close attention, as this treat subtlety delivers uber-complex flavors behind a slow and methodical burn. Puff after puff reveals unbelievably smooth flavors of oak, earth, and leather backed by a medium to full body. The experience is a nothing short of epic as each draw keeps you in suspense of what’s ahead. Packaged in attractive wine-style crates, the Cellar Reserve looks the part of a finely aged spirits, and rightfully so. Great news! Gurkha Cellar Reserve earned a well-deserved 90-rating, noting: ""Dark and girthy with a gleaming wrapper, this large cigar strikes a balance of cocoa bean flavors, woody notes and a leathery tasting finish.""",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Perfecto']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Perfecto",No,"Criollo '98, Dominican",Gurkha
Gurkha Cellar Reserve Edicion Especial,Rated 4.37 out of 5,,"All good things in all good time.With the sand-colored lacquered boxes, ornate bands, and blends utilizing 15 year old tobacco, the Gurkha Cellar Reserve made a huge impact on Gurkha’s legacy and on the cigar industry as a whole when it was released in 2012. Aficionados immediately took note, and the Cellar Reserve is to this day consistently awarded high scores and momentous praise from even the snobbiest circles. Now Gurkha is upping the ante with a follow-up containing an ever more extravagant blend: The Gurkha Cellar Reserve Edicion Especial.Gukha searches tirelessly to source the best and rarest tobacco in the world, and we didn’t think they could do any better than the amazing 15-year old leaves they found for the original, but they did. The Cellar Reserve Edicion Especial wears a corojo wrapper overtop a Dominican binder and long-fillers containing tobacco that’s been patiently aging for 18 long years. You read that right, 18 years. Your eyes aren’t deceiving you, and your palate won’t be either when you light up to the incredibly complex, medium-full bodied profile of espresso, leather, nuts, earth, spice, and a sweet nutty note that lingers long after the cigar is gone. It’s not often a cigar like this hits the market, and once the supply of 18-year old tobacco is gone, it’s gone. So act fast, and light up in luxury.",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Perfecto']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Perfecto",No,Corojo,Gurkha
Gurkha Cellar Reserve Limitada,,,"Some things get better with age.You’ve heard the shtick before. Gurkha cigars are great because of X, Y and sometimes even Z. Well, sometimes they are better because they take something old and make it new again. The Cellar Reserve Limitada did just that!The Gurkha Cellar Reserve Limitada is truly a horse of a different color. Taking the already elegantly blended Gurkha Cellar Reserve that utilized 15-year old Dominican long fillers and changing the wrapper to a Brazilian Arapiraca maduro leaf, the Cellar Reseve Limitada breathes new life into the beloved blend.  Upon lighting, the Cellar Reserve Limitada immediately asserts a rich and smooth bouquet beautifully displaying the tobaccos at hand. Pay close attention, as this treat subtlety delivers complex flavors behind a slow and methodical burn. Puff after puff reveals unbelievably smooth flavors of cocoa, earth, spices, and leather backed by a medium to full body. The experience is a nothing short of epic as each draw keeps you in suspense of what’s ahead. Packaged in attractive wine-style crates, the Cellar Reserve Limitada looks the part of a finely aged spirits, and rightfully so. ",Full,"['Gordo', 'Perfecto']",Dominican,Dominican,False,False,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Perfecto",No,Brazilian,Gurkha
Gurkha Centurian - Wrong Band,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Factory mess ups = big savings!Over the years, I've seen my fair share of factory blunders. But this just might take the cake. Our yearly shipment of Gurkha Centurian - the flagship Gurkha blend - arrived with the wrong band.Gurkha Centurian is exquisitely crafted using a mix of rare and well-aged Cuban-seed tobaccos, resulting in a flavor that's impossible to resist. The dark-natural Connecticut wrapper leaf is aged for a minimum of eight years. Spice, earth, and sweetness dance across your palate throughout the length of this medium-bodied experience. Rife with complexity and silky smooth, Gurkha Centurian is everything that a premium cigar should be.",Medium,['Double Perfecto'],Cameroon,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Double Perfecto,No,Connecticut,Gurkha
Gurkha Chairman's Select,Rated 4.22 out of 5, Based on 147 Ratings ,"The perfect selectionA cigar suitable for the wine and cheese crowd needs to have a superb blend, and this Gurkha doesn’t disappoint. With high-ratings galore and fans spread throughout the world, Gurkha cigars have risen to become the de facto choice when looking for either a celebratory cigar or an everyday blend. Gurkha Chairman’s Select is the cream of the crop and boasts a host of vintage tobaccos to provide an elegant and luxurious experience.Containing tobaccos aged at least thirteen years, Gurkha Chairman’s Select is draped in a Criollo 1998 wrapper atop aged Dominican long-fillers. Medium-bodied and boasting a motley crew of flavor, expect to be met with notes of cedar, baking spices, pepper, and leather that lead to a relaxing but complex adventure. Construction is flawless, with an easy draw and razor sharp burn, and elevates Gurkha Chairman's Select to the very pinnacle of excellence. Try Gurkha Chairmans Select cigars and take your cigar enjoyment to the next level. ​",Medium,"['Double Robusto', 'Perfecto']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Double Robusto, Perfecto",No,Criollo '98,Gurkha
Gurkha Chateau de Prive,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Gurkha’s Rose Gold MasterpieceThe Chateau de Prive is, quite simply, one of the nicest looking bands I’ve ever seen on a cigar. I’m not sure if that really matters, but, seriously, just check this thing out. After you’ve had a minute to wipe the drool of your chin, let me properly introduce you: welcome the Gurkha Chateau de Prive. Packaged in bright, dome boxes, each Gurkha Chateau de Prive features a silky-smooth Ecuadorian desflorado wrapper leaf overtop a Dominican olor binder and Dominican long-fillers. Toasting the foot, you’ll find a super-smooth flavor reminiscent of cigars like Montecristo. Crisp, with tons of creamy sweetness and a toasty core, Chateau de Prive is elegant, flavorful, and incredibly enjoyable. ",Medium,"['Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Gurkha
Gurkha Class Regent,Rated 4.48 out of 5, Based on 83 Ratings ,"The return of a 90-rated box-pressed beauty at killer CI prices.Gurkha Regent is a labor of love for Gurkha, always has been and always will be. The brand fell off the grid for a bit, but the blend was simply too damn good to let go forever. Now, its back and better than ever. The same 90-rated blend is at play too, but instead expect prices to be much, much lower. I'd call it an instant recipe for success, and I know you'll agree. This milky smooth Honduran handmade greets you with a gorgeous, dark Honduran Habano 2000 wrapper that has a redolent, silky feel. Beneath this velvet glove awaits a bevy of Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers, perfectly complementing one another. The cigar delivers a melting pot of toasty, leathery, cedary, and chocolaty medium-bodied flavors. It's been called one of the tastiest Gurkhas you can find. All at prices unmatched in the cigar industry. Tell your buddies - hell tell the wife - Gurkha Regent is back, and back to stay!In addition to having been named one of the year's Top 50 Cigars, Gurkha Regent earned a solid 90-rating, noting: ""This rich brown cigar burns evenly, with a fine draw.  It's elegant and balanced, with black cherry flavors, notes of sweet spice and a long, leathery finish.  Smooth.""",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']","Indonesian, Nicaraguan","Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Yes,,"Churchill, Robusto, Torpedo",No,"Habana 2000, Honduran",Gurkha
Gurkha Classic Havana,Rated 4.13 out of 5, Based on 64 Ratings ,"A Classic Blend!After years of searching years for the perfect concoction of wrapper, binder, and filler, the guys at Gurkha have uncovered a Cuban-esque blend for the record books. They took their time with this one, meticulously tweaking the blend over twenty times until they knew they had achieved the perfect Havana flavor profile. Introducing Gurkha Classic Havana Blend, a nod to those revered blends of Cuba’s past. Hailing from the fertile soils of Nicaragua that prove time and time again to encompass many of the same qualities as the revered Cubans of the past, Classic Havana Blend delivers in spades. Rocking a milk chocolaty Mexican San Andres wrapper, this gem begs to be lit at first sight. Medium-bodied and brimming with flavor, this box-pressed beauty permeates with notes of spice, earth, and nuts. If you yearn for that cherished Cuban taste or are looking to experience something darn close for the first time, Gurkha Classic Havana Blend is the choice cut for you.",Medium,"['Figurado', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Figurado, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Toro",No,San Andres,Gurkha
Gurkha Crest,Rated 4.16 out of 5, Based on 125 Ratings ,"Gurkha Le Grande....otherwise known as Crest.It's true. Gurkha has more blends than you (and an entire small country) could shake a stick at. Fortunately, they're all good. They're all made from superior tobaccos and top-notch quality control measures, producing some of the finest boutique cigars money can buy. However, even among the countless top-shelf blends beneath the Gurkha umbrella, few can compare to Gurkha Crest. Under constant demand, the Crest easily ranks among Gurkha's finest creations.To craft this masterpiece, a thick and chewy Connecticut Broadleaf maduro wrapper aged 9+ years conceals a vintage mixture of Cuban-seed long-fillers from Nicaragua's top growing regions. Each puff yields an exceedingly rich bouquet that's velvety smooth, delivering deep, roasted flavors throughout with softer hints of leather, oak, and toast. The finish is long, chewy, and sweet, completing a veritable work of art savored by the most critical of enthusiasts. If you're looking for a Gurkha blend that will really 'wow' you, look no further than Gurkha Crest.Note: Gurkha Crest is now available in a limited-edition Churchill size. These cigars ship in packs of 6. ",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Torpedo",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Gurkha
Gurkha Dakar,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 12 Ratings ,"Gurkha Dakar is worth citingDakar is the capitol city of Senegal, and hosts a variety of art galleries, markets, museums, beaches, and nightlife. With all of their amenities, this is a vacation spot I know you’ll agree with me is worth mentioning. And, so is Gurkha Dakar, another top-notch cigar from the luxury brand. Built with Nicaraguan tobaccos from Jalapa and Esteli mixed with Dominican long-fillers and finished in a Habano Ecuador wrapper, this premium is brimming with enough flavor and complexity to provide an unforgettable experience, just like the city. Take your taste buds on a trip without leaving the comfort of your recliner with this flavorful cigar, Gurkha Dakar. ",Medium,['Churchill'],Mexican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Churchill,No,Ecuador Habano,Gurkha
Gurkha Doble Maduro,Rated 4.43 out of 5, Based on 49 Ratings ,"Oohhh...that's the stuff right there.Gurkha Doble Maduro is a luscious handmade featuring a Costa Rican double-maduro leaf that’s so dark and oily, you might find yourself trying to take a bite out of it. Masterfully blended and well-aged, it is the very definition of the term juicy! Rich flavors swarm your palate with super-smooth, chocolatey charisma. The aftertaste is long and lasting, offering a slight cedary-sweetness derived from the individual cedar sleeve encasing each cigar. From its pitch-black appearance, many seem to think this is a full-bodied, power smoke. Instead it’s luxuriously mellow and medium in strength, delivering an array of relaxing flavors from start to finish, while burning slow and cool right down to the nub. The Double Rothschild Size measures: 6.5"" x 58",Medium,['Gordo'],,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Gordo,No,Costa Rican,Gurkha
Gurkha Elegance,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 20 Ratings ,"Beauty? No, Elegance!Selecting and blending rare tobaccos is a grueling process, a skill desired by many and perfected by few. A true master of such tobaccos is Gurkha Cigars. Their appetite for crafting the most interesting cigars in the world is not easily satisfied, as he continually produces distinctive small-batch blends. Case in point: the Gurkha Elegance.Utilizing an extremely rare 7-year Connecticut wrapper, the Elegance is limited to a mere 800 boxes per year. Now that’s what I call boutique my friend. This near flawless wrapper houses a balanced core teeming with Dominican long-fillers and Connecticut binder. But don’t judge this book by its cover, as this seemingly mellow creation delivers a well-rounded medium-bodied bouquet of buttery smooth nuances, highlighted by a creamy finish. From time to time expect a dash of spice to enter the fray, perfectly accentuating the intoxicatingly smooth blend. Highly enjoyable and smooth down to the nub, the Elegance is an ultra-rare indulgence worth partaking in. ",Medium,['Churchill'],,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Churchill,No,Connecticut,Gurkha
Gurkha Epicure,Rated 4.8 out of 5, Based on 20 Ratings ,"The Epicure for what ails you.Dubbed the “Rolls Royce of cigars,” the Gurkha brand is beloved across the nation and well-known for their luxury cigars featuring rare tobaccos and top-notch packaging. And their newest release holds nothing back.The latest from Gurkha's stacked stable of uber-powerful premiums, welcome Epicure. A beastly 6.5""x58 sized intimidator. However, this boomstick is as pleasing on the palate as they come, featuring a delightfully smooth medium body, with vibrant hints of charred wood, white pepper, leather, and a spicy sweet finish.",Medium,['Gordo'],,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Gordo,No,"Ecuador Habano, Habano",
Gurkha Evil,Rated 4.59 out of 5, Based on 34 Ratings ,"A powerful son of a gun.Introducing, Gurkha Evil....the latest in highly rated super-premiums from the prestigious family of cigars known as Gurkha. This rustic handmade combines a thick and leathery Brazilian wrapper with extensively aged Nicaraguan long-fillers secured by a feisty Dominican binder. Crafted into a variety of generous sizes, each premium cigar produces a medium to full-bodied array of flavor that remains smooth and balanced down to the nub. Hearty notes of pepper and wood mingle with earthy tones and a sweet, cedary finish. Both strength and flavor intensify during the burn, completing an eventful and powerful handmade built with the same uncompromising level of quality Gurkha is known for.Gurkha Evil received a well-deserved 90-point rating, noting: ""An attractive Torpedo that smokes evenly. The smoke is very toasty in character with hints of roasted nuts and a pleasant floral finish.""",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Brazilian,Gurkha
Gurkha Flavored Cigars,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Experience Gurkha. Experience Luxury. When the monumental Gurkha cigar brand, decided they're going to do something, they go all the way. From their luxurious, jaw-dropping packaging, to their substantial list of fan-favorite blends, with Gurkha there are, quite simply, no half-measures. So when we heard Gurkha was working on a trio of flavored cigars, we knew they’d be great. Originally introduced over a decade ago, the Gurkha flavored trinity is back and better than ever. Café Tabac: Flavored like premium coffee. Ultra-smooth, and a perfect cigar for any weekend morning.White Rascal: Aromatic with premium bourbon. Sweet with a spicy finish. ",Mellow-Medium,['Robusto'],Dominican,Dominican,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Robusto,No,Dominican,
Gurkha Founder's Select,Rated 3 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"The Founder's are OK with mePicking a favorite Gurkha is an impossible task, but Founder’s Select is certainly in the conversation. A Connecticut Shade wrapper that originally debuted at IPCPR 2016, Gurkha Founder’s Select has gone on to become one of the most popular sticks in K. Hansotia’s profile. Featuring an all-proprietary blend of rare long-filler tobaccos, the leaves here are aged 12 years before reaching your door. With a gorgeous Connecticut shade wrapper and Nicaraguan binder and filler, Founder’s Select impresses at first glance. Guaranteed to become one of your go-to Connecticuts, this smooth cigar features an easy draw with rich cedar flavor and nutty undertones. Mellow, mouthwatering, and affordable – it doesn’t get better than this. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,
Gurkha G5,Rated 4.69 out of 5, Based on 16 Ratings ,"Gurkha G5! No, I'm not callin' out bingo numbers (that'd be B5, fool!), I'm just singin' the praises of the newest handmade from Gurkha. Rejoice in Gurkha G5, a quality built handmade that's got flavor for days. Featuring the high-end, balanced complexity that you'd come to expect from a Gurkha handmade, G5 is a delicately blended cigar with notes of toasted nuts, soft baking spices, and some natural earthiness at the core.",Medium-Full,['Gran Rothschild'],Habano,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Gran Rothschild,No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Maduro",
Gurkha Genghis Khan,Rated 4.35 out of 5, Based on 40 Ratings ,"A dark, delicious Gurkha for you to sink your teeth into.To bear the name of Genghis Khan is a heavy burden, one that can only be endured by the finest of brands. Gurkha is a mighty fine brand with a more than impressive track record filled with prestigious, heavily sought-after blends, of which 90+ ratings have become commonplace. Known as the ""Rolls Royce of Cigars"", the Gurkha brand employs the world's finest tobaccos to create some of the industry's most exquisite premium cigars. Quality will never be sacrificed for price, and Gurkha cigars are worth every penny, and then some.Genghis Khan is yet another example of Gurkha's expertise in uniqueness and craftsmanship. The Connecticut Broadleaf maduro wrapper used to complete this cigar is simply gorgeous. Aside from being one of the hardest leaves on the planet to harvest, let alone one of the most expensive, it delivers an assortment of rich, slightly sweet flavors and promotes a super-slow burn. The hearty blend of aged Dominican and Honduran tobaccos combine with rare leaves from India and Africa to create an array of smooth, earthy notes backed by subtle hints of pepper. A medium-bodied delight to be savored, courtesy of one of the finest brands in the business.'The Khan' is an alluring, 7.5"" x 52 Churchill size that's masterfully blended and guarantees a satisfying and enjoyable experience. Such a masterpiece can only be presented as such. Packaged in a gloriously attractive dome chest that Genghis Khan himself would be proud to own. A big, bulky antique style, humidor quality dome that will sufficiently store 30 nicely proportioned churchills, complete with a lift-out tray that reveals a lower compartment for additional cigar or accessory storage. Once again, the folks behind Gurkha have outdone themselves with this piece.Gurkha Genghis Khan received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""Imposingly large with a dark wrapper and even draw. The smoke is chewy and nutty carrying a subtle cocoa-powder sweetness.""",Medium-Full,['Churchill'],,"Dominican, Honduran",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Churchill,No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Gurkha
Gurkha Ghost,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 43 Ratings ,"This Ghost has real spirit. Once you take a look at the Gurkha Ghost, you'll quickly see what all the fuss has been about. Eye-popping packaging, a downright scrumptious blend, and an affordable price tag, all make for another winner from Gurkha. The blend starts with a dark, alluring Brazilian Arapiraca wrapper. Thick and juicy, this leaf is draped over a well-aged Criollo '98 binder, which hugs a rich bouquet of Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers. Once lit, Gurkha Ghost expels clouds of smoke, as a medium-bodied profile produces hints of cocoa, sweetness, earth, and a dash of pepper. Come to think of it, it's a lot like the perfect date. Good looks - check. Treats you right - check. Affordable - check. Go ahead and give the Gurkha Ghost a whirl, chances are this is the start of a beautiful relationship.",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']","Criollo, Criollo '98","Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Brazilian,Gurkha
Gurkha Ghost Gold,Rated 4.63 out of 5,,"Fear not – Gurkha Ghost Gold is here! I could sit here and rattle off Gurkha’s gargantuan list of best-sellers to you, but we’d still be here tomorrow morning when the sun comes up. Suffice to say, their portfolio of best-selling blends is seemingly never-ending, but way up in the top you’re going to find Gurkha Ghost. A medium-bodied blend that’s been scaring away the competition for years, Ghost is truly some one of the best Gurkhas you can find — that’s why today, we’re proud to feature a new Ghost in this line-up: Gurkha Ghost Gold. For Ghost Gold, the original Brazilian Arapiraca wrapper leaf has been swapped to a silky-smooth Ecuadorian Habano specimen. Underneath, a Criollo ’98 binder encases U.S., Dominican, and Nicaraguan long-fillers to create a medium-bodied blend that’s ultra-smooth. You’ll find sweet and earthy notes, with hints of black pepper and cinnamon spice joining the mix. Adding to Gurkha's already impressive trophy case, Gurkha Ghost Gold was named the #4 Cigar to smoke now by Maxim magazine in May 2019.",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Mexican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Gurkha
Gurkha Governor's Private Blend,Rated 4.65 out of 5, Based on 131 Ratings ,"Evening, governor! New cigars from Gurkha are a common occurrence around these parts, but heed my words – Governor’s Private Blend is no ordinary cigar. The result of extensive aging and tweaking, these morsels are some of the finest to bear the Gurkha name, and are available at an everyday price that’s most friendly. Sporting an oily and enticing Ecuadorian Habano wrapper, Governor's Private blend looks amazing. Under the hood, a Dominican binder hugging a distinctive bouquet of Corojo long-fillers. This unique ensemble delivers an unforgettable medium-bodied experience. Complex notes of cedar, spice, and coffee smack the palate as occasional notes of caramel sweetness enter the fray. Delicious, and enjoyable to the nub, this is one of Gurkha’s most well-rounded offerings. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Double Perfecto', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",Dominican,Colombian,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Double Perfecto, Gordo, Robusto",No,Ecuador Habano,Gurkha
Gurkha Grand Age,Rated 4.55 out of 5, Based on 31 Ratings ,"Indeed, Gurkha has reached a Grand Age.With each new release under the Gurkha name, cigar aficionados worldwide have the luxury of enjoying a wonderful new smoking experience of the highest caliber. Gurkha cigars continue to push the envelope using ultra-rare tobaccos unattainable for most cigar makers, as they never spare any expense for their ultra-premium portfolio of blends.Enter the Grand Age. A beautiful handmade comprised of superior, vintage tobaccos. Hugging an elegant blend of extensively aged Nicaraguan and Peruvian tobaccos is a choice Cameroon leaf cultivated in 1996. Masterfully blended, this impressive cigar smacks the palate with its rich, earthy core supported by pleasant toasty undertones and a touch of sweet pepper. Silky to the touch and buttery smooth, the Grand Age is built specifically for the highest shelf of your humidor.Naturally, the elusive Gurkha Grand Age '90' rating, noting: ""A dark and toothy cigar with a great burn and chocolatey aroma. It is sweet and rich in character, full of medium-bodied caramel and cocoa flavors that build to a nutty finish.""",Medium,['Presidente'],,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Presidente,No,Cameroon,Gurkha
Gurkha Grand Reserve,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"A special cigar.Gurkha is a dynamite, top-of-the-line Dominican. Gurkha cigars are hand-rolled from the finest tobaccos grown in the Cibao Valley of the Dominican Republic. The Louis XIII line is one of the finest that Gurkha makes.The Grand Reserve (copper) features a premium Connecticut shade wrapper, and each cigar is infused with fine Louis XIII Cognac, resulting in a unique, subtle, pleasant finish. Not dipped, sprayed or injected, this secretive process is utterly unique, resulting in an extraordinarily mellow, subtle and refined taste that has not been duplicated by any other cigar maker. Each cigar is gorgeously presented under glass in crystal tubos, and each glass tube is characteristically hand-dipped in wax for a one-of-a-kind presentation.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Torpedo",No,"Connecticut, Maduro",Gurkha
Gurkha Harlequiss,Rated 4.45 out of 5, Based on 11 Ratings ,"Gurkha's ready for spellcheck! 
Right about here is where I’d normally tell you the elaborate, rich history behind a cigar. Perhaps it’s a Spanish word that needs translation, perhaps it relates to the tobaccos or the fermentation process, perhaps it’s a clever pun… or perhaps it’s Harlequiss. Yes, truly the result of a drunken night and a lack of an editor, Harlequiss is the newest Gurkha premium to land at CI. 
Now while the name may cause chuckles, the blend is no joke. Crafted in limited-edition quantities in the Dominican Republic, each Harlequiss features a girthy ring-gauge and an exceptionally slow burn. Puff after puff, you’ll find complexly layered notes of earth, leather, spice, and a core of crisp, natural tobacco, Harlequiss is sure to keep you coming back for more time and time again.
",Medium,['Gordo'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Gordo,No,Dominican,Gurkha
Gurkha Heritage,Rated 4.46 out of 5,,"A worthy heritage.Gurkha has worked hard to achieve their lofty status and recognition as the Rolls Royce of cigars. From their costly super premium blends like His Majesty’s Reserve to their more affordable every day options like Park Avenue, there is a Gurkha to suit any palate or budget.Hailing from American Caribbean Cigars in Nicaragua, the Gurkha Heritage features an Ecuador Habano Rosado wrapper overtop a Nicaraguan binder and Nicaraguan, Dominican, and Pennsylvanian long-fillers. This medium to full-bodied morsel will smack your palate with rich flavors that work together beautifully to deliver a savory and satisfying blend. Although geared towards the aficionado, this blend is accessible and enjoyable for anyone. ​",Medium-Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Gurkha
Gurkha Heritage Maduro,Rated 4.59 out of 5,,"This heritage is rich in flavorLend me your ear, son, and I’ll drop some knowledge on you. When a brand earns the nickname, “The Rolls Royce of Cigars,” it’s because they consistently deliver a quality product that rivals any other handmade on the market. So what brand has that moniker? Gurkha, of course! This cigar brand has become a mainstay in humidors everywhere, and today we’re happy to look at a sequel of one of Gurkha’s best blends — the Gurkha Heritage Maduro. Don’t let the simple packaging here fool you. Gurkha Heritage Maduro is a tasty and complex cedar-wrapped morsel that’ll push your tastebuds to new levels of cigar nirvana. A dark, oily Mexican San Andres Maduro wrapper over Brazilian and Nicaraguan long-fillers means you’re getting heaping piles of espresso, earth, and bitter dark chocolate with every single puff. I’m not a betting man, but I’d take the odds that you’ll love this one. ​",Medium-Full,['Toro'],Brazil,"Brazilian, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Maduro,Gurkha
Gurkha Hudson Bay,Rated 4.21 out of 5, Based on 207 Ratings ,"Explore this new beauty from Gurkha…discover delicious, dirt-cheap handmades. In creating Hudson Bay, Gurkha has hand-selected aged tobaccos of optimum quality as usual. But this time, they also honed in on one other very important detail: sharpening the pencil on price. The outcome is magnificent and Gurkha’s Hudson Bay is a true anomaly. How could a cigar composed of such fine tobaccos cost so little? It's a head-scratcher. Handcrafted in one of Nicaragua’s top factories with a Cuban-seed Nicaraguan long-filler recipe, Ometepe binders, and a muscular, leathery San Andres wrapper, this lovely, densely packed premium burns slow and cool with a bold, rich bouquet. Medium in strength with enjoyable notes of leather, earth, black pepper, and espresso delivered in velvety-smooth fashion. Delicious. Deeply discounted. Deserving of a permanent stay in your everyday rotation. ​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,San Andres,Gurkha
Gurkha Hudson Bay Red Skies,Rated 4.17 out of 5, Based on 109 Ratings ,"Hudson Bay's next big thing.Stretching its boundaries but not what’s in your wallet, Gurkha does it again with the second addition to the Hudson Bay line, Gurkha Hudson Bay Red Skies—a deliciously, money-saving premium handmade. The East India Trading Co. division of the well-known Gurkha brand creates another well-constructed, satisfying blend. Keep on reading if you enjoy an outstanding, handmade cigar without the high-end price. Medium to full-bodied, Red Skies is both pleasing to the eye and palate. With an Ecuadorian Sumatra wrapper giving off a visually stunning red hue, and Nicaraguan long-fillers, Gurkha hand selects aged tobaccos of the finest quality and packs them into one savory treat. The tobaccos and flavor profile of Gurkha’s Hudson Bay Red Skies carry sweet, spicy notes that are undeniably complex and linger enjoyably on your palate. This is one cigar to have in your humidor. ​",Medium,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Sumatra,
Gurkha K2,Rated 2.5 out of 5,,"Mountains of full-bodied flavor, climbing gear not required.By now, you should know that Gurkha is a brand that goes big. They’ve easily claimed their spot as one of the most prolific cigar companies on the market. With a portfolio including full-bodied gems like the Warlord, the Beast, the Centurian and so many more, it’s nearly impossible to try all of them. But the main reason Gurkha has become the pinnacle of full-bodied flavor? They’ll move mountains to win you over. And this time, with the new Gurkha K2, they brought the mountain to you.Packed densely into a compact 4.25”x 56 fat corona are some of the finest Dominican and Pennsylvania long-fillers Gurkha has to offer, all secured with a Sumatran binder and wrapped lovingly in a beautiful & rustic looking Ecuador Habano wrapper. The heavy double-rowed wooden box is attractive enough, but the flavor is what really sells these little flavor bombs. Cascades of leather, spice, earth, and chocolate coat the palate like an avalanche, burying your taste buds in rich, chewy flavors start to finish. For some of us, getting through a long day can feel like climbing a mountain. The Gurkha K2 is the perfect accompaniment to help you reach the summit.",Medium-Full,['Gordo'],Sumatra,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Gordo,No,Ecuador Habano,Gurkha
Gurkha Kaizad,Rated 3.33 out of 5, Based on 36 Ratings ,"While supplies last, enjoy extra juicy savings on packs of 20!Raise a glass to the Kaizad!Kaizad. The cigar, the myth, the legend. Kaizad is the blend that true aficionados love, and I’m pumped to share these with you us ‘cuz I plan on toasting a ton of these in the near future. This medium to full-bodied beauty offers a rich bouquet of spice, earth, and leather. Sure, this gem was specifically blended for aficionados, but any donkey with a half-decent palate will enjoy it's smooth finish and impeccable balance. Go ahead, grab a few sticks and see why Gurkha is one of the best-selling cigars in the world. ",Medium,['Toro'],Habano,"Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,"Connecticut, Ecuador Connecticut",Gurkha
Gurkha Kukri,Rated 4.22 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"A cigar as sharp as its nameJust as sharp as their premium knives, Gurkha Kukri cigars are a top-notch blend. The Gurkha legacy is long, dedicated to delivering blends that are the most pleasurable cigar experience that will have you coming back for seconds. Like the rest of the Gurkha portfolio, this premium makes the cut in flavor and appearance. Made of Dominican and Nicaraguan fillers, and draped in a Connecticut shade Ecuador wrapper, the Gurkha Kukri fits right in as another elegant, can't miss option from the Gurkha crew. Take a stab at this tactical blend and understand the greatness of Gurkha.",Medium,['Gran Rothschild'],Indonesian,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,Gran Rothschild,Varies,Ecuador Connecticut,Gurkha
Gurkha Legend,Rated 4.55 out of 5, Based on 31 Ratings ,"A bold statement, from one of the finest cigar makers in the world.
Labeling a cigar as ‘Legend’ is a bold claim that cannot be backed by just any cigar maker. Fortunately, Gurkha is not your ordinary, everyday cigar maker. Quietly and efficiently, Gurkha has become one of the top boutique brands in the land, creating some of the finest, most prestigious and sought after premium cigars in the world. They’re not cheap, but the best rarely is. To put it bluntly, Gurkha Legend Centurian is one of the best cigars in the Gurkha portfolio, hands down.
Their formula is simple: use a well-balanced blend of the highest grade Dominican long-leaf filler available, add a slightly spicy premium authentic Cameroon binder leaf, followed by a Habano wrapper. The process however, is not so simple. Gurkha Cigars holds the highest of standards, and expects perfection and excellence out of every cigar created. In order to achieve these high standards, the Legend must patiently undergo an extensive aging process of 8 long years. After all is said and done, this gorgeous, dense cigar delivers a powerful, rich bouquet of hearty flavors in a uniquely smooth manner. Oozing with oily goodness, the medium to full-bodied Gurkha Legend is a well filled, slow burning beauty that will demand your attention from start to finish.Gurkha Legend received a well-deserved '90' rating, which commented: ""A very handsome, dark brown torpedo with a near perfect draw. It opens on a black cherry note with significant spicy, earthy flavors. Some licorice notes segue into a long, spicy finish.""",Medium,['Toro'],Cameroon,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Honduras,Yes,,Toro,No,Habano,Gurkha
Gurkha Legend Connecticut,Rated 4.42 out of 5,,"A legendary experience.Legen…wait for it…dary. Legendary is a fitting description for Gurkha cigars, and the Gurkha Legend Connecticut lives up to the hype and then some. These medium-bodied morsels don’t disappoint in delivering the renowned Gurkha experience. With extensive 8 year aging process before shipping, Gurkha Legend dishes out a full plate of flavors and will have you coming back for a second helping. ",Medium,['Double Perfecto'],Cameroon,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Double Perfecto,No,Connecticut,
Gurkha Legend Vintage 2001,Rated 4.34 out of 5, Based on 59 Ratings ,"Gurkha Legend is back in vintage form and it’s better than ever.Legend - a bold statement. A statement few brands can stand behind. However, this statement is one Gurkha both embraces and exemplifies to the fullest degree.In 2008, the 90-rated Gurkha ‘8-Year Aged’ Legend was taken from the market due to a shortage in tobacco leaves. The rare, uber-expensive tobaccos used to create this delicious morsel were used up, much to the disappointment of countless enthusiasts. However, Gurkha has launched a new breed of Gurkha Legend using a choice Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper cultivated in 2001. This marks the rebirth of Gurkha’s highly perceived Legend, and it’s called Vintage 2001.Gurkha Legend Vintage 2001 is a savory morsel dressed in a dark, triple-fermented Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper. This rich, chewy leaf cultivated in 2001 conceals a bold blend of extensively aged Cuban-seed long-fillers grown in the Dominican's famed Cibao Valley. After extensive post-roll aging, each Gurkha Legend releases gobs of rich, satisfying flavors. A buttery-smooth bouquet sits heavy on the palate yielding a rich creaminess throughout; a creaminess complemented by notes of dark chocolate, leather, and black espresso bean. The finish is long and memorable, yielding peppery-sweet nuances after each puff. Medium to full in body and complex to the core, Gurkha Legend Vintage 2001 is truly a work of cigar-making art.Then, there’s the Gurkha Legend Vintage 2001 Aniversario. A beautiful creation using only the blend’s finest, highest-grade tobaccos and crafting them into a gorgeous Double Perfecto shape. Magnificent, and extremely tasty to say the least.",Medium,['Toro'],Cameroon,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Gurkha
Gurkha Marauder,Rated 4.28 out of 5, Based on 18 Ratings ,"You’ll want to raid, plunder, and pillage for this GurkhaStrap on your eye patches and holster your swords, you’ll want to pirate this Gurkha cigar Marauder once you try it. Marauder is an ultra-premium blend that's chockfull of premium long-leaf fillers, and a tasty cocktail of cigar flavor you expect from Gurkha. A premium gem worth hoisting sail for. While it’s fun playing pirate saying Argh with everything, you won’t have to follow any maps or raid any treasure chests to pick up this beaut of a cigar. ",Medium,['Toro'],Indonesian,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Ecuador Habano,Gurkha
Gurkha Marquesa,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Gurkha goes pre-EmbargoThe width and breadth of the Gurkha empire of brands is as strong as the day is long. Indeed, from uber-refined, ultra-expensive Cognac infused cigars, to everyday-friendly, insanely affordable bundles, Gurkha can do it all. Today, Gurkha turns our attention to pre-embargo Cuba to craft a cigar that honors the Cuban heritage of all modern-day cigars with the new Gurkha Marquesa. The artwork on this one is, quite frankly, beautiful, and luckily the flavor is just as nice. Utilizing a soft and silky Sumatra wrapper leaf, Gurkha Marquesa delivers a medium-bodied profile that includes hints of roasted nuts, slight saltiness, natural tobacco crispness, and a sweet core of flavor. Marquesa might just end of being one of Gurkha’s best blends to date, so I’d highly recommend grabbing yourself a few today. ",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Habano,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Robusto, Toro",No,Sumatra,Gurkha
Gurkha Master Select,Rated 4.25 out of 5, Based on 133 Ratings ,"Gurkha is a dynamite, top-of-the-line super-premium.The delicious Gurkha Master Select cigars are hand-rolled from fine tobaccos grown in the Cibao Valley of the Dominican Republic, expertly blended with an aged mixture of Dominican, and Honduran long-fillers. The gorgeous, dark and silky, Dominican-grown Habana 2000 wrapper imparts a rich, creamy flavor with a hint of spice and pleasant finish with a burst of flavor. They're damn tasty, and now sport a highly reasonable price tag. One that will ensure daily enjoyment, as well as a becoming a fixture in your rotation.The Gurkha Master Select received a well deserved 91-rating in addition to 'Humidor Selection' honors. Here's what the experts had to say: ""A supple cigar that emanates a toasty aroma. Rich smoke imparts a panoply of cream, cocoa, nut and earthy spice flavors. The finish is long and satisfying.""",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Figurado', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,"Dominican, Honduran",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Figurado, Gordo, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Habano,Gurkha
Gurkha Master Select Connecticut,Rated 4.08 out of 5, Based on 24 Ratings ,"A Classic Gets a FaceliftGurkha Master Select has a rich and storied history among the pantheon of Gurkha’s greatest offerings. Originally created as a collaborative effort with Fidel Olivas, Master Select has reappeared in a few different forms over the last two decades. Today, we’re looking at a mellower version of this Honduran masterpiece — Gurkha Master Select Connecticut. Using the original recipe that made Master Select so popular, Master Select Connecticut swaps out the traditional Habano outer leaf for a fine Connecticut that’s been perfectly aged. Notes of white pepper and cedar mingle with slight cream and hay to create a Connecticut with a little more oomph, that still won’t overwhelm if you pick this one as a coffee companion. In all, Master Select Connecticut is a fine sequel to a worthy handmade. ",Mellow-Medium,['Robusto'],,"Dominican, Honduran",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Robusto,No,Connecticut,Gurkha
Gurkha Master Select OVB,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"A glorious return!Originally composed back in 2001 by the Gurkha crew, the Gurkha Master Select has been a long running fan favorite. The original cigar was blended by Fidel Olivas himself, and now, that historic blend makes its return. Working carefully with the Olivas, Gurkha has perfectly recreated this now-famous cigar, offered up today in a variety of sizes. Packaged in attractive, 25-cigar cabinets, Gurkha Master Select OVB features a stunning, Ecuadorian Habano wrapper leaf. Underneath, you’ll find a Honduran Habano binder and a combination of Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers, working together to craft a medium to full-bodied, complex experience that’ll certainly please the palate. Notes of white pepper, espresso, and cedar mingle together, in a flavorful combination that any Gurkha fan will love.",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran Habano,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Perfecto, Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,Gurkha
Gurkha Ninja,Rated 2.6 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"Behold, Gurkha Ninja.Ninja is the latest in full-flavored creations under the prestigious Gurkha label. This feisty new handmade hails from the Dominican Republic and combines a thick and oily Brazilian wrapper with aged, Cuban-seed Dominican long-fillers. Each of the five savory sizes is medium in body but layered with flavor, dishing out rich and satisfying nuances with every last puff. Notes of coffee and earth are complemented by a chewy sweetness on the finish, while the cigar remains balanced and smooth down to the nub.Gurkha Ninja received a well deserved 91-point rating, noting: ""Dark and oily with a sweet bouquet coming from the unlit foot. The cigar burns a bit unevenly, though draws well, showing coffee bean notes, nutty flavors, and an underlying sweetness.""",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Torpedo",No,Brazilian,Gurkha
Gurkha Omen,Rated 4.29 out of 5, Based on 167 Ratings ,"Something special this way comes...There’s an Omen in the air. Gurkha Omen, that is. This tasty stogie is the newest addition to Gurkha’s already star-studded profile. I wasn’t sure there was room for another powerhouse blend in the Gurkha profile, but Gurkha Omen proved me wrong.Now right about here is where I'd normally give you the details on the specs of this blend... here's the bad news: this cigar was a one-off project Gurkha that ended up never reaching full production, meaning I don't have any blend information besides what I can surmise with my own eyes. Here's the good news: my closeout pricing reflects that, and this rich Gurkha compares most favorably to blends like Centurian and Titan. Bold notes of earth and spice mingle in a complex medley, delivering heaping piles of flavor with every puff. Just be warned - once we sell through, that's all she wrote, and this blend is gone for good. Get to it!",Medium,['Gran Rothschild'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Gran Rothschild,No,Connecticut,Gurkha
Gurkha Pan American,Rated 4.29 out of 5, Based on 14 Ratings ,"That good ol' AmericanaGurkha has long been known for their prolific offerings. Each cigar providing a different luxurious experience from the last, complete with the most creative packaging in the industry. Gurkha hasn’t strayed the course with the Gurkha Pan American, a large ringed, mellow cigar. Packaged in a box resembling a vintage steamer trunk used in the 1920’s, when railroad and steamship travel was most common.A real Nicaraguan treat, the Pan American features Nicaraguan long-fillers bound by a Nicaraguan binder and flawlessly covered with an Ecuadorian Connecticut shade wrapper. Sit back and relax to the creamy and nutty flavors with nuances of oak and spice that make this mellow to medium bodied gordo another top shelf choice from Gurkha. You’ve got to hand it to Gurkha on this one, you won’t find packaging like this anywhere else.",Mellow-Medium,['Gordo'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Gordo,No,Ecuador Connecticut,Gurkha
Gurkha Park Avenue,Rated 4.51 out of 5, Based on 507 Ratings ,"Top-shelf, sub-$3.50? Holy mackerel!Superior quality and precision blending combine in this astounding value from Gurkha cigars. The “Rolls Royce of Cigars,” Park Avenue is a savory cigar appreciated by all palates. Handmade in Nicaragua, the blend consists of well-aged Cuban-seed long-fillers grown in the black soils of Nicaragua and lush tobaccos from the Cibao Valley of the Dominican Republic. On the outside, a flawless Connecticut-seed wrapper grown in Ecuador seals the deal, adding a pleasant, creamy component to an already complex bouquet. The blend is leathery, with hints of nuts and baked bread, and remains smooth with a medium-bodied profile down to the nub.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Torpedo']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Gurkha
Gurkha Park Avenue Habano,Rated 4.33 out of 5, Based on 120 Ratings ,"The long-awaited Park Avenue line extension.The ultra-popular Gurkha Park Avenue Series is finally complete, thanks to the addition of a delicious, medium-bodied Habano blend. This fan-favorite line has been taking up permanent residence in humidors across the nation for years due to its consistent quality, attractive price-point, and scrumptious flavor. Now with the addition of a delectable medium-bodied offering, the Park Avenue Series is poised for a full-fledged take-over.At hand is the same time-tested Park Avenue blend of aged Nicaraguan long-fillers, but they are now paired with a gorgeous Ecuadorian Habano wrapper to create a rich, hearty experience layered with Cuban-esque notes of pepper, wood, cream, and earth. With ample flavor, a smooth n’ creamy cigar, and a strength that’s far from overwhelming, Park Avenue Habano is perfect anytime. ​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Torpedo']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Torpedo",No,Habano,Gurkha
Gurkha Park Avenue Maduro,Rated 4.52 out of 5, Based on 71 Ratings ,"Park Ave, now available in dark!Park Avenue has been a top-seller since Jump Street. It’s smoth, well-made, reasonably priced and absolutely delicious. So adding Maduro to the family became inevitable, and Gurkha Cigars was itchin’ to get it done. The Maduro is finally here....and she’s a beauty, let me tell you boy. For Park Avenue Maduro, a Habano Maduro wrapper grown in Jalapa, Nicaragua was selected. Pitch-black in color, smooth and loaded with oils, this handsome leaf is primed for flavor. Under the sheets, the same mellow, Nicaraguan long-filler blend as the original Park Avenue was retained. All in, it’s a few notches up in strength level, brimming with rich, smoky, spicy and sweet flavors. Smooth, balanced, delicious from start to finish. For this limited edition run, only 5,000 boxes were created. Once they’re gone, they’re gone for good.",Medium,['Torpedo'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Torpedo,No,Habano Maduro,Gurkha
Gurkha Prize Fighter,Rated 4.2 out of 5, Based on 44 Ratings ,"A real knockout.Here's one I never saw coming. Sort of like the first time I saw Rocky 5 - consumed with confusion and thoughts of ""what the hell is going on here."" But luckily in this instance, it makes this handmade even more special. Instead of swanky packaging and high MSRPs, this one cuts out all the fat for a lean, highly anticipated release. Inspired by historic boxing figures from the 1900's, Prize Fighter takes a refreshing all substance approach. In fact, you've probably heard stories of this era - when the men were men (and real men burnt cigars). Prize Fighter wins on so many levels....a picture perfect Connecticut-shade Ecuadorian wrapper, double binder combination of Ecuadorian and Indonesian leaves, and a 3 year aged blend of Dominican fillers. Never overpowering, this mellow to medium-bodied cigar is easy to enjoy one after another. Then tack on the highly enjoyable price....nuff said.",Mellow-Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Gurkha
Gurkha Red Witch,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 20 Ratings ,"One sexy....witch.Red Witch is the newest everyday premium cigar from Gurkha, and boy does it look good. Named after the famous East India Trading Company ship, this lovely handmade is gorgeous from head to toe. Carefully crafted in Nicaragua, this box-pressed creature packs 3-year aged Nicaraguan long-fillers, from the super-fertile region of Jalapa, into a Dominican binder. Then, tying the ensemble together is a seamless Ecuadorian Rosado wrapper. From first light, sweet nuances take the reigns as notes of spice, earth, and coffee also enter the fray. Medium to full in body and exceptionally well-balanced, this handmade takes you on one memorable voyage. Plus, they're reasonably priced too. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Gurkha
Gurkha Regatta,Rated 4.26 out of 5, Based on 57 Ratings ,"Test the waters with Gurkha RegattaSail ahead at full speed with Gurkha Regatta. This premium stogie, named after the series of boat races, will make you feel like you’re on the edge of a boat, cruisin’ the sea, without a care in the world. All from the comfort of your own home! And with the ultra-discounts you get at CI, what could be better? Filled with a blend of Pennsylvanian, Dominican and Nicaraguan tobaccos and finished in a Connecticut shade wrapper, this mellow cigar won’t shake your sea legs. Coast through every social event at your next Regatta with one of these Gurkha’s in hand, and embark on a flavorful excursion ‘til the finish line with this mellow addition to the luxury brand. ",Medium,['Gran Rothschild'],Indonesian,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Gran Rothschild,No,Ecuador Connecticut,Gurkha
Gurkha Rogue Tyrant,Rated 4.24 out of 5, Based on 29 Ratings ,"Gurkha does it again, and this time they're going Rogue.Take a peek at the third release under Gurkha's East India Trading line and behold a solid offering worthy of the mighty Gurkha name. This gem starts with a velvety smooth golden Ecuadorian Habano wrapper draped over a rare Ecuadorian binder and 3-year-aged blend of Nicaraguan, Honduran, and Dominican ligero long-filler leaves. The result? A full-flavored, medium to full-bodied profile that means business. Complexity? Check. Top-notch construction? Check. Unique un-finished foot? Check. Lively notes of spice, tobacco, and roasted chestnuts gradually build in intensity for a grand crescendo. Prepare thyself for a tasty ride that lives up to expectations, all at a CI price that’s just as scrumptious.Gurkha Rogue received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""A very dark squarish cigar with an uncut foot. It's toasty and spicy, with a sweet nutty character that becomes toasted by the finish.""",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,Robusto,No,Ecuador Habano,Gurkha
Gurkha Royal Brigade,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"A Gurkha fit for a kingKnown as the ‘Rolls Royce’ of cigars, Gurkha outdoes themselves in crafting high-end blends and is sought-after by those who have an eye for the lines of luxury. Each Gurkha cigar is produced with the highest of standards, and Royal Brigade is living proof to that testament. This regal cigar is filled with a fine blend of Dominican Ligero long-filler tobacco and clothed in a glistening dark Cameroon wrapper delivering notes of pepper, spice, and sweet earthy nuances. Another jewel added the Gurkha crown that will impress any cigar aficionado. Feel like royalty for a night or two with Gurkha Royal Brigade. ",Medium,['Gordo'],,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Gordo,No,Cameroon,
Gurkha Royal Challenge Maduro,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"I royally challenge you to try this.Gurkha Royal Challenge has a brand new extension, and this puppy lives up to the hype of its predecessor. Appropriately named Gurkha Royal Challenge Maduro, this blend takes the best parts of the original and adds its own unique twist to boost up the flavor. Packaged in the same leather box with regal platinum embellishments, this classy prize has all the components to be another star.Royal Challenge Maduro utilizes the same binder and filler tobaccos as the original - the wrapper, however, strays from the norm. Keeping in mind Royal Challenge’s original audience, Royal Challenge Maduro remains a creamy, mild experience. And with the addition of a Broadleaf Maduro wrapper leaf, the flavor becomes abundant. Hints of oak and earth are persistent from the first light, with a strong natural sweetness tiptoeing across your lips to the finish. A veritable masterpiece, Royal Challenge Maduro is a must try for novices and connoisseurs alike.",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Torpedo']","Habano, Honduran","Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Torpedo",No,Maduro,
Gurkha Seduction,Rated 4.82 out of 5, Based on 17 Ratings ,"Beauty. Beast. Titan. Centurian. Black Dragon. Just a few members of Gurkha's esteemed 'best of the best' club. But if there's one thing Joe hates, it's seeing a deserving specimen left out in the cold. That's why he's taking matters into his own hands, and bringing you one of Gurkha's finest creations for a hefty discount. Sporting an oily and enticing Ecuadorian Habano wrapper, and a distinctive bouquet of Columbian Corojo long-fillers, secured by a Dominican Olor binder, Seduction fires on all cylinders. This unique ensemble employs an unforgettable medium-bodied experience, pumping out unmistakable notes of cedar, spice, and coffee, as occasional notes of caramel-sweetness enter the fray. Complex, and enjoyable to the nub, this one will remain on your brain long after you set it down. Seduction hard to find, period. But it's impossible to find at this price, so get some!",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Colombian, Dominican",False,,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Gurkha
Gurkha Shaggy,Rated 2.6 out of 5,,"Hmm....I wonder why it’s called Shaggy.If you were guessing the Gurkha Shaggy got its name from its shaggy foot, then you are spot on. If you were thinking about Scooby-Doo....we might have a problem. The Gurkha Shaggy is a very distinctive cigar from the creative minds of Gurkha. Besides the noticeably exposed foot, the Shaggy utilizes a balanced recipe of vintage tobaccos. Bursting from within awaits 5-year old Dominican long-fillers and binder. Resting atop this aged core is an enticing chocolaty-brown 8-year old Dominican wrapper. Upon toasting the rugged foot, the binder and filler provide an insightful experience as to the taste of a cigar sans its wrapper. (Truly very unique if you have yet to experience it.) As the burn reaches the wrapper, warm flavors swarm the palate engulfing the senses as smooth notes of tobacco, oak, spice, and a hint of vanilla round out this medium-bodied treat. Not your normal Gurkha, heck – not your normal cigar, the Shaggy is a must try.",Medium,['Gordo'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Gordo,No,Dominican,Gurkha
Gurkha Sherpa Maduro,Rated 4.42 out of 5, Based on 33 Ratings ,"Let the Sherpa guide you to flavortown.Gurkha is a brand that's always ahead of the pack on Cigars International. Boldly going where no other brands dare to tread, Gurkha brings us cigars that are bold and unique, and leads our palates into wondrous uncharted territory. The Sherpa Maduro is the latest entry to their impressive portfolio, and like the original Sherpa, is an instant classic at a price of admission that will have the masses clamboring.A hearty, medium to full-bodied blend loaded with a tri-country blend of long-fillers that are encapsulated by a smooth Connecticut binder, this potent gem is finished with a dark maduro wrapper that provides notes of dark chocolate and hints of spice. Beautiful to look at and even more beautiful to taste, Sherpa Maduro is a certified humidor-stuffer that'll have you coming back for more in no time.",Medium-Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Connecticut Broadleaf,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Gurkha
Gurkha Sherpa Orange,Rated 3.99 out of 5, Based on 417 Ratings ,"A gem from Gurkha.Meticulously blended, Sherpa is a veritable treat for the senses. Hailing from Esteli, Nicaragua, Sherpa combines a vintage combination of Cuban-seed long-leaf tobaccos cultivated from two of the Central America’s most prized growing regions: Esteli and the Dominican’s Cibao Valley. This lush mixture is subsequently cloaked by a dark Habano wrapper grown in Nicaragua. Oily and pleasing to the eye, this choice outer leaf completes an eventful medium-bodied experience. Sherpa is rich and hearty, yet smooth from start to finish, offering enjoyable notes of leather, earth, and black espresso. The aroma is robust and toasty with a slight charcoal influence. Enjoy Sherpa, a complex and well-balanced cigar that's dirt cheap.",Medium,"['Double Corona', 'Robusto']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Double Corona, Robusto",No,"Habano, Nicaraguan",Gurkha
Gurkha Signature 1887,Rated 4.27 out of 5, Based on 11 Ratings ,"Mellow, redefined.Only the highest quality, vintage tobaccos attainable are used to create these tasty treats....tobaccos most brands cannot employ due to sparse quantities and exceedingly high costs. But Gurkha never sacrifices quality for quantity, as evidenced by the brand's slew of choice, 90+ rated blends.Gurkha Signature 1887 is a elegant blend, to say the least. Surprisingly mellow in character, this beautiful handmade booms with bigtime flavor. Toasty, oaky nuances smack the palate from all fronts, leaving behind a dense, but silky aftertaste that lingers long on the finish. A wonderful cigar you could puff on all day long, one that always delivers and satisfies. That's Gurkha Signature 1887.Naturally, the box is a work of art. A big, upright box with leather inlays in a high-gloss cherry finish.",Mellow-Medium,['Toro'],Dominican,Peruvian,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,Ecuador Connecticut,Gurkha
Gurkha Special Ops,Rated 4.48 out of 5, Based on 23 Ratings ,"Gurkha Special Ops....ready for deployment, sir!​​​​You might not have seen them comin', but the Gurkha Special Ops have arrived. Special Ops is a name traditionally reserved for the nation’s elite soldiers, the cream of the crop. Inspired by our nation’s best, Gurkha set out to create a cigar equally elite. Wrapped in an silky and flawless, extensively aged Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper (it’s quite stunning, mind you) each Special Ops is primed for optimal enjoyment. A complex core of Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers creates a medium-bodied bouquet. Earth and wood dominate, while a rich and chocolatey nuance lingers long on the toasty-sweet finish. From time to time you'll pick up some gentle notes of pepper, adding to yet another flavor to this complex beauty.",Medium,['Churchill'],,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Churchill,No,Maduro,Gurkha
Gurkha Status,Rated 4.6 out of 5, Based on 10 Ratings ,"The Status quo...Gurkha Status is an ultra-premium, subtle to medium-bodied offering that'll rival any top-shelf name you can imagine. A truly luxurious cigar, each Status lives up to its bold name thanks to top-notch aesthetics, delicious flavors, and unrivaled quality. Draped in a magnificent Connecticut shade wrapper, Status looks splendid and delivers a lovely bouquet to match. The underlying Dominican long-leaf core is bound with a heavily fermented Dominican binder, making the Status silky-smooth and buttery throughout. Accompanying the smooth, scrumptious subtleties of cream, cedar, and sweet tobacco is an easy draw and flawless burn. You owe it to yourself to grab a Status most expeditiously.",Mellow-Medium,['Torpedo'],Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Torpedo,No,Connecticut,
Gurkha Symphony,Rated 4.32 out of 5, Based on 75 Ratings ,"Smooth as silk.By all accounts, this 91-rated blend is a masterful one. It’s often compared to AVO cigars - indeed many would say it outpaces and outshines its rival, offering copious amounts of mellow, creamy smoothness. And despite its subtle body, Gurkha Symphony delivers a genuine richness of flavor and complexity, even a smidge of spiciness on the palate. ",Mellow,['Toro'],Dominican,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,Connecticut,Gurkha
Gurkha The Royal Reserve,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"The cigar rated by MAXIM and American Airlines magazine as ""finest in the world.""Gurkha is known for super-expensive, high-quality, well-aged premium cigars made with choice tobaccos. The Royal Reserve might just take the cake, as the line is among the most pricey in the world. The flat-out beautiful box packaging of this cigar makes it almost a shame to break open and enjoy.  This high-ticket box contains 22 exquisite cigars that have been ""super-infused"" with Louis XIII cognac that will tease your palate. Medium to full bodied with a unique, ornate wax coating, sealed under glass. A collector’s item.I'll be honest, I thought these went the way of the dinosaur. But, we recently received word from the manufacturer that these are still in limited production. This elusive handmade will only be around with very limited supply. There's no guarantee with how long they'll be available, so seize your opportunity to enjoy like royalty!",Medium,['Torpedo'],Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Torpedo,Yes,"Connecticut, Maduro",Gurkha
Gurkha Vanquish,Rated 4.57 out of 5, Based on 23 Ratings ,"Vanquish MSRPs!Gurkha's been beating the competition for years, but now it's time to wipe them off the map completely. With Gurkha Vanquish, they've crafted a handmade that'll make you forget all about the other mediocre blends some brands serve up as ""premiums."" Remove boring cigars from your mind, and indulge in Gurkha Vanquish today.Though Gurkha Vanquish is currently available in multiple sizes, they'll be tightening up to include just the XO 6""x60 version... if you're a fan of the Robusto, Churchill, or any of the various sundry of other sizes and shapes I hope you jump aboard today.",Medium,['Gordo'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Gordo,No,Habano,Gurkha
Gurkha Warlord,Rated 2.5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Hide ya kids, hide ya wife, the Warlord is here.The Gurkha Warlord is a cigar that takes no prisoners, and isn't shy about the matter, professing to be one of the greatest and most full-bodied Gurkha blends ever. A bold statement when you consider the impressive stable of cigars that exist under the Gurkha umbrella. Carefully handcrafted, the Warlord weighs in at a hefty 6.7”x60. This large vitola houses a choice selection of potent Nicaraguan fillers and is complemented by a flavorful Connecticut binder. Rounding out the savory blend is an oily and leathery Nicaraguan wrapper. This complex bouquet strikes a balanced accord between flavor and body, as meaty and rich flavors dance on the palate delivered by cool thick flavors. As the slow burn progresses, notes of nuts, oak, and spice are accentuated by an espresso like finish. Easily one of the most full-bodied Gurkhas on the market, the Warlord is not only de-lish, but delivers an experience as promised. In traditional Gurkha fashion, the Warlord is packaged inside eloquent treasure-style chests, bringing the high end feel of the limited-run Warlord full swing. Note: Only the Super Toro Box of 33 will be packaged in the the treasure chest.",Full,['Gordo'],Connecticut Broadleaf,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Gordo,No,Nicaraguan,Gurkha
Gurkha Warpath,Rated 4.22 out of 5,,"Get out the way, this Gurkha’s on a warpathIf you've been angrily on the hunt for a premium stogie, look no further than... well, Gurkha Warpath! You know Gurkha’s reputation for high-quality blends won’t steer you wrong, and this raging cigar is looking to put poser full-bodied cigars on the back burner. Warpath, a high-octane quality blend kicked up with flavor for high-energy cigar enthusiasts. This is a no-nonsense cigar, so put your money where your mouth is, in a good way, and get to savin’ from your pals at CI on the full-flavored Gurkha Warpath. Another great addition to the Gurkha portfolio of luxury cigars. ",Medium,['Gordo'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Gordo,No,Nicaraguan,
Gurkha Warpig,Rated 4.47 out of 5, Based on 248 Ratings ,"Pig out on Gurkha's affordable new handmade.To truly understand Gurkha Warpig, imagine a beast with sharp tusks, blood-thirsty eyes, a take no prisoners attitude, and roll that all into one savory handmade. Not for the timid, Warpig stares at you in the face, challenging you with every puff. Unleashing a fierce array of flavor that only few will, and can appreciate, Warpig is a full-flavored cocktail. Draped in a dark, oily maduro wrapper and jam-packed with feisty long-fillers from Honduras and the Dominican, prepare for a Gurkha cigar of epic proportions. A bold yet balanced profile leads the charge as strong notes of espresso, cocoa, pepper, cedar, and a healthy dose of cream enter the fray. Sealing the delicious ensemble in place is a long, lingering, lip-smacking finish. The best part is, this one comes equipped with a price tag that will have you enjoying it daily. A powerful, top-shelf Gurkha staring you down for around $4-$5. If this doesn't sound like a dream come true, you should get your head checked STAT. ",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Connecticut,"Dominican, Honduran",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Maduro,Gurkha
Gurkha Wicked Indie,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Evil name, good cigar.With a name like Wicked Indie, I'll admit I was a bit skeptical at first. It sounds kinda shoddy, but an honest look reveals another top-notch handmade from Gurkha cigars. Hand-crafted in Nicaragua, each Wicked Indie is dressed in a golden brown Nicaraguan habano wrapper glistening with oils. This striking leaf houses a complex bouquet of Nicaraguan long-fillers patiently aged for 3 years. The end result is a well-balanced cigar with plenty of big time flavors in tow. Up front, the Gurkha Wicked Indie starts out with pepper and oak, before slowly transitioning into deep notes of caramel, coffee, and a spicy-sweet tobacco finish. Thick and chewy flavor coats the palate, as the Gurkha Wicked Inidie remains smooth all the way to the nub. Sure to treat you right, this highly enjoyable medium-bodied handmade is destined to become a regular in your rotation. Gurkha Wicked Indie received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""A fairly thick cigar with an easy draw that's full of fresh, rich tobacco notes. Some nutty flavors join a combination of molasses, sea salt and floral flavors.""",Medium,['Robusto'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Robusto,No,Habano,Gurkha
Gurkha Widow Maker,Rated 4.47 out of 5, Based on 45 Ratings ,"Few boutique brands carry the all-around gravitas as Gurkha. Actually, few brands even come close. Known for exceedingly flavorful, high quality handmades crafted from the world's rarest, oldest tobaccos, the Gurkha name represents prestige and luxury. Centurian, Beauty, Beast, Titan, Crest, Triad....Gurkha's list of fine achievements is long and distinguished. Add Widow Maker to the list, because this rare specimen is ready for the masses. The medium to full-bodied Widow Maker is all substance. Available in two formats - Ecuador Connecticut and Connecticut Broadleaf - this ultra-premium is made entirely of extensively aged tobaccos. Rare, vintage tobaccos sorted countless times to obtain only the finest, highest quality leaves. Both varieties are bold and complex, offering soothing layers of robust, satisfying flavors delivered in a methodical, expertly balanced fashion only true vintage tobaccos can provide. Expectations will no doubt be high due to the price point....but a cigar of this caliber has the ability to meet, and also exceed, these expectations.Widow Maker MaduroWrapper: 10-year-aged Connecticut BroadleafBinder: 8-year-aged genuine CameroonLong-Filler: 8-year-aged Dominican HabanoExperience: Rich, rich, rich. Rich tobacco, rich espresso, rich cocoa bean, rich oak. Then there's the sweet, peanut influence and touch of sweet-spices from the Cameroon wrapper, adding yet another layer of complexity.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo']",Cameroon,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo",No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Habano",Gurkha
Gurkha Xtreme,Rated 4.56 out of 5, Based on 16 Ratings ,"This blend is as Xtreme as they come!Gurkha is well-known for creating intense, over-the-top blends that are as varied and coveted as the come (HMR, anyone?). One thing that’s equally intense is their packaging. A quick glance at this futuristic style black box may leave you wondering how to access the launch pad – it’s just that cool. Xtreme features a Nicaraguan wrapper and is available in three scrumptious sizes. And since Gurkha is just as much about the experience as it is about the cigar itself, this little stunner will fit right into your collection quite nicely.​Gurkha Xtreme even impressed the critics, earning a 90-rating, noting: ""Lots of earth and unsweetened chocolate with every puff of this toro. Hints of licorice also come through as well before a finish redolent of cloves.""",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Nicaraguan,Gurkha
Gurkha Yakuza,Rated 4.52 out of 5, Based on 60 Ratings ,"A gorgeously intimidating blend.Depending who you believe, the Yakuza are either a ruthless Japanese organized crime syndicate, or a misunderstood chivalrous organization…hint, I’d go with the former. The Yakuza are as famed for their intricate tattoos as their missing pinkies, and this new, bold blend from Gurkha, dubbed Yakuza, is as menacing as its namesake. A blend that’s as special as Gurkha Yakuza shouldn’t come in normal packaging, and leave it to Gurkha to knock this one out of the park. Coming dressed in a oil-oozing, milk-chocolaty Ecuador Habano ligero wrapper, Yakuza’s aesthetics are spot-on. A quick peak under the covers reveals a Nicaraguan binder embracing a collection of ligero-laced, uber-refined Nicaraguan and Honduran long-fillers with the addition of a small amount of La Entradas long-filler. Well-balanced, this firecracker is in-your-face full-bodied and will lay the smack-down in the flavor department. Bold notes of toast, oak, nuts, espresso, and pepper intertwine for a robust and dizzying experience. Not for the faint of heart, the Gurkha Yakuza will send you into sensory overload. Make sure to clear your schedule for this gem, because it's an experience that demands zero interruption.​",Full,['Toro'],Nicaraguan,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Ecuador Habano,Gurkha
H. Upmann 175th Anniversary,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Starting with a dream and ambition.It’s hard to believe that it’s been 175 years since H. Upmann got its start, but it’s abundantly clear that this was a brand built to withstand the test of time. Started in Cuba by an ambitious German banker, H. Upmann has flourished into a household name in the world of cigars, and is still going strong seventeen and a half decades later. This momentous anniversary deserves an exceptional cigar release, and exceptional is the perfect word for the H. Upmann 175th Anniversary.This exquisite puro uses only the finest leaves ever grown in Nicaragua, and is assembled by the most skilled rollers at the AJ Fernandez factory. The wrapper leaf is the star of the show on the 175th Anniversary: a Media Tiempo wrapper subjected to a specially developed three year fermentation process. The body is medium-full and the flavors are unlike anything you’ve ever tried, owing to the special processes only known to AJ Fernandez. Raise a glass to 175 years of H. Upmann and toast to many more to come!Good news! The H. Upmann 175th Anniversary has received a 93-point rating, noting ""This Churchill wears a gorgeous, dark wrapper that gleams with oil. Its effortless draw imparts rich, complex layers of chocolate and dried cherry interwoven with touches of oak, tannin and salty leather. The sweet aroma of stewing stone fruits is present throughout.""",Medium-Full,['Churchill'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Churchill,No,Nicaraguan,H. Upmann
H. Upmann 1844 Reserve,Rated 4.68 out of 5, Based on 41 Ratings ,"H. Upmann, reborn.H. Upmann has a strong track record in the cigar industry. With Cuban-roots dating back to 1844, and a history of top-selling blends from the Dominican Republic, H. Upmann is known for their smooth, flavorful handmade cigars that deliver time and time again. The classic H. Upmann line from the Dominican Republic recently underwent a complete overhaul. Packing change, a slightly tweaked blend, and even a new front mark - H. Upmann 1844 Reserve. I'll be the first to admit, I was skeptical. Why mess with success? But after burning a few, I realized why. This cigar is legit - a major improvement, no doubt. The new H. Upmann 1844 Reserve features a dark, reddish-brown Ecuadorian Habano wrapper that's oily and leathery. Underneath, a Nicaraguan binder and all-Dominican long-filler blend complete the ensemble. The result is a smooth, medium-bodied cigar that's rich in flavor and complete with notes of earth, nuts, pepper, and cedar. Delicious indeed and a fitting complement to the storied H. Upmann name.H. Upmann 1844 Reserve earned a spot in the Top 25 Cigars of the Year and received a stellar, 93-point rating, noting: ""A beautifully made pyramid with a superbly even burn and lush draw that layers the palate with earth, cedar, mineral and rich tobacco intonations.""",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Corona', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Corona, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Ecuador Habano,H. Upmann
H. Upmann by AJ Fernandez,Rated 4.57 out of 5, Based on 84 Ratings ,"With over 170 years of quality production under its belt, H. Upmann may not feel it necessary to collaborate. With a portfolio of cigars that keeps well in touch with a rich Cuban heritage, H. Upmann has kept to its roots very well and has developed a deserved following because of it. Fortunately for cigar enthusiasts everywhere, they’re open to partnering with some of the other bigs in the industry.Working with blend master AJ Fernandez, H. Upmann has put together a bold yet classic blend that will appeal to all types of palates. This medium to full-bodied cigar is made of Ecuadorian Sumatra wrapper surrounding Criollo ‘91 and Piloto Cubano fillers for a sweet but balanced taste that exude delicious hints of cocoa, spice, and roasted nuts. A delicious finish befitting the regal and historic H. Upmann name.Great news! H. Upmann by AJ Fernandez very quickly received a 90-rating. The review notes, “This well-made robusto has an even draw that offers notes of black cherry and nuts with a sweet vanilla oakiness.”",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Churchill, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Ecuador Sumatra,H. Upmann
H. Upmann by AJ Fernandez Finca La Lilia 2009,Rated 4.57 out of 5,,"A collaboration that was worth the wait!For 170 years, H. Upmann has worked endlessly to establish a portfolio that honors Cuban heritage. From production of cigars using time-honored traditions, to utilizing only the best tobacco for their cigars, H. Upmann has become a well-known name in the cigar industry. Collaborating with AJ Fernandez, another legend in the industry, was a move that advanced both names even further into success.  The gem I present to you today is the H. Upmann Nicaragua by AJ Fernandez Finca La Lilia 2009, the follow-up release to their very first collaboration. Released in a limited edition 6 x 60 size, the blend is similar to the original, with some significant improvements. A Nicaraguan Corojo 99 binder covers Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers, including tobacco from the 2009 crop produced at AJ Fernandez’s farm in Nicaragua, Finca La Lillia. Utilizing a higher priming of the Ecuadorian Sumatra wrapper this time around, the cigar has a darker color and added strength, generating a medium to full-bodied profile with notes of oatmeal, walnuts, cedar, white pepper and some natural sweetness. Just 375 boxes were made, so secure your box while you have the chance.",Medium-Full,['Gordo'],"Corojo, Criollo, Nicaraguan","Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,Gordo,False,Ecuador Sumatra,H. Upmann
H. Upmann Connecticut,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Better rename them the ‘Groupo de Connecticut’ The blenders behind numerous successful Montecristo, Romeo, and H. Upmann releases, ‘Groupo de Maestros’ may not be a household name but you’ve likely had a cigar that’s a result of their work. Today, they turn their eye to revitalizing the mellow-bodied cigar, attempting to offer up a cigar that’ll deliver all the flavor a contemporary cigar lover wants, without making it a full-bodied, Nicaraguan powerhouse. And luckily, they hit it out of the park. Crafted in the Dominican Republic, H. Upmann Connecticut features a gorgeously smooth Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper. The only thing smoother than this wrapper leaf? The flavor (and that transition, if I do say so myself). Loads of sweet cream hit the palate, with the slightest hints of pepper and a roasted, nutty core.  ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,H. Upmann
H. Upmann Fumas,Rated 4.23 out of 5, Based on 66 Ratings ,"A Fuma You Can't Shake a Stick At!As one of the oldest cigar brands around, H. Upmann is sure to be in your humidors. With a wide variety of strengths and flavor profiles to choose from in his large collection, H. Upmann delivers everything but the kitchen sink to please any cigar enthusiast. From classic blends like the 1844 Reserve to more modern cigars in the line up like Legacy and The Banker, H. Upmann cigars aim for excellence. And H. Upmann Fumas are no exception. This budget friendly blend is comprised of Nicaraguan Habano mixed filler and wrapped in an Indonesian Besuki leaf. A well-aged cigar, Fumas offers notes of spice, caramel, cream, and black pepper. Stock up on this affordable everyday premium at CI where you’ll find everyday low prices.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Indonesian,H. Upmann
H. Upmann Herman's Batch,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Crafted to the personal tastes of the man himself.In 1843, a German import/export banker moved to Cuba to secure assets and grow his clientele. He took a liking to the island, and after establishing his business reputation, began making cigars a year later. The man’s name was Herman Upmann, and he named the brand he developed after himself. H. Upmann remains a prominent name in cigar shops more than 175 years later, and the newest H. Upmann cigar not only pays tribute to this great man but is also crafted as a modern take on those original Upmann cigars from way back in 1844.For the blend, an Ecuador-grown Habano wrapper leaf covers a Dominican binder and long-fillers from the Dominican and the Condega & Esteli regions of Nicaragua. This decidedly modern mix of tobaccos produces a classic, wood-forward profile with ample complexity and undertones of spice, cocoa, and cinnamon that hearkens back to the taste of cigars from yesteryear. Now don your top hat & double-breasted vest, grab a box of Herman’s Batch, and be the first on your block to light up like a 19th-century socialite.",Medium,"['Corona Gordo', 'Lonsdale', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona Gordo, Lonsdale, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,H. Upmann
H. Upmann Hispaniola by Jose Mendez,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"A taste of the Greater Antilles.H. Upmann has a strong history of success in the cigar business that’s entirely their own, but this doesn’t preclude them from joining forces with other names in the industry. Big or small, these collaborations produce truly special releases that benefit not only themselves but the industry as a whole. The A.J. Fernandez and Grupo de Maestros versions were instantly well-received, and their newest collaboration is with famed tobacco producer Jose Mendez, with a goal to pay tribute to the nearly forgotten Dominican tobacco processes native to the island of Hispaniola.This medium to full-bodied gen contains tobacco from several different farms and growing regions in the Dominican, including Andullo and Pilotico. The binder is Dominican and the wrapper is a sultry Ecuador Sumatra leaf, producing uniquely creamy and complex notes of nuts, cedar, and toast. Jose Mendez pulled out all the stops for this exceptional blend, so grab a box and get a taste of olde-world Hispaniola.",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,False,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Sumatra,H. Upmann
H. Upmann Legacy Nicaragua,Rated 3.82 out of 5, Based on 200 Ratings ,"The perfect mistakeJoin me on a quick journey, we’re going back to the past… I’ve got a story to tell that you’ll find most interesting. Right around 2014, the blenders behind H. Upmann had finally finished crafting their newest cigar: the Legacy Nicaragua. Rolled in one size, a gorgeous 6”x54 Torpedo, they sent a huge order to the factory in anticipation of the release… but the release never came. Join me now, in 2017, where we stare down these three-year-aged, perfectly blended beauties that never were. H. Upmann Legacy Nicaragua never received an official release, so you won’t find any fancy packaging or boxes here. What you will find, however, is a handmade cigar utilizing 100% Nicaraguan grown tobaccos for the wrapper, filler, and binder. After taking a cedar nap for over three years, each cigar comes equipped with rich flavor, handsomely delivering notes of cedar, spice, earth, and almonds on each puff. You’ll never find aged H. Upmanns going this low again, so I’d heartily recommend you secure yourself a bundle today. ",Medium,['Belicoso'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Belicoso,No,"Nicaraguan, Sumatra",
H. Upmann Media Noche,Rated 4.09 out of 5, Based on 66 Ratings ,"The dark side of Upmann.The third installment in the Media Noche family comes complements of H. Upmann, a storied brand with over 170 years of cigar making tradition. This rich, delicious blend brings the flavor in spades, leading to an extremely balanced maduro profile you'll always remember.Crafted with an oily, dark Pennsylvania Broadleaf maduro wrapper and a well-blended ensemble of Dominican long-fillers, H. Upmann Media Noche delivers a sweet, chewy profile filled with nuances of oak, leather, espresso, and a delicious smoky-sweet finish. Medium in body, but layered with flavor, this well-balanced blend is smooth and satisfying down to the last puff. ",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Pennsylvania Broadleaf,H. Upmann
H. Upmann Perlado,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 18 Ratings ,"The true hidden gemAfter the success of the new fan-favorite Romeo y Julieta Perlado and Montecristo Perlado, it was natural there’d be a successor to the throne. Today, we welcome that new cigar… sort of. Feast your eyes on the H. Upmann Perlado, a new blend that’s sure to get some attention. The bad news? This cigar was crafted in a single size, without boxes, meant to be used only for promotional purposes and special events. The good news? We got our hands on a ton of them, and in true CI fashion, we’re delivering them straight to the people. Featuring a Sumatra Java wrapper leaf overtop US and Dominican fillers, this ultra-smooth Perlado comes in a little fuller than its brethren. Things never dip above a medium-bodied profile, though. The flavor is excellent, delivering a smooth sipper of a cigar that’s charming all the way down to the nub. In short, if you loved either of the last two Perlados, or just appreciate a good, Cuban-esque blend, you’ll find plenty more to love here.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Dominican, United States",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Sumatra,H. Upmann
H. Upmann Reserve Maduro,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Darth Upmann says, ""Come to the dark side.""H. Upmann has been shelling out premium blends for well over 150 years. Their staying power in undeniable and their offerings only seem to get better with age. For their next trick, H. Upmann went better and bolder, delivering a strong and complex, medium to full-bodied treat aimed to please the veterans of the leaf.Cloaked in a seamless, oil-soaked, dark chocolate-colored San Andres Morrón wrapper, Reserve Maduro is simply a thing of beauty. Ultra-refined long-fillers from Honduras and Nicaragua combine with a vintage Nicaraguan binder to deliver a spicy array of flavors including white pepper, oak, leather, and sweet cream. H. Upmann Reserve Maduro received a well-deserved 91-rating noting: “This cigar wears a silky wrapper the color of chocolate and is finished with an attractive cap. The draw is a bit firm but offers a spicy, cedary profile with some cocoa notes on the finish. An enjoyable, medium-bodied cigar.”​",Mellow-Medium,['Robusto'],Nicaraguan,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Robusto,No,San Andres,
H. Upmann The Banker,Rated 4.62 out of 5, Based on 34 Ratings ,"This one comes straight from the vault.Legend has it that Carl and Herman Upmann, a pair of ambitious German bankers, traveled to Cuba in 1844 with the intention of creating the perfect cigar. This top-secret blend was reserved solely for their most important (read: wealthiest) clients, and was locked in a vault to keep it away from prying eyes. Unfortunately, the bank burned down in the 20s, but luckily enough for you and me, attempts have been made to reintroduce this special concoction. That’s where H. Upmann The Banker comes into play.Swathed in a super-dark Ecuadorian Habano wrapper and filled to the gills with vintage long-filler leaves from Nicaragua and the Dominican, this bold treat is worth writing home about. Spicy enough to keep you on your toes without overwhelming, the blend is medium in body with a distinctly creamy texture and features solid, earthy notes. It’s the perfect choice for your favorite hedge fund manager, or for anyone who appreciates a well-made, intensely satisfying Cuban-esque premium handmade with a bit of history behind it.H. Upmann The Banker received a well-deserved 91-rating noting: ""The wheaty and raisin-like aromas coming off the cold bouquet of the foot recur on the palate. The cigar also takes on cedary, herbal notes before a coffee finish.""",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Ecuador Habano,H. Upmann
Half Pipe Cigars,Rated 4.71 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"Half cigar, half pipe, 100% valueI haven’t seen a Half Pipe since watching the X Games in the early 90’s. So when I heard we were getting Half Pipe cigars in, I was hoping for a celebrity spokesperson behind it. Sadly, no pro skateboarders entered the CI Offices.  What did enter, though, was a unique blend that is attempting to redefine the premium cigar experience. Half Pipe cigars are made with some of the sweetest pipe tobaccos known to man. All of the different flavors use a blend of half pipe and half premium cigar tobacco - hence the name Half Pipe, genius. Covered by a Habano wrapper and made in the Dominican Republic, this sticks are some of the smoothest, mellowest cigars I’ve ever burnt. It’s a perfect first cigar of the day, and the pre-punched setup in the foil pack only adds to the convenience. This one’s truly an experiment that paid off. Try some of the awesome blends that are each mixed with equal proportions of premium Dominican leaf and Pipe tobacco, wrapped in a smooth Habano wrapper:Sweet Ride: This blend provides the best of both worlds - delicious black Cavendish pipe tobacco and premium Dominican cigar tobacco - to create an entirely new smoking experience. Hand rolled into a natural wrapper and binder, the exquisite mellow flavor will take you for one sweet ride.Epic Red: A combination of premium Dominican cigar tobacco with a rich blend of Burley, bright Virginia, and toasted Cavendish pipe tobacco and a noticeable dose of natural cherry flavoring. The result is a smooth, sweet, very aromatic smoke that fills the room with the delicious aroma of cherry.Gold Rush: An almost pure Burley blend with just a bit of Virginia pipe tobacco added for balance mixed with premium Dominican cigar tobacco. This cigar captures the spice of rum with a caramel-sweet zesty top flavor that will transport your taste buds to Jamaica.​",Mellow,['Corona'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Corona,Yes,Dominican,
Hammer and Sickle Hermitage,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"In Mother Russia, cigar light you.Once you get past the unabashed communist inspired branding, Hammer & Sickle actually makes a really good cigar. Not to worry, Hammer & Sickle is not a commie company, but rather this intrepid band of capitalists tapped into the iconic symbolism and their growing portfolio already boasts highly-rated and top-selling blends.Hammer & Sickle Hermitage No. 1 is a medium to full-bodied cigar with a hearty and unique core. Coming draped in an authentic silky smooth Ecuadorian Habano wrapper sitting atop a Honduran Criollo binder, the long-filler blend is completed with Honduran and German tobaccos. With a delicious flavor profile including red pepper, chocolate, toffee, fruit, and a nice sweetness on the finish. Pick up this tasty blend today and celebrate your freedom to enjoy it. Hammer and Sickle Hermitage received an impressive 91-rating noting: ""The cigar is thick and box-pressed with a rich-looking, Ecuadoran wrapper that holds together a Honduran binder and fillers from Honduras and Germany...(it) impressed our panel with its sweet and earthy notes layered upon a nutty core...""",Medium-Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro']","Criollo, Honduran",Honduran,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Hammer & Sickle Cigars
Hammer and Sickle Tradicion Toro,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"A tradition like no other.Now that the USSR has been dispatched to the ol’ dustbin of history, Hammer & Sickle cigars have co-opted the iconic imagery and turned it into one of the fastest growing boutique brands in the industry. With a lineup boasting well-crafted and richly flavored blends, this up and coming brand is one to keep an eye on.Coming packaged in a handmade, etched glass box, Hammer & Sickle Tradicion will captivate you from the start. Walking the tightrope between mellow and medium-bodied, Tradicion consists of a hand-selected blend of 3 year old Dominican tobaccos tucked gently under a rich and creamy 5 year old Connecticut shade wrapper. With a flavor profile including subtle pepper, cream, citrus, cedar, and leather, this well balanced and complex cigar will appeal to all palates. Perfect for an every moment experience, put Hammer & Sickle Tradicion on your must try list.  Hammer and Sickle Tradicion received Top 25 honors for 2015 (#11 overall) and a well-deserved 94-rating noting: ""The Churchill is tasty, but understated with a floral quality, touches of nutmeg and a sweet, earthy aftertaste.""​",Mellow-Medium,['Toro'],,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,Connecticut,Hammer & Sickle Cigars
Hampton Arms,Rated 4.1 out of 5, Based on 10 Ratings ,"Premium flavor at a bargain price!From J.C. Newman Co., the same folks responsible for top-notch offerings such as Julius Caesar and Maximus, comes a handmade you can enjoy every day without breaking the bank. Enter Hampton Arms, a budget stick that’s riddled with high-end flavors. These medium-bodied morsels come packaged in Stay Fresh Humi-Bags, ensuring that each one is at the perfect humidity when it arrives at your doorstep. Nicaraguan fillers and a Nicaraguan binder are cloaked by a rustic Ecuadorian wrapper, reminiscent of those old-time, Cuban-style gems. Hints of caramel, citrus, and spice coat your palate from first light to nub. A st–… ahem, deal like this never felt so good.​",Medium,['Toro'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Havana Classico,Rated 3.53 out of 5, Based on 133 Ratings ,"A price that's out of this world (as is routine at Camp CI).For a quick and tasty little smoke, try these cut-filler Pequenos. Nice flavor, quality tobaccos are left from the trimmings of the regular production Havana Classico blend, and quick smokes.",Medium,['Lancero/Panatela'],,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Lancero/Panatela,No,Connecticut Broadleaf,
Havana Honeys,Rated 4.39 out of 5, Based on 358 Ratings ,"A trip to Havana without leaving home. There are a lot of choices among flavored cigars out there, and out of all the ones I’ve tried, I’d rank Havana Honeys at or near the top of the list.  These rich and flavorful cigars are perfect for a relaxing everyday experience and will provide a nice change of pace. These beauties come in your choice of the delicious and exotic flavors and aromas of old Havana. Each of these delectable morsels are crafted with a blend of Dominican and Italian tobaccos encased in a natural leaf wrapper and binder lovingly grown on the island of Indonesia. Upgrade your flavored cigar game with a taste of Havana. Original Flavor: Made with an exotic blend of Dominican tobaccos, the Original Flavor is a perfectly smooth Cuban-esque blend. Packed with traditional tobacco flavors and enjoyable down to the nub.​Classic Cognac: There are few things more classic than a good Cognac, and the Classic Cognac brings that distinct three finger night cap flavor in cigar form. A premium cigar with a deeper, more mature flavor.Sweet Honey: A flavor that even Yogi and Boo Boo can get behind! Sweet Honey builds on an exotic blend to provide a sweet and smooth experience. The best seller in the Havana Honeys line, and for good reason. Spiced Rum: For the adventurous at heart, give the Spiced Rum a go. Equipped with a rich and unique twist on the Havana Honeys premium blend, this sucker brings the heat with sweet, spicy nuances of premium Caribbean rum. Note: Pack of 25 purchases are packaged as a bundle. Pack of 20 purchases are packaged in fresh packs of 2. ",Mellow,['Petite Corona'],Indonesian,"Dominican, Italian",True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Petite Corona,Yes,Indonesian,
Hav-A-Tampa Jewels,Rated 4.57 out of 5, Based on 21 Ratings ,"Wood Tipped Jewels!Hav-A-Tampa Jewels are incredible little wood tip cigars. They’ve been one of the best-selling machine made cigars in the world for a very long time. This American owned company first started their craft in Ybor City in Tampa, Florida way back in 1901. They were one of the first companies to use machines in the cigar making business. Today, they are no longer produced in the USA, but instead in Puerto Rico, but they remain the world’s best-selling wood-tipped cigars. Each cigar is capped with a Birchwood tip that provides a clean and smooth draw without fail. They are relaxed, flavorful, and always smooth. Each pack of 50 comes packaged as 10 boxes of 5 cigars, which makes it convenient to grab one and go. If you’ve been looking for a nice change of pace cigar at a good price, Hav-A-Tampa should be your first choice. Incredibly consistent and priced for everyday enjoyment. ",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,,False,No,More Details,United States,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,HTL,
HC Series Black Maduro,Rated 4.29 out of 5, Based on 1011 Ratings ,"The saga continues....Let's face it, starting a new cigar brand is tough today. There's so many fantastic cigars on the market to compete with that many brands end up getting lost in the dust. So when the HC brand was announced, it had its doubters. But ten 90+ ratings later (that’s 10, count’em), it's safe to say HC has proven all doubters: wrong. With that in mind, welcome the latest addition to the HC family - HC Black Maduro.Dressed in a dark, silky-smooth Havana Oscuro wrapper grown in Connecticut, HC Black Maduro is jam-packed with a rich combination of long fillers from Nicaragua and the Dominican Republic. After aging, these medium to full-bodied handmades deliver a creamy, complex array of coffee, pepper, caramel, leather, and earth. Delicious is an understatement, HC Black Maduro is downright heavenly. And now for the really good part....they're starting at just $2.50 apiece.",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Maduro, Oscuro",HC Series
HC Series Connecticut,Rated 4.51 out of 5, Based on 41 Ratings ,"​HC smooth!The HC Connecticut is a cigar which that has been 5 years in the making. Just enough time to make it perfect. This complex blend is chock full of aged Costa Rican, Mexican, and Nicaraguan long-fillers all held together with a feisty Sumatra binder. Topping off this complex bouquet is a beautiful Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper. The end result is stunning stick that provides a highly unique and enjoyable experience as the distinct tobaccos truly shine. The HC Connecticut delivers smooth, creamy, and nutty nuances backed by a subtle to medium-bodied profile. Simply put, it was worth the 5 years.",Mellow-Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Sumatra,"Costa Rican, Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,HC Series
HC Series Criollo,Rated 4.48 out of 5, Based on 65 Ratings ,"​CREE-OH-SO-GOOD!The HC Criollo is a bowl full of porridge that’s just right - not too full, not too mellow. Well-balanced and medium-bodied, HC Criollo features a dark and eye-catching Nicaraguan Shade Grown wrapper that's been aged for 5 long years. Jam-packed with Honduran and Nicaraguan tobaccos, chewy flavors of leather, nuts, and tobacco generously coat the palate. Still need more encouragement? The HC Criollo received a well-deserved 91 rating noting: “Large and thick, this cigar draws well, though burns a touch unevenly. It’s nutty and woody with a salty, leathery note. Pleasant and consistent with no harshness or acidity.”",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Criollo,HC Series
HC Series Gran Limitado,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"​HC steps up its game.Since their introduction, the HC Series has received numerous high-ratings and heaps of accolades. HC Gran Limitado takes the HC brand to a whole new level with a complex, full flavor blend available in either a box or a collectible jar. The ceramic collectible jar features the HC Gran Limitado logo and would make a great addition to your man cave, office, or collection of tobacciana. This beauty starts your journey with a sleek Nicaraguan wrapper that hugs ultra-refined, 5-year-aged ligeros along with barrel-aged Nicaraguan long-fillers. This refined and decadent treat boasts notes of coffee, nuts, and a lingering sweet spice that will please those in search of a well-balanced and complex cigar. Full-bodied and full-flavored, this offering is utterly satisfying and reveals the deft touch of true tobacco blending artistry. I’m confident that once you try the flagship HC Series Gran Limitado you’ll be returning to the trough for more most expeditiously. ​​​",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Robusto,No,Nicaraguan,
HC Series Habano Colorado,Rated 4.33 out of 5, Based on 127 Ratings ,"​Get on up on this Habano!The HC Habano Colorado is the HC line’s piece de resistance. Boldly leading the way, this impressive cigar comes equipped with an oily and stunning chocolate brown wrapper from the Jalapa Valley of Nicaragua. Underneath awaits a core of tobaccos from Costa Rica, Jalapa, and Honduras. These well-aged tobaccos work seamlessly in creating a medium to full-bodied delight delivering truckloads of flavor. The smooth and rich experience is further accentuated by notes of pepper, leather, and a tad of sweetness. The HC Habano Colorado has garnered much deserved praise: earning an impressive '92' rating, as well as 'Top 25 Cigars of the Year' honors.Here’s what the critics had to say: “A dark, oily, gorgeous cigar that shows its strength from the first puff. It is a peppery, leathery smoke with a black cherry note on the finish.”",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Costa Rican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Nicaraguan Jalapa,HC Series
HC Series Habano2,Rated 4.71 out of 5, Based on 63 Ratings ,"The best HC Series yet.When HC first dipped thier toe in to the cigar game, doubters loomed around every corner. But ten 90+ ratings later, the cynics have been silenced and the brand is walkin' on sunshine. Now enter the newest cigar in the HC Series, the Habano squared. A de-lish box-pressed morsel destined for big things....very big things.As soon as HC ventured out to develop the Habano squared, nothing but the best would suffice. Everything from hand-selected leaves, down to the box-press were carefully thought out and executed. And the end result is extraordinary, because what awaits is a medium to full-bodied creation that is complex, uber-smooth and highly satisfying. Carefully crafted in Nicaragua, the blend starts with a hearty dose of patiently aged Honduran and Nicaraguan long-fillers. This rich core is hugged by an Ecuadorian Sumatra binder, smoothing out and complementing these bold leaves. Finally, an Ecuadorian Habano 2000 wrapper is carefully draped over the outside, boasting ample oils and a seamless appearance. Together these tobaccos wrangle up an impressive display of white billowy smoke. Predominant notes of roasted nuts and pepper mingle with nutmeg, coffee, and cedar before a creamy finish. Impressive from beginning to end, the Habano squared is no doubt the shining star of the HC Series.",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Sumatra,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Belicoso, Robusto, Toro",No,Habana 2000,
HC Series Maduro2,Rated 4.37 out of 5, Based on 168 Ratings ,"​HC squares up for the shot, and they score!After the overwhelming success of the HC Series Habano2, another addition to the club was inevitable. Lucky for all, they delivered with another gem. Introducing the HC Series Maduro2, a new take on an already celebrated blend. With the same highly rated binder and filler tobaccos being utilized as the original HC Series Habano2, the maduro version was destined for greatness. Add a Pennsylvania Broadleaf maduro wrapper into the equation, glistening with oils, and you have a different concoction all together. Medium to full in body, Maduro2 delivers bold, rich cigar with a subtle sweetness appearing on the back of the palate. Equipped with complexity and balance, this is a blend you are going to want to come across.  ",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",Sumatra,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Robusto",No,Pennsylvania Broadleaf,HC Series
HC Series Red Corojo,Rated 4.28 out of 5, Based on 247 Ratings ,"​HC Series Red Corojo, the other, other red meat.From what they have released up to this point, HC has gained some stellar reviews including a few 90-plus ratings. This time around, they are utilizing Jesus Fuego's talents with an extremely refined Corojo leaf. Enter HC Series Red Corojo.HC Series Red Corojo showcases a thick, oily Nicaraguan Corojo wrapper leaf overtop a meaty blend of long-fillers from Nicaragua’s top 3 growing regions. From the first puff, you’re greeted with rich, thick, and spicy billows of flavor layered with delicious hints of cedar, leather, nuts, and black pepper. Medium to full-bodied, Cuban-esque, and buttery smooth...this thing’s got it all. ",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Corojo,HC Series
HC Series White Shade Grown,Rated 4.4 out of 5, Based on 422 Ratings ,"A whiter shade of HC.HC Series seemingly has it all when you are looking for a quality cigar for a reasonable price. More recent additions to their portfolio including Corojo Red and Black Maduro take this premise a step further, bypassing boxes and sticking to economical bundle packaging while maintaining that spot-on construction and first-rate flavor that garnered multiple 90+ ratings. Flying off the docks would be an understatement for these super-popular offerings, it’s a constant inventory headache trying to produce enough to fill the demand. But here at CI, we will continue to fight for the rights of your palate!Now, the time has come for the third addition to this stellar line, a lighter version that’s sure to continue the top-selling trend that is HC Series. Welcome, HC Series White Shade Grown. Aptly-named, White Shade Grown features a Connecticut Shade Grown wrapper giving way to smooth, satisfying nuances of sweet cream, oak, and toffee. Long-fillers from the black, volcanic soils of Nicaragua intertwine in this every day standby’s core, and deliver a firmly rolled gem to add to the HC catalog. Jump on these rich, yet mellow offerings before the rest of the pack snatches them up. ​",Mellow-Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,HC Series
Heisenberg by Quesada,Rated 4.67 out of 5,,"They certainly are good.Heisenberg by Quesada embraces a concept which most brands fail to capture. The cigar. Nowadays, it seems like a lot of cigars focus on fancy bands, names, and advertisements. We all know you can't light up the band or that magazine spread. So, in an effort to allow the consumer to noodle just on the cigar, Heisenberg was born. Based on the Uncertainty Principle, which in layman's terms, means the more you think you know about one thing the less you will know about the other. So instead of coercing you with fancy packaging or a jazzed up theme, Heisenberg just delivers a straight-up, delicious cigar. I can't even give you any 411 on the blend, because there isn't any available. Think of it like a good mystery novel without a cover. There's nothing to judge it on, and it'll definitely keep you guessing until the very end. I will say this though, the few we got in the office disappeared quickly....",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Robusto,No,Corojo,
Helix,Rated 4.48 out of 5, Based on 52 Ratings ,"Helix is from the makers of Astral, in development for four years.This is an extremely mellow and smooth cigar, with a pleasant flavor and silky, true Connecticut shade grown wrapper leaf. The long filler is a blend of Cuban-seed grown tobaccos, Dominican, Brazilian Mata Fina and Honduran Talanga farm leaf. All tobaccos in Helix are aged a minimum of three years, and the flavorful overtones and smooth character make this a remarkably pleasant, smooth cigar at the right price and with our MSRP slashing prowess, we're bringing you this gem for an affordable price.",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Honduran, Mexican","Brazilian, Dominican, Honduran, Mexican",False,False,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro",False,"Connecticut, Connecticut Broadleaf",
Helix Remix,Rated 3.88 out of 5,,"Helix Remix is ready to take you for a slow, soothing ride.Known to cigar nation as one of the world’s smoothest and most subtle blends, Helix has broken away from the norm to fashion a delicious handmade that’s far from ordinary. The Connecticut shade wrapper employed for this handmade is smooth as silk, cloaking an aged blend of Dominican Olor and Piloto Cubano tobaccos. This exquisite combination imparts a sultry smooth flavor that’s creamy in character, yet satisfying and flavorful. As an added bonus, the blend has been slowly influenced by the sweet, rich flavors of premium amaretto liqueur, creating a luxurious smoking experience fit for anytime, any day enjoyment. ",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],Indonesian,Dominican,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,Connecticut,
Henry Clay,Rated 4.29 out of 5, Based on 21 Ratings ,"Not the prettiest girl at the prom.Henry Clays are tasty premium, long-filler cigar. Hand-rolled with quality medium-brown Connecticut broadleaf wrappers, Dominican long leaves and a Dominican binder. These cigars look a little mangy, but they’ll win you over.",Medium,"['Corona', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,
Henry Clay Limited Edition 2018,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Henry’s Back… Back Again For years, the Henry Clay brand sat, collecting dust on shelves and making the rounds of the cigar blogs, always listed as one of the most underrated blends on the market. Then, a few years back, Pete Johnson of Tatuaje fame declared his love for the brand, and breathed life back into it. Today, we look at another rejuvenation of this classic, Cuban-roots best-seller: the Henry Clay Limited Edition ’18. Crafted in a single, perfected vitola, this 5.7”x52 Perfecto is guaranteed to get you grinning from ear to ear. Up top, you’ll find a gorgeously oily and smooth Habana 2000 wrapper leaf overtop handpicked Criollo ’98 binder and Honduran and Nicaraguan long-fillers. The resulting profile is overtly smooth and uniquely complex, delivering notes of sweet cream backed by roasted coffee and cedar. Cubanesque to a t, this LE from Henry Clay delivers loads of flavor while never nudging above a medium to full-bodied offering.",Medium-Full,['Perfecto'],Criollo '98,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Yes,,Perfecto,No,Habana 2000,
Henry Clay Rustic Cheroot,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Not your average CherootHenry Clay Cigars are a renowned Cuban Heritage brand that for years, didn’t have much activity in the US market. But in the past few years, this brand has seen new life with the releases of Henry Clay Tattoo and the 92-rated Stalk Cut. This most recent release, Henry Clay Rustic Cheroot is an interesting one. The term Cheroot typically refers to a rustic, small, thin cigar with both ends open. The Rustic Cheroot gives it a modern interpretation with a pig tail cap and closed foot. Henry Clay Rustic Cheroot comes wrapped in a dark Connecticut Broadleaf while a Honduran Broadleaf binder holds a core of Dominican fillers and a special, incredibly strong Honduran leaf known as Capa Dura – a secondary leaf that grows after the tobacco has already been harvested from the stalk. It comes in one size, a 5 5/8” x 38 Pantela and offers a rich and robust, full-bodied profile with notes of earth, coffee, wood and spice. It’s a great choice when you’re pressed for time, as it offers a quick yet powerful experience. The price point is just the cherry on top.",Medium-Full,['Lancero/Panatela'],Honduran,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Lancero/Panatela,No,Connecticut Broadleaf,
Henry Clay Stalk Cut,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"Henry Clay was a brand that used to gather dust on store shelves, being bought by die-hard fans of the cigar but attracting few new customers. Henry Clay fan Pete Johnson, of Tatuaje cigars, helped breathe fresh life into the brand with his collaboration, Henry Clay Tattoo. Following closely on the heels of this exciting new addition comes Henry Clay Stalk Cut, exhibiting the bolder side of the old brand.Henry Clay Stalk Cut was crafted by the famous blending team, the Grupo de Maestros, and uses a stalk cut wrapper. With stalk cutting, the tobacco plant is cut at the stalk and is hung intact in a curing barn. This allows the leaves to continue to draw nutrients from the stalk and provides an earthier and deeper flavor. Full-bodied and with a take no prisoners flavor profile, this handmade contains all vintage tobaccos. A 2012 Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper blankets a 2010 Dominican piloto binder over long-fillers consisting of 2012 Dominican piloto and olor and 2013 Nicaraguan criollo. Luxurious and complex, you’ll be met with flavors of cinnamon, nutmeg, chocolate, coffee, earth, and leather leading to a rollercoaster ride for your palate. Try Henry Clay Stalk Cut and witness the rebirth of this legendary brand. ​Henry Clay Stalk Cut has been rated as high as a 92-rating and given Top 25 Cigars of 2016 honors. Previous reviews noted, ""Enrobed in an alluringly oily wrapper, this cigar is rolled with an uncut foot and a flat head. Toasty, cedary notes are matched by a rich almond and marzipan finish."" ​",Full,"['Double Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Double Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,
Henry Clay War Hawk,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"The man, the legend, the War Hawk.Henry Clay was an outspoken man. As a United States congressman and senator in the early 1800s, he fiercely advocated for war with Britain in order to secure Florida and the North West for America, and played a big role in beginning the War of 1812. Clay and his supporters were known as War Hawks, and now his namesake cigar brand is honoring this reputation with a feisty new blend, the Henry Clay War Hawk.The War Hawk replaces the Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper used on previous Henry Clay releases with a sumptuous Ecuador Connecticut wrapper, overtop a broadleaf binder and long-fillers from the lush soils of Honduras. The profile is balanced yet spicy, producing notes of earth, cocoa, and cedar. Following the success of the 92-rated Henry Clay Stalk Cut, this release is sure to fly off the shelves. We’re not saying you’ll have to go to war to get your hands on some, but you won’t want to wait!",Medium,"['Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Connecticut Broadleaf,Honduran,False,False,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Hesitant Pirate,Rated 4.05 out of 5, Based on 98 Ratings ,"Ha!!!!! The only hesitation that occurred was when I re-evaluated my career in the cigar business after being offered this sorry cigar. I took the maker's word that they're mellow, smooth, and not vomit-inducing. Just to make sure though, I outsourced the tasting process to a trio of palate-challenged dudes across the hall from me. They musta been knee-deep in the sauce because they gave Hesitant Pirate a unanimous thumbs up. I guess the $29.99 per bundle price tag for 20 big Churchills had something to do with it. One thing is for sure: there's no accounting for taste.",Mellow,['Churchill'],,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Churchill,No,Connecticut,
Highclere Castle,Rated 4.75 out of 5,,"A Royal CollaborationHighclere Castle is named after the famous British castle featured in Downton Abbey. But that’s not the only royal tie on this release from Foundation Cigar Company — the cigar is also blended and rolled under the watchful eye of the reigning king of Nicaraguan tobacco, AJ Fernandez. Though he’s normally known for his feisty Nicaraguan blends, here AJ shows his skills with mellower cigars. Though the wrapper here is a fine Connecticut Shade, the Brazilian Mata Fina binder is the true star of the show. Toasting the foot on these perfect specimens, you’ll find a creamy core of tobacco, with notes of baking spices, nuts, and cedar. Highclere Castle is without a doubt the smoothest cigar from Foundation, so do yourself a favor and order a box ASAP.",Mellow-Medium,['Robusto'],Brazil,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Robusto,No,Connecticut,
Hirochi Robaina Blue Maduro,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Don't be BlueThe Robaina family is tobacco royalty in the Cuban cigar industry, and has cultivated some of the finest tobaccos for legendary Cuban-made cigars. I know that doesn’t help you out, seeing as we can’t partake of the forbidden fruit, but what if I told you Hirochi Robaina expanded his operations to Nicaragua, where he’s growing some top-grade tobaccos and producing cigars that are totally legal in the U.S.?Among Hirochi’s offerings is Hirochi Robaina Blue Maduro - a full-bodied premium masked with an Ecuador Habano maduro wrapper and flush with Nicaraguan long fillers. A well-aged cigar with hints of molasses, baking spices, a hint of black pepper, and espresso. This beauty is a definite stunner from a Cuban tobacco master and totally worth your full consideration - so go ahead, order a box, and see what all of the fuss is about.",Medium,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Ecuador Habano, Maduro",
Hirochi Robaina Claro,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"A Cuban Legend in NicaraguaThe Robaina family has been growing tobacco in Cuba since the 1800’s - in fact, the late Alejandro Robaina was viewed as the most the premier grower who then passed on the family business to his grandson Hirochi. The younger Robaina is definitely living up to the family name and even expanding operations beyond Cuban borders. Hirochi took his vast knowledge of growing tobacco to Nicaragua, where he is creating top shelf premiums that are as legendary as his family. Hirochi Robaina Claro features an Ecuador Habano wrapper which encases a masterful blend of long fillers, giving this cigar a balanced and intricate profile. You’ll experience creamy notes of cedar, peat, and coffee with a bit of spice on the finish. Fully enjoyable and approachable for any palate, this is one cigar you won’t want to pass up.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,
Hirochi Robaina Signature,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Following in his family’s footsteps and blending to his own beatIt’s not easy being the grandson of a tobacco legend - but Hirochi Robaina does just fine with it. For those who need some brushing up on Cuban cigar history, Hirochi is the grandson to the legendary tobacco farmer Alejandro Robaina. Alejandro grew some of the best tobacco in the world, and his wish was to have Hirochi carry on the family tradition that began in 1845 in Pinar Del Rio.So, to carry on family tradition the younger Robaina, created HR series. Among his blends is the Signature, a stunning full-bodied cigar which uses a blend of tobaccos from Jalapa and Estelí and comes dressed in an Ecuadorian maduro wrapper grown from Habano 2000 seed. Bold and brimming with notes of black pepper, leather, dried fruit, and a natural sweetness.This is one seriously great cigar from a young legend in the making - so give this cigar a try and see why the Robaina family is viewed as one of the best tobacco growers in the world.",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,
Hoyo Dark Sumatra,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Tantalizingly rich.The Dark Sumatra series from Hoyo de Monterrey is a robust and rich cigar - even fuller in body than the original Hoyo de Monterrey. Blended by Estelo Padron, its deep, rich wrapper is striking and aesthetically pleasing, while the the taste is satisfying and complex. This Honduran beauty is made with a dark Ecuadorian Sumatra wrapper, Connecticut broadleaf binder, and long-filler blend of Honduran, Nicaraguan, and Piloto Cubano leaves.The Dark Sumatra of Hoyo Excalibur received a respectable '89' rating, noting: ""A maduro that is woody and cedary. A tea note accompanies some toasty flavors before the long, leathery finish.""",Medium,['Toro'],Connecticut Broadleaf,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Toro,No,Ecuador Sumatra,
Hoyo de Monterrey,Rated 4.55 out of 5, Based on 83 Ratings ,"This full-flavored brand is dubbed the ""espresso of cigars."" Hoyo de Monterrey is loved because of its famously rich, strong, and creamy taste. Handmade in the Villazon factory of Honduras, Hoyos consist of a complex blend of Nicaraguan, Honduran, and Cuban seed Dominican filler and Connecticut binder.",Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Presidente', 'Rothschild', 'Toro']",Connecticut Broadleaf,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Double Corona, Presidente, Rothschild, Toro",No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Ecuador Sumatra",
Hoyo de Monterrey Epicure Seleccion,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"A Special Seleccion for an epic legacy.It should come as no surprise that the cigar industry is built on tradition, and the most consistent and reliable brands are the ones with decades of history crafting premium cigars. Hoyo de Monterrey has been bringin’ us the goods since 1865, and the Hoyo de Monterrey Epicure Seleccion pays homage to their enduring legacy in a way only a brand as revered as Hoyo can.Made by STG Danli in Honduras, the nation where they have been crafted for the American market since the mid-1960s, Epicure Seleccion is crafted entirely of a proprietary blend of native Cuban-seed tobaccos grown in Honduras, with medium to full-bodied flavors of cedar, toast, hickory, coffee, and spice that will transport your palate back to the golden age of cigars. Hoyo de Monterrey has brought us a lot of gems over the years, but the Epicure Seleccion will easily go down in history as one of the best.",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,Honduran,False,,More Details,Honduras,False,,"Corona, Robusto, Toro",False,Habano,
Hoyo de Monterrey Excalibur Cigarillos,Rated 4.6 out of 5, Based on 128 Ratings ,"These convenient tins are overflowing with 20 flavorful Hoyo de Monterrey Excalibur cigarillos. Machine-made in Honduras, these tasty treats incorporate the same premium tobacco that's present throughout the entire Hoyo line. Robust and full-flavored, cigarillos are smooth with a slight spiciness and are a great addition to the Hoyo family. Grab a tin or two today, for the next time you want the full cigar experience, in a compressed timeframe.",Mellow-Medium,['Cigarillos'],Connecticut Broadleaf,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Cigarillos,No,Connecticut,
Hoyo de Tradicion,Rated 4.84 out of 5, Based on 25 Ratings ,"A top-notch blend from the Villazon factory.Hoyo de Tradicion honors the rich history and celebrated tradition of Hoyo de Monterrey, one of the oldest and most respected brands around. In creating this cigar, a Honduran-grown viso Rosado wrapper was cultivated from the Jamastran Valley. This lovely leaf boasts a leathery texture and reddish hue, a lovely leaf which is draped around a hearty blend of Nicaraguan, Honduran, and Dominican long-leaf tobaccos. The result is a rich, hearty array of flavor backed by a pleasant sweetness on the finish and aroma. Notes of nuts and earthy undertones are present throughout the cool, even burn. This medium-bodied gem is the perfect companion to any nightcap, and a great way to kick off your weekend.Hoyo de Tradicion received a well-deserved '91' point rating, noting:""This pressed cigar is covered in an attractive naturalwrapper. An even draw imparts a complex array of nutty leather flavor, tea leaf notes, wood and a bit of pepper.""",Medium,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Habano,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Yes,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,
Hoyo ICON,Rated 4.29 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"Small-batch in 1865, ‘ICON’ic in 2019.Where would the cigar industry be without the classic, Iconic releases of yesteryear? Some say that the name of the game these days is boutique. Plenty of connoisseurs almost hesitate to try cigars with name recognition, because everyone seems to be focused on the one-offs and the rare stuff. But despite these trends (that always come and go), there are a few brands that have always been there for us. Hoyo de Monterrey is one of those brands, delighting cigar fans for more than 150 years. How could you beat that track record? The answer: You don’t. You honor it properly with an ICON release.With this single-size 5.5” x 49 robusto, Hoyo de Monterrey becomes the third cigar brand to be honored with an ICON release, joining Macanudo and Punch in this exclusive club. You can join in on the festivities too, and the cost of admission is just one of these phenomenal cigars. The first thing you’ll notice is the gorgeous Corojo wrapper, a tribute to the kind Jose Gener grew in Cuba when the name was registered way back in 1865. This sits atop a Dominican binder and filler, and provides a toasty, Cuban-esque accent to the mellow-medium bodied notes of cream, nuts, and cedar. A touch of pepper guarantees this is a blend that won’t make you yawn, and the excellent construction ensures you won’t have to put them down until you’re burning your fingers. The past is very strong for Hoyo, but the future is even brighter. Grab a box of Hoyo ICON, and raise a glass to another 150 years.",Medium,['Robusto'],,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Robusto,No,Corojo,
Hoyo La Amistad Black,Rated 4.77 out of 5, Based on 13 Ratings ,"La Amistad completes the trilogyEver since Hoyo de Monterrey paired up with AJ Fernandez a few years back, the brand has been experiencing an awesome renaissance. And it’s well deserved! I mean, hell, when you mix two winners together, it’s hard to get anything besides A+ results. Called “La Amistad,” the Hoyo/AJ Fernandez collaboration has seen a release at the annual trade show the last two years, and this year doesn’t buck the trend: today, CI presents Hoyo La Amistad Black. Blended by A.J. Fernandez and hand rolled at his factory in Esteli, Nicaragua, each Hoyo La Amistad Black is a dark and enchanting treat. Featuring an oily, thick Ecuadorian Sumatra Oscuro wrapper, La Amistad Black is a full-bodied, spicy firecracker, featuring notes of cayenne pepper and black pepper, in addition to cinnamon and leather. It stays complex down to the end, thanks to the intricately blended and bunched Nicaraguan long-fillers… in all, this is probably the fullest-bodied, most flavorful Hoyo offering to date making it more than easy to recommend.",Full,"['Gigante', 'Rothschild', 'Toro']",Mexican,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Gigante, Rothschild, Toro",No,"Ecuador Sumatra, Oscuro",
Hoyo La Amistad Dark Sumatra,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"AJ turns to the dark side.Hoyo de Monterrey Dark Sumatra is a cigar that’s been somewhat dormant for a number of years. It was always an excellent blend, but it deserved a revamping for the modern market. Enter illustrious cigar manufacturer AJ Fernandez. The folks at Hoyo knew that AJ could do something special with this blend, so they gave him the original recipe and allowed him to create the same cigar, only produced with his signature fermentation and aging techniques at his factory in Esteli. The result is an extraordinary blend that’s at the same time classic and contemporary.The Hoyo de Monterrey La Amistad Dark Sumatra consists of a beautiful, oily Ecuador Sumatra wrapper overtop a Connecticut Broadleaf binder and Honduran, Nicaraguan, and Dominican fillers. The body is just as full as the original, and you’ll be greeted with complex notes of earth, pepper, espresso, and dark wood. This 5-country blend has all the complexity you expect from AJ along with classic Cuban-esque flavors from Hoyo de Monterrey, and it’s sure to be your next favorite. ",Full,"['Robusto', 'Robusto Extra', 'Toro']",Connecticut Broadleaf,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Robusto Extra, Toro",No,Ecuador Sumatra,AJ Fernandez
Hoyo La Amistad Gold,Rated 4.59 out of 5, Based on 100 Ratings ,"A Hoyo from the hands of AJ Fernandez...La Amistad or ""the friendship"" for the ""no habla"" folks, is a giant step into the future for Hoyo de Monterrey. The recipe is simple - buy the best Habano Ecuador wrapper in the world and cure it to perfection. Then, and only then, assemble the finest blend of tobaccos from Nicaragua's four major growing regions under the watchful eye of AJ Fernandez, and BAM, it's a Hoyo unlike any other. It's full-bodied to the max, blended to take this historic brand to bold new heights. But don't take my word for it. Here's what AJ had to say:“I grew up very near to the Hoyo de Monterrey farm and I have always had a love for the brand. When it came time to develop this blend, I put my heart and soul into it. To me, this project represents how far my family and I have come since Cuba, and how our expertise in tobacco continues to be recognized. This cigar represents the best of me and my factory and I am proud to be a part of this collaboration.”The delicious Hoyo La Amistad recently received a 90-rating, noting: ""Rolled with a toothy wrapper, this cigar has a full, even draw that shows notes of leather, cocoa powder and fruit before a big walnut finish.""NOTE: Hoyo La Amistad recently received a packaging update and is now called Hoyo La Amistad Gold. The blend has not changed. ",Full,"['Gigante', 'Robusto', 'Rothschild', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gigante, Robusto, Rothschild, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,
Hoyo La Amistad Silver,Rated 4.21 out of 5, Based on 19 Ratings ,"Silver is #1 HereThe highly anticipated sequel to the 90-rated Hoyo La Amistad, Hoyo La Amistad Silver is finally here. Blended and crafted by AJ Fernandez, you can bet this new release will be exquisite. Blended with entirely Nicaraguan Habano seed tobaccos from Esteli and Condega and draped in a sleek Ecuadoran Habano wrapper, this cigar is full-bodied and full of flavor. A bold profiled cigar, Hoya La Amistad Silver offers rich notes of cedar, cocoa, and spice. An indulgent blend by master crafter AJ Fernandez, this slow-burning cigar is a must try for cigar aficionado's alike.",Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto",No,Ecuador Habano,
Illusione Candela,Rated 4.2 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"It’s Easy Being Green When You’re This TastyCandela cigars are bit of an oddity these days, in fact - they can be downright difficult to find if you don’t know where to look - especially a candela as complex as Illusione’s. Blended with Nicaraguan Criollo ‘98 and Corjo '99 long-fillers and wrapped with a beautiful green Candela wrapper, this cigar is like nothing you’ve had before. It’s got some impressive floral notes with twinges of leather and a naturally sweet nuance. Mellow to medium-bodied and totally delicious, this is one Candela I’d enjoy anytime anywhere.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto",No,Candela,Illusione
Illusione Cigares Prive Corojo,Rated 4.75 out of 5,,"""Private Cigars""Illusione Cigares Prive Corojo used to be a limited edition cigar – when they sold out, they were gone. The brand’s owner, Dion Giolito heard the cries of forlorn enthusiasts from near and far and is now offering it as a regular production premium – and we couldn’t possibly be happier. For those unfamiliar with this boutique beauty, it’s a medium to full-bodied blend of Nicaraguan Criollo '98 and Corojo '99 Viso and Ligero long-fillers, all bound together by a Rosado Corojo wrapper. This combination leads to big flavor. We’re talking notes of cocoa, leather, a touch of cedar, and a bit of spice. Regular production means regular enjoyment, so do yourself a flavor favor and try this delicious handmade as soon as possible.",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Corojo,Illusione
Illusione Cigars Prive SA Maduro,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Some Maduro private timeFrom time to time you stumble upon an amazing cigar that’s just too good for words and then it just disappears without explanation - or because it’s a limited release that sold like hotcakes during the morning rush at your favorite breakfast nook. One such cigar is Illusione Cigares Prive SA Maduro - a medium to full-bodied cigar that just is finally back, and in regular production.The bad boy is wrapped San Andres Maduro leaf with Nicaraguan Criojo, Criollo, and ligero long-fillers beneath. To call this cigar complex would be an egregious understatement - it’s got pronounced notes of spice, coffee and oak with a nice long finish that sticks to the palate. Seriously delicious and well-made, this is one cigar that could be tough to keep stocked, so grab ‘em while you can. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,San Andres,Illusione
Illusione Cruzado,Rated 4.75 out of 5,,"Cruzado is no Illusione.Few boutique brands have a resume quite as impressive as Illusione’s. Its portfolio boasts an assortment of 25 appearances, a bunch of ratings of 90 or higher, plus a legion of devout fans who make it difficult to keep Illusione’s cigars in stock. Cruzado by Illusione is a prime example of this brand’s commitment to flavor, which is in a class of its own. Criollo ‘98 and Corojo ‘99 long-fillers are blended and wrapped with a rich Corojo Rosado wrapper. A solid medium to full-bodied cigar with hints of leather, coffee, oak, and a slight spice make this cigar one of the most complex in Illusione’s portfolio. In order to fully understand just how good this cigar is, you need to try them – so do yourself a favor and order a box.Illusione Cruzado has received a well-deserved 91-rating noting: ""A dark cigar with a blunted belicoso tip. It has plenty of toasty, woody flavors and a salty character, balanced by an underlying hickory-smoked sweetness.""",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Short Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Short Robusto",No,"Corojo, Criollo",Illusione
Illusione ECCJ,Rated 4.8 out of 5,,"Come one, come all for ECCJIllusione cigars well known for thinking out-of-the-box and creating full-flavored yet medium-bodied premiums introduces ECCJ. Released to commemorate the anniversary of the European Cigar Cult Journal magazine now more simply known as Cigar Journal, ECCJ cigars are complex in flavor from the start all the way down to the nub. With Nicaraguan fillers and a Nicaraguan Corojo Rosado wrapper, you’ll find this premium has some sweet beginnings followed by a spicy woody finish. An excellent cigar by Illusione that everyone should try at least once. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto Extra']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto Extra",No,Corojo,Illusione
Illusione Epernay Serie 2009,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Party like it's 2009!Making great cigars comes down this - passion, great tobacco, and amazing craftsmanship. It sound simple enough, but few companies actually pull it off as successfully as Illusione. Dion Giolito has led his brand to greatness, and it shows - the brand delivers consistently tasty cigars - I mean, it’s kind of hard to ignore a handful of top 25 appearances and a healthy collection of 90+ ratings. Through the years, Illusione has released some limited edition cigars that flew off the shelves, and we thought we’d never see them again - not the case with Epernay 2009. Lucky for us, this cigar is making a comeback as a regular production, and we couldn’t be happier. This mellow beauty is love at first sight with its Cafe Rosado wrapper which hugs Nicaraguan Criollo ‘98 and Corojo ‘99 long fillers. This is a truly classic Nicaraguan cigar with notes of toasted nuts, a slight spice, and cream. Good to the last puff and totally fulfilling, once you try this cigar, there is no looking back.Epernay 2009 received Top 25 Cigar of the Year honors and received an impressive 94-rating, noting ""Solidly rolled and topped with a three-seam cap, this dark brown cigar has an opulent draw that shows an earthy, leathery smoke with polished layers of gingerbread, cinnamon and orange peel, all building to a beautifully long, caramel finish. A sophisticated and balanced cigar.""",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Petite Corona', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Petite Corona, Presidente, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Corojo, Nicaraguan",Illusione
Illusione Epernay Serie 2009 10th Anniversary,Rated 4 out of 5,,"Party like it's 2009...again!Making great cigars comes down this - passion, great tobacco, and amazing craftsmanship. It sound simple enough, but few companies actually pull it off as successfully as Illusione. Dion Giolito has led his brand to greatness, and it shows - the brand delivers consistently tasty cigars - I mean, it’s kind of hard to ignore a handful of top 25 appearances and a healthy collection of 90+ ratings. The original Epernay 2009 received Top 25 Cigar of the Year honors and received an impressive 94-rating. For the Illusione Epernay Serie 2009 10th-year Anniversary, much of the cigar has remained the same with only a small tweak of the blend. This minuscule change creates a symphonic journey that weaves notes of creaminess, sweetness, white pepper, orange zest, carmel corn, and wood across the pallet for a memorizing experience time and time again. Illusione's solid construction once again offers you a pleasant medium-bodied burn throughout the entire duration of this cigar.  ",Medium,['Toro'],Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,False,,Toro,False,Nicaraguan,Illusione
Illusione Fume D'Amour,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"For a limited time only, enjoy CI Free Shipping on your entire order with the purchase of any Illusione Fume D'Amour box on this page!For the love of cigarsRoughly translated, Illusione Fume D’Amour means ‘love smoke.’ Once you encounter this boutique beauty any questions as to the name go out the window. With countless 90+ ratings under their belt since 2005, like a fine wine, Illusione is only getting better with age. Limited production and high grade tobacco combine for what are some of the top-tiered blends on the market today, and Fume D’Amour stays true to that recipe.A truly unique blend, Fume D’Amour uses no ligero, which is typically the tobacco that kicks blends up in body and strength. Instead, expert blending of seco and viso priming’s of the tobacco plant create a perfectly balanced, wonderfully complex full-bodied experience from start to finish. A blend that connoisseurs will flock towards, Fume D’Amour boasts ample refined notes that entertain the senses all the way through. To add to Fume D’Amour’s stellar reputation, it received the #3 cigar of the year honors for 2014.Also, Illusione Fume D’Amour received a well-deserved 95-point rating noting: “The result is a truly delicious cigar with balance and style, brimming with a rich, nutty cashew taste, hints of nougat sweetness and touches of baking spice.”​",Medium,"['Corona Extra', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona Extra, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Nicaraguan,Illusione
Illusione Garagiste,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Check out this garage bandWhen Dion Giolito created Illusione Cigars, he wanted to give the people something new - something different - something completely and totally delectable. The good news for us, he succeeded and what we got was one of the best boutique brands in the cigar industry. Garagiste is a true exhibition of Illusione’s consistent quality. It’s an absolute gem of a premium that utilizes ligero long-fillers from two different regions in Nicaragua as well as a blend of Criollo ‘98 and Corojo ‘99. It all comes together inside a Habano Ecuador wrapper. This combo packs on the flavor with notes of wood, earth, spice, and cocoa. Totally indulgent with flavor spilling out of the seams. Garagiste earned a well-deserved 90-point rating from noting: “The draw and burn of this cigar are even and consistent. Notes of vanilla and oolong tea are balanced by earthy undertones and a maple-pecan sweetness.”",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Short Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Illusione
Illusione Gigantes,Rated 3.5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Critical mass achievedIllusione Gigantes cigars are a big follow up to the very popular Illusione Rothchilde. The newest cigar from the boutique brand is full of flavor yet medium-bodied, precisely what Illusione is known for. This large and in charge cigar is packed with earthy flavors such as cocoa, salted nuts, leather, pepper, and has a sweet creaminess from the dark Mexican San Andres maduro wrapper and the well-aged blend of Aganorsa long-fillers derived from Nicaragua. Joined with an enjoyable floral aroma, this premium cigar is not too big for your britches. ",Medium,['Gigante'],"Corojo, Criollo '98",Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Gigante,No,"Ecuador Connecticut, San Andres",Illusione
Illusione Haut 10,Rated 4.2 out of 5,,"10 years and still going strongCongratulations are certainly in order for Illusione surpassing 10 years in the cigar industry. In honor of their on-going success of one-of-a-kind boutique premium cigars, Dion Giolito released Illusione Haut 10. Anniversary cigars are commonplace in this industry, but let me promise you this — Illusione 10th is special. A superb handmade cigar filled with seco dominant blends of Nicaraguan Corojo and Criollo tobaccos draped in a Nicaraguan café claro AAA grade wrapper. This mellow to medium-bodied cigar is slow burning and full of flavors of pepper, roasted almonds, and hints of sweet caramel. Illusione cigars is definitely haut to trot, and deserves to celebrate in style – pop the champagne and light up an Illusione Haut 10. Good news! Illusione Haut 10 has received a well-deserved 90-point rating, noting: ""A long cigar that burns evenly, showing notes of cedar, graham cracker and baking spices. The finish calls to mind fresh tobacco.""",Medium,['Robusto Extra'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Robusto Extra,No,Corojo,Illusione
Illusione Maduro,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"No ordinary MaduroIllusione is no ordinary boutique brand - it makes regular Top 25 appearances and has even more 90+ ratings. There is no doubt that Illusione has real staying power in humidors everywhere. Illusione Maduro is no exception to this with a vast array of flavor, spice, and complexity. On the surface, you’ll find an oily San Andreas wrapper with Nicaraguan Criollo and Corojo fillers hidden snugly underneath - a cocktail that leads to spicy notes of black pepper, wood, earth, and espresso.  This is a seriously great offering from Illusione - one that you’d be regret passing up.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Petite Corona, Robusto",No,San Andres,Illusione
Illusione OneOff,Rated 4.57 out of 5,,"You’re gonna want a peace of this!Remember this one? How could you forget? The funky peace sign band? Originally released in 2001, the OneOff brand was met with a ton of fanfare. But as quickly as the brand arose, it rapidly moved into back into anonymity. There was a brief attempt to bring it back a few years later, but that attempt failed. Now? Dion Giolito of Illusione is here to save the day. And after one taste of this classic, you’ll be happy he did. These medium to full-bodied treats are produced at one of Nicaragua’s hottest factory: Aganorsa Leaf. That’s right. The same factory that produces gems like the 93-rated JFR Lunatic Habano or the 93-rated Guardian of the Farm. Ring a bell now? Illusione’s OneOff carries on that reputation with this Nicaragua puro. Rich, hearty, and rounded out by hints of spice, OneOff is ready to regain it’s cult-like status in the cigar industry. Good news! Illusione OneOff has received a well-deserved 92-point rating, noting: ""The woody core of this reddish-brown gem is framed by notes of honey, red pepper and crushed pistachio. A sweet-and-spicy cigar.""",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Corona Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Robusto Extra', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,"Churchill, Corona, Corona Gordo, Robusto, Robusto Extra, Short Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,Nicaraguan,Illusione
Illusione Original Documents,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"Your Eyes Are Not Deceiving YouWhen Dion Giolito introduced Illusione over a decade ago, he promised that his cigars would be different - and he absolutely delivered. The brand’s trophy case is spilling over with a bevy of 90+ ratings and a few Top 25 appearances, so different adequately describes this brand in the best possible way. Today, submitted for the approval of enthusiasts everywhere - an exceptional blend from Illusione that’s garnered Top 25 Cigar of the Year honors not once - but twice.  Original Documents is a rustic looking beauty with Nicaraguan Criollo ‘98 and Corojo ‘99 all packaged up in a Rosado wrapper. The result - a long ride through flavor country with notes of oak, black pepper, leather, and cocoa. This full-bodied blend received a 93-rating, noting: “balance as well as strength, with sweet leather, nuts and cocoa on the palate.”",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Lonsdale', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Corona, Double Corona, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Lonsdale, Petite Corona, Robusto",No,Corojo,Illusione
Illusione Rothchildes,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"Illusione doesn't always mean ""expensive""Small but mighty and loaded with complex flavor, Illusione Rothchildes are a go-to option in my humidor at all times. Created in small batches, you can be sure that each cigar is rolled to perfection with hand-selected tobaccos. Each Illusione Rothchildes is wrapped in an oily San Andres wrapper with Nicaraguan long-fillers at the center. Small, but flavorful, this little guy packs on notes of black leather, earth, and almonds. Unquestionable quality and supreme affordability makes these Rothschilds a great option as an everyday, boutique option. ",Medium,['Rothschild'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Rothschild,No,"Ecuador Connecticut, Maduro, San Andres",Illusione
Illusione Singulare,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Singulare-ly one of the best Cigars You’ll Ever EnjoyAfter sampling Illusione’s collection of delicious premiums, I can honestly tell you that this brand delivers. Every. Single. Time. Critics, enthusiasts, aficionados, and even my mom know just how amazing these cigars are. Dion Giolito launched Illusione over a decade ago, and some of his very first blends received to 25 honors - an amazing feat for any newcomer.  Fast forward a few years, and what you’ve got is decorated boutique brand who couldn’t make a bad cigar if it tried, something you can chalk up to Dion’s picky palate and his extreme attention to detail. Illusione Singulare is a prime example of this brand’s seemingly effortless success with blending top notch cigars. Lower priming Nicaraguan Criollo ‘98 and Corojo ‘99 long fillers from one specific farm are wrapped perfectly in a AAA Grade Corojo Cafe Rosado leaf - a combination the leads to a mix of cocoa, leather, and oak flavors. Give this expertly crafted goodness a shot so you can fully understand what so many people have been raving about for years.",,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Rothschild', 'Salomon', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Churchill, Robusto, Rothschild, Salomon, Toro",Varies,"Corojo, Nicaraguan",Illusione
Illusione Slam Bench Pressed,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Slam! Let the Boys be BoysI don’t know how Illusione does it, but they’ve created another winner with its Slam Bench-pressed cigar - a box-pressed beauty with a ton of flavor. This medium to full bodied blend is crafted with all Nicaraguan tobaccos and offers zesty notes of cedar, leather, and coffee while leaving behind a nice long finish on the palate. This handmade offers you a smooth consistent burn, allowing for a totally relaxing experience. With an enjoyable addition this, it’s no wonder Illusione has attained every accolade and award since its debut over a decade ago. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Double Corona']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Churchill, Double Corona",No,San Andres,Illusione
Illusione Ultra,Rated 4.8 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"Ultra goodTo say Illusione has an impressive portfolio would be an egregious understatement. It churns out top rated cigar after top rated cigar, and to be honest - it can be overwhelming deciding which of Dion Giolito’s tasty creations I should enjoy next.If I’m in the mood for something full-bodied with a ridiculous amount of flavor, I tend to reach for Ultra. The fillers are a bold blend of all Nicaraguan tobaccos consisting of Corojo, Criollo and ligero from two regions with a Colorado Rosado wrapper on the surface. There cigar has some serious chew, a fair amount of spice, and notes of earth and coffee. If you’re looking for a cigar with flavor that can’t be tamed - you’ll hit the jackpot with Ultra. ",Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,Yes,,"Churchill, Corona, Double Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Short Robusto, Toro",No,Corojo,Illusione
INCH Limitada 2019 by E.P. Carrillo,Rated 4.11 out of 5,,"64/64ths of pure herfin’ bliss!E.P. Carrillo is huge right now. The brand responsible for the #1 cigar of 2018 is riding high, with 90+ ratings and accolades being a common theme across their impressive portfolio. Following the success of the 90-rated INCH and its subsequent line extensions, Carrillo has whipped up a limited-edition version of the blend, aptly named INCH Limitada 2019, and released just 2000 boxes.INCH Limitada 2019 comes in in just one meaty 6.2” x 64 size, absolutely bursting at the seams with flavor. A Connecticut Habano wrapper grown in the USA covers a hearty, well-aged blend of Nicaraguan long-fillers, and produces a medium-bodied flavor profile that leaves little doubt in Ernesto’s big-ring blending abilities. Featuring a coffee-dominant profile with just enough spice to satisfy but not overwhelm, this is a cigar that fans of any ring gauge can enjoy.",Medium,['Gordo'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Gordo,No,Habano Connecticut,E.P. Carrillo
INCH RingMaster by E.P. Carrillo,Rated 4.63 out of 5,,"E.P. Carrillo is the RingMaster!RingMaster – sure it sounds like a weird 80’s movie you’ve never heard of, but this high-quality blend from Ernesto Perez-Carillo is no joke. The newest addition to the popular INCH line of cigars, Ringmaster is a Nicaraguan puro with a full inch of ring gauge (the width of the cigar). Handmade at Tabacalera La Alianza in Santiago, INCH RingMaster is one Napoleon complex of a cigar you sure don’t want to miss out on. A Nicaraguan puro that’s rich and spicy, RingMaster promises a complex blend of the highest degree. Even better, the blend is just as bold as it looks, booming forward with rich Nicaraguan spice and black pepper before mellowing off into a smooth natural sweetness with hints of cedar and coffee mixed in. If this is anything like the other INCHes, it’s sure to get a 90+ rating soon – so get in ahead of the hype. ",Medium-Full,['Gordo'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Gordo,No,Nicaraguan,E.P. Carrillo
Irish Charms,Rated 4.36 out of 5,,"Most charming indeed! I’ll keep this one short and sweet, just like the cigars this write-up is describing. Available in boats of 100, Irish Charms are a delicious cigarillo that are perfect for when you want a nice hit of flavor but are lacking on time. Guaranteed to burn smooth and slow, each Irish Charm offers up a nice 15 minute distraction or driving companion. Irish Charms are available in a natural Sumatra wrapper, along with Coffee, Chocolate, and Vanilla. ",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Sri Lanka,No,,Cigarillos,No,Indonesian,
Isla del Sol Maduro by Drew Estate,Rated 4.73 out of 5, Based on 70 Ratings ,"The long-awaited follow up is here!Isla del Sol has long been a champion of Drew Estate’s massive cigar portfolio. And why wouldn’t it be? The blend combines Drew Estate’s renowned infusion process and pairs them with everyday prices that any red-blooded cigar enthusiast could get behind. But with this latest version, things are about to take a dark turn…So how does the original Isla del Sol get better? Add in a dark, oily maduro wrapper to the already tasty mix-fill Nicaraguan blend that is carefully infused with the enticing nuances of premium, Sumatran Mandheling Bean Coffee. Add in the lightly sweetened cap, and you got a rich and hearty busting at the seams with notes of cocoa, spice, and – of course – coffee. The folks at Drew Estate have done it again!  ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,True,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Cigarillos, Corona, Robusto, Toro",Yes,Maduro,Drew Estate Cigars
Island Jim by Oscar #2,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"I love a good #2! Island Jim, and his red hot ‘Leaf by Oscar’ brand, have been tearing up the industry over the last few years. After starting off in the industry running the Leaf & Bean cigar shop in Pittsburgh, PA, Jim Robinson has gone on to create one of the fastest-selling boutiques on the market. Today, we welcome the Island Jim #2 to CI, in both the original and maduro formats. Shaped like a #2 pencil, both version of these Island Jim cigars are impressively crafted. On the original, you’ll find a Connecticut tip that’ll lend a subtle, tea-like sweetness to the cigar… cut it further down, under the Connecticut tip, and you’ll find a richer, chocolatey profile. For the maduro, the cigar stays the same, just swapping out a darker, richer wrapper leaf that provides a fuller-bodied profile. ",Medium-Full,['Torpedo'],Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Torpedo,No,"Nicaraguan Jalapa, San Andres",
It's a Boy! /It's a Girl!,Rated 4.82 out of 5, Based on 34 Ratings ,"Celebrate with a cigar worth celebratin' with!These Nicaraguan-made lovelies combine a mellow mixture of Cuban-seed Nicaraguan and Dominican long-leaf tobaccos inside a lovely Connecticut wrapper from Ecuador. Each leaf was extensively aged prior to rolling, giving you a crowd pleasing cigar to be enjoyed by all. The flavor is rich and creamy with a complex bouquet and soft, elegant aroma. As for the price? Forget about it....don't waste your time finding that perfect box of expensive puros most people won't enjoy anyway. These cigars are top-notch, offering superior quality and enjoyable flavors every time.",Mellow-Medium,['Churchill'],,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Churchill,No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Jaime Garcia Reserva Especial,Rated 4.7 out of 5, Based on 70 Ratings ,"Like father, like son. Jaime (pronounced Hi-may) Garcia is the son of Don Pepin Garcia, and an integral member of the family business. He's worked side-by-side with Pepin for years and has had in hands in a number of projects. But now, he's got his own eponymous brand - blended entirely solo. Jaime Garcia Reserva Especial utilizes a dark, oily Broadleaf maduro wrapper paired with a rich blend of Nicaraguan long-fillers with tobaccos from some of the Garcia family's farms. It's on the fuller side, but smooth and layered with notes of espresso, pepper, earth, and cedar. A tasty, well-made stick that will make the old man proud. Burn one of these, and you'll experience the artisanal skill of this family history.Jaime Garcia Reserva Especial received a well-deserved 90-point rating, noting: ""Even though this dark, near-veinless robusto is solid to the touch, it draws wonderfully, leaving full-bodied notes of pepper, wine oak and coffee bean flavors on the palate.""",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,
Jaime Garcia Reserva Especial 10th Anniversary,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"A decade, well-burned.10 years ago, in December 2009, My Father Cigars debuted a special new cigar to an exclusive audience. That cigar was the first in the company’s portfolio blended entirely by Jaime Garcia, the son of patriarch Jose “Don Pepin” Garica. Jaime had contributed to many of the brand’s most successful blend, and his first venture into blending was an immediate success. The cigar was named after its creator, and now My Father Cigars is celebrating that great blend with an anniversary edition, the Jaime Garcia Reserva Especial 10th Anniversary!Coming in a single 6.5” x 52 toro size, the Jaime Garcia Reserva Especial 10th Anniversary is similar to the original Jaime Garcia Reserva Especial, but adds a hefty dose of Pelo de Oro tobacco grown on Pepin’s own farms to the filler. This rare and flavorful leaf is also utilized as the binder, and rests beneath a toothy Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper. This stick is booming with big, full-bodied notes of earth, spice, molasses, and a nice dose of zest from the Pelo de Oro. Only 2500 boxes were made, so secure yourself one today and help the Garcia family celebrate 10 years of Jaime Garcia!",Medium-Full,['Toro'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Maduro",
Java by Drew Estate,Rated 4.7 out of 5, Based on 325 Ratings ,"Java cigars are a combined effort from two leaders in the industry.Introduced in 2004, and released in the 1st quarter of 2005, Java cigars are an exceptionally unique handmade from two of today's hardest working cigar makers: Jonathan Drew of Drew Estate and Rocky Patel. Quite a one-two combo, to say the least, and boy does this cigar pack a punch, not in strength, but in flavor. Java is a subtly sweet Nicaraguan that features a dark, oily maduro wrapper stretched across an aged blend of Nicaraguan long-fillers. While aging, these cigars have been slowly infused with the delicious flavor of gourmet mocha, morphing a traditional Nicaraguan cigar into an incredibly rich cigar that burns smooth from start to finish, leaving an extremely pleasant aroma in its wake.What's this 'Latte' all about, you ask? The Java Latte employs a silky-smooth Connecticut Ecuador wrapper rather than the standard Connecticut Broadleaf. The result is a mellow and creamy sensation with all that Java awesomeness you've come to love.Note: The Wafe size is a flat-pressed cigar that measures roughly one-third of an inch thick when laid flat. ",,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,True,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Cigarillos, Corona, Gordo, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",Yes,"Brazilian, Ecuador Connecticut, Maduro",Drew Estate Cigars
Java Mint by Drew Estate,Rated 4.64 out of 5, Based on 160 Ratings ,"​Java update available. Click to install.Some say this cigar tastes like a Peppermint Pattie. Others say it reminds them of Creme de Menthe. Whatever the case may be, we say it's pretty damn tasty. If you tried and enjoy Java, consider this your next guilty pleasure. A zero-calorie, carb-free dessert to savor after a thick 'n juicy steak dinner....or that cold leftover pizza from last night. Java Mint is an exceedingly flavorful handmade built with a rich blend of aged Nicaraguan long-fillers inside a thick and oily, 3-year aged Brazilian Mata Fina maduro wrapper. During the aging process, these cigars have been slowly infused with the delicious subtleties of gourmet mocha with select mints to develop a unique handmade with no comparison. A rich, traditional, medium-bodied handmade filled with hints of mocha, coffee, vanilla, and mint that burns silky-smooth and creamy down to the nub, leaving behind a lovely sweetness after each puff along the way. If you're looking for a sweet cigar to mix things up, Java Mint is a top-notch choice. Note: The Java X-Press Mint is a newly released product debuting at the 2019 IPCPR Trade Show. Shipping is expected to begin in November, so get your preorders in now!",,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,True,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Cigarillos, Corona, Gordo, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",Yes,"Brazilian, Maduro",Drew Estate Cigars
Java Red by Drew Estate,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 111 Ratings ,"Take cover from this cherry bomb! Java by Drew Estate — a cigar capable of creating world peace and righting all wrongs. Alright, maybe that's a little dramatic, but this line of premium cigars from Drew Estate and Rocky Patel certainly brings fans of cigars together! Featuring delectable coffee infused blends, the Java line is synonymous with unique flavor and unbridled quality, and today the Java family adds a new member. Welcome, Java Red.Java Red by Drew Estate is a cigar bursting with rich, cherry flavors along with notes of dark cocoa and coffee, a certified palate please indeed. Need I say more? These premiums are handmade in Nicaragua, specifically infused by Drew Estate's unique processes, and exclusively distributed by Rocky Patel cigars. Treat yourself to one of the most decadent treats the cigar world has to offer, a veritable chocolate covered cherry of a blend, and don't look back. ",Medium,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,True,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Corona, Gordo, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",Yes,Maduro,Drew Estate Cigars
JFR Lunatic Habano,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Can you handle the Lunatic?A number of years ago, big ring cigars were all the rage. 6""x 60 and larger sizes were commonplace in humidors, prized for their cool burn, copious amounts of flavor, and bang-for-the-buck prices. With smaller cigars coming back into style, though, big rings are starting to disappear from shelves. But JFR doesn't follow trends, and they know what sizes they do best.The JFR Lunatic Habano is an imposing cigar. The sizes range from a chunky 4.7""x 52 robusto all the way up to an incredible 8x80 belicoso, and all are blended to perfection with a silky Ecuador Habano wrapper and Nicaraguan binder & fillers. Produced at Aganorsa Leaf in Nicaragua, and chock full of Aganorsa goodness, you know these are the real deal. Exploding with notes of roasted nuts, earth, toast and coffee, these sticks are just as big in flavor as they are in size. The JFR Lunatic is an experience, one you’d be a lunatic to pass up.Good news! The JFR Lunatic Habano was named #7 cigar of 2018, with an impressive 93-point rating, noting “The cigar is profoundly nutty (no pun intended) with precise notes of cashew and walnut wonderfully layered atop a core of coffee bean”.",Medium-Full,"['Gigante', 'Gordo', 'Short Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Gigante, Gordo, Short Robusto",Varies,Ecuador Habano,Casa Fernandez
JFR Lunatic Loco,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Muy perfecto Loco, or muy loco perfecto? Why not both?Aganorsa’s JFR has been delighting cigar fans with their big ring sized and big, bold flavors since 2005, way back when they were a just a small brick-and-mortar exclusive line. The company has come a long way, their passion and success culminating in a 93-point rating and #7 spot in the top 25 cigars of the year for the Lunatic Habano. Now their latest release looks to take an even better spot, and we don’t see it having too much trouble.The first thing you’ll notice about the JFR Lunatic Loco is the shape. All options are 5.5” or shorter, with ring gauges ranging from 60 all the way to 80. These chunky little sticks taper slightly at both ends for a unique perfecto shape, and they all feel great in the hand owing to the girth. A Nicaraguan puro containing nothing but the best leaves from Aganorsa’s own farms, the Loco wears a special shade-grown Jalapa Corojo wrapper dripping with oils and as dark as a good cup o’ Joe. You can definitely expect this beauty to greet you with full-bodied, spicy flavors, and keep you interested with smooth earth, pepper, dark fruit, cedar, and leather notes. Grab a box today, because you’d have to be loco to miss out on this one. JFR Lunatic has been honored with a well-deserved 90-point rating, noting: ""Wrapped in an oily cover leaf with smooth veins, this perfecto has an excellent draw, showing a core of cedar accented by notes of vanilla bean and nougat before the sweet, earthy finish.",Full,['Perfecto'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Perfecto,No,Nicaraguan Jalapa,Casa Fernandez
JFR Lunatic Maduro,Rated 4.64 out of 5, Based on 14 Ratings ,"My, what a big cigar you have.Casa Fernandez’s Aganorsa farms are renowned for growing some of the most Cuban-esque tobacco outside the island south of Miami. This is no doubt a result of their using authentic Cuban-seed tobacco planted by Cuban farmers using tradition Cuban methods. Aganorsa tobacco can be found in cigars from Alec Bradley, Illusione, and Padron to name a few. The first thing you notice about the Casa Fernandez JFR Lunatic is that it’s a ginormous cigar, an 8x80 Belicoso if you can believe it. This beast comes draped in a San Andres wrapper with an Aganorsa Nicaraguan binder and long-fillers. This big, slow-burning blend is medium to full-bodied and complex, and boasts an array of flavors including spice, pepper, earth, coffee, chocolate, and leather. ​Good news! JFR Lunatic Maduro has received a 90-point rating, which noted: ""Though mammoth and solid, this huge plug of a cigar burns and draws quite evenly. An initial blast of spice calms down to show a nutty, herbal smoke with hints of graham cracker and an anise finish.""",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Short Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Short Robusto",No,San Andres,Casa Fernandez
JFR XT Corojo,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"A Cuban-esque game changer.Even if you’ve never smoked a Casa Fernandez cigar, you’ve no doubt tried tobaccos from their Aganorsa farms. As one of the largest and most respected tobacco growers in Central America for going on 30 years, their tobacco has been used in highly-rated cigars such as Illusione and Padron. Aganorsa tobacco has a true Cuban-esque quality, due in no doubt to their using authentic Cuban-seed tobaccos, using Cuban growing methods, and employing Cuban farmers. In addition to supplying many of the industry’s top manufacturers, they have released their own line of premium cigars, dubbed Casa Fernandez.Casa Fernandez JFR XT Corojo uses their signature Aganorsa Corojo wrapper concealing a Nicaraguan Aganorsa binder and long-fillers. The start to the cigar features hearty flavors of pepper, leather, nut, and wood before a natural, almost sweet fruit essence settles in. This stick is medium to full-bodied, flawlessly constructed, and strikes a perfect balance between strength and flavor.  ​",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Toro",No,Corojo,Casa Fernandez
JFR XT Maduro,Rated 3.33 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"A true taste of Cuba.The tobacco grown on Casa Fernandez’s Aganorsa farms is used in many of the industry’s top-selling and highly-rated brands from Alec Bradley to Padron. Their tobacco fields are planted with authentic Cuban-seed tobacco by Cuban farmers using traditional Cuban methods. They have released their own line of premium handmade cigars to high acclaim, fittingly named Casa Fernandez. Casa Fernandez JFR XT Maduro comes dressed in an Aganorsa maduro wrapper sitting atop a Nicaraguan Aganorsa binder and long-fillers. This cigar is full-bodied with complex flavors including spice, earth, wood, and coffee. Construction is perfect with an easy draw and the rich flavors are balanced nicely against the strength. For a true taste of old world Cuba, give the Casa Fernandez JFR XT Maduro a try.​",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Toro",No,Maduro,Casa Fernandez
JM's Dominican,Rated 4.44 out of 5, Based on 25 Ratings ,"Stretch your cigar budget.Ok, these might not be the prettiest girls at the dance, but take em for a spin and you’ll be surprised. Dressed in your choice of wrappers and packed with aged Cuban-seed Dominican tobacco, JM’s are every day, knock-around sticks that are creamy and smooth. These tasty Cuban-Sandwich cigars may remind you of some pricier super premiums, but won’t put the same dent in your wallet. Consistently good and flavorful, these are among the best bang for your buck cigars available.   Connecticut – Featuring a gorgeous Connecticut wrapper. A mellow bodied creamy, smooth flavor.Maduro - Flavorful medium bodied burn.  Construction is spot-on and notes of chocolate, spices, cedar, and leather coat the palate without becoming overwhelming. ​Corojo - Notes of black pepper, eath, leather, cedar, and spice.Sumatra - Notes of earth, cinnamon, and natural sweetness.  ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Varies,"Connecticut, Corojo, Maduro, Sumatra",JM Tobacco
JM's Dominican Honey,Rated 4.59 out of 5, Based on 27 Ratings ,"Honey, I shrunk the price tag.Ok, these might not be the prettiest girls at the dance, but take em for a spin and you’ll be surprised. Dressed in your choice of wrappers and packed with aged Cuban-seed Dominican tobacco, JM’s Honey are every day, knock-around sticks that are flavor-stacked and smooth. These tasty Cuban-Sandwich ropes are available in 4 exotic varieties, Honey, Honey Berry, Honey Vanilla, and Honey Rum. Adorned with a Sumatra wrapper and just the right amount of flavoring.  Burn one of these, and I'm sure you'll be coming back for more. ",Mellow-Medium,['Corona'],,Dominican,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Corona,No,Sumatra,JM Tobacco
JM's Nicaraguan,Rated 4.11 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"Yours for a song.Give these a try and you’ll be singing the praises of JM’s Nicaraguan cigars. These cigars are handmade Cuban sandwich blends hailing from Esteli, Nicaragua and consist of well-aged Nicaraguan tobaccos inside your choice of flavorful wrappers. JM’s Nicaraguan are perfect for a day on the links, handing out to your buddies, or just kickin back for a relaxing stogie. These beauts are tasty, priced to move, and one of the best everyday sticks out there. Sumatra - Medium-bodied Expect a creamy, smooth burn with a touch of earth and pepper.  Maduro - Medium-bodied, creamy and smooth throughout with hints of nuts and chocolate. ​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Maduro, San Andres, Sumatra",JM Tobacco
John Bull,Rated 4.4 out of 5, Based on 382 Ratings ,"Mellow but flavorful Connecticut-wrapped lovelies....for an incredible price.The best part about this cigar is the quality-to-price ratio. There are better cigars out there and there are far more pricey cigars out there....but if you want a good quality, subtle handmade at a tremendous price, this is an ideal 'everyday' option. Oh my! John Bull combines a silky Connecticut Ecuador wrapper with an aged combination of Nicaraguan and Dominican tobaccos. Together this holy cocktail delivers a pretty smooth, calm to medium-bodied bouquet. The cigar billows with thick, creamy, voluminous clouds, consuming the palate in rich fashion and leaving behind pleasant notes of cedar and toast. Hey, for an everyday subtle handmade, John Bull is an enjoyable and satisfying solution, brother. Packed in big, chunky, cedar boxes of 30 cigars....all at a price that’ll keep you coming back for more, a dozen times over.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Presidente, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,
John Bull The Dark Hour,Rated 3.82 out of 5, Based on 11 Ratings ,"The Dark Hour is upon us...When you want to feel like a snob or impress your friends & colleagues, you might reach for an ornate, pricey cigar. But what about when you just want a great stogie to puff on and really enjoy? Smart aficionados looking for smooth, balanced flavors and great construction that won't break the bank reach for John Bull. The Dominican-made gems might not look as pretty as the major labels, but one puff and you'll always want to keep these on hand.John Bull Dark Hour is the first follow-up to the original John Bull, a CI Nation favorite. Handmade in the Dominican Republic, The Dark Hour wears a rich & oily Maduro wrapper over Dominican-grown long-fillers blended to produce a medium-full bodied profile of espresso, roasted nuts, and earth. This isn't a spice bomb, but the flavors will sit nice and heavy on your palate, and will pair well with any drink you decide to enjoy on the side. So go ahead, grab a box of John Bull The Dark Hour, and enjoy premium deliciousness for a fraction of what the big guys charge.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto",No,Maduro,
Jose Rey,Rated 4.75 out of 5,,"A new Jose Rey, for a touch of sweetness every day.Jose Rey might be a new name to the cigar industry as a whole, but it traces its origins to a small cigar lounge in New Orleans, LA. In the early 2000s, brand founder Abe Flores was working with three owners of a shop that produced their own cigars. Abe found them to be uninteresting, so he founded the Pinar del Rio brand as a store exclusive, with the Jose Rey as one of their first offerings. Eventually Abe cut ties with the shop and moved with one of the owners to the Dominican Republic, and the rest is history.Jose Rey Cigars come with a sweetened cap that will remind you to slow down and enjoy the sweeter things in life, and help remind you to carry a positive energy that will make your days just a little bit brighter. The filler blend is undisclosed, but this mellow-medium bodied gem comes in your choice of Sumatra, Maduro, or Connecticut wrappers, and it’s sure to put a pep in your step when you taste the toasty, zesty wood notes with a pleasant sweetness on the lips and in the finish. We’re not sure exactly who Jose Rey is, but we know damn sure that his name will be well known to cigar connoisseurs before too long.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona Gordo', 'Robusto']",,,False,False,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona Gordo, Robusto",No,"Connecticut, Maduro, Sumatra",Pinar del Rio
Joya de Nicaragua Antano 1970,Rated 4.71 out of 5, Based on 103 Ratings ,"In the 1970s, this brand was considered the finest not only in Nicaragua, but in the entire world. It was actually created in Nicaragua’s first cigar factory founded in 1964, enjoyed by US Presidents and renowned for its rich and full flavor. But decades of war and Communist rule in Nicaragua destroyed the brand and decimated the factory - and most of the rest of the country for that matter. Well, the country has been on the rise again, and fittingly, so is the brand. This new Joya de Nicaragua Antaño 1970 was created to celebrate the rich heritage and worldwide renown it enjoyed in 1970, and marks a return to those glorious days. It’s well on the way, earning a terrific 91 rating (Cigar Insider). A very, very full-bodied, robust ""muscle cigar."" This beauty is simply delicious, and if you're a fan of strong cigars, I recommend you jump on these quick.Great news! The Antaño 1970 has been named one of Cigar Aficionado's Top 50 Cigars. In addition to several 90-point scores, it received a well-deserved '91' noting: ""A stocky, fat figurado that performs well. It's medium to full bodied, with earthy, leathery flavors and floral, spicy hints. The finish is long and complex.""",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Criollo,Joya de Nicaragua
Joya de Nicaragua Antano Connecticut,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"The stronger side of Connecticut.For decades, Joya de Nicaragua has enjoyed a reputation as a serious connoisseurs stick. Bold, full-bodied flavors are the hallmark of this classic brand, and many a new puffer has been taken off guard by the strength and remember the JdN Antano as the first cigar to turn them green. Despite this, they remain highly sought after decades after their release. The newest member of the Joyo de Nicaragua portfolio wears a silky smooth Ecuador Connecticut wrapper, but don’t let the light color fool you - this cigar is all Joyo. The Nicaraguan filler & binder work with the wrapper to create a medium-full bodied powerhouse of a profile. It’s rare to see a Connecticut shade wrapper exhibit this much body & flavor, but the minds at JdN refused to compromise until they got the blend exactly how they wanted it. Lighting up, you’ll be greeted to an intensely peppery, rich profile with notes of toast, cedar, and leather, and you’ll be hooked before you even make it halfway. It’s not long before this release is showered with accolades and becomes a bit scarce, so don’t hesitate to try this game-changing Connecticut.",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Corona Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Belicoso, Corona Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Ecuador Connecticut,Joya de Nicaragua
Joya de Nicaragua Antano Dark Corojo,Rated 4.52 out of 5, Based on 27 Ratings ,"Mmm....Dark Corojo.Created 10 years after the launch of the landmark Joya de Nicaragua Antaño blend, the new Dark Corojo puts a unique and welcomed spin on Nicaragua's Classic handmade. Created with 3-year aged Nicaraguan long-filler tobaccos and a special Corojo leaf wrapper that's dark, oily and loaded with flavor. Naturally robust but impressively smooth, JdN Dark Corojo exudes a rich series of earth, cedar, pepper, cocoa and a slightly sweet finish. Complete, refined and worthy of the Joya de Nicaragua name.And as if this brand wasn't powerful enough, JDN has added a ""bulldozer"" to its lineup. The box-pressed La Niveladora, which is the Spanish term for the titanic land-mover, just solidifies the strength behind this brand. If you're looking for a strong, satisfying blend, make sure you keep these Dark Corojos in your rotation. Joyo de Nicaragua Antano Dark Corojo received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""A dark and strikingly oily torpedo that delivers a bready, cedary and earthy smoke with wheaty and sweet intonations and a spicy, red-pepper finish.""",Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Corojo, Nicaraguan",Joya de Nicaragua
Joya de Nicaragua Antano Gran Reserva,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Antano gets a faceliftAmong the questions I get asked the most, “How are aged cigars different than non-aged ones?” is number three, right behind, “Y’all got Cubans?” and “Can I have some free samples?”. Today, Joya de Nicaragua lends us a hand in answering this age old question, with the release of Antano Gran Reserva. Modeled after their flagship Antano line, Gran Reserva is a similar blend, with the addition of aged tobaccos to provide a more “mature” experience. Manufactured at Joya de Nicaragua’s operation in Esteli, Nicaragua, Joya de Nicaragua Antano Gran Reserva is a Nicaraguan puro of the highest caliber. To set this one apart from its peers, Juan Martinez (Executive President of JdN), called for the addition of five-year-aged filler leaves to the mix and applied a rich and oily Corojo wrapper on top. The result is markedly different from the regular Antano: what was once a powerful, unabashed beast has been tamed, offering a much smoother ride. There’s still hits of black pepper up front, but they’re quickly joined by natural, sugary sweetness, nutty notes, and dry chocolate. Good News! Joya De Nicaragua Antano Gran Reserva has been awarded as the #16 best cigar of 2018 and earned an awesome 93-point rating, noting: ""this attractive cigar has a pleasantly toasty core that's elevated by hints of saffron, hickory wood and chocolate. The finish is sweet and woody.""",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto', 'Robusto Extra']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Belicoso, Robusto, Robusto Extra",Varies,"Corojo, Nicaraguan",Joya de Nicaragua
Joya de Nicaragua Black,Rated 4.56 out of 5, Based on 18 Ratings ,"Joya is back in black, baby!An amped up follow-up to their incredibly Joya Red blend, Joya de Nicaraguan Black is a medium to full-bodied blend with tons of rich, Nicaraguan flavor. A balanced and complex experience, Black easily lives up to the Joya de Nicaragua name and tradition, and offers a great addition to the profile of the oldest Nicaraguan cigar factory. This ain’t just a flashy name either, fellas. Each scrumptious Joya Black features a dark, perfectly crafted Mexican San Andres Negro wrapper — the first Joya blend to do so. Thick and oily, this wrapper burns slowly to bring you dark chocolate, dried fruit, and hints of cedar and coffee. Joya Black is the second release in the “modern face” of Joya, and for my money, Joya’s going to have quite the bright future. ​Good news, Joya de Nicaragua Black has received an impressive 93-point rating, noting: ""This corona gorda leaves precise impressions of black cherry and cocoa nibs on the palate, which are elevated by notes of leather, nougat and a hint of peppermint.""",Medium,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Double Robusto', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Cigarillos, Corona, Double Robusto, Robusto, Toro",No,San Andres,Joya de Nicaragua
Joya de Nicaragua Cabinetta,Rated 4.57 out of 5, Based on 23 Ratings ,"Joya de Nicaragua with a delicious twist.Joya de Nicaragua Cabinetta Serie cigars combine a dark, coffee-hued Nicaraguan Criollo wrapper with a creamy, light Ecuadorian Shade main wrapper. It's like a chocolate and vanilla swirl ice cream cone! And the good news here is, this duo works just as well, lending to a complex array of flavors and aromas. Less demanding on the palate than the other members of the JdN family, this medium-bodied blend also features carefully selected Nicaraguan long-fillers that deliver a solid, smooth experience worthy of praise. Greeting the senses are deep cocoa, earth, and tobacco with a decidedly spicy finish. This one might have been released without the dog and pony show, but it doesn’t need the pomp and circumstance....this one speaks for itself.  Enjoy Joya de Nicaragua Cabinetta, a truly unique cigar.Good news, Joya de Nicaragua Cabinetta has received a well-deserved 90-point rating , noting: ""Rolled with two wrappers, this cigar starts woody and tangy with hints of vanilla bean but takes on the sweet quality of chocolate-covered raisins. The finish is toasty.""",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,"Connecticut, Criollo",Joya de Nicaragua
Joya de Nicaragua Cinco Decadas,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Joya turns 5050 years is a long time. You don’t believe me? Let’s journey back to 1968 – the year the oldest cigar factory in Nicaragua was established. The Beatles were still a band, the legal drinking age was 18, gas was 34 cents, and the internet wasn’t even a thing. While all this has changed, Joya de Nicaragua has been perfecting the craft of premium handmade cigars. 50 years of accumulated knowledge, experience, and resilience all come full circle with the Joya de Nicaragua Cinco Decadas. This cigar celebrates an impressive milestone, so the Joya team worked tirelessly to create a Nicaraguan cigar of unparalleled elegance. The blend has not been disclosed but we do know it’s a medium to full-bodied Nicaraguan puro made exclusively with the companies best extra-vintage leaves. Cinco Decadas was originally rolled up in two specially selected sizes – the Diadema and El General - the first sizes ever rolled at the factory. The Funadador was created to exhibit the best possible tobacco for this blend, and pays tribute to the founders of Joya de Nicaragua. Quantities of these special cigars are very limited, and it's only a matter of time before they're gone. Grab a box today, and toast to 50 years with some of the best tobacco on the planet.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Perfecto', 'Toro']",Mexican,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Churchill, Perfecto, Toro",Varies,Nicaraguan,Drew Estate Cigars
Joya de Nicaragua Cuatro Cinco,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"Cuatro....cinco....Look, I’m not the best counter in the world, but I do know one thing for sure – this limited edition handmade was crafted to celebrate a really important anniversary, the big four-five. Forty-five years of cigar wizardry by none other than Joya de Nicaragua. This Nicaraguan puro pays tribute to the land, the people, and the legacy.Cuatro Cinco really adds up. The ultra-special 5-year-aged tobacco leaves were saved specially for the occasion and aged in oak barrels to add a little something extra. Topping things off, a smooth and sleek Nicaraguan wrapper leaf from the Jalapa valley is the perfect complement. Notes of coffee, spice, and nuts combine in harmony, and remain perfectly balanced throughout the experience. In short, it’s a fitting tribute to celebrate four and a half decades of pure Nicaraguan awesomeness from JdN.",Full,"['Double Robusto', 'Petite Corona', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Double Robusto, Petite Corona, Toro, Torpedo",No,Nicaraguan,Joya de Nicaragua
Joya de Nicaragua JOYA Copper,Rated 3.75 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"This Copper is pure gold.Joya de Nicaragua has come along way since its creation in Nicaragua’s first cigar factory in 1964. More than 50 years after its inception, JdN is still the first choice for true connoisseur looking for a powerhouse stick. Now Joya de Nicaragua is adding a new horse to their stable of high strength handmades, the Joya de Nicaragua Copper!The Joya de Nicaragua Copper joins the Red, Black, and Silver as their newest colored release, and has flavors reminiscent of the flagship Antano 1970. Those who have enjoyed this blend know that it’s a supercharged Nicaraguan Puro with a spicy and delicious profile carrying quite a bit of strength. The Copper is just a bit more toned-down than that, exhibiting a medium-bodied flavor profile of wood, leather, and espresso, with a bit less spice than the 1970. Of course, they’re all made with JdN’s commitment to quality, and they’re sure to put a smile on your face when you light up and blow the first puffs. Grab a box today, and pair it with your favorite heavy after-dinner libations!",Full,"['Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Corona, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Nicaraguan,Joya de Nicaragua
Joya de Nicaragua JOYA Red,Rated 4.28 out of 5, Based on 47 Ratings ,"Joya de Nicaragua paints the town red.The stories surrounding Joya de Nicaragua's handmades stretch from sea to shining sea. Like brave knights coming to battle a fearsome dragon, many enthusiasts have entered the fray confident, only to be quickly tamed by bold, powerful profiles. I've seen it all too many times. We even had a guy pass out while using the facilities at one of our stores....he was puffing on it like a locomotive stuck on overdrive. Luckily, after about a 5 minute tile nap, he exited with just a bruised ego. He, like many before him, learned that Joya de Nicaragua makes one hell of a full-bodied cigar. But now, Joya de Nicaragua dials the strength down a bit for a cigar that's built for daily enjoyment. Without any further delay welcome, JOYA Red. Many of Joya de Nicaragua's handmades rely on potent ligeros to deliver their feisty bouquet. This time, lower tobacco primings were chosen to impart the same core flavors, but in a much more palatable fashion. Long-fillers from the uber-fertile regions of Esteli, Condega, and Jalapa, were stuffed into a golden hued Nicaraguan Habano wrapper. This recipe yielded a medium-bodied bouquet boasting strong doses of roasted nuts and pepper, as hints of leather, toast, and coffee also enter the fray. In a nutshell, JOYA Red is going to appeal to fans of Joya de Nicaragua, as well as newcomers of all shapes and sizes. Heck, even those still licking their wounds should thoroughly enjoy this one. JOYA Red received a well-deserved '90' rating noting: ""The lush draw of this cigar delivers a strong black pepper character that settles down to show notes of hickory, brown sugar and earth."" ",Medium,"['Cigarillos', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Cigarillos, Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,Joya de Nicaragua
Joya de Nicaragua Silver,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"This Silver is goldJoya de Nicaragua was established in 1968 and is Nicaragua’s first and oldest cigar factory still in operation. According to math, that makes 2018 the companies 50th anniversary. And what better way to celebrate than with a shiny new cigar. Over the years, this company has developed a portfolio of brands that caters to anyone and everyone, from the mellow and flavorful Cabinetta to the complex Joya Black, both beginners and connoisseurs alike have indulged in some fantastic JDN cigars. On their continuous quest for an unforgettable cigar, Joya Silver enters the fray with edgy packaging. Available in 4 box-pressed sizes, it offers a distinct perspective of Nicaraguan character, influenced by leaves from other regions. It comes filled with rich Nicaraguan long-fillers, held tight by Mexican binder. The outer wrapper is an Ecuador grown Habano leaf which adds a nice touch of sweetness to the hearty core. Overall, it’s a medium to full-bodied blend that offers complex notes of spice, chocolate and some cherry. The buy in is modest, hop on a box and see what 50 years in this industry is worth. Good news! Joya de Nicaragua Silver has received an impressive 92-point rating, noting: ""Crafted with a three-seam cap, this box-pressed cigar burns evenly. Its earthy character is enlivened by hearty impressions of fruit, roasted nuts and coffee bean.""",Medium,"['Corona', 'Corona Extra', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Mexican,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Corona Extra, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Drew Estate Cigars
Joya del Jefe,Rated 4.28 out of 5, Based on 143 Ratings ,"It ain't rated 90.... but it is a bargain""You can put your boots in the oven, but that doesn't make them biscuits."" Indeed. Joya del Jefe ain't the world's finest and will not be winning any awards among the chardonnay-and-brie crowd. However, if you're looking for a knockaround, enjoyable handmade at a cheapie price for in-between times, try this one on for size. This deal brings you 50 cigars for as low as a buck-forty apiece. It's a bargain, it's very well-made especially for a mixed-fill, and it's subtle. Can't promise you anything beyond that!",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Judge Wright by JC Newman,Rated 4.35 out of 5, Based on 162 Ratings ,"Give this cigar a fair trial.In the 1920’s J.C. Newman’s top-selling cigar was a little brand known as “Judge Wright.” Back then, the line had a simple slogan, “A fair trial will give a verdict in favor of this cigar.” Now, I’ve got to be honest. My experience with any sort of court is limited to Judge Judy and Law and Order reruns. However, if I were a judge, I’d throw anyone who didn’t like this cigar out, as they must be insane. This cigar is a straight up value, and I’d recommend getting in early and often. Judge Wright is a Nicaraguan puro with a Sun Grown wrapper, but unlike some similar blends, this one stays smooth and medium-bodied throughout. The ‘Cuban sandwich’ blend has great flavors of earth, leather, and slight spice. There’s nothing else I can say here, Judge Wright is a great everyday cigar. Case dismissed. ​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo",No,Ecuador Sungrown,
Kentucky Cheroots,Rated 4.4 out of 5, Based on 60 Ratings ,"All American made cigarillos from a time-tested company and a fan favorite is a recipe for success. Avanti brings you Kentucky Cheroots, made of 100% USA grown tobaccos hailing from Tennessee and Kentucky these are bold and rugged-looking firecrackers that get the job done in great fashion. Coming in 10 packs of 4 in each, you’ll be stacked to the brim with tasty morsels ripe for the picking.  ",Medium-Full,['Cigarillos'],,,False,No,More Details,United States,No,,Cigarillos,No,Kentucky Fire-Cured,
Kentucky Fire Cured Swamp Rat & Swamp Thang,Rated 4.35 out of 5, Based on 31 Ratings ,"Get your Swamp onThe Kentucky Fire Cured line from Drew Estate is an exceptionally unique line of handmades. The original blends pushed the limits of what a “conventional” cigar could be, introducing American fire-cured tobacco leaves from Virginia and Kentucky. And now, from the swamps of innovation, rises the Swamp Rat and the Swamp Thang — the newest additions to the Kentucky Fire Cured lines. So what makes these cigars so interesting? Just take a look at them – they’re green! That’s right, Swamp Rat and Swamp Thang each feature a unique Candela wrapper below the band. Combine that with the American fire cured leaves, and you’ve got a blend that’s truly never been seen before. Find flavors of grass, smoky BBQ, and light pepper. ",Medium,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Kentucky Fire-Cured, Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Cigarillos, Corona, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Kentucky Fire-Cured,Drew Estate Cigars
Key West Extra,Rated 4.25 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Don’t pay extra, get Key WestEver been to Key West? You’ll get nickeled and dimed down to your last penny down there. Lucky for you, Key West Extra remains a great value. The original 1876 Reserve Key West bundles are one of the best-selling bundle brands we carry, known for being mellow, affordable and perfect for everyday enjoyment. Key West Extra enters the game with added flavor.Up top sits a golden Connecticut wrapper from Ecuador over a Sumatra binder. The filler blend is all Dominican. It sits in the mellow to medium-bodied range, but it’s loaded with flavor. Expect a delicious core of cedar and sweetness, backed by the perfect touch of pepper on the finish. If you’re looking for a little extra bang for your buck, go with Key West.  ",Mellow-Medium,"['Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Sumatra,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Presidente, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Key West Select,Rated 3 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"An easy selectionA few years back, while on a purchasing trip in the Dominican Republic, we were offered up a boatload of mellow cigars at a price we couldn’t believe. We said yes before we even tasted the suckers. And we’re glad we did. They turned out to be pretty darn tasty and the 1876 Reserve Key West cigars have been flying off our shelves ever since. For those who have been looking for just a little bit more, here it is – Key West Select. Fresh off the boat with an Ecuador Connecticut wrapper that conceals an Indonesian Sumatra binder and a core of Dominican fillers. It’s a step up from 1876 reserve and falls in the mellow to medium-bodied ranged but remains smooth with notes of sweet cream, nuts, and a clean, crisp finish.",Mellow-Medium,"['Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Sumatra,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Presidente, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,
King Edward Cigars,Rated 4.61 out of 5, Based on 18 Ratings ,"- Known as America’s mellowest cigar- 100% natural filler tobaccos- Smooth, enjoyable flavor- Subtle in body",Mellow,['Corona'],,,False,No,More Details,United States,No,,Corona,No,Indonesian,
Kristoff 685 Woodlawn,Rated 4.7 out of 5,,"Take a little trip down nostalgia lane.Kristoff 685 Woodlawn is named for brand founder Glen Case’s address for the first 21 years of his life, and it’s meant to instantly evoke that feeling you get recalling your childhood home. Backyard shenanigans, barbecues, firefly catching, tree climbing – come on, you remember it, right?With a small-batch production and a blend of super special tobaccos, this is one memory maker you won’t want to miss. A blend of Nicaraguan, Dominican, and mysteriously undisclosed filler leaves are layered inside a Nicaraguan binder and then topped with a sleek and oily Brazilian wrapper leaf. This medium to full-bodied experience features peppery notes all the way through. It’s a fine creation from Kristoff that will leave you full of fond recollections.",Medium-Full,['Perfecto'],Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Perfecto,No,Brazilian,Kristoff
Kristoff Cameroon,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"A classic Cameroon blend.You’ve tried the usual suspects, now it’s time to try one of the hottest and fastest rising boutique brands around. Kristoff cigars have been stockpiling 90-plus ratings and filling humidors since their introduction in 2004. Kristoff Cameroon is dressed in an African Cameroon wrapper that was aged 7 years with Dominican and Nicaraguan Habano seed long-fillers under the sheets. This medium to full-bodied blend is silky smooth with seductive notes of baking spices, nuts, cedar, and earth completing the package. Coming packaged in old-school, rustic boxes filled with shredded tobacco and featuring the exquisite profile of a perfectly blended cigar, we’re confident Kristoff Cameroon is a handmade you’ll find yourself revisiting over and over again.  ​",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Robusto,No,Cameroon,Kristoff
Kristoff Connecticut,Rated 4.71 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"Kristoff Redefines Connecticuts Connecticuts, Connecticuts, Connecticuts. Every time I turn my head there's some new, mellow offering with a Connecticut wrapper in my gaze. And it makes sense. This wrapper has long been the most-requested and most-enjoyed leaf of any premium cigars. But with such a huge slew of Connecticut offerings available, there's bound to be imitators. Kristoff Connecticut cigars are, luckily, the absolute real deal. You know the formula at this point. Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper + Nicaraguan binder. But Kristoff brings a quad Dominican mixture of long-fillers to bat as well. The result is a Connecticut like none I've burnt before. The typical notes of sweet cream and slight spice are present, but they're joined by a nuttiness and a vanilla undertone. If I haven't made it clear at this point: Kristoff Connecticut is absolutely worth your time. ​",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Kristoff
Kristoff Corojo Limitada,Rated 4.86 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"Habano times three.The Kristoff Corojo Limitada is carefully crafted in true boutique fashion in the Dominican, utilizing the finest most patiently fermented Cuban-seed tobaccos. Greeting you on the outside, a Nicaraguan Corojo wrapper shimmering with oily goodness. Beneath this leaf awaits a long-filler core of Nicaraguan and Dominican Habano tobaccos, secured by a Nicaraguan Habano binder. This triple dose of Habano dishes out medium to full-bodied stogie exuding hints of leather, spice, roasted nuts, and a spicy-sweet finish. In short - pick up a few of these, and I guarantee you will find them highly enjoyable.Great news, the Kristoff Corojo Limitada earned a spot in the Top 25 Cigars of the Year along with an impressive 93-point rating. This comes after already garnering a 92-point rating, which noted:""A tasty and bold dark torpedo with an even draw and fine burn. Sweet anise and raisin notes take on richness and minerality as the cigar progresses.""​",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Corojo,Kristoff
Kristoff Criollo,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 12 Ratings ,"Traditional in every sense. Kristoff Criollo is made in small-batch fashion in the Dominican Republic utilizing a dark, Nicaraguan Habano Criollo wrapper, a Cuban-seed Dominican binder, and an all Cuban-seed blend of Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers. The result is a medium-bodied smoke that's layered with subtle notes of cedar, nuts, earth, and spices. It burns slow and true, dishing out a cool, extremely smooth flavor with each puff. And as an added bonus, each Kristoff Criollo comes finished with a Cuban-inspired pigtail and shaggy foot. Grab Kristoff Criollo for a boutique that always delivers.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Habano,Kristoff
Kristoff GC Signature Series,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"The boss's cigar.Kristoff GC Signature Series is hands down one of the most intriguing blends to bear the Kristoff name. Due to producing rich, chewy notes of oak, molasses, dried fruit, and cocoa, along with a spicy-sweet finish, it's easy to see why. The word on the street is this blend is the personal favorite of Kristoff owner and creator Glen Case. And honestly, I don't blame him one bit. On the outside awaits a Brazilian Maduro wrapper, boasting a gorgeous oily sheen. Tucked just beneath this leaf a long-filler, Cuban-seed core of Dominican, Honduran, and Nicaraguan tobaccos secured by a Honduran binder. If you're asking me, I'd have to say that a ton of people will enjoy this full-bodied, flavor-packed handmade.The Kristoff GC Signature Series earned an impressive 91-rating, noting: ""Near black with a thick pigtail cap and uncut foot. First puffs show straw-and-hay flavors leading to leathery notes that become sweeter""",Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",Honduran,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto",No,Brazilian,Kristoff
Kristoff Kristania,Rated 4.71 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"All Kristoff....half the price.Kristoff Kristania hails from the same boutique factory in the Dominican as the rest of the Kristoff line, where each cigar is carefully crafted from top-notch tobaccos before undergoing a series of strict quality control measures. So why the cheaper price? Honestly I don't know, but Scout's honor the only thing you'll take heed of are a few more bucks in your wallet. Dressed in a dark brown Nicaraguan Criollo wrapper and supported by a core of Dominican Habano long-fillers, each cigar produces a rich medium-bodied profile. Notes of espresso, cocoa, vanilla, gentle spices, and natural sweetness all enter the fray before a long satisfying finish. A highly enjoyable offering indeed.",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Criollo,Kristoff
Kristoff Kristania Maduro,Rated 4.6 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"Kristania reappears in maduro form.After the overwhelming success of Kristania, a follow up to this budget friendly Kristoff was inevitable. Sporting the same packaging sizes as the original in a darker stained box, Kristoff unveils Kristania Maduro. This addition uses the same Dominican Habano long-fillers as the original, but swaps in a chocolaty, Brazilian maduro wrapper leaf. This medium-bodied, full-flavored concoction boasts aromatic notes of cocoa, hazelnut, coffee, and spice, capped off by a long, cool finish. The result…another instant classic from Kristoff.",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Brazilian,Kristoff
Kristoff Ligero Criollo,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Ligero times three.The Kristoff Ligero series takes the traditional Kristoff blends to bold new heights, utilizing three times the ligero to produce a full-bodied, full-flavored bouquet layered with satisfying nuances, but maintaining perfect balance throughout the burn.Ligero Criollo is a beautiful handmade with a dark, chocolate-brown color and impressive oils. Each generous vitola is made entirely with Cuban-seed long-fillers, including a Cuban-seed blend of Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers with ample long-leaf ligeros at play. This feisty combination is secured within a bold Dominican binder, then cloaked by a thick and leathery Honduran Criollo wrapper. Once removed from the aging rooms, each Kristoff Ligero Criollo burns slowly to produce a medium to full-bodied array of flavor, including toast, cedar, nuts, and sweet spices on the long but refined finish. The strength gradually increases throughout the burn, ending with a full-bodied, full-flavored crescendo.Kristoff Ligero Criollo received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""This pigtailed lancer is rolled with an uncut foot. Plenty of smoke on the draw layers the palate with hearty, savory flavors of leather, sea salt and black pepper.""",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto",No,Criollo,Kristoff
Kristoff Ligero Maduro,Rated 4.86 out of 5, Based on 14 Ratings ,"Ligero times three.The Kristoff Ligero series takes the traditional Kristoff blends to bold new heights, utilizing three times the ligero to produce a full-bodied, full-flavored bouquet layered with satisfying nuances, but maintaining perfect balance throughout the burn.The Ligero Maduro blend boasts a dark, oily, and super-thick Brazilian wrapper to conceal a full-flavored Cuban-seed mixture of Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers secured within a feisty Cuban-seed Dominican binder from the Cibao Valley. After extensive post-roll aging, these cigars open the palate with rich and toasty nuances, including roasted espresso bean, dark cocoa, black tobacco, and a long, spicy-sweetness from the wrapper. A powerful, richly rendered maduro delivered in smooth, balanced fashion....that’s Kristoff Ligero Maduro.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Brazilian,Kristoff
Kristoff Maduro,Rated 4.44 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"Maduro goodness, complements of Kristoff. The Maduro version of Kristoff comes dressed in a dark, oily Brazilian Maduro wrapper that's loaded with flavor. On the inside is a well-fermented, well-aged blend of robust Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers. This combination leads to a rich, chewy profile offering notes of espresso, pepper, and earth. Well-balanced, flavorful, and smooth, Kristoff Maduro is highly enjoyable. ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Brazilian,Kristoff
Kristoff San Andres,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"An artful blend from Kristoff.Since being founded in 2004, Kristoff cigars have quietly amassed a boatload of 90-plus ratings and are one of the fastest growing boutique brands in the industry. Using top quality premium tobaccos and relying on generations of Cuban cigar making experience, Kristoff cigars feature flawless construction and deliver an exquisitely rich flavor profile.Kristoff San Andres is sheathed in a San Andres wrapper hugging an Ecuadorian Habano seed binder, and Nicaraguan Habano seed long-fillers. This blend is luxuriously rich, medium to full-bodied, and embraces your palate with notes of spice, black pepper, and chocolate with a smooth coffee cream finish. Give Kristoff cigars a try and see for yourself why this brand is quietly becoming a go-to for aficionados across the country. ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",Habano,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto",No,San Andres,Kristoff
Kristoff Shade Grown,Rated 4.52 out of 5,,"A first from Kristoff.The Kristoff Shade Grown marks the first release of a mellower handmade in the Kristoff portfolio. But just like the other cigars found under the Kristoff umbrella, this one promises big-time flavor. And boy does it hit its mark. Draped in a silky Honduran Connecticut shade wrapper, and brimming with aged Cuban-seed Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers, expect a highly complex, yet exceptionally smooth to medium-bodied profile. Prominent notes of cream, nuts, toast, and gentle spices make an appearance behind a buttery rich finish. A fine display of depth, flavor and complexity all wrapped up into one savory package. That's the Kristoff Shade Grown.Note: This cigar has received a packaging & name update. Previously known as Brittania Reserva, the Shade Grown is the same exact blend under a new name.",Medium-Full,"['Double Robusto', 'Double Toro']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,False,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Double Robusto, Double Toro",No,Honduran Connecticut,Kristoff
Kristoff Sumatra,Rated 4.83 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"Not your average Sumatra-wrapped Dominican.Kristoff Sumatra is a tasty treat from the Dominican Republic. At play, a thick and leathery Sumatra wrapper, expertly fermented and lovingly hugging an aged blend of Cuban-seed Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers inside a flavorful Brazilian binder. These tobaccos marry nicely, creating a complex, medium-bodied core of rich and creamy tobacco flavors complemented by sweet notes, cedar, and a unique peanut-like nuance. Eventful down to the nub, Kristoff Sumatra is a great choice when looking for a solid and dependable cigar for everyday enjoyment.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Sumatra,Kristoff
Kristoff Vengeance,Rated 4.29 out of 5,,"Back with a vengeanceKristoff Cigars first started crafting their cigars back in 2004 and has been one of the fastest growing boutique brands ever since. Now with a slew of blends on the market and many notable ratings, fans everywhere know them for a few things: old school pigtail caps, the loose tobacco in box packaging, and their bold medium to full-bodied blends. Their most recent effort is the re-release of Kristoff Vengeance – a cigar that was once popular back in 2011. Kristoff Vengeance returns with a few tweaks in the blend. The original Brazilian Maduro wrapper is replaced by an equally tasty Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper, as well an Indonesian leaf for the binder, which holds the same core of finely-aged Dominican and Nicaragua long-fillers. It lands firmly in the medium to full-bodied range with delicious flavors of espresso, sweet mocha, graham cracker, and spice. If you enjoyed the original Vengeance, or Kristoff Cigars in general, this is yet another pure-bread winner that is sure to leave you satisfied. ",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],Indonesian,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Robusto,No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Kristoff
La Alianza Rosado by E.P. Carrillo,Rated 4.83 out of 5,,"Well-deserved recognition.E.P. Carrillo is an important man in the cigar industry. First rising to fame during the cigar boom of the ‘90s, Carrillo was responsible for the blending of the La Gloria Cubana, one of the most ubiquitous cigars in any shop. Many of Carrillo’s most popular & successful blends are produced at Tabacalera La Alianza in the Dominican Republic, and now there’s a brand new Carrillo-blended cigar bearing the factory’s name. Introducing: La Alianza Rosado by E.P. Carrillo.La Alianza Rosado is covered in a gorgeous, oily Ecuadorian Rosado wrapper. The binder & filler blend is all Nicaraguan, and the leaves are lovingly combined and constructed into a delightful cigar with a great draw, even burn, and medium-bodied flavors of dried fruit, cedar, spice, and nuts. Chances are many of the cigars you’ve enjoyed have come from La Alianza, so it’s about time you got a box of cigars with the same name!",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Toro",No,"Ecuador Sungrown, Rosado",E.P. Carrillo
La Aroma de Cuba,Rated 4.66 out of 5, Based on 159 Ratings ,"The new La Aroma de Cuba.Now made by Jose ’Don Pepin’ Garcia in Nicaragua, La Aroma de Cuba is a bold blend of Cuban-seed Nicaraguan long-fillers insider a dark Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper. The flavor is zesty throughout with a smooth core of deep, earthy sensations balanced by a rich core of tobacco flavors. Medium to full in body and complex, La Aroma de Cuba is a flavorful, well-made, and aesthetically pleasing handmade.La Aroma de Cuba received a 93-point rating, noting: ""Impeccably made with a dead-even burn and consistent draw... full of bold, woody, nutty flavors that leave smoked almond and leathery notes on the palate.""",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Corona, Double Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,La Aroma de Cuba
La Aroma de Cuba Edicion Especial,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 20 Ratings ,"A bold new statement from La Aroma.Enjoy Edicion Especial, a tasty new variety from La Aroma de Cuba. Carefully crafted by hand in Nicaragua by cigar artisan Jose 'Don Pepin' Garcia, the Edicion Especial is enchanting through and through. On the outside, a leathery Cuban-seed wrapper glistens with oils. Grown in the misty valleys of Ecuador, this flavorful leaf conceals a robust mixture of aged Cuban-seed long-fillers from the black, volcanic soils of Nicaragua. Together, these tobaccos produce a hearty experience layered with deep, toasty flavors. A silky bouquet smacks the palate with an earthy core of aromatic nuances supported by notes of cedar, leather, and white pepper. Medium to full-bodied, La Aroma de Cuba Edicion Especial is a satisfying, well-made cigar built for enjoyment.In addition to a 93-point rating and 'Humidor Selection' honors, La Aroma de Cuba Edicion Especial was named one of the Top Cigars of the Year, numero four to be exact. The rating noted: ""A very attractive belicoso with a great draw and even burn. Every puff is rich with coffee and cocoa notes, yet well balanced by cedary flavors and plenty of spice.""",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gigante', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Corona, Gigante, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Ecuador Sumatra,La Aroma de Cuba
La Aroma de Cuba Mi Amor,Rated 4.76 out of 5, Based on 181 Ratings ,"The latest addition to the La Aroma de Cuba saga....La Aroma de Cuba 'Mi Amor' is hand crafted in Don Pepin Garcia's Nicaraguan factory. Utilizing a dark, toothy Cuban-seed wrapper grown in Mexico and a robust Nicaraguan long-filler blend, Mi Amor offers a rich, medium to full-bodied profile. Brimming with notes of earth, cocoa, espresso, spices and a smooth, semi-sweet finish. Complex, flavorful, balanced and perfectly constructed, La Aroma de Cuba Mi Amor is thoroughly satisfying.A former #2 cigar of the year (and 95-rated) from 2011, La Aroma de Cuba Mi Amor has once again been honored on the Top 25 List for 2016. Coming in at #13 and receiving a well deserved 93-rating, noting: ""Packed solid with tobacco, this box-pressed belicoso integrates notes of cocoa bean and coffee with sweet woodiness and a touch of leather. There's a touch of licorice on the finish.""",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,San Andres,La Aroma de Cuba
La Aroma de Cuba Mi Amor Reserva,Rated 4.79 out of 5, Based on 70 Ratings ,"The love saga continues....Enter the exciting new follow up to the heralded #2 Cigar of the Year, La Aroma de Cuba 'Mi Amor' Reserva. This time around don't expect a drastic overhaul, but rather a tweaking of the existing blend. But don’t worry, Reserva packs plenty of subtle nuances providing more than enough change to keep things interesting. Hand-crafted in Nicaragua at Pepin Garcia's My Father factory, each Mi Amor Reserva is draped in a dark and enticing Cuban-seed San Andres Oscuro wrapper. This toothsome leaf hugs a potent array of aged Nicaraguan long-fillers. Together this ensemble delivers a bevy of rich, smooth flavors in spades. Notes of roasted coffee, cocoa, earth, sweetness and a hint of cedar all make an appearance behind an impressively refined finish. Throughout the cool, slow burn, expect a gentle note of spice to enter the fray, weaving its way through the impressive bouquet. Although a tad stronger than its counterpart, Mi Amor Reserva never sacrifices an ounce of that renowned La Aroma smoothness.Mi Amor Reserva joins the rest of the 90+ rated family of La Aroma de Cuba blends, earning a 94-point score and a rating in the Top 25 Cigars of 2013, noting: ""The well-made cigar has hickory and almond notes that lead into hints of dark chocolate and earth.""",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",San Andres,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Varies,San Andres,La Aroma de Cuba
La Aroma de Cuba Noblesse,Rated 4.8 out of 5, Based on 10 Ratings ,"One fine specimen. The first limited edition La Aroma de Cuba. Sounds tasty already, right? And it is. REALLY FREAKIN’ DELICIOUS. It ain’t cheap though, but the best never is. Even at $14+ apiece, I’m considering going back for seconds. Hailing from Pepin’s My Father Factory in Nicaragua, La Aroma de Cuba Noblesse features a pristine Ecuadorian Habano Rosado wrapper and an all-Nicaraguan blend of Cuban-seed tobaccos from Pepin’s farms. Special is an understatement, this cigar is exceptional. Rich, loaded with flavor, and perfectly Cuban-esque, Noblesse offers a ultra-complex bouquet of nuts, leather, fruit, spices, coffee, honey, and cream delivered in smooth, elegant fashion. Only 3,000 boxes are being produced yearly, so get in line now. Note: Adding to the exclusivity of the La Aroma de Cuba Noblesse release is the introduction of the ""Viceroy"" size. Quantities are extremely limited. ​",Medium-Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Habano,La Aroma de Cuba
La Aurora 107,Rated 4.88 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"107 years, and counting!Crafted in celebration of the 107th Anniversary of La Aurora, this new medium to full-bodied handmade is impressive. Featuring a dark, oily Ecuadorian sun-grown wrapper leaf and a dense long-filler blend from Nicaragua and the Dominican Republic, La Aurora 107 unleashes a rich and balanced profile that's layered with notes of cedar, spices, earth, and a slightly sweet finish. As it burns, it builds slightly in body and the flavors intensify before an impressively flavorful finale. Beautifully presented in Spanish cedar boxes of 21 cigars. Burn one of these, and you'll experience some of La Aurora's best. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,La Aurora
La Aurora 1495 Series,Rated 4.31 out of 5, Based on 103 Ratings ,"Behold, La Aurora's finest creation to dateIn 1495, Christopher Columbus sailed to the Dominican Republic, where he arrived to the fertile valley of Cibao - home of today's finest Dominican tobaccos - founding the city of Santiago de los Caballeros. La Aurora's 1495 Series honors the foundation of this city with a supremely-made, medium to full-bodied blend that could be the factory's greatest accomplishment to date. Combining a complex, but patiently aged, blend of Dominican Corojo and Dominican-seed ligero grown in Nicaragua, the 1495 is adorned with a stunning, marbleized Ecuadorian-grown wrapper leaf that's thick, toothy and loaded with pop. Chewy hints of leather and spice excite the taste buds without overpowering the palate, keeping the flavors smooth and balanced from first light to your very last puff.La Aurora 1495 Series received a well-deserved 92-point rating, noting: ""Dark and oily with a strikingly even burn. It starts out with a mineral sweetness, then progresses to a balance of spice, coffee bean, and wood.""",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Robusto']","Corojo, Dominican","Dominican, Nicaraguan, Peruvian",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Robusto",No,Ecuador Habano,La Aurora
La Aurora 1985 Maduro,Rated 4.31 out of 5,,"A solid addition to the Time Capsule Series!Established in the Dominican Republic, La Aurora has a strong company history rooted in traditions. One such tradition, the Time Capsule Series line of cigars, releases specific blends and wrappers and names them utilizing those unique attributes and their corresponding years. As their fourth addition to this line, La Aurora introduced the 1985 Maduro. Underneath the dark Brazilian Maduro wrapper leaf awaits Nicaraguan binder and fillers that combine to produce a medium-bodied experience that engulfs the senses with cascading notes of oak, earth, leather, nutmeg, black pepper, and cocoa. The cigar’s secure construction ensures a solid burn throughout encounter, adding to one’s enjoyment. So go on, step back in time and indulge in this nostalgic piece of La Aurora history!",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Double Toro', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,,More Details,Dominican Republic,False,,"Churchill, Double Toro, Robusto, Toro",False,"Brazilian, Maduro",La Aurora
La Aurora ADN Dominicano,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"It’s in the DNALa Aurora is one of the oldest cigar manufacturers in the business. So it’s no surprise that they have perfected the oldest tobacco-processing technique and put it to good use in the La Aurora ADN. This process is Andullo tobacco. Instead of the tobacco being placed in the usual pilones (large piles or rotating tobacco), Andullo tobacco is made by taking the harvested tobacco and then wrapping it up into large pods that are then rooted into the ground. This tobacco is typically used in pipe tobacco and is known for its strength, aroma, and sweetness. ADN Dominicano was crafted to honor the special Andullo tobacco, but it actually uses tobaccos from a few different countries. The wrapper is a chocolate brown Dominican leaf from the Cibao Valley while a Camerron binder holds long-fillers from Pennsylvania and Nicaragua, as well as a full leaf of Domincan Andullo. It’s full-bodied but never overpowering with notes of chocolate, spice, some woodsy notes, and a pleasant sweetness. This unique offering is definitely worth a try. Good news, La Aurora ADN Dominicano has received an impressive 90-point rating, noting: “The spicy, woody notes of this cigar meld pleasantly with hints of sweetness that segue into a graham cracker finish. The cigar draws and burns evenly throughout.”",Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Cameroon,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Dominican,La Aurora
La Aurora Barrel Aged,Rated 3.45 out of 5, Based on 22 Ratings ,"La Aurora's finest?The secret to La Aurora Barrel Aged is that all of the tobaccos, including wrappers, spend four years aging in oak barrels - barrels formerly used to age Dominican Rum. The wrapper is Dominican Corojo that has undergone several fermentation processes to produce a maduro shade. This further mellows the blend, allowing it to tame the complex mixture of Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers inside. La Aurora Barrel Aged is a medium-to full-bodied cigar layered with rich tobacco flavors. You’ll pick up a sweet spice upon first light and towards the nub, with a rich, chewy, and toasty bouquet in between. The burn is slow and true, completing another fine specimen from the Dominican’s oldest factory, La Aurora.Rated 91 and voted into the Top 25 Cigars of the Year list: ""A dark and attractive pyramid with an even draw that produces a heavy, thick smoke rich with woody, toasty flavors that hint of mocha and coffee bean.""",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Robusto,No,Corojo,La Aurora
La Aurora Bristol Especial Maduro,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"A lion's share of hearty flavors for a mouse-sized price.La Aurora is a company deserving of copious amounts of praise. They've been bringing us cigars that set the standard for Dominican tobacco since they became the first established Dominican cigar factory, and the numbers don't lie. They're still going strong well into the 21st century, and the newest addition to the La Aurora portfolio is nothing short of a masterpiece.This version of the La Aurora Bristol Especial replaces the Cameroon from the original with a dark, toothy Maduro wrapper overtop the same blend of Piloto Cubano, Olor Dominicano, and Nicaraguan long fillers. The result is a rich, deep flavor profile including notes of earth, coffee, and cocoa, which steadily develops more complexity as the straight burn gets closer to the band. The impeccable construction is no less than we expect from La Aurora, and the prices are surprisingly low for quality of this caliber. Keep your humidor stocked with La Aurora Bristol Especial Maduro cigars, and you'll never be lacking in hearty Dominican flavor. ",,[],,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,False,,,False,Maduro,La Aurora
La Aurora Cameroon Palmas Extra,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"A classic La Aurora blend beefed up!La Aurora has been crafting cigars in the Dominican Republic for over 100 years. And you sure as hell don't make it in the industry that long without doing things right. No shortcuts, or easy street attitude, because when it comes to La Aurora, only the best will suffice. Case in point the La Aurora Cameroon.The classic La Aurora Cameroon blend was a winner. Period. In fact there was nothing wrong with the blend. But in an effort to evolve toward a market craving stronger cigars, the blend was tweaked for a bit more gusto. Draped in a dark, toothy Cameroon wrapper, a lovely cedary sweetness remains the backbone of the medium to full-bodied profile. But thanks to an amped up core of Dominican long-fillers, layers of coffee, earth, and cream join the fray. Cool, rich and highly satisfying, the La Aurora Cameroon is stronger, more flavorful, and better than ever. ",Medium,['Lancero/Pantella'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Lancero/Pantella,No,Cameroon,
La Aurora Embassador Habana Corojo,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Aurora bonita!La Aurora is the quintessential Dominican cigar brand. They were the first established cigar factory in the island nation, and they’ve provided excellent expressions of their Dominican heritage to connoisseurs all over the world for over 100 years. It takes dedication and skilled craftsmanship to build a brand this successful, so when La Aurora announces a new release, we’re all over it. And you’re not going to want to pass up what I have for you today.Nestled inside an Ecuador-grown Havana Vuelta Arriva seed wrapper is a bevy of tasty leaves from 3 different countries. Dominican Corojo Ligero, Colombian Cubita, Nicaraguan Viso, and Criollo 98 Seco long-fillers are masterfully blended and secured with a Dominican Corojo binder, for an elegant experience with notes of toast, nuts, spice, cedar, and citrus. It takes a while to try all of the blends La Aurora has to offer, but with CI’s low everyday prices, the Embassador Habana Corojo is a great place to start.",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Corojo, Dominican","Colombian, Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro",False,Ecuador Habano,La Aurora
La Aurora Embassador Maduro,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Aged 10 YearsLa Aurora Cigars are steeped in history and tradition. It was the first established cigar factory in the Dominican Republic and the only one with 100 percent Dominican Roots. La Aurora means “rise like the dawn” and their cigars have certainly risen to be some of the best cigars on the market since their humble beginnings. And what we have at hand here is a rare treat that should be added to cart ASAP. During a factory visit down in the DR they kindly showed us to an aging room where they had shelves full of these bundled beauties that had been patiently aging for 10 years – a project that simply never came to fruition. And after puffing down a few samples, it was a no brainer. These things are the real deal, so we took them all off their hands are passing the savings on to CI Nation. They’re covered in an oily Brazilian maduro wrapper, and stuffed to gills with Dominican, Brazilian, Nicaraguan, and Peruvian long-fillers. A smooth medium-bodied cigar with a pleasant notes of chocolate, cedar, leather, and black pepper. The only bad news? This is one time deal, so hop on these aged treats while they’re still available. ",Medium,[],Brazil,"Brazilian, Dominican, Nicaraguan, Peruvian",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,False,,,False,Brazilian,La Aurora
La Aurora Preferidos Diamond,Rated 4.88 out of 5,,"Gorgeous.The Preferidos line was the first cigar manufactured in the Dominican Republic back in 1903. Its beautiful, unique shape was designed to offer a perfect blend of varying intensities. Preferidos, the cigar that established the cigar-making tradition of the Dominican Republic, is now rolled in limited quantities. This time-tested, super-premium cigar offers the finest wrappers and vintage long-fillers aged patiently aged in rum barrels.The Preferidos Diamond wears a deep, rich Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper over Dominican bunder & fillers, resulting in a full-bodied profile of coffee, pepper, and cedar, with a spicy finish. An excellent follow-up to a heavy meal. Great news! La Aurora Preferidos Diamond has been awared a 90-point rating, noting: ""A dark perfecto with a handsome zeppelin shape. It burns and draws well, showing rich, semisweet choco- late flavor, raisin sweetness and a dried cherry finish.""",Full,"['Double Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Double Perfecto, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,La Aurora
La Aurora Preferidos Emerald,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Gorgeous.The Preferidos line was the first cigar manufactured in the Dominican Republic back in 1903. Its beautiful, unique shape was designed to offer a perfect blend of varying intensities. Preferidos, the cigar that established the cigar-making tradition of the Dominican Republic, is now rolled in limited quantities. This time-tested, super-premium cigar offers the finest wrappers and vintage long-fillers aged patiently aged in rum barrels.An oily Ecuador Sumatra wrapper adorns the La Aurora Preferidos Emerald. Combined with Dominican binder & fillers, this absolute gem produces a luxurious medium-bodied profile laden with earth, oak, leather, and a slight sweetness that lasts long into the finish.Great news! La Aurora Preferidos Emerald has received a 91-point rating, noting: ""Despite the bulbous body and tapered ends, this classic perfecto draws and burns evenly. The smoke is well balanced with coffee bean flavors, cedary notes, earthiness and a nutty finish.""",Medium,"['Double Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Double Perfecto, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Sumatra,La Aurora
La Aurora Preferidos Gold,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Gorgeous.The Preferidos line was the first cigar manufactured in the Dominican Republic back in 1903. Its beautiful, unique shape was designed to offer a perfect blend of varying intensities. Preferidos, the cigar that established the cigar-making tradition of the Dominican Republic, is now rolled in limited quantities. This time-tested, super-premium cigar offers the finest wrappers and vintage long-fillers aged patiently aged in rum barrels.La Aurora Preferidos Gold utilizes a Dominican-grown Corojo leaf over Dominican long-fillers, resulting in a mellow to medium-bodied profile suitable for all-day enjoyment. The subtly spicy notes of cedar, nuts, and toast will pair equally well with a morning coffee or evening nightcap, and the excellent construction ensures a reliable experience. Good news! La Aurora Preferidos Gold has received a 91-point rating, noting: ""an attractive perfecto whose even draw delivers a dense, chewy smoke full of heavy wood and coffee flavors balanced by sweet and spicy flavor.""",Mellow-Medium,"['Double Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Double Perfecto, Robusto, Toro",No,"Corojo, Dominican",La Aurora
La Aurora Preferidos Platinum,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Gorgeous.The Preferidos line was the first cigar manufactured in the Dominican Republic back in 1903. Its beautiful, unique shape was designed to offer a perfect blend of varying intensities. Preferidos, the cigar that established the cigar-making tradition of the Dominican Republic, is now rolled in limited quantities. This time-tested, super-premium cigar offers the finest wrappers and vintage long-fillers aged patiently aged in rum barrels.The La Aurora Preferidos Platinum wears a toothy African Cameroon wrapper atop a Dominican binder and long-fillers. Earthy and rich, this medium to full-bodied expression of blending expertise features an earthy-sweet profile of cocoa, coffee, oak, and nuts. Unique yet familiar, this is a cigar that can please any palate. Great news! La Aurora Preferidos Platinum has received a 91-point rating, noting: ""Pleasant wheaty notes underscore some notes of freshly ground black pepper corn that lead to a warm leathery, salt-and-pepper-like finish.""",Medium-Full,"['Double Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Double Perfecto, Robusto, Toro",No,Cameroon,La Aurora
La Aurora Preferidos Ruby,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Gorgeous.The Preferidos line was the first cigar manufactured in the Dominican Republic back in 1903. Its beautiful, unique shape was designed to offer a perfect blend of varying intensities. Preferidos, the cigar that established the cigar-making tradition of the Dominican Republic, is now rolled in limited quantities. This time-tested, super-premium cigar offers the finest wrappers and vintage long-fillers aged patiently aged in rum barrels.La Aurora Preferidos Ruby is draped in an oily Brazilian Maduro wrapper, which hearkens back to the original wrappers used on the very first La Aurora cigar made in the Dominican, way back in 1903. Medium to full in body and pleasantly spicy, this gem also exhibits a subtle, natural sweetness and notes of red pepper, leather, and earth. Great news! La Aurora Preferidos has reveived 90 and 92-point ratings, one review noting: ""An old-fashioned, blimp-shaped perfecto with a pointy tip and dark wrapper. Though it starts out rough and charred, it quickly turns into a woody, peppery smoke with toast and caramel flavors. Full bodied and pleasant""",Medium-Full,"['Double Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Double Perfecto, Robusto, Toro",No,"Brazilian, Maduro",La Aurora
La Aurora Preferidos Sapphire,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Gorgeous.The Preferidos line was the first cigar manufactured in the Dominican Republic back in 1903. Its beautiful, unique shape was designed to offer a perfect blend of varying intensities. Preferidos, the cigar that established the cigar-making tradition of the Dominican Republic, is now rolled in limited quantities. This time-tested, super-premium cigar offers the finest wrappers and vintage long-fillers aged patiently aged in rum barrels.La Aurora Preferidos Sapphire utilizes Dominican, Brazilian, and Cameroon fillers adorned by a smooth & oily Ecuador Sun-Grown Connecticut wrapper. Full-bodied notes of cedar and espresso are at the forefront, with a backing of toast, pepper, and leather. Meticulously crafted, and possibly the most unique of the Preferidos selections. Great news! La Aurora Preferidos Sapphire has received a 90-point rating, noting: ""This short perfecto is solidly constructed. It burns and draws fine. It has a toasty aroma and complementary toasty, woody flavors. The finish smacks of cinnamon.""",Full,"['Double Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Double Perfecto, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,La Aurora
La Aurora Principes,Rated 4.44 out of 5, Based on 756 Ratings ,"Big on value, small on price.La Aurora cigars are made in the oldest factory in the Dominican Republic – established in 1903 with a rich 100 year tradition of cigar making. Popular among native Dominicans, they’re made from the trimmings of the regular La Aurora cigar production and are the pride of the Dominican cigar industry. Principes are short-filler blends offering a flavorful medium-bodied taste and smooth draw. And at these prices, you can enjoy these day in and day out without breaking a sweat. Great news! Principes are now available in flavors! Made the exact same way as the original Principes line, and are gently infused with delicious all-natural flavors.NOTE: La Aurora Principes have undergone a packaging change. The cigars have not changed at all, just the names on the boxes.Cherry is now ""Red"".Natural is now ""Original"".Chocolate is now ""Brown"".Rum is now ""Caribbean"".Vanilla is now ""Blond"".",Medium,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Corona Gordo']",,Dominican,Varies,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Cigarillos, Corona, Corona Gordo",Varies,Cameroon,La Aurora
La Aurora Untamed,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Unabashed, Unapologetic, Untamed.Being the forth major release in two years for La Aurora, this timeless brand is at the top of its game with Untamed. This firecracker is not for the faint of heart, billed as the strongest release from the La Aurora camp to date, it has proven to live up to the hype. Straying from the norm with Untamed’s packaging as well, La Aurora leaves its customary traditional packaging behind for an updated, in your face look that will catch your eyes from afar.A potent, oily Connecticut Broadleaf Maduro wrapper conceals hearty long-fillers from the Dominican and Nicaragua. Blasts of black pepper greet you from the start with cocoa and subtle citrus overtones adding to Untamed’s complexity. Balanced with spot-on construction and a snow white, firm ash all add to its allure. If you are a fan of the full-bodied persuasion, this is a must try.     ",Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,La Aurora
La Aurora Untamed Extreme,Rated 4.67 out of 5,,"Go extreme.La Aurora is the oldest cigar factory in the Dominican Republic, beginning operations over a century ago. They are recognized as the crown jewel of the Dominican due in part to their longevity and their phone book sized portfolio of highly-rated blends. When looking for a well-made, flavorful Dominican cigar, most enthusiasts will reach for a La Aurora. La Aurora Untamed Extreme features edgier packaging and a more robust recipe than any of their previous releases.  Coming dressed in a Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper hugging a blend of Dominican and Nicaraguan long leaves, Untamed Extreme is full-bodied and full-flavored.  Upon lighting, expect notes of cocoa, earth, pepper, spice, and cedar with the flavors remaining in perfect balance. Give Untamed Extreme a try and experience the richer, bolder, more powerful side of La Aurora. ​",Medium-Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,La Aurora
La Barba One & Only,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"The one, the only, the masterpiece.Tony Bellato’s La Barba brand has spent the better part of the last decade picking up steam and carving out a tidy chunk of the premium cigar market for themselves, and now they’re running full-speed towards legend status. The now-iconic straight razor that graces their bands is a clear indicator of a great cigar experience to come, but the newest line from the certified sommelier’s line up is the follow-up to a limited edition released in 2016, and is the first name in their portfolio to eschew the razor imagery.For the La Barba One & Only, Bellato sourced tobaccos aged for an average of 13 years, and expertly blended them into a hefty 6.5” x 54 double toro size, bursting at the seams with flavor, nuance, and complexity. The fillers come from the Dominican Republic, Nicaragua, and Pennsylvania, and the leathery Habano wrapper hails from the cloud-covered fields of Ecuador. The imagery is a bit bizarre but striking, to say the least, but the cigars inside are expertly crafted, and will please even the pickiest of connoisseurs. I’ll bet that you’re going to like this cigar, but you’ll want to try it quick. Because of the rare tobacco used, once they’re gone, they’re gone!",Medium-Full,['Double Toro'],,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, Pennsylvania",False,False,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Double Toro,No,Ecuador Habano,
La Barba Purple,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Shave n’ a haircut, with a puff or two on the side!When WSET-certified sommelier Tony Bellato and his best friend Craig Rossi decided to create a cigar company, they spent two years at the drawing board crafting their inaugural release, the La Barba Red. The response was better than they could have hoped for, and with Caldwell handling distribution, their popularity exploded and fans yelled for more. Bellato heard, and more is exactly what he delivered with the release of the La Barba Purple.This line extension was carefully blended with assistance from Henderson Ventura and Robert Caldwell, two masters of the cigar industry with plenty of experience and expertise to go around. The cigar consists of an Ecuadorian HVA Habano wrapper overtop a Dominican corojo binder, but the real magic is in the filler. Among corojo and HVA habano is a special, rare Dominican leaf called Carbonell. The profile is a delectable combination of black pepper, wood, and toast, with just a hint of natural sweetness in the background. You’ll find excellent construction & a sharp burn, and a medium bodied profile that will hold your attention to the very end. Keep your shavin’ razor sharp and your taste buds sharper with the La Barba Purple! ",Medium,"['Double Corona', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto']",,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Double Corona, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto",No,Habano,
La Barba Red,Rated 4.38 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"Fear the beard!La Barba - or the beard is a pretty new brand - having only been in the industry since 2010, but in the short time, this brand has made some serious waves. Its loyal nation of fans have made it abundantly clear that the brand isn’t going anywhere.La Barba Red was this brand’s first cigar to hit store shelves way back when, but the blend’s gotten a bit of a touch-up. The idea was to turn up the spice, but keep Dominican flavor intact. To say they succeeded would be a vast understatement. The cigar’s Dominican Corojo wrapper encases Dominican long-fillers and Ligero leaves. What you get is a full-bodied beauty with notes of pepper, cocoa, cedar, and of course spice. This beard definitely has some bite, but lots and lots of flavor.",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Rothschild', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Lancero/Panatela, Rothschild, Toro",No,"Corojo, Dominican",
La Barba Ricochet,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"The beard goes primalLa Barba Cigars are fairly new to the industry. Though their first cigar, La Barba Red, hit the market in 2010, they spent some time tweaking and refining it before they started working on anything new. That cigar is now a hidden gem and they’ve gathered up some followers to please with their third cigar in the lineup. Following La Barba Red and La Barba Purple, La Barba Ricochet is the boldest cigar they have created to date. Up top is a thick and chocolaty Mexican San Andres wrapper leaf that conceals an Indonesian binder and long-fillers from the Dominican, Nicaragua, and Pennsylvania. It’s the companies’ first Maduro blend, as well as their first full-bodied cigar, but with production coming from Tabacalera William Ventura – maker of many Dominican boutique brands – you can count on great flavor and solid performance. It produces a complex array of pepper, spice, cedar, vanilla and a hint of grapey fruitiness in the back half. This blend is sure to please, grab a handful and don’t look back. ",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Indonesian,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,San Andres,
La Barba Ricochet Cru Mexi-Sol,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"The Beard below the border.After bursting onto the market in 2010 and captivating cigar connoisseurs with three amazing blends, Tony Bellato and Craig Rossi’s premium brand is ready to take a little vacation. But this isn’t entirely a leisure trip, because La Barba’s coming back from Mexico with more than just a fresh tan and a wild story about what happened in Tijuana. Don’t worry, they won’t make you sit and watch a boring slideshow of vacation photos. All they ask is that you sit back, relax, and light up their newest blend, the La Barba Ricochet Cru Mexi-Sol. Bellato describes the flavor of the Mexi-Sol as being similar to a left bank Bordeaux wine, exhibiting a “definitive spicy minerality, and a touch of soft sweetness.” This unique and exquisite profile is achieved through the use of a sun-grown Mexican wrapper overtop an Indonesian binder and fillers from the Dominican Republic, Nicaragua, and Pennsylvania. The La Barba Ricochet Mexi-Sol is just the latest example of Bellato’s blending genius, so grab yourself a box before the awards start stacking up!",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto Extra', 'Torpedo']",Indonesian,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, Pennsylvania",False,False,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Petite Corona, Robusto Extra, Torpedo",No,San Andres,
La Coalicion by Crowned Heads & Drew Estate,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Two crowns are better than one.This is both a great time to be a fan of cigars, and one of the bleakest. It seems every day there are new attacks on our freedoms to enjoy fine cigars, and there are players who won’t stop until our luxurious hobby goes the way of the dodo bird. But one great thing this impending sense of doom has caused is a very strong feeling of camaraderie among the best brands in the industry. Rather than throat-cut competition, companies are collaborating to bring the best products possible to the market. The most recent of these big name collaborations is La Coalicion.Willy Herrera of Drew Estate and Jon Huber of Crowned Heads have very similar visions when it comes to cigars. They’re both industry leaders, paving the way for a new generation of aficionados with innovative & provocative packaging and truly unique blending. La Coalicion is a fully collaborative effort between these two titans, and the results are nothing short of extraordinary. A beautifully oily Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper conceals a Sumatran binder and fillers from Nicaragua and the Dominican Republic, and produces a full-bodied bevy of earth, coffee, and raisin notes. This specimen was crafted by two men with a shared vision, and the expertise and resources to bring it to life. Try it now before they earn their title as cigar legend.",Medium-Full,"['Corona Gordo', 'Double Toro', 'Robusto Extra', 'Toro']",Sumatra,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona Gordo, Double Toro, Robusto Extra, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Drew Estate Cigars
La Diferencia Cubana,Rated 4.12 out of 5, Based on 76 Ratings ,"A gi-normous closeout offer on a lovely calm handmade.As I sit here pounding the keyboard like a gorilla on a Samsonite, I am reminded what a solid closeout deal this is, and one that is flying out of here at a feverish clip. La Diferencia Cubana was a private label brand formerly made by the well-regarded Hendrik Kelner (and current maker of such brands as Davidoff and AVO). This was a gem of a cigar albeit a pricey one. But now it’s on the chopping block....and CI is swinging the battle axe with furious abandon, delivering 60% savings in bunches. Featuring a silky Nicaraguan sun grown wrapper and filler blend of Cuban-seed tobaccos, La Diferencia Cubana delivers a flavorful, creamy, smooth mellow to medium-bodied blend.At these clearance prices, mellow-medium fans are gonna love this deal.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Sun Grown,
La Duena,Rated 4.43 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"La Duena - translation: the owner or boss.The Garcia family knows cigar making like the back of their hand. First on the scene was Don Pepin, followed by his son Jaime, and now dipping her toe in the water is Janny, Don Pepin’s daughter. Blended by Pete Johnson a close family friend, La Duena is built to cater to Janny's appetite for medium-bodied full-flavored cigars. Crafted in the renowned My Father factory in Nicaragua, this impressive offering hits the nail on the head. Exceedingly rich and flavorful, this handmade manages to achieve a glorious array of flavors without ever growing beyond medium-bodied. Thanks to the dark and toothy Connecticut Broadleaf maduro wrapper, and a supporting core of Connecticut Broadleaf and Nicaraguan long-fillers, this ensemble performs like a dream. Smooth refined notes of cocoa, coffee, earth, and gentle spices mingle before a naturally sweet finish. Complex, smooth, and lip-smacking from start to finish, La Duena is well-worth your time.La Duena received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""Dark and streaky, this veiny robusto is earthy and spicy with touches of cedar and mint. Cinnamon-sugar sweet- ness and a touch of leather add complexity.""",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Corona', 'Robusto']",,"Connecticut, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Corona, Robusto",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Don Pepin Garcia
La Estrella Cubana Connecticut,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 18 Ratings ,"All-Star performance at rookie prices.Brought to you by the company behind Macanudo and Cohiba, La Estrella Cubana is a high-quality handmade that burns like a champ. While your buddies are off spending hundreds on the big-name brands, save your bankroll, and get a similar experience for a fraction of the cost. It's not rocket-science, it's an easy-going Connecticut blend that tastes just as good as the real deal. Even better when you realize all the money you are saving!",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Gigante', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gigante, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,
La Estrella Cubana Habano,Rated 4.27 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"Hitch your wagon to a star.If you know real estate, you know the wise bet is to buy the cheapest house in the best neighborhood. In La Estrella's case, the neighborhood is called General Cigar and you have the likes of Punch, Partagas, and Cohiba living next door. That's right, La Estrella Cubana is the value play from an industry giant, and lucky for you they are not familiar with making ""value"" cigars. What does that mean? Simple, you get excellent cigars for an arbitrarily low price. La Estrella Cubana Habano is medium-bodied and uber-satisfying with notes of coffee, spice, and earth followed by a long balanced finish. Get on the wagon my friend!​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gigante', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gigante, Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,
La Flor Dominicana 1994,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Let’s toast to 20 years of La Flor!Two decades in this industry is one Hell of a long time. In 2014, Litto Gomez and company celebrated their 20th year in the cigar industry the way any cigar maker would — by making a cigar! 1994 combines all the knowledge one gains from twenty years in the ‘biz, and presents it all in one affordable, delicious package. The samples smell great, the cigars we were sent disappeared very quickly, so survey says this one’s gonna be a surefire hit. What’s in the blend? A Mexican San Andres Maduro wrapper hugs Dominican binder and filler grown from La Flor Dominicana’s own factory and farm. The wrapper almost oozes with oils, and gives off a potent bouquet. Lighting it up, you’ll get chocolate and molasses, with a sharp citrus-y note and some black pepper on the finish. La Flor Dominicana has stood the test of time, and I can’t think of a better way to celebrate than by lighting up one of these boomsticks.  ​",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,San Andres,
La Flor Dominicana Air Bender,Rated 4.3 out of 5, Based on 10 Ratings ,"La Flor Dominicana....Air....Bender?I hear guys praising Nicaragua all the time, but let’s be real: there’s a ton of awesome countries producing amazing tobacco. And I can’t think of a better example than LFD. La Flor Dominicana’s farm and factory are responsible for some of the tastiest handmades hailing from the island. And undoubtedly the strongest. Made with estate grown Dominican binder and long-fillers, wrapped under a gorgeous Habano wrapper, the Air Bender is a full-bodied cigar lover’s dream. This stick burns long and smooth, promising a ton of burn time on the larger sizes. Beyond that, the white clouds booming off of this cigar bring red pepper, earthiness, and a nice sweetness that holds it all together. In addition to a '94' rating, La Flor Dominicana Air Bender was named one of the world's 'Top 25 Cigars', which stated, ""Bold from the very first puff, the cigar is strong and meaty, full of spice and coffee notes, with a finish reminiscent of a whiskey barrel.""NOTE: We are experiencing delays from La Flor Dominicana at this time, and are unsure when we will receive more box product. The Pack of 20 cigars available are the same blend and quality, just without the box.",Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Wedge']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Wedge",Varies,Ecuador Habano,
La Flor Dominicana Andalusian Bull,Rated 4.58 out of 5, Based on 12 Ratings ,"The #1 Cigar of 2016!This award winning blend comes from the mind of master-blender Litto Gomez. Born in Spain, Litto gives a nod to his homeland with arguably the best release to ever come out of the La Flor Dominicana camp (and that’s saying a whole lot), dubbed Andalusian Bull. Striking in its appearance, the Bull gets its unique, old-school shape from a long-since-retired cigar mold that Gomez tracked down in Belgium. Coming in one size only, a rustic-looking figurado, this gem takes you back to the golden age of cigars.A beautiful, reddish-hued Ecuadorian Corojo wrapper is first to grab your attention. (There have been very few times I knew a cigar was going to rock my world just by looking at it…this was one of those occasions.) Potent Dominican filler tobaccos including Criollo ’98 and Pelo d’Oro are hugged by a Dominican binder. The unique figurado shape lends itself to a truly complex experience. The thickest part of the Bull is at the foot of the cigar, and introduces a myriad of flavors from the get-go. Caramel, leather, and a tinge of milk chocolate kick things off, with notes of sweet spice, rich red pepper, and slight citrus nuances entering the fray as the ring gauge gradually decreases. In this case, I’m happy to report this sucker deserves its #1 Cigar of the Year honors and then some, get ‘em the very first chance you get!La Flor Dominicana was awarded with #1 Cigar of 2016 honors and a well-deserved 96-rating! Here’s what the experts had to say, “First impressions are bold and savory with strong notes of hickory and leather. But it continues to take on a complex spiciness of saffron and cumin as well as a slight tangy note that brings the strength and spice together quite gracefully—and it only gets better with every puff.”Note: As a result of Andalusian Bull's recent praise and honors, the factory is experiencing an extended backlog. At this point, lead times on filling new customer backorders may be up to 1 year. Due to the extended delay, we will not be accepting any further backorders until production increases. We apologize for the inconvenience and will update this message if new information becomes available. ​",Full,['Torpedo'],Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Torpedo,No,Corojo,
La Flor Dominicana Cameroon Cabinet,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Call a Cabinet meetingLa Flor Dominicana has always been the king of ligero, that's undisputed. But they aren't content to be a one-trick pony, no sir. La Flor Dominicana Cameroon Cabinet is an absolute treat for boutique cigar lovers, combining one of the tastiest, most naturally sweet wrappers known to cigars with the spice and strength of Dominican long-fillers. La Flor Dominicana hails from the Dominican Republic and is well-known for its robust, full-flavored blends. The Cameroon Cabinet is no exception. This small-batch cigar comes packaged in big, cedar chests of 50 sans cigar bands, and contains a select blend made with a 4-year old Cameroon wrapper. The blend consists of Nicaraguan and Dominican long-leaf tobaccos inside a Dominican binder. The smoke is complex, but smooth, offering a toasty array of nuts and spice with a rich, long aftertaste.",Full,"['Corona', 'Lonsdale', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo', 'Wedge']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Lonsdale, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo, Wedge",No,Cameroon,
La Flor Dominicana Chapter One,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Forgive the pun — A New ChapterTo say a La Flor Dominican cigar is full-bodied at this point seems redundant. Long known for their homegrown, spicy and full-flavored ligeros, La Flor Dominicana cigars are always chewy and dense. But with Chapter One, they’ve somehow turned the dial open even more. The first cigar to be blended by Litto Gomez’s son, Antonio, Chapter One is one of the fullest cigars to ever pass through CI HQ. Overtop the core of Dominican long-fillers, you’ll find a chocolate brown and super-thick Brazilian Oscuro wrapper and Connecticut Broadleaf binder. Box-pressed and offered up in LFD’s chisel vitola, Chapter One is the beginning of a story I want to be a part of. Strong to a “T,” and loaded up with an awesome mixture of cedar and earth — this is one spicy meatball! Grab some Chapter Ones, set some time aside, and jump into this unparalleled creation today. ​",Full,['Wedge'],Connecticut Broadleaf,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Yes,,Wedge,No,Brazilian,
La Flor Dominicana Coronado,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Coronado Wears the CrownCoronado is a heartbreaker of a cigar from La Flor Dominicana. Let me explain that. This blend is without a doubt one of, if not THE, best cigar that LFD offers, but for whatever reason it’s been on and off the market for years. A decade ago, this cigar got rave reviews, then disappeared. Luckily, Coronado is back in action and just as tasty as ever before. Ligero fans, rejoice. Never tried this one before? Let me break it down for you. An expertly applied Nicaraguan Habano wrapper sits atop a powerful, potent combination of Dominican binder and long-fillers. The recipe is simple, the result is complex. An explosion of pepper smacks the palate, before sweet tobacco, salty leather, and rich earth come in. Grab a bottle off the top shelf, and light up a Coronado — it’s a real treat for any enthusiast. ​",Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Gordo', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Double Corona, Gordo, Toro",No,Habano,
La Flor Dominicana Double Claro,Rated 4.29 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"The golden (green) days of yore Seeing green? No need to adjust the ol’ monitor settings, your eyes are working just fine. The Double Claro from La Flor Dominicana features the criminally underused Candela wrapper. If you’re unfamiliar with Candelas, I’ll break it down nice and easy. These wrappers are delicate, tasty beasts that deliver flavors unlike any other leaf. Flip the calendar back a few decades, and Candela was the most-popular wrapper on the market. But I know what you’re really here for. You want to know what this weird looking green cigar tastes like! So let’s get into it. The Candela wrapper delivers a soft grassy note that’s similar to tea, while the Dominican long-fillers provide a complex balance of earth and spiciness. You probably read this statement a lot, but there’s no other way to say it — Double Claro is a completely unique experience from LFD, that any and every cigar lover should try. ​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto",No,Candela,
La Flor Dominicana Double Ligero,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 23 Ratings ,"Double the ligero, double the fun.Tangible proof that uber-powerful, full-bodied cigars can be produced in the Dominican, La Flor Dominicana has become one of the most sought after cigars on the market today. The man behind the magic, Litto Gomez, studied the art of tobacco growing and blending for years before crafting his first LFD blend. At first, LFD was another mellow Dominican offering. Until after tireless hours of scheming and studying, Senior Gomez developed the ultra-refined, ligero-laced lovelies at hand today.The Double Ligero line of La Flor Dominicana is one of the strongest and most well-balanced cigars you will come across. The next level of the original LFD Ligero series, this addition boasts double the strength inducing ligero fillers as its counterpart. Diving head-first into these gems, you are met with bold, heady notes of pepper, leather, spice, and cedar. A super-fermented Ecuadorian Sumatra sun grown wrapper leaf is draped atop well-aged Dominican long-fillers. Available in some of the most innovative sizes in the industry, La Flor Dominicana Double Ligero is buying up real estate in humidors across the globe.La Flor Dominicana Double Ligero received an impressive 94-rating noting: ""Crafted to look like a mini wedge, this dark cigar has a notably firm draw, though each puff is full of pepper and spice that become hearty with leather and more intense""NOTE: We are experiencing delays from La Flor Dominicana at this time, and are unsure when we will receive more box product. The Pack of 20 cigars available are the same blend and quality, just without the box.​",Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Wedge']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Presidente, Robusto, Toro, Wedge",No,Ecuador Sumatra,
La Flor Dominicana Double Ligero Maduro,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Double the ligero, double the fun.Tangible proof that uber-powerful, full-bodied cigars can be produced in the Dominican, La Flor Dominicana has become one of the most sought after cigars on the market today. The man behind the magic, Litto Gomez, studied the art of tobacco growing and blending for years before crafting his first LFD blend. At first, LFD was another mellow Dominican offering. Until after tireless hours of scheming and studying, Senior Gomez developed the ultra-refined, ligero-laced lovelies at hand today.There’s a few different wrappers in the mix, but if you love dark, rich Maduros, you’re picking a winner regardless of where you land. The same basic ingredients are in the mix here: Dominican binder and long-fillers, with a perfectly applied wrapper leaf on top. The end is up to you: Oscuro, Maduro, or Habano Maduro. Either way, you’re gonna get loads of pepper, earth, leather, and a fantastically complex and full-bodied taste.  NOTE: We are experiencing delays from La Flor Dominicana at this time, and are unsure when we will receive more box product. The Pack of 20 cigars available are the same blend and quality, just without the box.",Full,"['Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Wedge']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Toro, Wedge",No,"Maduro, Oscuro",
La Flor Dominicana La Nox,Rated 4.83 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"Embrace La NoxLa Flor Dominicana is the full-bodied cigar lover’s dream come to life. The blends are incredibly full-flavored and packed to the gills with ligero, with a nice smooth flavor to back them all up. Litto Gomez and his team at LFD are certified Dominican Tobacco Geniuses, with each blend being better than the last. La Nox is the prime example of this, with more industry awards heaped upon it than you can shake a stick at.With a dark and oily Brazilian Maduro wrapper, a Mexican San Andres binder, and the classic LFD Dominican ligero long-fillers, La Nox is certainly potent. There’s some weight to this one in the hand, and it shows in the smoke: you can easily get 90+ minutes from the Toro. The strength is off the charts, with cedar, leather, earthiness, an awesome spice, and a refreshing creaminess coating the palate. Do yourself a favor and scoop this one up. ​",Medium-Full,"['Petite Corona', 'Toro']",Mexican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Petite Corona, Toro",No,Brazilian,
La Flor Dominicana La Volcada,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Dance up an appetite for La VolcadaPut on your dancing shoes, and tango the night away with La Flor Dominicana La Volcada. This sweet n’ spicy cigar tributes Uruguay’s tango heritage. The dance of love is said to have been invented in Uruguay, and La Flor Dominicana co-owner Litto Gomez grew up there. To honor his hometown’s popular cultural export, La Volcada was crafted, named after one of the tango’s most popular steps. Utilizing tobacco fillers grown on Gomez’s farm in La Canela, Dominican Republic, and a dark San Andres wrapper, this full-bodied blend pleases your palate with notes of red pepper, espresso, sweet hay, and an underlying molasses-like sweetness. La Volcada – a cigar flavorful enough to honor the tango proudly. Good news, the La Flor Dominicana La Volcada has earned an impressive 90-point rating, noting: ""Draped in an oscuro cover leaf and topped with a pigtail cap, this oily Churchill burns evenly. Its dry, earthy smoke offers notes of nougat, leather and licorice before a spicy finish.""",Full,['Churchill'],Corojo,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Churchill,No,San Andres,
La Flor Dominicana Ligero,Rated 4.89 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"All ligero, all of the timeLitto Gomez and LFD can easily be crowned the King of Dominican Cigars. Sure, there’s tons of awesome handmades coming from this island, but none quite as iconic or flavorful as La Flor Dominicana. While the blends are incredibly varied, there is one thing in common: LFD’s got kick. Like, championship level kick-boxing strength behind it. It all comes from their generous use of ligero long-fillers, and in the cigars at hand today, that leaf takes center-stage. If you’re not a fan of full-bodied cigars, I’d suggest taking yourself elsewhere post-haste. But if you want a boutique boomstick that’ll demand your taste bud’s full attention, stand up. LFD Ligero has an awesome pre-light aroma, and after toasting it you’ll find a spice that grows in flavor and intensity down to the nub. Earthiness and the natural sweetness of Dominican tobacco make an appearance too. Jump in on this jalapeno, and you won’t be disappointed. La Flor Dominicana Ligero received a well-deserved 92-rating noting: ""Beautifully made, this earthy cigar has a sweet wood flavor and a taste of black cherries. It's medium to full bodied, complex and delicious.""​NOTE: We are experiencing delays from La Flor Dominicana at this time, and are unsure when we will receive more box product. The Pack of 24 cigars available are the same blend and quality, just without the box.",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Salomon', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Salomon, Toro",No,Ecuador Sumatra,
La Flor Dominicana Ligero Cabinet,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"Join the LFD CabinetAt this point in the game, I’m sure it doesn’t surprise you to hear that every cigar in La Flor Dominicana’s star-studded lineup is a treat in itself. But with the Ligero Cabinet, Litto Gomez takes it all one step further. Available in a variety of classic sizes, and using cigars grown on LFD’s own farm outside of Santiago, you can tell this one’s legit from the first puff. Ligero Cabinet is perhaps the most flavorful cigar in regular production for La Flor: and that’s saying something. The strength you’d expect from a Gomez blend is there, but the flavor is incredibly unique. Creamy, with woody tobaccos and a slight spice, this one has an awesome finish that matches up very well to any beverage (from coffee to spirits). Well worth the money, Ligero Cabinet is a can’t-skip boutique cigar. La Flor Dominicana Ligero Oscuro received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""A very oily, dark wrapper covers this cigar. Buttery, cedary notes even out to show sweet spice, leather and earth before a wood finish.""",Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Salomon', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Salomon, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Sumatra,
La Flor Dominicana Reserva Especial,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Make your reservation with LittoAfter tinkering with his formula for years, Litto Gomez finally landed on a recipe that delivered flavor and intensity that people didn’t even know could come from Dominican tobaccos. Though they’re now known for their full-bodied sticks, La Flor is capable of delivering incredibly balanced experiences as well. And that skill is on full display in the La Flor Dominicana Reserva series. With Nicaraguan binder and Cuban-seed Dominican long-fillers, the Reserva brings a delicious medium-bodied profile to the table. This thing is like a buffet of flavor. The Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper shows off a creamy note and some hints of natural tobacco, backed up by slight spice, and a cool earthiness. Want to talk construction? These handmades burn razor sharp and the draw is exactly where you want it. In short, there’s no reason not to try LFD Reserva. ​",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Double Corona', 'Figurado', 'Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Brazilian, Dominican",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Double Corona, Figurado, Gordo, Perfecto, Robusto, Toro",No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Ecuador Connecticut",
La Flor Dominicana Suave,Rated 4.8 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"A different side of LFDNo one can dispute that LFD is the king of strength. Their full-bodied cigars are favorites of the boutique crowd, with enough ligero in them to make a linebacker take a nap. Far from being a one-trick pony, La Flor proved they can make an awesome mellow cigar too, with LFD Suave. Still full on flavor, Suave packs a bit less punch to make this a great cigar with a morning cup of coffee. Suave features Dominican binder and long-fillers, like most LFD blends, but they switch things up from the regular formula with the silky Connecticut wrapper. The balance on this one is incredible. A slight spice and cedar come through, with the wrapper contributing buttery sweetness to the blend that reminds me of a bucket of popcorn. Elegantly cool and effortlessly enjoyable, that’s Suave in a nutshell. ​NOTE: We are experiencing delays from La Flor Dominicana at this time, and are unsure when we will receive more box product. The Pack of 25 cigars available are the same blend and quality, just without the box.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,"Connecticut, Connecticut Broadleaf",
La Galera 1936 Box Pressed,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"80 years of experience, 7 years of agingLa Galera cigars is a fairly new brand to the industry, but the people who make them are most definitely not. Master blender Jochy Blanco is a fourth generation tobacco grower and manufacturer and his Tabacalera Palma Factory, where these cigars are made, was one of the first established cigar factories in the Dominican Republic back in 1936. La Galera 1936 Box Pressed cigars were released in 2016, but the planning for these cigars first started 7 years prior. When Jochy decided he was going to create a premium line of cigars of his own, he took some of the finest tobaccos he had grown on his La Canela farms and set them aside to age for 7 years. These were Piloto Cubano and Criollo 98 leaves that are used in the filler and another Criollo 98 as the binder. To finish the blend off he applied a smooth Ecuador Habano wrapper on top. The blend is medium to full in body, with a ton of great flavor. Notes of cocoa, pepper, dried fruit, espresso, and earth make for a satisfying complexity. It’s hard to find cigars of this quality in this price range, try out a fiver and I’m sure you’ll be back for a box. Good news! La Galera 1936 Box Pressed has received a well-deserved 90-point rating, noting: ""There's a pipe-tobacco sweetness to this neatly pressed torpedo, which is balanced by notes of wood and graham cracker, though the finish has a touch of char.""",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']","Criollo '98, Dominican",Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Yes,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Habano,
La Galera Connecticut,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Go GaleraIf you have yet to familiarize with the La Galera brand, allow me to introduce them. La Galera is the flagship brand being produced at Tabacalera Palma. This is a Jochy Blanco’s factory located in Tamboril Dominican Republic. Jochy is a fourth generation manufacturer and tobacco grower and his families factory was one of the first established in the Dominican Republic. They grow some of the finest tobacco coming out of the DR and their factory produces cigars for many other brands that you’ve probably enjoyed without knowing before. So yeah, they know a thing or two about tobacco. La Galera Connecticut was created after Jochy had made Connecticut’s blends for many other brands and decided he wanted more out a Connecticut. It employs an Ecuador Connecticut wrapper atop a Domincan Piloto Cubano binder and three different varieties of Dominican long-fillers all grown in the Cibao Valley. It’s mellow to medium in body, but has as great amount of rich flavors. Toasted almonds, cocoa, espresso, and some floral notes round out this satisfying Connecticut. ",,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,"Dominican, Varied",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Ecuador Connecticut, Habano",
La Galera Habano,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"La Galera - Spanish for tobacco kitchenEver heard of Jochy Blanco? You should have. He’s a fourth generation tobacco grower and cigar manufacturer in the Dominican Republic, and his Tabacalera Palma factory was one of the first established factories in this country many years ago. He grows some of the finest Dominican Tobacco out there and has been producing cigars for countless other brands that you’ve likely enjoyed before. In 2016, Jochy decided it was time to create a brand of his own to be the new flagship brand of Tabacalera Palma, and La Galera Cigars were born. If you’re the type that pays attention to the presentation, La Galera Habano does it incredibly well – from the band artwork to the box – it’s a beautiful cigar. And the tobaccos used are just as good. La Galera only uses proprietary, aged tobaccos grown on Jochy’s farms in the Cibao Valley, with the only exception for wrapper leaf. In this case, an Ecuador Habano wrapper is applied atop a Dominican Corojo binder and Piloto Cubano, Criollo 98, and Pelo de Oro long-fillers. It falls in the medium-bodied spectrum but is full on flavor, with heavy notes of pepper, some earth, wood, and a touch of fruity sweetness. These cigars are by no means cheap, but for the quality tobacco and construction, the asking price is more than fair. Good news! La Galera Habano has received numerous 91-point ratings. One review noted: ""Draped in a dark, toothy wrapper, this cigar starts spicy and leathery but warms to show big notes of vanilla, nuts and tangy wood. A rich, brawny cigar.""",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Corojo, Dominican",Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Toro",No,"Ecuador Habano, Habano",
La Galera Maduro,Rated 4 out of 5,,"La Galera, Tabacalera Palma, Jochy BlancoAny of these words ring a bell? They should. Tabacalera Palma was one of the first Established cigar factories in the Dominican Republic back in 1936. But its story starts long before that. Jochy Blanco is the current owner and is the fourth generation of Blancos to work with tobacco. His great, great grandfather first moved to the Cibao Valley to grow and trade fruits and tobaccos in the mid 19th century. Today, they grow some of the finest tobaccos coming out of the Dominican and their factory produces cigars for many other brands that you have likely enjoyed before. La Galera is simply jochys first brand of his own. La Galera cigars all use all premium, aged tobaccos grown on Jochy’s farms in the Dominican with the only exception for their wrappers. La Galera Maduro comes adorned with a dark, Mexican San Andres wrapper over a Dominican Piloto Cubano binder and Dominican long-filers. It sits comfortably in the medium-bodied range and offers a balanced and pleasant experience. Rife with rich chocolate, cedar and spicy flavors, it also leaves a nice creamy sweetness on the palate. For the quality tobacco and years of experience that went into these Dominican gems, the price point is right as rain. Snag a box and I’m sure you’ll be back for more. ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Short Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,San Andres,
La Gloria Cubana,Rated 4.47 out of 5, Based on 206 Ratings ,"You down with LGC?Those in the know call it by its abbreviation – La Gloria Cubana is affectionately known by three little letters that represent a whole lot of really good stuff. This highly celebrated brand does a few things right, like putting out blends that are full, rich, creamy and strong. In essence, they’re everything you want a cigar to be, and nothing that you don’t want a cigar to be. It really is that simple.E.P. Carrillo, the face behind the name, is a master of his craft. When it comes to full-bodied, well-constructed cigars, nobody does it better, and that’s why the fans absolutely love it and can’t stop coming back for more. A delicious balance of Brazilian, Dominican, Mexican, and Nicaraguan filler leaves are lovingly swaddled inside a dark, sultry Ecuadorian wrapper, or a perfect brown Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper. What you’re left with is something worth getting excited over. So get down with LGC, right about...now.​Good news, La Gloria Cubana has earned a whole slew of 90+ ratings, as high as 92 points. One such review noted: ""It starts with a leafy edge, but quickly strengthens to show rich chocolate and leather flavors, with a cedary finish. A powerhouse that will age well.""Note: La Gloria Cubana recently underwent a packaging update. We currently have a mix of old and new packaging, so you may receive either. The cigars are the same, just the bands & boxes have changed.",Full,"['Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Lonsdale', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Rothschild', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,"Brazilian, Dominican, Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Cigarillos, Corona, Double Corona, Lonsdale, Presidente, Robusto, Rothschild, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Ecuador Sumatra",La Gloria Cubana
La Gloria Cubana Artesanos de Obelisco,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"La Gloria strikes again!Utilizing a dark, oily Ecuadorian Sumatra wrapper, a rich Connecticut Broadleaf binder, and a well-aged blend of robust Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers, La Gloria Cubana Artesanos de Obelisco delivers a bold, full-bodied flavor. But the real beauty lies in its special shape - an unusual pyramid-style vitola that's modeled to resemble a famous Dominican monument. And when this blend is crafted in this shape, the results are nothing but impressive. Complex, to the say the least, with notes of earth, cedar, pepper, cream, and coffee, the Obelisco is truly impressive. Further adding to the goodness, La Gloria Cubana Artesanos de Obelisco comes gorgeously presented in a very unique half circle-shaped box.La Gloria Cubana Artesanos de Obelisco received a well-deserved 91-rating noting: ""A petit belicoso that is box-pressed towards the foot. Earthy and wood, the cigar takes on leather and pepper notes before a mineral finish."" ",Medium-Full,['Pyramid'],Connecticut Broadleaf,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Pyramid,No,Sumatra,La Gloria Cubana
La Gloria Cubana Coleccion Reserva,Rated 4.46 out of 5, Based on 24 Ratings ,"A collection item for your humidorLa Gloria Cubana Coleccion Reserva is an exciting new release that celebrates 25 years since the brand first received some highly praised ratings. The cigar was blended and made by industry titan Ernesto Perez-Carrillo and it marks the first LGC cigar that he has made in 10 years. A medium to Full-bodied blend, Coleccion Reserva uses proprietary Nicaraguan tobaccos from Ernesto's collection along with an oily Ecuador Sumatra wrapper to create an exquisite experience cigar aficionado's will want to try. Add this beautiful gem to your humidor or give it as a gift to your cigar loving friends. I'm sure they won't complain with this masterful blend. Note: La Gloria Cubana recently underwent a packaging update. We currently have a mix of old and new packaging, so you may receive either. The cigars are the same, just the bands & boxes have changed.",Medium-Full,"['Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']","Nicaraguan, Sumatra",Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Presidente, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Sumatra,La Gloria Cubana
La Gloria Cubana Esteli,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 16 Ratings ,"The LGC returns to EsteliBorn in Cuban roots, La Gloria Cubana Cigars first launched in 1885. Once one of the best kept secrets in the industry, they are now one of the most popular brands for those after a full-bodied experience delivered through quality craftsmanship and exceptional artistry. At the IPCPR 2018 show, La Gloria Cubana released La Gloria Cubana Esteli – a modern interpretation of the classic La Gloria Cubana blend. What does modern mean in cigar terms? That’s easy. Full-bodied, full-flavored, Nicaraguan, and ligero wrapped.LGC Esteli delivers bold profile with Nicaraguan spirit, thanks to a deep brown ligero wrapper from Nicaragua’s rich Jalapa Valley. Underneath, a Honduran leaf binds a blend of Honduran seco and ligero long-fillers grown in two different regions. The end result is a complex medium to full-bodied cigar with notes of cedar, spice and white pepper. Full of flavor and expertly crafted, La Glora Cubana Esteli is sure to keep the LGC trend of high ratings rolling.  ",Medium-Full,"['Gigante', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gigante, Robusto, Toro",No,Nicaraguan Jalapa,La Gloria Cubana
La Gloria Cubana Rabito de Cochino,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"Rabito de Cochino - a new twist to La Gloria Cubana.La Gloria Cubana has long been one of the industry's premier, full-bodied cigars. This legendary name is synonymous with flavor and quality. However, Rabito de Cochino takes things up a notch, using ample Nicaraguan ligero inside a traditional Lancero format to yield layers of satisfying flavors.Named for its Cuban-style 'pig tail' head, La Gloria Cubana Rabito de Cochino redefines the Lancero size. Thick and leathery Ecuadorian wrappers conceal a bold blend of Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers to promote a full-flavored charisma only LGC can provide. A rich, hearty profile swarms the palate, dusting the taste buds with spicy, woodsy notes complementing the deep, Cuban-esque core perfectly. Delicious with every puff, LGC Rabito de Cochino is no doubt a classic in the making.In addition to a spot among the world's Top 25 Cigars, LGC Rabito de Cochino received a well-deserved, 92-point rating, noting: ""The Rabito de Cochinos are balanced and elegant, with substantial woody notes, followed by hints of cocoa and toast.""",Medium-Full,['Double Corona'],Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,United States,No,,Double Corona,No,Ecuador Sumatra,
La Gloria Cubana Serie N,Rated 4.65 out of 5, Based on 52 Ratings ,"La Gloria Cubana Oscuro!Serie N is a bolder, richer addition to the storied La Gloria Cubana line. Crafted with a pitch-black Oscuro wrapper leaf, and a proprietary Nicaraguan binder and filler blend, Serie N unleashes a bold, complex profile. Notes of coffee, cocoa, pepper are finished by slight sweetness. Delicious indeed. And to take it to the next level, La Gloria Cubana Serie N comes impressively presented in a high-gloss hexagon shaped box.​",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Oscuro,La Gloria Cubana
La Gloria Cubana Serie R,Rated 4.66 out of 5, Based on 460 Ratings ,"'R'guably La Gloria Cubana's finest.The La Gloria Cubana Serie R cigar utilizes an Ecuadorian grown Colorado shade wrapper, or Connecticut Broadleaf maduro, concealing an extensively aged blend of M​exican, Dominican, Brazilian, and Nicaraguan filler leaves. The result is a richer, spicier, fuller bodied version of the regular La Gloria Cubana cigar line. Using thicker ring gauges, the Serie R helped pave the way for today’s thicker, bolder cigars. Experience the beginning of a legend.The Serie R has been honored with a 92-rating noting: ""Rich in color with an oily wrapper and superbly crafted cap, this short robusto draws and burns evenly. Sweet woods and floral notes are balanced by spices, earth and hints of dried orange peel.""",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,"Brazilian, Dominican, Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Robusto",No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Ecuador Sumatra, Maduro",La Gloria Cubana
La Gloria Cubana Serie R Black,Rated 4.57 out of 5, Based on 221 Ratings ,"A richer, bolder La Gloria Serie R? Oh yes!La Gloria Cubana Serie R Black extends th​e immensely popular, 92-ra​ted Serie R line. But here’s why this one’s different (and better). Th​e ne​w La Gloria Serie R Black is handcrafted in Nicaragua which allows for​ easier access to the powerful, ultra-flavorful tobaccos contained within. A Nicaraguan Tapado ligero wrapper grown in Jalapa overlays a bold, well-aged, Cuban-seed blend of Nicaraguan long-fillers.​ This combination is ripe with flavor and strength, offering a rich n’ hearty profile brimming with notes of pepper, earth, coffee, cedar, cream, honey, and spices. Delicious, noticeably stronger than the already-powerful Serie R line, and ready to satisfy even the most discriminating palates. The big-ring sizes, relentless consistency, and top-notch construction you’ve come to expect from La Gloria remain, but they’ve surprisingly added in a lower per-stick retail price. What’s not to love about this one? Can’t think of a damn thing. ",Full,['Gordo'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Gordo,No,Nicaraguan Jalapa,La Gloria Cubana
La Gloria Cubana Serie R Black Maduro,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 55 Ratings ,"A follow-up to one of La Gloria’s GreatestThe original La Gloria Cubana Serie R helped to redefine today’s handmade cigars. No, really. Once Serie R introduced large ring-size cigars, it started a trend that has sold like hotcakes ever since. That’s not all La Gloria Cubana is good for, though. These guys have been around forever, and like grizzled cigar veterans, they quietly release Cuban-inspired blend after Cuban-inspired blend, year in and year out. LGC Serie R Black Maduro is everything you know and love about this classic brand in one oily, rich handmade. A Nicaraguan puro that booms with flavors of spice, earth, leather, and a slight hint of chocolate that makes this one perfect with a coffee or a tall, strong drink. In three big-ring sizes, and with more ligero long-fillers than you can shake a stick at, Serie R Black Maduro promises one helluva ride. ​",Medium-Full,['Gordo'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Gordo,No,Connecticut Broadleaf,La Gloria Cubana
La Gloria Cubana Serie R Limitada 2005,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"You down with LGC?E.P. Carrillo, the face behind the name, is a master of his craft. When it comes to full-bodied, well-constructed cigars, nobody does it better, and that’s why the fans absolutely love it and can’t stop coming back for more. And one of his most celebrated blends? La Gloria Cubana Serie R. A 92-rated, full-bodied treat packed with a four country blend of Dominican, Nicaraguan, Brazilian and Mexican long-fillers. These cigars first hit the market back in 1999 and have seen much success. In 2003, celebrating the 5th anniversary of the cigar, Carrillo debuted the Serie R Limitada Series. These are made in limited quantities every year using a different blend that will never be revisited. The Limitada 2005 comes in your choice of Connecticut Broadleaf or Ecuador Sumatra wrapper over Nicaraguan binder and long-fillers from the Dominican and Nicaragua. It comes in one hefty size at almost 8"" long with a thick 62 ring gauge providing over 2 hours of enjoyment. Only 700 boxes were produced in each wrapper and they come packaged inside an Italian handcrafted humidor made especially for this release. The draw is a bit tight at first - likely due to the length - but opens up nicely to a bold and chewy, full-bodied array of coffee, nuts and tobacco flavors. These cigars are very hard to find and we were only able to source an extremely limited amount. If this cigar interests you at all, I suggest you jam that add to cart button ASAP, they will soon be gone for good.  ",Full,['Gordo'],Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Gordo,No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Ecuador Sumatra",
La Gloria Cubana Spanish Press,Rated 4.57 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"What’s old is new again.Back in pre-embargo Cuba, when the box-pressing was a novel concept in cigar manufacturing, the process was a bit different than it is today. Instead of using molds to press cigars before placing them in a box, the box-press was achieved by simply placing cigars in specially-sized boxes that would apply even pressure to the cigars, resulting in a more even box-press that eliminated air pockets and guaranteed an excellent draw. This was known as a “Spanish Press”, and the Spanish Press by La Gloria Cubana is the perfect tribute to this classic style.The La Gloria Cubana Sapnish Press features a toothy Nicaraguan Jalapa wrapper, brimming with flavors that perfectly compliment the San Andres binder and tri-country filler blend consisting of Nicaraguan Jalapa, Dominican Piloto Cubano, Dominican Olor, and Brazilian Mata Fina tobacco. Along with a great draw and smoke production, you’ll find spicy earthiness and notes of cedar and toast. This release is an excellent addition to La Gloria Cubana’s portfolio, and a terrific way to honor the roots of an important genre of cigars. Grab a box of La Gloria Cubana Spanish Press, and light up old-world Cuba style. Note: La Gloria Cubana recently underwent a packaging update. We currently have a mix of old and new packaging, so you may receive either. The cigars are the same, just the bands & boxes have changed.",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Mexican,"Brazilian, Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,False,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Nicaraguan Jalapa,La Gloria Cubana
La Herencia Cubana,Rated 4.54 out of 5, Based on 83 Ratings ,"Delicious through and through.La Herencia Cubana means ""Cuban heritage""....a fitting name indeed. From time to time I stumble upon a fantastic new cigar and find it hard to contain my excitement. I'm genuinely excited about it. See, I'm a cigar lunatic who burns through a half dozen cigars on light days, so I get very excited when a special cigar like La Herencia Cubana arrives on the scene. This is a legit, thoroughly delectable cigar. The wrapper is a dark, toothy, leathery-looking Ecuadorian Sumatra leaf that's responsible for delivering much of the intense, rich flavory goodness. The fillers are a well-balanced collection of long-leaf tobaccos from three of the major growing regions in Nicaragua: Jalapa, Condega, and Esteli. The flavor is medium to full in body and begins with a burst of black pepper, a feisty opening that's tamed by a rich yet smooth core of tobacco flavors and underlying creaminess that's present right on through to the cigar's conclusion. Its hearty bouquet is coupled with toasty, woodsy notes and a long-lasting, peppery aftertaste. Fans of unique and 'boutique' blends, I urge you to take me up on this one. As you know, we've got a generous return policy - so you've got nothing to lose and a whole lot to gain - especially for just over 3 bucks per cigar here at CI.",Medium-Full,"['Lonsdale', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Lonsdale, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Sumatra,
La Herencia Cubana CORE,Rated 4.69 out of 5, Based on 179 Ratings ,"Some brands make an impression, yet some enhance our appreciation for the craft of premium boutique cigars. Core is the latter, producing an unadulterated cigar experience with every toast of the foot.The blend....Wrapper: Habano Ecuador sun-grown ligeroBinder: Esteli Habano visoFiller: Esteli ligero, Jamastran ligero, Pennsylvania Broadleaf, Nicaraguan Ometepe ligeroAppearance....- Dark, smooth wrapper with minimal veins- Impressive oils casting a nice shine- A gentle box-press finishes each vitolaThe experience....- Noble richness with a hearty, rustic core of genuine tobacco flavor- A supporting cast of earth, leather, cream, and black pepper- Bold yet elegant with superior balance and a lengthy, toasty finish- Smooth through the nose- Satisfying elevation of strength during the burn- Warm aroma full of rich oak and toast- Bold, earthy finish with ample zest",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Habano,"Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,
La Herencia Cubana Oscuro Fuerte,Rated 4.6 out of 5, Based on 81 Ratings ,"Oscuro + Fuerte = cigar nirvana.Oscuro Fuerte is a bold expression from La Herencia Cubana. Unlike the medium-bodied LHC Original, LHC Oscuro Fuerte is a rich, full-flavored morsel packed with aged long-leaf ligeros from Nicaragua's top growing regions: Esteli, Condega and Jalapa. Topping it off is the crown jewel: a dark and lovely Pennsylvania Broadleaf wrapper that completes the feisty recipe. Chewy, lip-smacking layers of crisp tobacco flavor smacks the palate, tamed only by refreshingly sweet undertones on the finish. The flavor is toasty and oaky, clinging to the palate with each puff and lingering long on the aftertaste. The strength hits you up front, then mellows ever so slightly, before gradually becoming stronger, resulting in a full-bodied, full-flavored crescendo.",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Robusto, Toro",No,Pennsylvania Broadleaf,
La Historia By E.P. Carrillo,Rated 4.86 out of 5, Based on 98 Ratings ,"EP Carrillo just can’t miss, and his new La Historia line extends the streak even further. Created to honor all of the members of the Perez-Carrillo family who’ve supported and enabled Ernesto to perfect and continue his craft over the past decades, La Historia is a fitting tribute. Gorgeous, ornate artwork and a blend that was selected for the perfect marriage of texture, flavor, and balance, La Historia employs a Mexican San Andrés wrapper, Ecuadorian Sumatra binder, and Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers. Rich, chewy flavors coat the palate before you’re hit with subtleties of roasted nuts, espresso, black pepper, and dark chocolate. Just a hint of sweetness on the finish adds the perfect balance. It’s sensory overload, and it delivers in spades.La Historia by E.P. Carrillo received a well-deserved 95-rating noting: ""The Perez-Carrillos worked two years on this cigar, and it shows in the final product, which is finished with a luxurious, dark leaf of Mexican tobacco grown in the San Andrés Valley.""​",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Sumatra,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Maduro,E.P. Carrillo
La Hoja Edicion Crema 1962,Rated 5 out of 5,,"A creamy masterpiece.La Hoja cigars are a small batch, boutique brand that traces its roots back to the glory days of Cuban cigars before Castro seized power. Now, firmly solidified as a go-to brand for enthusiasts seeking a perfectly constructed and supremely flavored blend, La Hoja seamlessly blends old world Cuban techniques with today’s taste and strength preferences.La Hoja Edicion Crema 1962 hails from the Dominican Republic and comes draped in an Ecuadorian Habano wrapper atop a luscious blend of Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers. Exuding copious and aromatic clouds, this medium-bodied blend delivers flavors of baking spices, chocolate, cedar, cream, coffee, and nuts. With flawless construction and a complex, balanced flavor profile, La Hoja Edicion Crema 1962 needs to be at the top of your must-try list. ​",Medium,['Gordo'],,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Gordo,No,Ecuador Habano,
La Hoja Edicion Maduro 1962,Rated 4.11 out of 5,,"La Hoja’s back, tell a friend.La Hoja Cigar Co is a new name, but the brand dates back to the glory days before the Cuban revolution. The brand has navigated some bumpy roads, including a rebranding as La Hoja, and managed to establish itself as one of the top boutique cigar brands in America. Fusing old-school Cuban tradition with a modern attitude, La Hoja far exceeds today’s cigar enthusiast’s expectations. La Hoja Edicion Maduro 1962 features a sultry, oily San Andres maduro wrapper nestling a Dominican binder, and Dominican Piloto Cubano, and Nicaraguan long-fillers. Medium to full-bodied, the rich flavors include nuts, leather, spice, chocolate, maple syrup, white pepper, and sweet cream. You will be wowed by the perfect balance of complexity, and the long, smooth finish. See for yourself why La Hoja is among the most talked about brands today. ​",Medium-Full,['Toro'],Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,Maduro,
La Jugada Habano,Rated 4 out of 5,,"One great follow-up..This sophomore release from Moya Ruiz Cigars, a company with Danny Moya and Nelson Ruiz at the helm, is made by hand at Erik Espinosa’s famed La Zona Factory. La Jugada Habano is gorgeously constructed with the same Nicaraguan binder and long-leaf fillers as Prieto, but the difference is on the outside. A gorgeous, rich and oily Ecuadorian Habano tops off this little stunner. A cornucopia of complex flavors awaits you here, with notes of spice, nuts, and cream making their debuts during the creamy, oh-so-smooth experience. Medium to full in body, this is one follow-up release that pretty much steals the show.",Medium-Full,['Belicoso'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Belicoso,No,Ecuador Habano,
La Mission du L'Atelier,Rated 4.64 out of 5, Based on 11 Ratings ,"L’Atelier sets out on a mission.La Mission du L’Atelier was inspired by the strong and hearty wines of France. L’Atelier is known as a small batch producer of exquisite cigars, and with Mission du L’Atelier they’ve outdone themselves.Hailing from the My Father factory in Esteli, Nicaragua, La Mission du L’Atelier is the strongest blend yet for L’Atelier. Coming dressed in a Mexican San Andres wrapper over Nicaraguan long-fillers, including the revered Sancti Spiritus leaf, the cigar is stunning in appearance. Medium to full-bodied, and box-pressed with a pigtail cap, the cigar includes robust notes of chocolate, pepper, coffee, leather and wood, and boasts complexity and depth of flavor. La Mission du L’Atelier is an enchanting and pleasurable cigar, and will soon occupy the top shelves of humidors everywhere.La Mission du L'Atelier received Top 25 honors for 2015 (#17 overall) and a well-deserved 93-rating noting: ""The blend is impressive, especially in the 1959 size, which shows a savory, leathery note, sweet baking spices and a touch of anise.""​",Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,San Andres,L'Atelier
La Palina Black Label,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"La Palina flexes their muscles.La Palina’s rich history began in the late 1800’s. Their patriarch, Samuel Paley immigrated to Chicago from the Ukraine and immediately found work as a ‘lector’ in a cigar factory. By 1896 Sam had started his own factory with a cigar store nearby. Sam dubbed his factory, Congress Cigar Company and quickly gained the name ‘Mr. Sam’, a moniker given to him by his factory workers. After Sam’s retirement in 1926 the La Palina brand was all but forgotten, but now, Sam’s grandson has reinvented the brand in a big way. This addition to the La Palina line lays claim to being their strongest offering yet.La Palina Black Label features an ultra-dark Brazilian Bahiano wrapper leaf rife with oils and silky-smooth to the touch. Long-leaf ligeros from Nicaragua and the Dominican fill out Black Label’s core and meld together beautifully. Hailing from Honduras, Black Label plays host to bold notes of dried fruit, cocoa, espresso, and sweet oak. Uber-refined, Black Label is a full-bodied powerhouse that maintains impressive balance throughout the entire experience.​",Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto']","Dominican, Nicaraguan","Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Gordo, Robusto",Varies,Brazilian,La Palina
La Palina Blue Label,Rated 4.4 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"You don't have to sing the blues no mo'!There's not a single chance anyone reading this would remember tuning in to the ""La Palina Hour"", since it ran over a century ago. The host was Samuel Paley, the head of a small cigar factory called Congress Cigar Company, and he named it after his flagship cigar line, La Palina. This was a very long time ago, but La Palina stands today as one of the most delicious & consistent cigar brands on the market. The La Palina stable holds many fine blends, and today we're welcoming yet another addition to their myriad of great options: La Palina Blue Label.The Blue Label was originally offered in just one 6.5"" x 52 toro size to a small number of retailers, but now two new sizes have been added and they're ready to fill your humidor. The gorgeous medium-brown Habano wrapper was grown in Honduras, and conceals a Habano binder and fillers from Honduras and Nicaragua. Sound good? It tastes even better. The medium-full bodied flavor profile is a touch spicy, with cedar, earth, and leather notes balanced out by a nice creaminess. It's strong but balanced, spicy but smooth, and the perfect blend to wear the newest La Palina band.",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,False,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Honduran,La Palina
La Palina Bronze Label,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"This Bronze is Pure GoldMore than a century ago, Samuel Paley opened his own cigar shop in Chicago, created the La Palina brand, and hosted the “La Palina Hour” radio show. A rich tradition that began right here in the U.S., La Palina still stands tall today as a symbol of luxury, elegance, and unrivaled taste. Their newest blend, the La Palina Bronze Label, fits right into their portfolio – offering up a timeless medium-bodied blend that any cigar fan will love. Originally blended as a TAA Exclusive, La Palina Bronze Label is handmade in Honduras. From wrapper to filler, you’ll find only the highest-quality Honduran tobacco here, plus a few leaves of choice Nicaraguan long-filler. Each draw offers crisp notes of cedar, a dry, earthy undertone, chocolate, and black pepper. Give this one a little time, and I guarantee the ratings will start flowing — once you try one for yourself, you’ll understand why.",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Gordo, Robusto, Short Robusto, Toro",Varies,Habano,La Palina
La Palina Classic Connecticut,Rated 4.29 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"A revamped classicLa Palina is a true original, with roots tracing back to the late 1800’s. The brand was founded by a successful business man, Sam Paley, but it seemed to retire just as he did in 1926. Years later it was revived by Paleys grandson, maintaining the same tradition of excellence that La Palina had been known for since its inception. The 93-rated La Palina Classic line has been given an overhaul, and this time it’s here to stay – introducing three new blends that capture the experience of elegance and finesse in true La Palina Style. La Palina Classic Connecticut is served up in a golden brown Ecuadorian Connecticut Wrapper. This expertly applied leaf and double band up top make for a pleasing appearance. Underneath you will be met with long-filler tobaccos from the Dominican Republic and Nicaragua – teaming up to create a creamy and smooth draw that is filled with flavors of cedar, leather, and caramel. If your humidor is in need of some mellower tastes, you can’t go wrong with the revival of La Palina Classic Connecticut cigars. ​",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,La Palina
La Palina Classic Maduro,Rated 4.2 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"A Dark revivalLa Palina Cigars have been a common stock in humidors across the US for many years, praised for immaculate construction and the most refined tastes. Their roots trace back to the late 1800’s with founder Sam Paley, a very successful business man. When Paley retired in 1926, the production of his cigars seemed to do the same, only to be revived by Mr. Paleys grandson, Bill. Now, La Palina’s Classic line is getting an overhaul with three new releases , and this time they are here to stay.The La Palina Classic Maduro comes dressed in a deep brown Honduran wrapper that’s directly responsible for the tasty, full-bodied profile. A peek under the sheets will reveal Honduran, Dominican, and Nicaraguan long-fillers of the highest quality. From top to tail this cigar is impressive, with flavors of dark roasted coffee, black pepper and earth. Great construction, a bevy of full-bodied flavors and a modest price – this new addition to La Palina’s Classic Line will not disappoint. ",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Honduran,La Palina
La Palina Classic Natural,Rated 4.11 out of 5, Based on 18 Ratings ,"With origins in the 1800's, La Palina is a true original. The Classic Natural is a noteworthy blend that will become a staple in your humidor. Classic Natural features a Honduran wrapper and blend of Nicaraguan, Dominican, and Honduran fillers. Hints of caramel, hazelnut, and spice with earthy undertones excite the palate. We think that these classic tobacco flavors combine to form a masterpiece.",Medium,"['Double Corona', 'Robusto', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Double Corona, Robusto, Short Robusto, Toro",No,"Habano Oscuro, Honduran",La Palina
La Palina Classic Rosado,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"La Palina Cigars have been a common stock in humidors across the US for many years, praised for immaculate construction and the most refined tastes. Their roots trace back to the late 1800’s with founder Sam Paley, a very successful business man. When Mr. Paley retired in 1926, the production of his cigars did the same only to be revived by his grandson years later. The brand has seen some ups and downs for sure, but it has also claimed some high ratings and a large following along the way. The 93-rated La Palina Classic line is now getting an overhaul, releasing three new blends that provide an experience of elegance and finesse in true La Palina style. Covered in a chestnut brown Honduran leaf, this medium-bodied release has pristine craftsmanship as you should expect from the brand. The outside is gorgeous indeed, and the inside is brimming with premium long-fillers from the Dominican Republic, Nicaragua, and Honduras. You can expect distinct flavors of leather, spice, and coffee throughout the satisfying profile. The brand may have had a shaky beginning, but La Palina Classic Rosado is here to stay with this impeccable blend. Great news! La Palina Classic Rosado recently received a 90-rating from Cigar Aficionado. Here's what the critics had to say: ""Pronounced notes of cedar and minerals become earthier with dark cacao and coffee bean qualities."" ",Medium,"['Lonsdale', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Lonsdale, Robusto, Toro",No,Honduran,La Palina
La Palina El Ano 1896 Oscuro,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Back with a vengeance!La Palina always delivers in terms of quality, consistency, and flavors that are so good - sometimes I’m tempted to light two cigars at once. The brand was actually founded in 1896, but it went away for a few decades after its founder, Sam Paley, retired in 1926. El Ano 1896, named for the year the brand was founded, is another example of remarkable craftsmanship. Wrapped in an oily Mexican San Andres wrapper and brimming with long-fillers from the Dominican, this palate-pleaser offers up tons of flavor with notes of espresso, walnuts, leather, and earth. Another premium offering from La Palina — a brand who’s got quality down to a science.",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Robusto, Toro",No,"Oscuro, San Andres",La Palina
La Palina El Diario,Rated 4.83 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"A true prize from La Palina.La Palina’s rich history began in the late 1800’s. Their patriarch, Samuel Paley immigrated to Chicago from the Ukraine and immediately found work as a ‘lector’ in a cigar factory. By 1896 Sam had started his own factory with a cigar store nearby. Sam dubbed his factory, Congress Cigar Company and quickly gained the name ‘Mr. Sam’, a moniker given to him by his factory workers. After Sam’s retirement in 1926 the La Palina brand was all but forgotten, but now, Sam’s grandson has reinvented the brand in a big way. This addition to the La Palina line is a Honduran-made gem hailing from the revered Raices Cubanas factory, dubbed, La Palina El Diario.Rolled right alongside numerous other 90-rated cigars such as Alec Bradley Prensado and Tempus, you can rest easy knowing every El Diario has be crafted with meticulous attention to detail and the highest quality tobaccos. This medium-bodied gem boasts a Honduran rosado wrapper leaf around well-aged Nicaraguan Corojo and Criollo long-fillers. Spicy notes of mocha, nut, and leather all rear their heads in this super-complex offering. Securing a spot in my regular rotation, this cigar is one not to be overlooked.La Palina El Diario received a well-deserved 93 rating noting: “A powerful, meaty cigar with an open draw that delivers a lot of bold smoke for such a small size. Concentrated pepper, cedar and earth lead to an apple-like finish.” ​",Full,"['Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Honduran,La Palina
La Palina Family Series,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"La Palina Family Series makes its triumphant return.The La Palina Family Series Miami marks the promised return of the company’s first cigar line. The blend has been reworked and production was moved from the Graycliff factory in Nassau, Bahamas to the famed El Titan de Bronze factory on Calle Ocho in Miami, FL.The Family Series Miami comes sheathed in a stunning Ecuadoran Corojo ’98 wrapper enclosing an Ecuadoran Habano binder and Nicaraguan long-fillers. The cigar is visually stunning with no visible seams and no soft spots. Family Series Miami is medium-bodied with robust flavors of nuts, wood, coffee, spices, and some sweetness and caramel making an appearance behind the scenes. Family Series is a highly sought after and collected brand that can offer an even more attractive price with their move to a new factory. These won’t stay in our humidor long, so don’t risk losing out on your chance to experience a modern classic.​Good news! La Palina family series received a 90-point rating in 2016, noting: ""Initial wheaty, bready notes become bright with vanilla bean, honey and cinnamon. Notes of orange peel are prominent on the finish. A tasty and attractive cigar with a pristine wrapper.""",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Habano,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,United States,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Corojo,La Palina
La Palina Fuego Verde,Rated 4.4 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"Green FireFlashback to yesteryear — big bands are playing, and everyone’s carrying around skinny, green cigars. Ah, the Candela wrapper. Once the most popular wrapper leaf in America, Candela has gone on to become something of a rarity. Luckily, La Palina has an eye for the past, and is looking to apply some contemporary cigar making knowledge to the classic leaf. Enter La Palina Fuego Verde.Undeniably one of La Palinas most unique offerings to date, Fuego Verde uses the green tinted Candela wrapper to bring a complex Caribbean essence to this mellow-bodied cigar. Luscious Nicaraguan long-fillers and a Honduran binder keep the flavor profile interesting. From first puff down to the nub, you can expect a balance of sweetness and subtle spices. If you’ve never tried a Candela wrapped cigar before, you won’t get a better introduction than this. Smooth, refined, and entirely unique, Fuego Verde has all the qualities you’d expect from the La Palina name.",Mellow-Medium,['Robusto'],Honduran,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Robusto,No,Candela,La Palina
La Palina Goldie,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"La Palina’s finest, bar noneMany blends have rich histories in this industry, but perhaps none are richer than the La Palina Goldie. Before now, every single Goldie cigar in existence was rolled by one person: Maria Sierra. Maria was one of the original women trained on rolling Cuban cigars in Havana, spending years of her life producing Cohiba. Maria retired in 2017, but not before passing off the production of the Goldie to a new specialized tercedor: Lopez “Chino” Perez, who works hard to ensure only the highest level of quality from this legendary blend — with production per day highly limited. Handmade in El Titan de Bronze, the famed Florida cigar factory, Goldie is one immaculate creature. Gracefully adorned with a fan-tailed cap, and seamlessly dressed in a silky-smooth Ecuadorian Habano wrapper, Goldie screams elegance. Toasting the foot, the flavor follows suit, delivering a profile with a perfect marriage of nuttiness, spice, cedar, earth, and sweet, creamy nuances. One of the best cigars you’ll ever try, you need to check out La Palina Goldie ASAP. ",Medium,['Churchill'],Ecuador,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,United States,False,,Churchill,False,Ecuador Habano,La Palina
La Palina Illumination,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"La Palina's Gold StarThe Goldie line from La Palina is a well-beloved, 90-rated blend from La Palina that easily ranks among their best offerings. The only knock against Goldie? The price. Luckily, La Palina has given us Illumination — a new, ""everyday"" version of the Goldie blend that's designed to deliver the same superb experience, without the high price tag. Both Goldie and the new Illumination are made at the El Titan de Bronze factory in Miami, FL. The blend between the two is similar as well — you’ll find an Ecuadorian Habano wrapper, Ecuadorian binder, and Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers. The difference here is that Illumination includes a higher priming ligero leaf, resulting in cigar that’s heartier and spicier than Goldie. You’ll find notes of nuts, black pepper, and earthy undertones making this a balanced cigar that you’ll feel great reaching for time and time again.",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Corona', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,United States,No,,"Belicoso, Corona, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,La Palina
La Palina Maduro,Rated 4.55 out of 5, Based on 11 Ratings ,"Welcome the highly rated La Palina Maduro.La Palina’s rich history began in the late 1800’s. Their patriarch, Samuel Paley immigrated to Chicago from the Ukraine and immediately found work as a ‘lector’ in a cigar factory. By 1896 Sam had started his own factory with a cigar store nearby. Sam dubbed his factory, Congress Cigar Company and quickly gained the name ‘Mr. Sam’, a moniker given to him by his factory workers. After Sam’s retirement in 1926 the La Palina brand was all but forgotten, but now, Sam’s grandson has reinvented the brand in a big way. This addition to the La Palina line offers a darker, heartier variety that is sure to hit all the right notes, entitled, La Palina Maduro.Encased in an uber-oily, naturally processed Connecticut Broadleaf maduro wrapper, La Palina Maduro also features a Brazilian binder and all long-filler Habano-seed tobaccos. Offering billows of thick, flavorful notes with each puff, La Palina Maduro showcases a heady profile of sweet spice, cedar, and citrus, all topped off with a underlying buttery cream nuance. Medium-bodied with impressive balance, this addition to the La Palina arsenal is a maduro enthusiast’s dream come true.The original La Palina Maduro received a well-deserved 91 rating noting: “Draped in a near-black cover leaf, this Churchill offers plenty of sweet and tangy notes that range from marshmallow and chocolate to sour cherry. Complex and interesting.”​",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Brazil,,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,La Palina
La Palina Mr. Sam,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"The return of a legend.La Palina’s rich history began in the late 1800’s. Their patriarch, Samuel Paley immigrated to Chicago from the Ukraine and immediately found work as a ‘lector’ in a cigar factory. By 1896 Sam had started his own factory with a cigar store nearby. Sam dubbed his factory, Congress Cigar Company and quickly gained the name ‘Mr. Sam’, a moniker given to him by his factory workers. After Sam’s retirement in 1926 the La Palina brand was all but forgotten, but now, Sam’s grandson has reinvented the brand in a big way. This addition to the La Palina line pays homage to the man who started it all, enter Mr. Sam.Mr. Sam hails from Miami, Florida, rolled at the famed El Titan de Bronze factory. Utilizing a dark Ecuadorian Habano wrapper leaf, Mr. Sam is packed full of Nicaraguan long-leaves all held in place by a sturdy Nicaraguan binder. Bold notes of pepper, cedar, spice and coffee are evident at the first draw and continue to alternate in intensity right down to the nub. Medium to full-bodied, Mr. Sam boasts ample complexity with a balance that is second to none. La Palina Collection Mr. Sam received a well-deserved 90 rating noting: “Covered in a dark and slightly veiny wrapper, this corona draws and burns evenly. Initial earthy, woody notes lead to a cedary and nutty finish.”​",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,United States,No,,"Corona, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,La Palina
La Palina Nicaragua Connecticut,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"La Palina goes NicaraguanLa Palina Cigars are a true classic, with roots tracing back to the late 1800’s. They have been a staple in humidors across the country ever since – praised for smooth, well rounded blends that create cigars of true elegance and finesse. In 2016, La Palina hit the ICPCR show locked and loaded with some fantastic new blends and a new logo, proving they are still one of the premier cigar manufacturers in the business. One of the newest releases, La Palina Nicaragua Connecticut, enters the scene filling a void in the brands portfolio.La Palina has released cigars from almost every major region, but this collaboration with AJ Fernandez is the first from Nicaragua. The Nicaragua Connecticut comes wrapped in an Ecuadorian Connecticut Shade leaf – another first for La Palina. The binder and filler tobaccos are both cultivated in the rich soils of Nicaragua. The overall experience is mellow to medium-bodied, boasting rich and creamy flavors with hints of earth, pepper and roasted nuts. We’ve been waiting for a Nicaraguan from La Palina for years now. And Nicaragua Connecticut does not disappoint.",Mellow-Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,La Palina
La Palina Nicaragua Oscuro,Rated 4.42 out of 5, Based on 12 Ratings ,"Dark, rich, and La Palina to the coreLa Palina has been producing quality cigars with a passion since they first opened their doors in the late 1800’s. They have released cigars from almost every major tobacco region, providing the most refined tastes and an experience of elegance. Surprisingly enough, they portfolio has never had included a cigar from the rich soils of Nicaragua, until now. Teaming up with master blender AJ Fernandez, the La Palina Nicaragua line is offered in two different wrappers options, both produced in AJ’s esteemed factory in Esteli.On Nicaragua Oscuro, a deep brown Ecuadorian Oscuro wrapper is applied up top, with savory Nicaraguan tobaccos brimming underneath. The profile? Medium-bodied with hints of leather. Dark chocolate and oak join the mix as the cigar progresses. La Palina has been releasing a bevy of exciting new blends over the past year, that’s for sure. And Nicaraguan Oscuro might just be the best of the bunch.Good news! La Palina Nicaragua Oscuro received a 90-point rating in November 2019. The review noted: ""A thick log of a cigar with an open draw and even burn. Notes of cedar, black tea and citrus take on a touch of star anise before the malted chocolate finish.""",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Oscuro,La Palina
La Palina No. 1,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"No. 1 by all accountsLa Palina has a sterling reputation among enthusiasts - and rightfully so. Their cigars are becoming classics for their complex profiles and not to mention, the classic branding. But now, the minds behind La Palina are thinking outside the box for their newest creations, and bringing something completely different to the market.     La Palina Number 1 features an Ecuadorian Sumatra wrapper with long fillers from Nicaragua and Honduras, and a unique binder tobacco from Costa Rica. This stick is nothing short of complex with notes of leather, spice, and hay. Different from what we’re used to? Yes! Can you enjoy it down to the nub? Absolutely! La Palina No. 1 recently earned a 90-rating, noting: ""fortified by leathery notes and a touch of licorice. The finish is long and resonant."" ",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Costa Rica,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Sumatra,La Palina
La Palina No. 2,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Who does No. 2 work for!? La Palina is a classic brand. Classic flavors, classic style, heck the company dates back to the 1800’s, so what would you expect? But today, the La Palina brand is straying from its classic roots and giving its newest cigar line a bit of a modern update. Enter the numbered series from La Palina cigars - a contemporary line, for the contemporary cigar lover. While the most noticeable change is the branding, La Palina No. 2’s unique use of a Costa Rican wrapper with Honduran and Nicaraguan long-fillers give this premium a spicy and sweet character with notes of cocoa and earth. Definitely worth the experience time and time again, this is one cigar you cannot miss.",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Costa Rican,La Palina
La Palina Paley's Vault,Rated 4.44 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"As American as apple pie! The La Palina brand of cigars has been around for years and years. Over 120, to be exact! Originally called the “Congress Cigar Company” and run by the son of CBS’s founder, La Palina was broadcast across the airwaves as “The Quality Cigar” for years in the early 1900’s. Today, Sam Paley’s grandson has revitalized the brand, receiving tons of 90+ ratings and fan accolades for their efforts. That brings us to the cigar at hand today: Paley’s Vault. A test blend that never received a full release, these cigars were originally stored in the aging room for Bill Paley to enjoy whenever he would visit the factory. Since then, they went on to release them in extremely limited fashion in collection-friendly glass tubes. The blend here is hush-hush, but I can promise you you’ll find tons of natural sweetness and the type of balanced complexity that only comes from perfectly aged tobaccos. Grab a box, and enjoy a piece of cigar history. Note: 5-packs will not come packaged in tubes. ",Medium,['Toro'],,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Corojo,La Palina
La Palina Red Label,Rated 4.24 out of 5, Based on 33 Ratings ,"Stop and look at La Palina Red Label.La Palina is becoming an industry stalwart when it comes to extremely flavorful, well made, boutique cigars. The brand was resurrected by Bill Paley, the grandson of founder Sam Paley, and has quickly become one of the most collected and revered brands in the industry. Hailing from the Plasencia's El Pariaso Factory in Honduras, La Palina Red Label is dressed in an Ecuadoran Sun-Grown wrapper over rich, well-aged Nicaraguan and Honduran long-fillers. The cigar starts off mellow, with a creamy essence before progressing to a solid medium-body with spice, pepper, and wood making an appearance. La Palina Red Label is enchanting, from its classy appearance to its succulent full flavored medium-bodied profile, and will soon occupy real estate in humidors across the country.La Palina Red Label received a well-deserved 92-rating noting: ""This cigar has a toothy wrapper and burns well. Cedar and nutty intonations of pecan leave a toasty graham cracker finish with a touch of minerality on the palate.""",Mellow-Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Ecuador Sungrown,La Palina
La Palina Regal Reserve Connecticut,Rated 4.4 out of 5, Based on 10 Ratings ,"A herf fit for a king!Founded in 1896, La Palina’s empire is vast. Boasting several 90+ ratings and fans including high-society snobs and average Joes alike, the sun never sets on La Palina’s success. No matter your situation, you’ll feel like a monarch when you light a La Palina.The La Palina Regal Reserve Connecticut wears a golden Connecticut shade wrapper packed over well-aged Nicaraguan & Costa Rican long-fillers, and the easy-going flavor profile is sure to please loyal fans of all things mellow. Notes of toast and roasted nuts kick off the experience, with a pleasantly creamy texture and a touch of natural sweetness. A Regal blend indeed!",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,"Costa Rican, Nicaraguan",False,,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Robusto",No,Connecticut,La Palina
La Palina Regal Reserve Habano,Rated 4.6 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"Feel like a king every time you light up.When the son of CBS’s founder created the La Palina cigar brand in 1896, he fully expected to achieve success. But it’s doubtful he would’ve realized how big of a hit his cigars would be more than 120 years later. La Palina stands strong as an excellent choice for anyone looking for a smooth, carefully blended experience.The La Palina Regal Reserve Habano continues that tradition, producing medium-bodied loaded with well-balanced complexity. The blend starts with a Cuban-seed Habano wrapper and features carefully selected long-fillers from Nicaragua and Costa Rica, for a medium-bodied experience truly fit for royalty.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,"Costa Rican, Nicaraguan",False,,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Robusto",No,Habano,La Palina
La Palina Regal Reserve Oscuro,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"The dark side of royalty.Look, it ain’t easy being king. Few brands have been able to boast the same success that’s followed La Palina, and a brand like this, the grind never stops. The latest brainchild from Bill Paley, great-grandson of CBS’s founder, is dark, delicious, and tastes like a million bucks. Introducing the La Palina Regal Reserve Oscuro!Featuring a profile that’s at the same time rich and spicy yet smooth and well-balanced, the La Palina Regal Reserve Oscuro wears a dark oscuro wrapper covering meticulously blended long-fillers sourced from Costa Rica and the Jamastran province of Nicaragua. The flavor profile is undeniably decadent, enveloping your senses in notes of dark chocolate, leather and earth. Whether you’re a pauper or a prince or anything in between, if you like full-bodied cigars, you’ll want to keep some La Palina Regal Reserve Oscuro cigars in your humidor at all times.",Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,"Costa Rican, Nicaraguan",False,,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Robusto",No,Oscuro,La Palina
La Perla Habana 1515,Rated 4.45 out of 5, Based on 168 Ratings ,"A tribute to Cuba.Created to celebrate the 500th anniversary of the founding of Havana, Cuba, this new La Perla Habana is truly something special. Handcrafted in Nicaragua by AJ Fernandez, La Perla Habana 1515 combines a dark Habano Ecuador wrapper, Sumatra Ecuador binder, and a rich blend of Cuban-seed long-fillers from Esteli, Condega, and Jalapa, Nicaragua. This combination delivers a classic, Cuban-esque profile that’s met with amped up strength and complexity. Notes of cream, pepper, earth, wood, coffee, and more meld perfectly to deliver a delicious, elegant, highly-memorable experience. A perfect tribute to Cuba’s rich cigar history, and a hellova cigar you’ll savor down to the last puff.​",Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Sumatra,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Habano,La Perla Habana
La Perla Habana Black & Tan,Rated 4.02 out of 5, Based on 55 Ratings ,"Tasty morsels that have been deliciously flavored with the sweet taste of coffee and Irish Crème. These cigarillos are super satisfying and are priced to move, plus they offer up pleasant, subtle flavors without overpowering at any point. Wrapped in a Sumatra wrapper and packaged in boxes of 50, you’ll have enough to last you a good, long time. Go ahead and sample the first flavored cigarillos from the La Perla Habana line. You won’t be sorry that you did.",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,,True,No,More Details,Ireland,No,,Cigarillos,Yes,Sumatra,La Perla Habana
La Perla Habana Black Pearl Morado,Rated 4.35 out of 5, Based on 358 Ratings ,"You say Morado, I say Moraadooh!Don't be fooled by its purple garb, La Perla Habana Morado is the real deal. A full-flavored, Cuban-esque handmade cigar that can play ball with the best of 'em. Featuring an authentic, African Cameroon wrapper and a choice Nicaraguan long-filler blend, La Perla Habana Morado unleashes a full-flavored assault of complexity. Notes of oak, caramel, and espresso are backed by rich tobacco goodness. Morado is a medium-bodied sipper that delivers every time.La Perla Habana Morado received a well-deserved 93-point rating: ""An attractive cigar with an even draw and perfect burn. It delivers a substantial smoke, rich with profound tobacco flavors and a sweet note on the finish.""",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Robusto, Toro",No,Cameroon,La Perla Habana
La Perla Habana Black Pearl Original,Rated 4.27 out of 5, Based on 83 Ratings ,"I love the smell of insane cigar deals in the morning.La Perla’s Black Pearl is an, er, jewel of the first order. An uber-tasty maduro with lip-smacking, deep maduro flavors galore, trumped only by CI’s providential discount pricing. Call me insane, call me anything, you can even call the men in the white coats, but just remember to call me for dinner because there’s no denying the goodness of this deal. Black Pearl brings a jet-black Brazilian Arapiraca maduro wrapper which disguises a meaty long-filler blend of aged tobaccos from Nicaragua, Mexico, and the Dominican to create a rich, brawny profile that’s medium in body and balanced throughout. Complex notes of toast and wood mingle with a subtle caramel sweetness, while the rich aroma fills the room with deep charcoal scents. Rich and flavorful, Black Pearl would be a bargain at twice the price but at CI’s introductory offer, it’s downright epic.",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Brazilian,La Perla Habana
La Perla Habana Black Pearl Oro,Rated 4.39 out of 5, Based on 277 Ratings ,"Another La Perla gemAsk some of the cigar enthusiasts out there what a 90+ rated cigar is supposed to cost, and I’m sure they’ll tell you $8, $9, even $10+. These guys insist that you have to hand your paycheck over in order to get a “real” cigar. Well, you and I both know these guys are nuts, and La Perla Habana Black Pearl is the nail in the coffin of that argument. The last two blends in this line, Black Pearl Rojo and Black Pearl Maduro, are a mere $3 apiece and have received a ‘90’ and ‘93’-rating. And now, we’ve got the same aged Cuban-seed long-filler tobaccos of those blends with a smooth Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper.​They’ve got another winner on their hands here with this mellow-bodied blend (and I say that with confidence because the samples we received originally disappeared in a matter of hours). Lighting these suckers up you’ll be impressed by the savory, smooth, creamy notes of this complex, well-balanced morning stogie. And, here’s the best part — La Pearl Habana Black Pearl Oro starts at an even lower price than its fuller-bodied companions. ​",Mellow-Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,La Perla Habana
La Perla Habana Black Pearl Rojo,Rated 4.34 out of 5, Based on 80 Ratings ,"Rojo's got mojo!La Perla Habana Rojo is plum good. I rediscovered this 90-rated beaut recently and welcome it back into the CI stable with open arms. And I'm plying you with heavy doses of discounts to get the party started, quickly. Featuring exquisite materials, including a thick, toothy Habana Criollo wrapper and generously proportioned filler blend of Nicaraguan tobaccos, La Perla Habana Rojo is primed to deliver rich, heady flavor. As it burns, you'll notice hints of nuts, cocoa, cream and a slightly peppery, cedary finish. Medium to full in body, but complex and refined, Rojo will bring a smile to any fan of boutique cigars. La Perla Habana Rojo received an outstanding 90-point rating along with ""Best Buy"" honors:Dark, oily and alluring, with a superb draw and lovely burn. The cigar is sweet and spicy, with chocolate notes, hints of roasted nuts and earth and a black coffee finish.",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Robusto, Toro",No,Criollo,La Perla Habana
La Perla Habana Cazadores,Rated 3.83 out of 5, Based on 157 Ratings ,"La Perla, now in dirt cheap. If you've been checking out the competition (shame on you!), you know that our prices on La Perla Habana are crazy-low. 93-rated handmades for less than $3 apiece in a box - it's nutty. Probably too nutty. But that's who we are, and it's what we do. Like they say, old habits die hard and discounting runs in our blood. Can't change, don't wanna change, will never change....so here's round #2,574. The brand new LPH Habano is yours starting at a paltry buck-seventy-five apiece.LPH Cazadores by La Perla Habana is bred for everyday enjoyment and, of course, rich Cuban-esque flavor. Crafted with a top-grade Habano Criollo wrapper leaf and an aged 'Cuban Sandwich' blend of Nicaraguan and Dominican tobaccos, this medium-bodied blend offers flavor in droves. Notes of cedar, rich tobacco, pepper, earth, and nuts are present before a delicious, slightly sweet finish. It's tasty, no doubt. And at my massively discounted prices, you can burn through 'em recklessly and still have enough cash left over to splurge on super-sizing.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Criollo,La Perla Habana
La Perla Habana Cazadores Connecticut,Rated 3.95 out of 5, Based on 154 Ratings ,"Cazadores equals valueThese tasty gems deliver a premium experience while saving you some serious coin. If you’ve been around Camp CI a bit, you know we’ve got insane prices on La Perla. Under $3 for 93-rated blends is unheard of in some lands, but in the home of Cigar Bliss, this is just everyday awesomeness. And now, we can add a modest-bodied blend to the La Perla portfolio of value. These Cazadores are filled with rich, Cuban-inspired flavor with a pleasant, smooth body. The aged ‘Cuban Sandwich’ style is wrapped in a Connecticut wrapper, making this a perfect cigar for your morning tee time, or a relaxing blend after a long week at work. Flavors of cream, rich tobacco, earth and nuts come through with reliable consistency, burning cool and pleasant time and time again. For those that haven’t experienced LPH yet, you’re in for a real treat. And for those of you that are already a fan, I’m sure you’ll find this cigar a great addition to your regular rotation. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,La Perla Habana
La Perla Habana Classic,Rated 4.34 out of 5, Based on 155 Ratings ,"Classic, to the T!La Perla Habana Classic is the one that started it all. A jim-dandy of a good time, now at an unthinkable, everyday discount. Comprised of a top-grade Indonesian wrapper and brimming with aged long-fillers from Honduran, Nicaragua and the Dominican Republic, La Perla Habana Classic dishes out a smooth and complex medium-bodied flavor. With crisp notes of earth, cedar, spices and a semi-sweet, creamy finish, Classic fits the bill any time of day. And at these prices, why not?",Mellow-Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Robusto, Toro",No,Indonesian,La Perla Habana
La Perla Habana Classic Cameroon,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"We’re nuts for a Cameroon wrapper!With more than a few 90+ ratings under their belt, it is safe to say that La Perla Habana cigars knows a thing or two about blending tobaccos. Their refined tobacco pairing techniques continue to deliver great tasting notes and aromas throughout all their lines. And rest assured, their newest addition is no different!The La Perla Habana Classic Cameroon cigar takes their original La Perla Habana Classic blend of Dominican, Honduran, and Nicaraguan fillers and binder, and kicks it up a notch by swaddling it in a beautiful Cameroon wrapper. Toothy Cameroon tobacco leaves add an oily sheen to the look of a cigar, enticing you to want to enjoy every draw. As you slowly burn through the cigar, a parade of nuts, toast, butter, and cedar meld with a natural sweetness that dances across your palate. Of course, an experience like this could be enjoyable anytime of the day, but don’t take our word for it. Light one up and see for yourself! ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Connecticut Broadleaf,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Cameroon,La Perla Habana
La Perla Habana Classic Maduro,Rated 4.37 out of 5, Based on 163 Ratings ,"La Perla Habana Classic Maduro - a recipe for success and a veritable masterpiece in waiting. This right here is yet another example why being a boutique-burning lunatic in today's cigar world is....well, right. Feels right, tastes right, and in many cases - such as this - priced right. Take the same, top-selling LPH Classic combo of aged Honduran, Nicaraguan, and Dominican long-fillers. Blend them inside a hefty 54-ring frame. Carefully drape a dark and oily Brazilian Arapiraca maduro wrapper around this tasty combo. Lock them in the aging vault for a long cedar nap. BOOM.... instant winner. LPH Classic Maduro is deep in rich, chewy flavors. A toasty, medium-bodied bouquet offers balanced notes of oak, earth, leather, and semi-sweet spices throughout the slow-burn.",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Maduro,La Perla Habana
La Perla Habana White Pearl,Rated 4.45 out of 5, Based on 91 Ratings ,"These ain’t your grandma’s pearls.If you’re a fan of super-premium, mellow cigars but you’re really not a fan of paying top dollar, then La Perla Habana White Pearl is the blend for you. Smooth, mellow, creamy, and modest flavors abound, and can easily be compared to pricier offerings such as Ashton Classic and Monte White. But there is one huge difference – the price tag. Because you’re here and because I would never dream of making you spend one shiny nickel more than you need to, White Pearl is generously discounted and offered up for way less than it’s worth.An Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper leaf enshrouds a Sumatran binder, and the whole shebang is completed by the generous addition of Honduran and Nicaraguan filler, including just enough ligero to deliver a little kick. The flavors are complex, yet maintain that smooth and creamy character that’s reminiscent of a much costlier brand. If you have big city taste and a small town budget, then you’ve come to the right place.​",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Sumatra,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,La Perla Habana
La Perla Habana WIDE,Rated 4.61 out of 5, Based on 54 Ratings ,"A classic brand, now with a delightful new twist.La Perla WIDE was created for the contemporary seeking cigar connoisseur who appreciates the fine quality of tradition but still wants to see a bit of innovation. Gentlemen, allow me to introduce La Perla Habana WIDE, a bold line of cigars offered in big ring gauges for your enjoyment. Handcrafted beneath the watchful gaze of Nestor Plasencia, this is the La Perla that you’ve been waiting for. A tri-country filler mix of Honduran, Nicaraguan, and Costa Rican tobacco leaves is topped with a Honduran binder and a sleek, hearty Pennsylvania Broadleaf wrapper. The flavors are bold and complex, with subtle nuances that will positively delight the palate. It has a distinctive vibe, meshing classic and contemporary and succeeding with ease. From first puff to final draw, this is one blend you don’t want to miss.​",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Honduran,"Costa Rican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Pennsylvania Broadleaf,La Perla Habana
La Tradicion Perdomo Reserve Sun Grown,Rated 4.92 out of 5,,"Make reservations for this PerdomoLa Tradicion Perdomo Reserve cigars. A mouthful of a name, but this series of limited edition sticks from Nick Perdomo was a real favorite of those in the know. A few years back the line disappeared, and those who got the heads up snatched all these premiums up like doomsday preppers. Now, I’m happy to announce that La Tradicion Perdomo Reserve is back, and just as good as we all remember. There’s three different wrappers available on these gems, but today, let’s focus in on the Sun Grown. Those who’ve burnt Perdomo before know that the Sun Grown wrapper is a specialty of Nick’s Nicaraguan factory, and that’s more than obvious on this stick. With Nicaraguan binder and filler, the La Tradicion Perdomo Reserve Sun Grown is medium-bodied, balanced, loaded with natural sweetness, earthy notes, and a slight black pepper. In short, you better snatch this one up. ​",Medium,"['Figurado', 'Gordo', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Figurado, Gordo, Torpedo",No,Nicaraguan,
La Unica,Rated 4.78 out of 5, Based on 18 Ratings ,"Unmatched flavor for an unmatched price.In 1985 Stanford Newman of JC Newman Cigar Co. approached Carlos Fuente, Sr. with a challenge...he wanted to create a premium cigar offered in bundles. Bundles at that time were “seconds” and not thought of highly. Then, Stanford had the brilliant idea that if he could offer a premium quality bundled cigar, customers would love them. In 1986 La Unica was born, and it has remained a top selling premium bundled cigar for JC Newman to this day. It sold so well that the Newman's decided to award this fan-favorite blend with a packaging update, and in 2010 after nearly 25 years in circulation, La Unica finally received the box packaging that it always deserved.Manufactured at Tabacalera A. Fuente in the Dominican Republic and coming with your choice of a creamy Connecticut or a rich Connecticut broadleaf maduro wrapper, La Unica contains a long-filler blend of aged, premium Cuban-seed Dominican tobaccos and is a pleasant and consistent mellow to medium-bodied blend. The profile is rich and balanced, and you’ll be greeted with flavors of nuts, cream, and fruit. La Unica is a perfect cigar to enjoy any time of day.​",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Lancero/Panatela, Presidente, Robusto, Toro",No,"Connecticut, Connecticut Broadleaf",
La Vieja Habana Connecticut,Rated 4.62 out of 5, Based on 34 Ratings ,"A delightful classic by Drew Estate!LVH Fumas by Drew Estate are handmade in Esteli, Nicaragua and offer gorgeous packaging and - despite SCHIP tax increases - remains a good value. The Connecticut Shade is the most mellow of the LVH Fumas blends. Dressed in a true Connecticut Shade wrapper, one that's silky and smooth, this blend combines a mixed-filler combination of Nicaraguan tobaccos from Esteli and the Jalapa Valley. The result is a mellow blend with creamy, smooth nuances including toasty notes of earth and coffee.",Mellow-Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Cigarillos, Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Drew Estate Cigars
La Vieja Habana Corojo,Rated 4.73 out of 5, Based on 15 Ratings ,"A delightful classic by Drew Estate!LVH Fumas by Drew Estate are handmade in Esteli, Nicaragua and offer gorgeous packaging and - despite SCHIP tax increases - remains a good value. Each cigar within the Corojo series utilizes a Cuban Corojo wrapper and a mixed-filler blend of Nicaraguan tobaccos grown in both Esteli and the Jalapa Valley of Nicaragua. These slow-burning puros are rich and flavorful with a bit of spice and earthy flavors. And at these prices, they're easy to reach for every day. ",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Cigarillos, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Corojo, Habano",Drew Estate Cigars
La Vieja Habana Maduro,Rated 4.56 out of 5, Based on 34 Ratings ,"A delightful classic by Drew Estate!LVH Fumas by Drew Estate are handmade in Esteli, Nicaragua and offer gorgeous packaging and - despite SCHIP tax increases - remains a good value. The Maduro variety combines a dark and toothy Brazilian maduro wrapper with a mixed-filler blend of Nicaraguan tobaccos grown in Esteli and Jalapa. The result is rich and smooth, with hints of coffee and earth. The dark wrapper lends a slight, natural sweetness to the aftertaste. Grab a box of La Vieja Habana Maduro, and enjoy a rich cigar without empyting the piggy bank.",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Cigarillos, Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Brazilian,Drew Estate Cigars
La Zona Connecticut,Rated 4.52 out of 5,,"Zoning in.New from Erik Espinosa, the man behind brands such as: 601, Murcielago and Cubao, comes his latest endeavor, La Zona. Named after his boutique factory in Esteli, Nicaragua, La Zona takes an all substance approach to deliver a high end handmade brimming with character.Featuring a silky Ecuador Connecticut wrapper, and chock full of Nicaraguan long-fillers, La Zona Connecticut dishes out smooth mellow flavor in spades. Up front your palate is greeted with soft notes of cream, coffee, leather, and toast before a gentle hint of spice enters the fray. Thanks to its balanced bouquet, the La Zona Connecticut dances right around medium-bodied, dishing out a well-rounded any time of day indulgence.",Mellow-Medium,['Robusto'],,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Robusto,No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Lars Tetens Cubagua,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Transport your senses to a tropical paradise.When you step onto the island of Cubagua off the coast of Venezuela, you step away from the worries and cares of the rat-race modern lifestyle. Hustle-and-bustle doesn’t exist in this idyllic landscape, without roads, without skyscrapers, and at least two hours away by ferry from civilization as most people know it. The goal behind Lars Teten’s Cubagua is to bring this spirit of slowing down & kicking back to your daily cigar rotation.The exact details of the Cubagua blend are closely guarded, but the flavors are distinct and unlike anything else. A creamy earthiness is at the forefront, the spicy yet smooth flavors accentuated perfectly by a sweetened cap. Lighting up a Lars Tetens Cigar is always a great experience, but the Cubagua might just make you feel like you’re kicking back on a sunny beach without a care in the world.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,True,,More Details,,False,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",True,,
Lars Tetens Grass,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Dinner is served.Lars Tetens is a man of a great many talents. In addition to being a major driver in the cigar boom of the ‘90s and recreating many cigar production techniques nearly lost to time, he has also earned the title of master chef for his skill in cooking. The Lars Tetens Grass is inspired by many of his best dishes, blended to achieve a complex, layered profile reminiscent of a fine dining experience. The Grass exhibits an aromatic medium-bodied profile, and is one of Lars Tetens’s most highly-sought-after blends. Lars keeps the exact blend details a secret to ensure their status as being entirely unique, but we do know this is a fantastic blend that shouldn’t be overlooked. Light up a Lars Tetens Grass, and treat your palate to a cigar feast.",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Toro']",,,True,,More Details,,False,,"Gordo, Toro",True,,
Lars Tetens Phat Cigars,Rated 5 out of 5,,"All of these things are not like the others.Lars Tetens is an eclectic man. A complex individual who wears many hats, he’s always ready to surprise fans and followers with new talents and breathtaking innovations. Lars Tetens Phat Cigars carries that same reputation, and offers different experiences to fit any taste & palate, for an ever-changing experience that still exhibits Lars Tetens’s skills in consistency and quality.  Each one of Lars Tetens Phat Cigars has a unique flavor and size, but they all carry the same undeniable Lars Tetens quality. Knockoffs are eliminated by keeping the blend details secret, and they’re all rolled with a twisted head & untrimmed foot to add to the unique style of this great release. Ranging from mellow & creamy to spicy and bold, there’s a Phat Cigar for beginners and aficionados alike.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Lonsdale', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,True,,More Details,,False,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Lonsdale, Robusto, Toro",False,,
Lars Tetens Serie D,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Strength never goes out of style.During the cigar boom of the 1990s, the Lars Tetens name was inescapable. His blends were expertly crafted and featured hand-selected tobacco with bold, rich flavors that captivated cigar aficionados everywhere. Now Lars Tetens has revived this influential brand, and the Serie D is the perfect tribute to the full bodied blends that made Lars Tetens a household name in cigar shops.Carefully hand-crafted using top-quality, hand-selected tobacco, the Serie D exhibits a full-bodied profile replete with earth, pepper, and leather. These fine specimens serve as a reminder of what a good, full-bodied cigar should be, and owing to the undisclosed blend details, are at the same time classic and completely unique. Give the Lars Tetens Serie D a try, and get back to the essentials.",Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,True,,More Details,,False,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",False,,
Lars Tetens SS,Rated 5 out of 5,,"What’s ancient is new again.Mankind has been enjoying cigars for eons, but how they make them has changed over time. The ancient methods of cigar production were nearly forgotten, consigned to the dustbin of history, until visionary and Renaissance man Lars Tetens decided to get into the cigar game. Now, after much too long of a wait, Lars is ready rerelease his once-in-a-lifetime cigar experience, the Lars Tetens SS.Medium-bodied with a spicy-sweet cap, this cigar will bend your perception of what a cigar should taste like. The production methods and blend are kept secret, but it’s obvious that Lars has something truly special and unique here. Home-bodies need not apply, this is a cigar experience for those looking for something different. If you’ve been getting bored with the same old flavors and experience, you’ll definitely want to give the SS a try.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,True,,More Details,,False,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",True,,
Lars Tetens Steam Punk,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Wake up your palate.Listen up: Lars Tetens is back, and he pulled out all the stops. The man-of-many-talents, including master chef and luxury designer, is finally bringing his fine handmade cigars back into cigar shops everywhere. Lars Tetens knows that for a cigar to truly be great, it needs to appeal to both seasoned aficionados and beginners alike, which is exactly the spirit behind the Lars Tetens Steampunk.Lars creates blends that are so different from anything else on the market, details and production methods are kept secret to ensure that no imitators pop up. The Steam Punk is a good example of just why that is, exhibiting a long, delicious finish and a full-flavored profile while maintaining an accessible medium-body. If you’ve been wondering what makes Lars Tetens Cigars so special, you won’t want to miss your chance to grab a box of Steam Punk.",Medium,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",,,True,,More Details,,False,,"Robusto, Toro",False,,
Lars Tetens Sutton Place,Rated 4.56 out of 5,,"A high-society experience.Sutton Place, Manhattan is where you can find some of the most opulent lifestyles in the US. The brownstones, constructed in 1875, are home to the fat-cats, movers-and-shakers, and socialites who know the true meaning of luxury. When you light up a Lars Tetens Sutton Place, your palate will be imbued with this spirit of cocktail parties and high-society living, for a taste of the high-life every time you light up.That feeling of opulence is achieved through a silky-smooth profile without any sharp edges or aggression. Mellow bodied flavors coat the palate, drowning out worries and cares as the stogie burns down. The blend is kept secret to foil any would-be copy cats, but the profile is undeniably smooth and makes for a prestigious cigar experience.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto']",,,True,,More Details,,False,,"Churchill, Petite Corona, Robusto",False,,
Las 6 Provincias MTZ BP,Rated 4 out of 5,,"A nod to the olde-world.Before Castro rose to power in Cuba and changed the country & the cigar industry forever, the island nation was divided into 6 provinces: La Habana, Matanzas, Pinar del Rio, Camaguey, and Oriente. The communist dictator split these into the 15 provinces that make up Cuba today, but Espinosa refuses to let the world forget those pre-Castro days with his 6 Provincias cigar series. Last year saw the first release in this line with the LHB, their tribute to the province of La Habana. The next in line is Matanzas, and contains an entirely new blend that so far has been kept under tight wraps. It’s being produced at the San Lotano factory in Ocetal, Nicaragua from the finest tobacco, and jam-packed with classic pre-embargo flavors that go along perfectly with the ornate box art. The LHB sold out so quick that plenty of people didn’t even know it existed, so grab a box of MTZ and light up pre-Castro style. ",,[],,,False,No,More Details,,No,,,No,,
Las Cabrillas,Rated 4.61 out of 5, Based on 46 Ratings ,"Enjoy the bargain-based quality of Las Cabrillas.Las Cabrillas is a tasty little number from Honduras dressed in silky Connecticut shade wrappers. This subtle to medium-bodied handmade combines an all-Mexican blend of long-fillers inside a Mexican binder. Throw in some meaty big-ring sizes and you have an eventful slow-burner that won’t break the bank. Expect a surprisingly zesty little blend that’s mellow in character, offering notes of earth and sweet pepper with a long and satisfying finish. Las Cabrillas is a great everyday 'gar. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto']",Mexican,Mexican,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto",No,Connecticut,
L'Atelier,Rated 4.57 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"L'Atelier = the workshopWhat do you get when you take Pete Johnson, his brother, add a couple of friends to the mix, and make a cigar? Answer - L'Atelier. Blended by Pete Johnson, and hand-crafted in Pepin's My Father Factory, each cigar shows up to the big stage well prepared. Dressed to impress, each L'Atelier comes cloaked in a bold new wrapper leaf known as 'Sancti Spiritus' - a hybrid of Criollo and Pelo de Oro. Grown in the misty valleys of Ecuador, this beautiful leaf boasts a wonderful aroma, and houses a rich core of Nicaraguan long-fillers. Together, this recipe strikes up medium to full-bodied, containing meaty notes of spice, cedar, earth, dried fruit, and a long hearty finish. The cherry on top is a beautiful pigtail cap. L'Atelier received Humidor Selection honors and several top ratings, including two 92-point scores and a 94-point head-turner, which noted: ""The burn and draw are superb on this beautifully balanced cigar. Notes of chocolate and wood build on the palate before taking on touches of vanilla and earthy truffle.""",Medium-Full,"['Lancero/Panatela', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Lancero/Panatela, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,L'Atelier
L'Atelier Cote d'Or 2017,Rated 5 out of 5,,"A rare findCigars and wine have a lot in common - aside from being delicious and a perfect pair, both need a lot of time, energy, and care in order to obtain great flavor and balance. On top of that, in order to make the best possible product, you need the best ingredients. This is something L’Atelier Owner Pete Johnson understands very, very well - so he created a cigar named for a region in France known for its pinot noir wine varietals made with temperamental grapes.In the same spirit, Cote d’Or 2017 uses the ultra-rare and temperamental Pelo de Oro tobacco in the blend of fillers. When combined with the brand’s Sancti Spiritus tobacco, you’ll get a seriously tasty cigar with boldness, complexity, and a balance that’s as rare as the tobacco. This is a limited production offering, so once we’re out this gem is gone forever.",Full,['Churchill'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Churchill,No,"Ecuador Habano, Varied",
L'Atelier El Suelo,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 8 Ratings ,"The every day L'Atelier.Enter the new El Suelo by L'Atelier. Meaning 'the ground', or 'the soil' in Spanish, El Suelo was crafted as an every day offering equipped with an everyman price tag. And the exciting part is, it doesn't skimp on a single thing. Blended by Pete Johnson, and hailing from Don Pepin's Tabacalera Cubana factory, each cigar is well-balanced, medium in body, and provides plenty of big-time flavor. At play is an Ecuadorian Habano wrapper, draped over a core of Nicaraguan and Connecticut Broadleaf long-fillers. The end result is a cigar exuding notes of leather, earth, nuts, roasted coffee bean, and undeniable hint of sweetness. Boasting a resounding similarity to L'Atelier's pricier offerings, El Suelo is worth far more than the asking price.",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto']",,"Connecticut, Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Petite Corona, Robusto",No,Ecuador Habano,L'Atelier
L'Atelier Extension de la Racine 2016,Rated 5 out of 5,,"A fancy name, but a kickass cigarPete Johnson has released some of the most lip smackingly good cigars on the market today. His L’Atelier brand has a number of 90+ ratings, and that’s no accident. L’Atelier’s tobaccos are hand selected, and the cigars are rolled at the My Father Factory in Estelí. With that much attention to detail, you can be sure that this brand will absolutely blow your mind.  L’Atelier Extension de la Racine 2016 is an absolute dream of a premium, made with a Nicaraguan Sun Grown Criollo ‘98 wrapper with Nicaraguan binders and fillers inside - along with the signature Sancti Spiritus tobacco. Medium to full bodied, this palate pleaser is packed with satisfying notes of earth, roasted nuts, and espresso. This limited edition beauty is totally satisfying, but there are only so many to go around, so order now before we run out.",Medium-Full,['Robusto'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Robusto,No,Criollo '98,
L'Atelier Extension de la Racine 2017,Rated 5 out of 5,,"A yearly traditionPete Johnson does not mess around when it comes to the quality of his cigars. They’re all tasty little treats and each time Johnson releases something - I get a little giddy. The L’Atelier brand utilizes top of the line tobaccos and they’re all made in Estelí, Nicaragua by Pepin at the My Father Factory. One of this brand’s latest creations is Extension de la Racine 2017. This blend uses top choice long-fillers from Nicaragua. L’Atelier’s signature style utilizes the rare Sancti Spiritus tobacco as the binder - all wrapped in a Sun Grown Criollo wrapper. This exquisite blend makes for a delightful experience with notes of white pepper, cedar, a touch baking spices, and coffee. The only downside to this cigar is it’s a limited run, so order now while we still have inventory.",Medium-Full,['Robusto Extra'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Robusto Extra,No,Criollo,
L'Atelier Identite,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"No Secret Identity Here...Just when you thought L’Atelier’s cigars couldn’t get more interesting, Pete Johnson goes and does something like this. I mean, he’s already got a handful of 90+ ratings and a portfolio of tasty, tasty premiums - so it’s clear now that Mr. Johnson is just showing off now. Crafted at the My Father Factory in Estelí, Nicaragua L’Atelier Identite uses the brand’s signature Santci Spiritus tobacco as the wrapper as well as in the filler and binder. Medium to full-bodied, Identite has a distinct profile with notes of cedar, cream, a touch of spice, and some cocoa. This gem is an absolute pleasure with flavors that are completely unique. Give ‘er a go, you won’t regret it. ",Medium,['Corona'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Corona,No,Ecuador Habano,
L'Atelier Maduro,Rated 4.58 out of 5,,"L'Atelier maduro-ified.Like the name L'Atelier (the workshop) implies, the guys behind the wheel never stop tinkering around with blends. I like to think of them as mad scientists, always on the lookout for the next best thing. And from their workbench spawns a bold maduro variety, L'Atelier Maduro.Hailing once again from Pepin's My Father factory, L'Atelier Maduro is proof that darker cigars don't need head-spinning strength to win you over. This time you'll find the 'Sancti Spiritus' - the hybrid wrapper leaf from the regular L'Atelier - now acting as the binder. This leaf imparts a great depth of complexity when paired with the aged Nicaraguan long-fillers and oily, slightly toothy Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper. This exciting recipe produces a medium, sometimes medium to full-bodied profile of rich, dense nuances. Expect hints of molasses, coffee bean, and spices, to accent a long semi-sweet finish. A well-done maduro churning out ample flavor in a versatile format. It's fair to say L'Atelier gone and did it again.",Medium,['Toro'],,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Connecticut Broadleaf,
L'Atelier Selection Speciale,Rated 4.33 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Pete Johnson and friends are back!L’Atelier Selection Speciale is well on its way to being an instant classic. Using a similar formula as its 94 rated older brother, this is sure to send you right on your way to stogie nirvana! Once again using the finest tobaccos from the legendary Oliva Tobacco Company and manufactured in the famed My Father Cigars factory in Esteli, Nicaragua these beauties make their presence known from first light and hold it with ease until the final draw.​Selection Speciale uses the same mold-resistant hybrid wrapper as the initial L’Atelier. Dubbed Sancti Spiritus, higher primings are utilized in this Criollo and Pelo de Oro splice to promote a headier, full-bodied experience. Nicaraguan long-fillers and binder make up the meat, adding subtle notes of caramel, espresso and a long lasting spice through the finish. To bring out all Selection Speciale has to offer, pair it with red wine or even dark rum.    L'Atelier Selection Speciale received a well-deserved 91-rating noting: ""Its solid core of cocoa and earth is balanced by notes of black pepper, toast and salted nuts.""​",Full,"['Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Criollo,L'Atelier
L'Atelier Surrogates,Rated 4.36 out of 5, Based on 22 Ratings ,"Pete Johnson & crew are at it again.Introducing the next project from L'Atelier cigars, Surrogates. Blended by Pete Johnson, and crafted in Don Pepin's My Father factory in Nicaragua, each Surrogate was masterfully created to serve up four unique and completely different experiences. This time around, their goal was simple. To create a new series of cigars, limited-edition in nature, that would be readily available to the consumer without breaking the bank. A winning combination if you ask me. Here's the bottom line: Surrogates deliver the goods as promised.Each blend is easily distinguished by its....errr....'one of a kind' names and bands. I don't know where they came up with these, but they sure make for a good conversation. Skull Breaker – Full-bodied. Bold notes of cocoa, leather, espresso, and black pepper. Featuring: Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper, Nicaraguan long-fillers.Bone Crusher – Full-bodied flavor bomb. Robust hints of coffee, earth, leather, and a dash of pepper. Featuring: Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper, Nicaraguan long-fillers. Tramp Stamp – Medium-bodied and teetering towards medium to full. Layers of cedar, coffee, nutmeg, leather, and a dash of spice. Featuring: Ecuadorian Habano Oscuro wrapper, Nicaraguan long-fillers, and a covered foot.Crystal Baller – Medium to full-bodied. Notes of natural sweetness, spice, cocoa, cedar, and a toasty finish. Featuring: Ecuadorian Habano wrapper, Nicaraguan long-fillers, and box-pressed finish.Crystal Baller received a well-deserved 91-rating noting: ""Box pressed with a three-seam cap and perfectly tapered shoulders. Sweet flavors of dry cocoa powder, incense and myrrh take on a slight Cavendish tobacco note.""Satin Glove - Medium to full-bodied. The first under the Surrogates line to use a Mexican San Andres wrapper. A box-pressed churchill with notes of cocoa, pepper, and a spicy-sweet finish.Satin Glove received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""Near-black and pressed, this earthy, nutty cigar takes on a bittersweet chocolate note as well as hints of black pepper and oaky vanilla.""Animal Cracker - Medium to full-bodied with a thick 60-ring gauge vitola. An Ecuadorian Habano Oscuro wrapper gives off a dark chocolate complection. Nicaraguan long-leaves and binder promote nuances of coffee, cherry, and earth with a prominent pepper appearing on the retro-hale.Cracker Crumbs - Animal Cracker's little brother, this medium to full-bodied firecracker uses the same Ecuadorian Habano Oscuro wrapper leaf and the same Nicaraguan long-fillers and binder. A thinner ring gauge results in a slightly stronger, more flavorful experience.",Full,"['Churchill', 'Double Corona', 'Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Double Corona, Gordo, Perfecto, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Ecuador Habano, Habano Maduro, San Andres",L'Atelier
L'Atelier Trocadero,Rated 4.8 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"L'Atelier quality meets basement prices.L'Atelier is new on the cigar scene, but already things have quickly started heating up for the buzz-worthy brand. And making things even more exciting is Trocadero. Blended by Pete Johnson, and crafted in Don Pepin's Tabacalera Cubana factory, Trocadero goes where few brands dare, bundles. But honestly, you're a fool if you pass up on these legit handmades all because of a box, because there's a lot to be enjoyed here. Draped in an Ecuador Habano rosado wrapper, and jammed packed with Nicaraguan long-filler tobaccos, each Trocadero wrangles up a pleasant mellow to medium-bodied profile. Notes of toast, leather, nuts, earth and gentle spices round out this highly satisfying, highly affordable handmade.",Mellow-Medium,"['Gordo', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Petite Corona, Robusto",No,Ecuador Habano,L'Atelier
Leaf by Oscar Connecticut,Rated 4.92 out of 5, Based on 12 Ratings ,"Turn a new LeafI know, I know. At first glance, these cigars are some of the ugliest sticks you’ll ever see. But that’s just the protective, outer leaf. Unwrap it, and you’ll find a beautiful specimen inside, handmade by skilled rollers in Honduras, and blended by Oscar Valladares. A Honduran puro, the Leaf by Oscar Connecticut weighs in a little heavier than your typical Connecticut blend. Mellow to medium-bodied, this complex handmade gives off sweet notes of tobacco and cream, backed by a mixture of cedar and spice to keep things interesting. A perfect choice for the fan of boutique Connecticut creations, this Leaf by Oscar blend is easy to recommend. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Toro",No,Honduran Connecticut,
Leaf by Oscar Corojo,Rated 4.73 out of 5, Based on 11 Ratings ,"Go, go, CorojoA collaboration between “Island Jim” and Oscar Valladares, Leaf by Oscar is a boutique brand worthy of a second glance. Offering up four different versions of their handcrafted creation, today we’ll be checking out the Corojo wrapped option – a medium-bodied charmer that I’m sure tons of you out there will dig. Now before you go dogging this cigar, remember to remove the outer tobacco leaf. Underneath, you’ll find that the stick is actually quite beautiful, glistening with oils that have been perfectly protected by the raw tobacco on top. And it’s not just a looker, this thing performs! Toasting the foot, you’ll find a woodsy and nutty core of flavors, with hints of red pepper spice throughout. In short, this should definitely go on your “must-try” list. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Toro",No,Corojo,
Leaf by Oscar Maduro,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 10 Ratings ,"The Leaf goes darkI don’t know if I’ve ever heard more calls for us to carry a brand than the droves of CI Nation demanding Leaf by Oscar. Originally starting in Pittsburgh, PA, the Leaf by Oscar has swept the nation, delivering their four boutique brands to cigar enthusiasts everywhere. And I’ll be honest, when they landed here we conducted a little scientific “taste-test” across the line, and they all fit easily under the “win” column. The fullest-bodied of the four offerings, this Maduro is a gorgeous specimen. And before you peek at our picture and wonder what the hell I’m talking about, remember that you’re supposed to remove that outer leaf before lighting up. Underneath, you’ll find a slick, dark cigar, glistening with oils. Each sample I scarfed down gave off a thick, honey-like sweetness, with notes of chocolate and black pepper in the mix. It’s a most satisfying combination, especially with a bourbon in the other hand, and I’d recommend you give it a shot today. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Toro",No,Nicaraguan Jalapa,
Leaf by Oscar Sumatra,Rated 4.81 out of 5, Based on 16 Ratings ,"A handsome Honduran handmadeYou may have heard of Leaf by Oscar for their clever packaging — each cigar is wrapped in a raw tobacco leaf after it’s done being rolled. But if you’ve never tried one, let me assure you: this is not just a marketing gimmick! The tobacco perfectly encloses each cigar, protecting it from any sort of damage in the same way that cellophane would. Unwrap the leaf, and you’ll find a flawless presentation underneath. For the Sumatra version of this fan-favorite boutique brand, blend master Oscar Valladares utilized a, you-guessed-it, Ecuadorian Sumatra wrapper overtop the usual Honduran binder and long-filler. Coming in just a tad above medium-bodied, Leaf by Oscar Sumatra delivers a full-flavored mixture of natural tobacco, citrus, and black and white pepper. It’s a most worthy addition to their portfolio, and one I can easily recommend to any lover of boutique cigars. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Sumatra,
Leon Jimenes,Rated 3 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Easy on the eyes and palate....and at CI it’s easy on the wallet too.A relentlessly consistent blend from one of the premier cigar factories in the world. Made in the La Aurora factory - oldest in the Dominican Republic (1903) - Leon Jimenes are handmade with special light Connecticut shade leaf wrappers, along with a well-aged recipe of Cuban-seed Dominican long leaf tobaccos. Meticulously constructed, the result is a consistently flavorful, medium-bodied taste and pleasant aroma. Just roll one of these beauties between your forefinger and thumb to see why their always highly rated and a winner day-in, day-out.Leon Jimenes received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""This cigar has a great balance. It is filled with a rich, coffee bean flavor, and hints of nuts. It has an overall cedary character, but a slight dry woody finish.""",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Robusto",No,Connecticut,
Liberation by Hamlet,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Liberate yourself from ho-hum tobaccosFor the last few years, Rocky Patel has been working with the Cuban mastermind Hamlet Paredes to blend some of his most successful lines… and a trilogy of releases bearing Hamlet’s name. Today, the third cigar from Paredes lands at the sunny shores of CI, and this one’s destined for greatness. Say hello to Liberation by Hamlet Paredes. Originally, this cigar was crafted in just one 6.5"" x 55 perfecto-shaped toro size, in order for the rollers to focus on making the best, most consistent product possible. Now after taking their time to perfect this delicious blend in a few other shapes, there are two more options to choose from! Rocky heard the demand for more sizes, but refused to put them on the market until he had them just right. This delicious blend delivers a ton of earthiness, before the cigar kicks up to a medium to full-bodied profile of earth and roasted coffee. Liberate yourself from ho-hum, same-old same-old cigars, and grab a box of Liberation by Hamlet today.",Medium-Full,"['Corona Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Corona Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Varies,"Ecuador Habano, Habano",Rocky Patel Cigars
Long Live the King by AJ Fernandez,Rated 4.89 out of 5,,"The King goes to NicaraguaYou might consider Robert Caldwell and AJ Fernandez to be in competition, but they would disagree. They know how important collaboration is, and that getting other blender’s input on your cigars can only result in good things for the consumer. The T was a collaboration between Caldwell, Booth, and Fernandez, and instantly gained a terrific reception. So when AJ Fernandez gave some of Caldwell’s classic blends a try and felt he could do some great things with them using all Nicaraguan tobacco, Caldwell said ‘go right ahead!’The Long Live the King by AJ Fernandez swaps out the Dominican wrapper, binder, and fillers on the original for an all-Nicaraguan blends of some of AJ’s rarest and most delicious leaf. The result is a full-bodied yet smooth stick, redolent of the Caldwell version but with a bit more oomph. Spicy layers of toast, cedar, and leather coat the palate before giving way to a zesty finish. These won’t be around for long, but as good as they are, we have our fingers crossed for many more collaborations down the road!",Full,"['Gordo', 'Lonsdale', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Lonsdale, Robusto",No,Nicaraguan,AJ Fernandez
Lucious Lyon,Rated 4.5 out of 5,,"Get ready for a new #1 hit single! Empire. If you haven’t heard of this show yet, you must be living under some kind of rock, ‘cuz this things got more buzz than a hive full of bees. Empire tells the story of Lucious Lyon, the founder and CEO of world-famous Empire Entertainment. Delivering fantastic music, insanely awesome storylines and a star-studded cast week in and week out, Empire is known mostly for its polished style. And now, the hit television series has its own cigar, that’s just as smooth as you’d expect. Handmade with premium tobaccos in Honduras, Lucious Lyon cigars feature a San Andres binder and Mexican and Dominican long-fillers. The silky Connecticut Shade wrapper leaf delivers spades of pleasant flavor all the way down to the nub. You’ll find oak, toasty tobacco, cream, and overall, a Connecticut experience that’s truly unforgettable. Grab yourself some official Empire Lucious Lyon cigars today, and relax top-shelf style. Lucious Lyon TM ® 2016 FOX and its related entities. All rights reserved. ​",Mellow-Medium,['Torpedo'],Mexican,"Dominican, Mexican",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Torpedo,No,Connecticut,Lucious Lyon
M Bourbon by Macanudo,Rated 4.77 out of 5, Based on 13 Ratings ,"Old Fashioned, compliments of Macanudo.Macanudo has the mellow-bodied cigar market locked down, they’re building their portfolio of great full-bodied offerings, and they’re making waves in the world of small-batch sticks, so it’s only natural that they would come for their share in the infused category, too. M by Macanudo was released in 2018 and instantly became a classic. Now the M Bourbon by Macanudo is ready to see the light of day, and it’s genuinely different than any bourbon cigar you’ve had before.There are tons of cigars for sale flavored with the delicious American libation, but for the most part, they’re all just straight bourbon. But Macanudo went against the grain by adding a touch of cherry & bitters, mixing up the perfect old-fashioned without the glass. An Ecuador Connecticut shade wrapper hugs an Ecuador binder & Dominican fillers that complement the classic cocktail flavors perfectly. Slide up to the bar and light yourself an M Bourbon by Macanudo, sip it slowly, and revel in aromatic bourbon bliss.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Ecuador,Dominican,True,No,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",True,Ecuador Connecticut,Macanudo Cigars
M by Macanudo,Rated 4.55 out of 5, Based on 29 Ratings ,"M? Mm, mm, good! Ask most people to name a cigar brand and “Macanudo” is gonna come flying out of their mouths a majority of the time. And for great reason. From their humble Cuban-roots, to their current global dominance, the Dominican based Macanudo brand is truly a household brand. And a new cigar from this brand? It matters. Somewhat stingy with their new releases compared to the other big brands, when a new Macanudo comes out it means something big. And “M” is a most monumental release, indeed. Presenting the first ever infused Macanudo, known simply as “M.” With rich, lingering nuances of single-origin Colombian coffee, this cigar is perfect to enjoy as your first stick of the day, or when you’re looking to wrap up your night. Handmade in the Dominican Republic, each M by Macanudo features an Indonesian Bezuki wrapper leaf with Phillipine Isabella binder tobacco and Nicaraguan long-fillers. Toast the foot and you’ll find notes of cedar, earth, and spice, backed by a strong coffee flavor for a creamy blend that’s just screaming to be paired up with a steaming cup o’ joe. ",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Corona Extra', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,True,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Corona Extra, Toro",Yes,Indonesian,Macanudo Cigars
Macanudo Cafe,Rated 4.55 out of 5, Based on 870 Ratings ,"Ask any Tom, Dick, or Harry what his favorite brand of cigar is, and chances are he’ll blurt out, “Macanudo” before you can even finish asking the question. Sure, there are fancier, more limited edition, and more snob-approved cigars out there on the market. Sure, it’s unlikely to impress Mr. Snooty Pants. But when it comes to consistently subtle and pleasant offerings with exceptional pricing, Macanudo is just what the doctor ordered. And with a wide variety of sizes from Ascot cigarillos to Gigante gordos, there's a Macanudo to please the masses including the popular Macanudo Cafe Hyde Park. Plus, my prices are unbeatable, so daily enjoyment is practically a prerequisite.Well-constructed using Dominican and Mexican filler and Connecticut shade wrappers, Macanudo handmades have built up a fine reputation for quality, which is part of what makes them so damn popular. These are the top-selling cigars in the world, and it’s hard to argue with a statistic like that. Take a chance, light one up, and see for yourself why these Macs are where it’s at.Macanudo Cafe has earned a well-deserved 90-point rating, noting: ""Full of bright and zesty tobacco, this lonsdale offers plenty of earthiness and nutty notes as well.""",Mellow,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Figurado', 'Gigante', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Petite Corona', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Mexican,"Dominican, Mexican",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Cigarillos, Corona, Figurado, Gigante, Lancero/Panatela, Petite Corona, Presidente, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Connecticut,Macanudo Cigars
Macanudo Cru Royale,Rated 4.25 out of 5, Based on 51 Ratings ,"Not your daddy's Macanudo.Indeed. This beaut is draped in a dark, oily Ecuadorian Habano leaf and brimming with a complex blend of Nicaraguan, Dominican, and Brazilian long-filler tobaccos. Up a few clicks in flavor and power from previous Macanudo blends, this medium-bodied cigar brings a rich, hearty flavor bursting with notes of spice, dark chocolate, and cedar. If Macanudo Café is your breakfast cigar, Macanudo Cru Royale makes for a perfect cigar after a hearty meal.Macanudo Cru Royale has been named one of the Top 25 Cigars of the Year, earning a 91-rating, which noted: ""Despite its dark, oily wrapper and thick ring gauge, the Poco Gordo draws and burns beautifully delivering leathery, nutty flavors, and a richness that isn’t ordinarily associated with the Macanudo cigar line.""​",Medium,"['Gigante', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Brazilian, Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gigante, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Macanudo Cigars
Macanudo Gold,Rated 4.46 out of 5, Based on 155 Ratings ,"Gold, Jerry! Gold!Macanudo’s limited edition, seasonal cigar has cigar enthusiasts all over the country waiting with anticipation every year. Elegant, mellow, and smooth, Macanudo Gold Label delivers one of the most refined and balanced cigar blends on the market. Macanudo Gold Label is a limited-edition line of Macanudo cigars that adds a new taste to America’s best-selling premium cigar brand. The wrapper is golden Connecticut shade, culled from the first and second primings, the filler is Cuban-seed Dominican and Mexican. Smooth, consistent, and an unusual lemony sweetness that’s difficult to describe. After one puff on this cigar, you’ll understand why Macanudo Gold is one of the most sought-after cigars on the market. ",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Lonsdale', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",San Andres,"Dominican, Mexican",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Cigarillos, Corona, Lonsdale, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,Macanudo Cigars
Macanudo Heritage Nuevo,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Telling a whole new story.Over the years, it’s been very interesting to watch the evolution of Macanudo. What was originally a small Cuban brand became a Honduran boutique, and it didn’t take them long to earn the title of best-selling brand in the US. Now Macanudo is going back to the drawing board to recreate the best-of-the-best names in their portfolio, using specially sourced seeds grown in new locales and new soil, the result being a product that’s at the same time familiar and strikingly unique. The Heritage Nuevo is the first release of this multi-year project, and sources exclusive & proprietary tobacco from select farms to reimagine their classic Café line. The Connecticut shade wrapper is grown by an independent grower specifically for this limited-edition release, and envelopes a Mexican binder and the same Dominican and Mexican filler blend from the Café with the addition of a special Nicaraguan leaf. Upon lighting, you’ll be greeted with silky smooth yet pleasantly complex notes of spice, toast, cedar, nuts, and a subtle sweetness. These exquisite cigars will only be around until the specially-grown tobacco is depleted, so treat yourself to a truly Nuevo experience today.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Mexican,"Dominican, Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,False,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Macanudo Cigars
Macanudo ICON,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"A fitting tribute to a true 'Icon'.Every once in a while, a cigar hits the market that captures the attention of connoisseurs everywhere. These brands line the walls of the proverbial cigar hall-of-fame, and can be found pretty much everywhere you go. When I try to think of an example of such a brand, one name jumps into my mind immediately: Macanudo. Macanudo has been deserving of the utmost praise since they first began operations in 1969, and the brand is finally releasing a blend worthy of bearing the name Macanudo ICON.Macanudo is primarily known for their mellow sticks, and the ICON is sure to please fans of mellow and full-bodied cigars just the same. The long-filler blend of Dominican, Brazilian Mata Fina, and Honduran tobacco is aged for a minimum of three years before being carefully secured by Honduran & Mexican binders, and finished with a beautiful, silky, true Connecticut shade-grown wrapper leaf. Coming in just one 5”x 50 robusto size, replete with creamy nuances of nuts, cedar, and coffee. Treat yourself to a mellow-bodied cigar with plenty of complexity, and tip your hat to a truly ‘ICON’ic brand. ",Mellow-Medium,['Robusto'],"Honduran, Mexican","Brazilian, Dominican, Honduran, Mexican",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,False,,Robusto,False,Connecticut,Macanudo Cigars
Macanudo Inspirado Black,Rated 4.36 out of 5, Based on 117 Ratings ,"Be inspiredMacanudo, Macanudo, Macanudo… What is there that’s left to say? You all know ‘em, you all love ‘em. Consistently, Macanudo ranks among our best-selling and highest-rated brands. And that’s not for nothing. If you haven’t yet burnt a Macanudo, this classic Cuban brand is best known for their high quality control, smooth flavors, and delightful blends. Well, with Macanudo Inspirado Black, they’ve cranked it up a notch, and released a medium to full-bodied blend that’s a true must-try for any cigar enthusiast.Inspirado Black begins with a dark, oily Habano Connecticut wrapper, draped over Dominican, Honduran, and Nicaraguan fillers. Though the strength has been increased here, this stogie still delivers that classic Macanudo smoothness. Flavors of coffee, cocoa, cedar, and a warm toasty note make this a perfect complement to a cup of coffee or a glass of bourbon.  Check out Macanudo Inspirado Black today, and remind yourself why Macanudo is a go-to brand.​",Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Sumatra,"Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Macanudo Cigars
Macanudo Inspirado Black,Rated 4.36 out of 5, Based on 117 Ratings ,"Back in black.Macanudo Inspirado Black just got a makeover and one deserves some attention. It was blended to provide an international smoking experience and uses a new proprietary growing technique on the wrapper. With the new doo, Macanudo Inspirado Black's fresh dark look showcases an oily Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper encasing a blend of Nicaraguan fillers. The result is a full-bodied experience that is quite balanced. Emitting flavors of spice, dark chocolate, cocoa, nuts, and coffee from start to finish. Inspirado Black will delight your taste buds and calm your senses, a great cigar to have after a heavy meal.",Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Sumatra,"Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Macanudo Cigars
Macanudo Inspirado Green,Rated 5 out of 5,,"The grass is greener on Macanudo’s side.At this point, there’s not much I can say about Macanudo that you haven’t heard before. This classic brand has its share of hit cigars and a strong coalition of fans, and when a new Macanudo hits the shelves, there’s nothing short of a stampede. The Inspirado series is a line of contemporary offerings from Macanudo, and now the Inspirado Green is finally here and ready to impress.Inspirado green starts with a Brazilian Arapiraca wrapper – a first for the Inspirado series. This gorgeous, oily leaf coats an Indonesian binder and well-aged Dominican long-fillers, all resulting in a sultry medium-bodied profile loaded with notes of black pepper, coffee, and cocoa. A truly unique cigar, the Inspirado Green is one of the finest Macanudo releases to date.Note: This is a newly released item, and shipping is expected to begin in July. Get your preorders in today and be the first to try Macanudo's newest masterpiece!",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Indonesian,"Colombian, Dominican",False,,More Details,Dominican Republic,False,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",False,Brazilian,Macanudo Cigars
Macanudo Inspirado Orange,Rated 4.43 out of 5, Based on 28 Ratings ,"A true fan-favorite! The Macanudo Inspirado line has been one of my favorite series of cigars in years. We all know Macanudo, that’s for sure, but most people don’t dig deeper than Café. And I can’t really blame them – Macanudo Café is the gold standard for mellow-bodied cigars, and has been for years. But with the Inspirado series, the folks behind Macanudo took a more “boutique” approach, focusing their blends on complex flavors and rarer tobaccos. Today, we’re looking at Macanudo Inspirado Orange, a cigar that’s new…ish. You see, Inspirado Orange originally started as a European exclusive. It was so popular that it quickly moved to the states, originally appearing only in brick-and-mortar retailers. Today, the people have spoken and Inspirado Orange is finally available to the masses. Wrapped in a gorgeous Honduran leaf overtop Dominican, Honduran, and Nicaraguan long-fillers, Orange produces a rich, buttery blend with almonds, pepper, and a leathery core. A must-try for all fans of medium-bodied cigars. Macanudo Inspirado Orange received a well-deserved 92-rating and Top 25 Cigar honors, noting: “A great cigar… bright finish of almonds and black pepper.”",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Gigante', 'Robusto', 'Robusto Extra', 'Toro']",Honduran,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Churchill, Cigarillos, Gigante, Robusto, Robusto Extra, Toro",Varies,Honduran,Macanudo Cigars
Macanudo Inspirado Red,Rated 4.2 out of 5, Based on 88 Ratings ,"Get Inspired. Get Macanudo. Macanudo has been around longer than most of us having been enjoying cigars, and for good reason. With its roots in Havana, Cuba, this decades old brand is the gold standard for consistency and excellence — especially if you love mellower blends. But a few years back, a new contender from Macanudo entered the ring: the Inspirado line. If Macanudo Café is made for the everyday cigar lover, Inspirado is made for the true cigar aficionado. That’s why today we’re more than happy to welcome the newest addition to the brand: Macanudo Inspirado Red. Before you dive into this one, let me give you a little advice: this ain’t your daddy’s Macanudo. Inspirado Red is a full-bodied flavor bomb, possibly the strongest blend to ever wear the Macanudo name. Born from the rich, volcanic soils of Nicaragua, Red features an Ecuadorian wrapper leaf, complemented by Nicaraguan binder and Nicaraguan and Honduran long-fillers. Each puff reveals loads of dark fruit, red pepper, hints of cedar, and slight notes of leather. Complex, delicious, and affordable, Inspirado Red is an absolute must-have. ",Full,"['Cigarillos', 'Gigante', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"African, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Cigarillos, Gigante, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Ecuador Habano,Macanudo Cigars
Macanudo Inspirado White,Rated 4.39 out of 5, Based on 100 Ratings ,"The White-out is comingMacanudo has never been a brand that pushed any sort of story, gimmicks, or crazy marketing gestures. And they’ve been doing just fine. Indeed, this brand has been at the top of the sales charts for as long as I can remember, with no artificial fanfare or hype — they’ve simply remained true to the tenets of crafting a great cigar. Today, though, I’d like to break tradition a bit to discuss Macanudo Inspirado White — a cigar too complex and delicious to not dive in deep on. Inspirado White is a study in contrasts. It’s simple, yet complex. It’s sweet, but spicy. It’s elegant and refined, but doesn’t carry a top-shelf price tag. Perhaps it’s the aged tobacco inside each and every perfectly wrapped specimen here that delivers so much. The golden, silky Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper is aged for 6 years; the Nicaraguan and Mexican San Andres filler leaves are aged for four. The draw is perfect on every sample I’ve got my hands on, producing a smattering of earth, slight spice, soft and creamy notes, and a warm tobacco core. My new favorite Macanudo, you owe it to yourself to try Inspirado White as soon as possible. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Indonesian, Sumatra","Mexican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Churchill, Cigarillos, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Ecuador Connecticut,Macanudo Cigars
Macanudo Maduro,Rated 4.55 out of 5, Based on 69 Ratings ,"Mac's on the attack!Macanudo cigars are the undisputed king of the hill when it comes to reliable mellow-bodied premiums, and full-bodied fanatics routinely turn to the brand for the always welcome change of pace. If you’re like me, and getting tired of playing whack-a-mole with the latest, hottest, limited edition cigars – you know, the minute you get your hands on one, a new one pops up – do as I do and turn to an ol’ faithful brand like Macanudo.Macanudo Maduro comes draped in an oily, black Connecticut Broadleaf maduro wrapper hugging Mexican and Dominican long-fillers. These gems are medium-bodied and perfectly constructed – dishing out a buffet of rich flavors including baking spices, chocolate, coffee, and cedar. Sounds pretty good, right? Well I’m feeling generous, so take a gander at my reckless prices and proceed to the checkout pronto, and secure your stash of this premium blend. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Figurado', 'Gigante', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto']",,"Dominican, Mexican",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Cigarillos, Corona, Figurado, Gigante, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Macanudo Cigars
Macanudo Vintage 2006,Rated 4.54 out of 5, Based on 28 Ratings ,"A Macanudo for the ages, back again!Macanudo Vintage 2006 utilizes an exemplary wrapp​er crop of Connecticut shade tobacco which was grown in 2006. Now, after years of proper aging, this gorgeous leaf is ready to take center stage. Vintage 2006 offers an elegant, mellow​ to medium-bodied profile that's layered with crisp, soft nuances and is very well-balanced. Each individual cigar comes complete with a commemorative metal band and packaged in mahogany boxes of 12 cigars. Yes, once again Macanudo displays their beautiful metal band. In addition to doubling as a luxury cigar holder, this band also serves as a quality control device for your humidor's moisture output.This is a certified fan-favorite that we can never keep in stock long, so jump on this rerelease while you still have the chance!",Mellow-Medium,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,Macanudo Cigars
Macanudo Vintage Maduro 1997,Rated 4.72 out of 5, Based on 144 Ratings ,"Mac Vintage Maduro? Say it ain't so!Introducing, the first maduro within the highly regarded Macanudo Vintage series. This limited production handmade employs the very best Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper leaves from a small crop cultivated in 1997. Hand-selected and extra-fermented to perfection, this dark and oily leaf conceals a carefully blended recipe of Nicaraguan, Brazilian, and Dominican long-fillers. The result is a deep, rich flavor that's truly Macanudo. Smooth and consistent, each Macanudo Vintage Maduro 1997 produces a dark maduro flavor with ample flavor and a soothingly sweet aftertaste.....and yes, that really is a metal band. In addition to doubling as a luxury cigar holder, this band also serves as a quality control device for your humidor's moisture output.",Medium,"['Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Brazilian, Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Perfecto, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Macanudo Cigars
Magellan Dominicans,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Super mellow & well-aged....this one’s a winner.If you’re a regular Montecristo or Ashton fan, or otherwise just enjoy mellow cigars, Magellan might be right up your alley. To many, it’s a comparably smooth, pleasant and creamy Dominican handmade. So instead of shelling out 100+ bucks per box, you can burn these instead and pay well under $1 apiece. Hoooah! I think that’s why many of my customers call it the “poor man’s Montecristo.” ",Mellow,['Corona'],Nicaraguan,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,False,,Corona,False,"Connecticut, Maduro",
Maker's Choice,Rated 3.88 out of 5, Based on 215 Ratings ,"These ugly ducklings are actually tasty little treats.Maker's Choice cigars are Dominican handmades that are ""freehand"" rolled without using any molds. As a result they look a little mangy, but are decent little knockaround cigars. They're called ""Maker's Choice"" because so many of the rollers in this factory puff on these during the day.",Medium,['Petite Corona'],,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Petite Corona,Yes,Connecticut,
Man O' War,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 159 Ratings ,"​Unhand the Opus, my good man.Man O’ War is carefully blended and hand-crafted by Abdel ""AJ"" Fernandez in Esteli, Nicaragua. Born in Cuba, AJ began working with tobacco at a very young age, studying under some of the industry's most legendary minds. After years absorbing knowledge, Abdel moved to Nicaragua 6 years ago and began building what is now emerging as one of the finest boutique makers in the country.Of all the cigars made in his factory – ITC 10th Anniversary, Padilla Habano, Rocky Patel Fusion – Abdel considers the Man O’ War his finest creation. Each expertly made cigar is a sight to behold. The dark Habano Ecuador wrapper is beautiful...thick, smooth, and covered with natural oils. This thing is stunning, positively gorgeous. But underneath the velvet glove is a hammer, a robust medium-full recipe of aged Cuban-seed Nicaraguan long-fillers which unleashes a bold bouquet for the senses. The opening is robust, with heavy spice and wood undertones, developing a chewy, velvety-smooth core of oak and earth which coats the palate, leaving behind a sweet array of spices. A variety of understated nuances come and go throughout the burn, including coffee, cocoa bean, and a touch of vanilla. Man O' War is simply incredible. I mean it. The packaging for Man O’ War is suitably impressive, a presentation to match the quality of the cigar itself. 22 Man O' War cigars snugly packed in a unique, heavy cedar chest.",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Figurado', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Double Corona, Figurado, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Habano,Man O' War
Man O' War Armada,Rated 4.72 out of 5, Based on 39 Ratings ,"Worth. Every. Penny.A $20 cigar runs counter to every fiber of the deep discounting instinct that runs through CI Nation's red blood. Many expensive cigars are simply 3-dollar sticks with a 10-dollar bill wrapped around it. But from time to time such a price tag is warranted…. expensive because they're actually, well, expensive. Extra care, extra long processes and extra steps during production, extra aging and optimum fermentation, extra rare and costly tobaccos and materials. Man O’ War Armada is all that and more. The price is nauseatingly steep, but boy-oh-boy are you getting something special. It's a special, personal blend of cigar master and Man O’ War maker A.J. Fernandez. A tasty elixir draped in a dark, toothy, Ecuador-Sumatra wrapper leaf and bringing a full-frontal assault of flavor: complexity like you read about, an eruption of Cuban-esque power yet nicely balanced, over-the-top notes of earth, vanilla, coffee, spices, and cedar with a crisp tobacco core. Gloriously full, voluptuous and dense, disarmingly redolent. A super-premium of the first order (red cape sold separately).",Full,['Gordo'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Gordo,No,Ecuador Sumatra,Man O' War
Man O' War Damnation,Rated 4.48 out of 5, Based on 87 Ratings ,"Not trying this cigar is a damn shameMaster blender AJ Fernandez pulled out all of the stops in flavor and strength with the latest Man O’ War cigar Damnation. Known for full-bodied cigars, the Man O’ War line goes against the boring norm of everyday life to create carefully crafted handmades. Man O’ War Damnation embodies that motto in showing off an oily Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper leaf, brimming with fiery Nicaraguan long-fillers. Damnation cigars denotes sinister notes of oak, leather, bitter espresso and a hellish amount of spice. While this cigar packs a punch of flavor it’s perfectly balanced. Every cigar enthusiast will be drooling over Damnation once they get their hands on it. ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']","Habano, Nicaraguan",Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Man O' War
Man O' War Dark Aged Maduro,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"A daring new chapter in the Man O’ War saga.When you browse all the options for premium cigars on the market today, you see words like ‘bold’ and ‘rich’ popping up just about everywhere. But not every cigar can be at the top of the heap when it comes to hearty, deep maduro flavors, and if there’s one cigar these descriptors fit to a T, it’s Man O’ War Dark Aged Maduro. AJ Fernandez pulled out all the stops when blending this beast, selecting flavorful & well-aged Nicaraguan and Pennsylvania long-fillers and covering them with a Nicaraguan binder and Ecuador Habano Ligero wrapper. From start to finish, your palate will be treated to a symphony of deep, resonant flavors, including notes of oak, pepper, espresso, and earth. Despite the strength level, the blend remains well-balanced, just like every project AJ Fernandez has a hand in. Grab a box today, and experience the best of the best that Man O' War can offer.",Full,"['Robusto', 'Salomon', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,"Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Salomon, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Habano,Man O' War
Man O' War Puro Authentico,Rated 4.61 out of 5, Based on 97 Ratings ,"Puro Authentico is the personal blend of Man O’ War creator AJ Fernandez. Previously reserved for only his consumption, AJ has finally broken down and agreed to share MOW Puro Authentico’s goodness with all. Small in size, but massive in flavor, this full-bodied, full-flavored firecracker will send you into sensory overload. A dark Esteli-grown Habano ligero wrapper is jam-packed with as many Cuban-seed Nicaraguan long-leaf ligeros as humanly possible....producing a Corona unlike any you've had before.And now, Puro Authentico comes in maduro too, adding a bold, rich element to this already heady blend.",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Corona']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Corona",No,"Habano, Habano Maduro, Ligero, Maduro",Man O' War
Man O' War Ruination,Rated 4.7 out of 5, Based on 282 Ratings ,"An orotund offering that epitomizes the skillful art of full-bodied premium handmades.ru - in - a - tion [roo-uh-ney-shuh-n]-noun1. the act or state of ruining or the state of being ruined.2. something that ruins.Strap on your bike helmets gents. Behold, Man O’ War Ruination, a supremely flavorful handmade offering superior layers of bold, Cuban-esque flavors balanced by velvety smoothness that pours forth with raw spirit and intensity. Ample flavor abounds, driven by its bold mixture of Cuban-seed Nicaraguan and Honduran long-leaf ligeros. These hand-selected tobaccos have been picked from the plant's highest priming, bringing maximum flavor and richness. To conceal this deep, dense blend of tobaccos, an oily Habano Ecuador ligero leaf was chosen as its wrapper - one that's thick and juicy, even outshining the flavorful core within. An explosion of spice greets you up front, as Ruination deliquesces into softer notes of oak, earth, toast, wood, and leather. The velvety smoke coats the palate, leaving a long and satisfying finish filled with the wonderful lingering aroma of toast and charcoal. Toward the nub the roller-coaster continues....closing with a concentrated, layered, full-bodied finale. Nothing short of a religious experience!",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Robusto']",,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Perfecto, Robusto",No,Ecuador Sungrown,Man O' War
Man O' War Ruination 10th Anniversary,Rated 4.9 out of 5, Based on 30 Ratings ,"10 years of ruining the competition.Man O’ War first marched out of AJ Fernandez’s factory ten years ago, and took the CI Nation by storm. Ever since the mighty flavors and bold blends entered our territory, we’ve been glad to quarter them in homes without putting up a fight. And when our scouts gave word that a new blend was on the rise, we gathered the troops and got ready to snatch as many as we could.The Man O’ War Ruination 10th anniversary is a sight to behold. It all starts with the Ecuador Habano wrapper leaf, dark enough to blot out the sun. This imposing leaf is wrapped around a core of Nicaraguan and Honduran Ligero, bursting with power, earthy & leathery notes, and spice. This blend is full-bodied and ready to wage war on the competition, so if you like heavy cigars, add these to your cart before they’re gone! ",Full,['Gordo'],,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,Gordo,No,Ecuador Sungrown,Man O' War
Man O' War Side Projects,Rated 4.7 out of 5, Based on 69 Ratings ,"A little sumpin' sumpin' on the side, Man O' War style!Some cigars invigorate the enthusiast, but are merely a daily task inside the factory. Man O’ War cigars enlivens the Esteli-based fortress of which it was spawned, inspiring the very hands crafting it to work beyond perfection. To exceed one’s talents and stimulate creativity. This internal drive has generated a new breed of Man O’ War cigars known to the factory as Man O' War Side Projects. A brash refusal to become complacent; an exclusive series of unique shapes and sizes and modified blends to produce an unrivaled cigar experience. A new breed of Man O’ War cigars for the exploratory enthusiast.Man O' War Side Project: 52C- A unique 5""x52 Chisel-shaped vitola- Dark, leathery Ecuadorian Habano ligero wrappers- Powerful, complex, full-bodied- Notes of oak, espresso, pepper, and sweetnessMan O' War Side Project: Little Devil- A petite, but ultra-flavorful 5.5""x44 size- Extra-fermented Habano Sun Grown wrappers- A strong, heady blend- Notes of earth, cedar, coffee, and pepperMan O' War Side Project: Phalanx- A chunky, 6.5""x56 Toro Gordo- Jet-black Pennsylvania Broadleaf Maduro wrappers- Medium-bodied, but extremely rich- Notes of cocoa, pepper, coffee, and cedarMan O' War Side Project: Skull Crusher- An innovative 5.75""x56 club-shaped figurado- Thick, oily Pennsylvania Broadleaf maduro wrappers- Brimming with complexity, full-bodied- Notes of espresso, black pepper, honeyMan O’ War Side Project: Legion-	A whole lotta cigar, crafted in a 6.5” x 66 Gordo Extra shape-	4-year-aged Ecuadorian Sumatra Oscuro wrapper-	Big, powerful, and full-bodied-	Notes of leather, pepper, and cocoa",Full,"['Corona', 'Figurado', 'Gordo', 'Gordo Extra', 'Wedge']","Connecticut Broadleaf, Mexican","Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Corona, Figurado, Gordo, Gordo Extra, Wedge",Varies,"Ecuador Habano, Ecuador Sumatra, Habano, Maduro, Oscuro, Pennsylvania Broadleaf",Man O' War
Man O' War Valkyrie,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"For a limited time, you'll receive FREE shipping on your entire order when you buy a box of Man O' War Valkyrie!AJ Fernandez as you’ve never seen him before…Over a decade after its inception, Man O’ War continues to be one of AJ Fernandez’s finest creations. Each Man O’ War release has left fans clamoring for more and established AJ as one of the best cigar makers around. In the decade since Man O’ War was introduced, AJ has gone on to win numerous awards, including Cigar Aficionado’s #1 Cigar of the Year in 2019. But with Valkyrie, Fernandez proved he’s not slowing down. Man O’ War Valkyrie uses an Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper leaf that’s known as a “Desflorado.” While the tobacco is growing, AJ removes the flower and the upper portion of the plant, allowing the leaves that remain to absorb all the sunlight and nutrients. The result is a flavor like no other. Coffee, light pepper, cedar, and cream combine together to create a masterpiece of a cigar you have to taste to believe. Mellow enough to be your first cigar of the day, and flavorful enough to be your last, any AJ fan worth their salt needs to add this stunner to their humidor stat. ",Mellow-Medium,[],,,False,,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,,No,Connecticut,Man O' War
Man O' War Virtue,Rated 4.49 out of 5, Based on 234 Ratings ,"From the half man, half god creators of Man O' War, comes a mellow contender!Man O' War, the recently crowned king of full-bodied, has just dropped another bomb. This time, a gentler handmade - Man O' War Virtue - and it is spectacular. Dressed in a seamless, silky-smooth Connecticut-seed wrapper grown in Ecuador and generously filled with Nicaraguan long-fillers, Virtue is brimming smooth and creamy complex flavors. Mellow and medium-bodied, but filled with richness and flavor, Man O' War Virtue is impressively complex and refined. Note of oak, cream, nuts and a toasty-but-buttery smooth finish make up the core profile. Subtle hints of white pepper and sweetness round out the mix. Well-made, perfectly blended and extraordinarily tasty - Man O' War Virtue is the sets the new standard in Connecticut wrapped cigars. Perfect in the morning, perfect after a big meal, just perfect. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Lonsdale', 'Robusto', 'Salomon', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Lonsdale, Robusto, Salomon, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Man O' War
Manuel Quesada 70th,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Happy birthday Quesada!When I have a birthday, I throw a party, invite a few friends - maybe indulge a little too much. When a cigar maker has a birthday - especially a big one - they blend a cigar to commemorate the milestone. Case in point, Manuel Quesada just turned 70 in 2017, aside from saying a very happy birthday, I’d also like to thank him for blending an extremely tasty stogie, trust me when I say, this is a testament to Sr. Quesada’s talents as a blender.Draped in a Cuban-seed wrapper with a combination of long-fillers from Nicaragua and the Dominican tucked underneath, Manuel Quesada 70th exudes notes of dried fruit, almonds, leather, and a twinge of black pepper. The good news is these cigars are delicious, the bad news: they’re only available in limited quantities - so once we sell out, that’s all she wrote.",Medium-Full,['Toro'],,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,Dominican,Quesada Cigars
Mark Twain,Rated 4.36 out of 5, Based on 704 Ratings ,"​Silky smooth 50-54 ring Churchills for 3 bucks.In addition to being a true American treasure, Mark Twain was rarely seen sans cigar. The man’s list of positive attributes didn’t stop there - humanitarian, novelist, humorist, scholar, plus world class jump roper and Brazilian Jiu-Jitsu master. Just kidding about that part. Mark Twain cigars also happen to bring an extensive list of positive attributes to the table. All smooth and mellow, all tasty, all extremely affordable, all monster Churchill sizes ranging from 7”x50 to 8”x54. Draped in a silky Connecticut shade wrapper and generously filled with an aged blend of Nicaraguan long-fillers, Mark Twain delivers a flavorful, mellow to medium-bodied experience. Notes of oak, cream, white pepper add to a rich tobacco core, completing a mellow but eventful 60+ minutes of your time. For 3 bucks, these big boom sticks are the ultimate value-priced handmades.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Presidente']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Presidente",No,Connecticut,
Mark Twain Memoir,Rated 4.46 out of 5, Based on 487 Ratings ,"I’ve made it a rule to never enjoy more than one cigar at a time.Mark Twain was a prolific novelist, satirist, cigar enthusiast, and the originator of the ‘that’s what she said’ joke. While that last part may require some additional verification, Twain’s love of tobacco, and his particular devotion to the cheapest cigars money could buy, is an established legend. Mark Twain Memoir is the newest addition to the line, and ratchets up the intensity and flavor while still staying true to its core.Mark Twain Memoir jumps off the page with a dark Pennsylvania Broadleaf maduro wrapper blanketing a hearty blend of rich Nicaraguan premium long-fillers. Medium to full-bodied, expect to be met with a dose of pepper and spice from the get-go, with notes of cream, cedar, hay, and coffee settling in to round out the blend. Pick up this big-ring premium handmade at a price that even Mark Twain himself would approve of.  ​",Medium-Full,['Gordo'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Gordo,No,Maduro,
Mark Twain The Press,Rated 4.71 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"Extra! Extra! Read all about it!Mark Twain was a busy guy, with an impressive resume. Despite a list of achievements including satirist, novelist, scholar, philosopher, humanitarian, and 5-year champion of the Philadelphia Wing Bowl (we’re not super positive about that last one), the man was never too busy to burn a cigar. His tastes leaned heavily toward the cheap stuff, and while the tobacco used in Mark Twain The Press is undeniably top-grade, even Mr. Twain himself would have smiled at the price point. The blend starts with Honduran and Nicaraguan long-fillers hugged by a Honduran binder, and finished off with an Ecuador Sumatra wrapper. Weighing in at medium-body with a toasty-smooth profile of earth, oak, and leather, Mark Twain The Press makes the perfect companion for a relaxing lunch break with a cup o’ joe and the daily news. ",Medium,"['Double Corona', 'Robusto Extra']","Habano, Honduran","Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,,More Details,Dominican Republic,,,"Double Corona, Robusto Extra",False,Ecuador Sumatra,
Metropolitan Petites by Nat Sherman,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Nat Sherman recently expanded their popular cigarillo line with Metropolitan Petites. Available in 3 distinct varieties, Petites offer a little somethin’ for everyone. From tame and mellow to full and bold, these short cigars a great for a quick break. Maduro: fuller-bodied with a slightly sweet and rich flavor. Dominican and Nicaraguan fillers are paired with a Connecticut Broadleaf maduro wrapper.Connecticut:  mellow profile that is toasty and creamy. A Connecticut shade wrapper is combined with Dominican and Nicaraguan fillers.Host (Honduran): made by Camacho. Rich Honduran fillers are packed inside a Connecticut shade wrapper for a flavorful, medium-bodied blendNote: These cigars used to be called Nat Sherman Point Fives. They were recently rebranded as Metropolitan Petites but the blends have not changed. ",,['Cigarillos'],Honduran,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,"Dominican Republic, Honduras",No,,Cigarillos,No,"Connecticut, Connecticut Broadleaf, Ecuador Connecticut, Maduro",Nat Sherman
Mi Querida,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 18 Ratings ,"A mistress you can show off! If you’ve ever met Steve Saka, you know that calling him a big deal is quite the understatement. Originally gaining fans with his work at Drew Estate, Saka retired from DE back in 2013. But in 2015, Dunbarton Tobacco & Trust was born, and like a phoenix from the cigar ashes, Saka rose again with another fantastic brand of top-shelf sticks. Sobremesa, the first release, was loved by enthusiast’s everywhere. But now, the follow-up, Mi Querida is here. Spoiler alert: this is no sophomore slump. Mi Querida, Spanish for “my mistress”, is a medium to full-bodied cigar that deserves immediate attention. The recipe is a seamless Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper over Nicaraguan binder and filler. The first few puffs are filled with chocolate, and thick syrupy sweetness. Keep going, and you’ll find strength, coffee, pepper, and a warm earthiness. Complex, perfectly rolled, and undeniably unique, you owe it to yourself to try some of these today. Love Mi Querida? Try something extra special - the 6""x60 Puma Negra size available exclusively right here at Cigars International! The CI exclusive Puma Negra size has received rave reviews from CI Nation and industry vets alike, including a 90-rating from halfwheel.",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Gordo, Robusto, Short Robusto, Toro",Varies,Connecticut Broadleaf,Dunbarton Tobacco & Trust
Mi Querida Puma Negra,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Something extra-special from Saka.Steve Saka is a major player in the cigar industry, having helped catapult Drew Estate to the level of prominence they enjoy today, and known most famously for his involvement in the creation and perfection of the top-shelf Liga Privada brand. In 2015, he created his own cigar brand called Dunbarton Tobacco and Trust. Mi Querida has been a hit from the beginning, but now Saka is helping us say thank you to the CI Nation with an exclusive size you can only get here.You heard me right. You won’t be able to find the beautifully big Puma Negra size of this amazing blend anywhere else. Now don't get me wrong — the regular production sizes of Mi Querida are already booming with medium-full bodied flavors. But this chunky 6”x60 Gordo kicks things up a notch with even more Nicaraguan long-fillers beneath the Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper. The initial light will coat your palate in spicy, chocolatey flavors, with cream, coffee, earth, and leather not far behind. Grab yourself a box of Mi Querida Puma Negra, hunker down for a nice long herf, and pat yourself on the back for being a customer of the greatest cigar store in the world. The CI exclusive Puma Negra size has received rave reviews from CI Nation and industry vets alike, including a 90-rating from halfwheel.",Medium-Full,['Gordo'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,Gordo,False,Connecticut Broadleaf,Dunbarton Tobacco & Trust
Mi Querida Triqui Traca,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Hot like an M-80!Mi Querida is (literally) the darling of Steve Saka’s portfolio. Steve Saka’s 2nd release under Dunbarton Tobacco & Trust, the Mi Querida is a medium-full bodied powerhouse of a stick, bursting with well-balanced complexity and big, bold flavors. But since Saka is never finished tweaking, perfecting, and experimenting with his blends, Mi Qurida’s stronger little brother is ready to take the spotlight. Introducing: Mi Querida Triqui Traca.I know what you’re thinking, ‘Triqui who now??’ These little bombs are named after the Nicaraguan slang term for two firecrackers tied together. Complete with a Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper, Nicaraguan binder, and Nicaraguan & Dominican Ligero long-fillers, the cap is formed into a ‘fuse’ and the flavors are an amped up version of the original Mi Querida. You can expect a peppery, unapologetically bold profile of leather, spice, and earth. Grab a box of Triqui Tracas, light ‘em up, and let ‘em rip!Click Here to view the rest of the Dunbarton Tobacco & Trust portfolio.",Full,"['Lonsdale', 'Robusto']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Lonsdale, Robusto",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Dunbarton Tobacco & Trust
Micallef Experiencia La Crema,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Experience the Cuban Legacy! For the last few years, the Micallef brand of cigars has been quickly and quietly growing throughout our industry, impressing anyone who’s had the chance to sample their brands. Today, we’re shining the spotlight on the Micallef Experiencia La Crema– a medium-bodied charmer that’s sure to impress any fan of premium cigars. Would you expect anything less from a family that’s been in the business since 1934? Each Micallef cigar is crafted with impressively aged tobaccos, and the Experienca is no different. In fact, each leaf in this blend is aged four years before the cigars are rolled – and go through an additional year of aging after! For the specs themselves, you’re looking at a Nicaraguan Habano wrapper leaf, San Andreas Habano binder, and Nicaraguan, Dominican, and Panamanian long-fillers. As soon as you light this one you’ll know it’s there, greeting you with a great aroma and the perfect balance of sweet and spicy tobacco. Burning cool and slow, the only thing you’ll be left wanting after finishing this cigar is more. Good news! Micallef Experiencia La Crema has received a well-deserved 90-point rating, noting: ""Each puff shows an earthy, leathery quality along with touches of nuts and chocolate. The finish hints of cinnamon.""",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Double Robusto', 'Gordo', 'Robusto Extra', 'Toro']",Habano,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, Panamanian",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Churchill, Double Robusto, Gordo, Robusto Extra, Toro",Varies,Sumatra,
Micallef Grande Bold A Maduro,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"You want A Maduro? We’ve got plenty! Nowadays everyone in the cigar world talks about “innovation”… new tobaccos, new processes, new packaging and so on. But sometimes, you gotta keep it classic. Enter Micallef. With nearly 100 years of family experience in the premium cigar world, each Micallef blend is a testament to tried-and-true methods of fermentation, aging, and rolling. Want me to prove it? Just check out A Maduro. Released under the “Grande Bold” line, the A Maduro is one of the best examples I can think of to show off a classic Maduro. Full-bodied and full-flavored, Micallef Grande Bold A Maduro is balanced with woodsy and nutty notes, backed by a dark chocolatey note and a cedar-rich finish. This is thanks to the beautiful Ecuadorian Broadleaf maduro wrapper perched atop a bevy of Nicaraguan long-fillers. Perfect for those who appreciate the way things were, A Maduro belongs in your cart swiftly. ",Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Micallef Grande Bold Ligero,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Grande Bold goes BIGBack in the day, the Connecticut cigar ruled the roost. Today, Connecticuts still outsell fuller-bodied offerings, but there’s no doubt that the cigar loving world has got a taste for ligero. Yes, the full-bodied cigar has been gaining in popularity year over year thanks to great manufacturers like Oliva and A.J. Fernandez. Today, a new name enters the game with an uber-rich cigar you won’t soon forget: Micallef Grande Bold Ligero. Let me state this up front: this cigar is bold to a ‘t.’ If that’s not your bag, this one isn’t for you… but if you want your cigar dark and sophisticated, you’re going to find a lot to love. Micallef Ligero’s oily Sumatran wrapper leaf sits overtop an Ecuadorian binder along with Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers. Each puff delivers tons of balanced spice with sweet undertones, and a rich level of flavor that’ll easily stand up to any bourbon or scotch you’d like to pair this with. ",Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Robusto Extra']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Gordo, Robusto, Robusto Extra",Varies,Connecticut Broadleaf,
Micallef Grande Bold Mata Fina,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Mata Fina – most fine! Micallef may look like the new kids on the block, but don’t let that fool you! You see, Don Pedro Gomez actually began his family business back in Cuba in 1934. Today, the cigars have been given a contemporary re-release on shelves, with Gomez’s grandchildren at the helm. The blends and looks may be new, but at their core this is still a company that believes in the classic Cuban focuses: consistency, quality, and flavor. The Grande Bold Mata Fina is a medium to full-bodied offering from Micallef’s core line. Wrapped in a dark and oily Brazilian Mata Fina leaf and backed by Nicaraguan binder and long-fillers, the Mata Fina delivers an uber-rich experience perfect for any cigar lover. The profile is an instant classic, featuring tons of great toasty and nutty flavors in a balance that’ll have you quickly coming back for more. ",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Toro, Torpedo",No,Brazilian,
Micallef Grande Bold Nicaragua,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"From Cuba to Nica! Micallef cigars are a new line of classic Cuban inspired blends that’s sure to impress any cigar lover that gets their hands on them. Honoring their family’s legacy in the world of premium cigars (one dating all the way back to 1934 in Cuba), Edel and Joel Gomez are quietly making some of the most consistent, delicious cigars in the industry today. With their Grande Bold Nicaragua line, Edel and Joel perfectly marry contemporary Nicaraguan tobacco to classic Cuban techniques. Full-bodied and full-flavored but never overwhelming, each Micallef Nicaragua features loads of spicy-sweet flavors up front, before mellowing out into a smooth core of flavors showcasing roasted nuts and cedar. Wrapped in a gorgeous Connecticut Broadleaf and backed by Nicaraguan binder and long-fillers, the Micallef Nicaragua is a certified recipe for success. ",Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,
Micallef Grande Bold Sumatra,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Micallef ‘Press’es the IssueThe Micallef Grande Bold line is full of well-made, consistent cigars. That’s no doubt. From their humble roots in Cuba almost 100 years ago, the Gomez family has been constantly refining their craft in an effort to bring you the best cigars on the market. The result is a ton of great blends… but perhaps the best of the best is the Grande Bold Sumatra.Box-pressed and beautiful. Indeed, this one’s a real charmer at first glance. Up top, the oily Sumatra wrapper leaf sits atop a Broadleaf binder and a mixture of Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers. Toasting the foot, the cigar delivers on its promise of boldness — each puff is full of woody and cocoa notes with just a hint of spice on the finish. Never edging above a medium to full-body, the Grande Bold Sumatra should be a must-try for cigar fans everywhere. ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",Connecticut Broadleaf,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Robusto",No,Sumatra,
Micallef Leyenda,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"A Collaboration of Legendary ProportionsThe Gomez Sanchez name in cigars is one you may not know, but they’ve been in the game for quite some time. Back in 1934 in Havana, Cuba, Don Pedro Gomez began his family’s legacy in the premium cigar game… today, their name lives on through his grandsons, Edel and Joel. But as anyone who’s been around cigars long enough can tell you, the past matters, and with the Gomez Sanchez Leyenda, Micallef cigars honors their legacy. Offered in tapered figurado vitolas, the Leyenda is a most impressive cigar to behold. And I’m not just talking about the unique coffin that holds each handmade. Underneath the three bands, you’ll find a five-year-aged Ecuadorian Habano wrapper leaf that’s rustic in all the right ways. This is joined by a Nicaraguan binder and a tri-country blend of Nicaraguan, Dominican, and Honduran long-fillers, all aged 5 years pre-roll as well. Toasting the foot, you’ll find a classic Cuban profile, featuring a nice strength, rounded out by naturally sweet tobacco notes, black pepper, and a roasted nuttiness. Good news! Micallef Gomez Sanchez 1RA Generacion has received an awesome 92-point rating, noting: ""A long figurado with a thin, tapered head. Its lush draw delivers notes of chocolate, almonds and creamy vanilla around a core of rich wood. The finish hints of coffee.""",Medium-Full,['Figurado'],Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Figurado,No,Ecuador Habano,
Micallef Migdalia,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Micallef’s most beautiful flowerThere are a lot of people involved in the cigar industry, and while many come and go throughout the years, some names are worthy of the highest recognition and remembrance. Migdalia Sanchez is one of those people, a dedicated representative of Cuban cigars and one of the most highly decorated cigar rollers on earth since completing her tobacconist education at just 17 years old. Migdalia herself aided Micallef in the blending of her namesake cigar, with extraordinary results. A rich, gleaming San Andres Habano wrapper sits atop a 4 year-old Sumatran binder and 4 year-old Nicaraguan & Dominican long-fillers. The flavors are deep & rich, with notes of red wine, cedar, pepper, and cocoa. This is a great full-bodied expression of true cigar mastery, so grab a box today and tip your hat to a cigar industry legend. ",Full,"['Corona', 'Corona Extra', 'Toro']",Sumatra,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Corona Extra, Toro",No,San Andres,
Micallef Reserva Limitada Privada,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Micallef’s Crown Jewel.Al Micallef might be a new name in the cigar industry, but his Nicaraguan-produced brand is destined for the annals of cigar legends. The brand is laser-focused on luxury and quality, easily going toe-to-toe with the established giants and blowing them out of the water. Rolled under the watchful eyes of the third generation cigar-making Gomez Sanchez family, all of Micallef’s cigars are backed by more than 80 years of experience and expertise.The Micallef Reserva Limitada Privada is the most luxurious cigar in Micallef’s portfolio, a blend that truly captures the vision behind this strong brand. All of the components used, from the San Andres Habano wrapper overtop the Nicaraguan binder, to the Dominican & Peruvian long-fillers, are aged for a minimum of 8 years, and once lit, yield a phenomenally complex profile of toasted wood, leather, cocoa, and a touch of pepper that increases in intensity as the cigar burns down. The price of admission may be high, but this is certainly not meant to be an everyday cigar. This cigar is meant for the special moments in life, a rare treat for the times when one is appropriate. Slow down, savor that moment, and pair it perfectly with the Micallef Reserva Limitada Privada. ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Honduran, Peruvian",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Toro",No,San Andres,
MISTAKES,Rated 4.42 out of 5, Based on 299 Ratings ,"As smooth as they come, MISTAKES is a wonderful everyday cigar.This “smooth operator” is a dynamo that I can barely keep in stock. In fact I’ve got tons of customers who order nothing but this cigar. It’s easy to see why. MISTAKES give you premium flavor and terrific construction at a bargain price. They’re super-smooth, nice and mellow, made in a top-notch factory, and darn cheap. A beauty that’s simply a great everyday cigar. Have I mentioned how inexpensive they are? Made in the Dominican for CI exclusively, MISTAKES are gorgeous cigars rolled with Connecticut-shade wrappers and Dominican mixed fillers. Trust me, if you like pleasant, smooth, well-constructed cigars with a perfect draw....not to mention a cheap every day price, then this one’s for you. Overall it’s an extraordinarily compelling cigar for the money.",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,
Monte by Montecristo AJ Fernandez,Rated 4.68 out of 5, Based on 97 Ratings ,"So nice they named it three times! The old world heritage of Montecristo. The new world flair of Nicaragua. I hope you’re ready for a Montecristo like you’ve never experienced before, because Monte by Montecristo Crafted by AJ Fernandez (or MBMCBAJF for short) doesn’t pull any punches. The story behind this one is about as long as the name, so let’s skip it and jump right into the blend.At first look, you’re going to know this is a cigar you have to get your hands on. Each gorgeous specimen in these boxes of 20 is expertly wrapped with a stunning Habano 2000 wrapper. Inside, you’ll find vintage Dominican Criollo binder and long-filler tobaccos, hand-selected from some of the finest harvest the DR has ever experienced. And the flavor. Oh baby, we could write paragraphs about every complexity contained in this powerhouse blend. Coffee, thick sweetness, dark chocolate, and a warm and nutty core meld together perfectly into every puff. Try one today, we guarantee you won’t regret it. Monte by Montecristo by AJ Fernandez received two 90-ratings, and a 91-rating, noting: ""Enrobed in a pristine, chocolate-brown cover leaf, this cigar burns and draws evenly, delivering big notes of coffee, fruit and toast with touches of dark chocolate.""",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Criollo '98, Nicaraguan","Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Belicoso, Corona, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Ecuador Habano,Montecristo
Montecristo,Rated 4.54 out of 5, Based on 239 Ratings ,"Montecristo cigars are flawlessly crafted by hand with Dominican grown, Cuban seed long filler and Connecticut shade wrappersMany consider the famous Montecristo cigar brand to be the finest cigar in the world. This refined blend has been aged well, which adds a nice, complex depth to the flavor of this classic cigar. Each size in the line boasts superior construction and a rare blend of exquisite tobaccos, yielding a satisfying, medium-bodied profile. Try a box of Montecristo cigars today and save at our discounted prices.​Montecristo has received numerous 90-ratings, and a 91-rating in Cigar Insider, noting: ""This well-made cigar shines with oils and is well made. It is steely, smooth and creamy, with lots of white pepper flavor and a pleasant kick of herbs on the palate.""",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Lonsdale', 'Torpedo']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Cigarillos, Corona, Double Corona, Lonsdale, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,Montecristo
Montecristo Classic,Rated 4.54 out of 5, Based on 289 Ratings ,"A classic rendition of Montecristo.To create the Montecristo Classic cigar, only the finest Connecticut shade wrappers were hand-selected to conceal a superior mixture of top-notch Dominican long-fillers. As expected, quality is on point with each cigar, producing a dependable cigar that’s mellow, smooth, and well-balanced. Notes of wood and earth are present just before a crisp, somewhat spicy finish completes each puff.​Good news, Montecristo Classic has received a well-deserved 91-rating, noting, ""A golden-brown lonsdale with an earthy, woody smoke underscored by notes of coffee and caramel. Richer than it looks.""",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Brazil,"African, Dominican",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Churchill, Cigarillos, Corona, Double Corona, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,Connecticut,Montecristo
Montecristo Crafted By AJ Fernandez,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 1 Rating ,"Two legends join forces.Montecristo is one of the oldest and most recognizable cigar brands in existence, and the gold standard for cigar quality all over the world. AJ Fernandez is the king of Nicaraguan tobacco, and holder of countless awards and 90+ ratings. You would think that competition would be fierce between these two titans of the industry, but they have instead decided to work together, and bring us a cigar nothing short of extraordinary.The blend born of this collaboration starts with a toothy Ecuador Sumatra Oscuro wrapper, covering a lush Mexican San Andres binder and long-fillers from Honduras and Nicaragua. Pressed into a candy-bar box-press, these sticks offer near-perfect construction and an excellent draw, and medium to full-bodied notes of black pepper, coffee beans, and umami. The heritage, passion, and expertise involved in this collaboration simply can’t be beat, so grab a box today and see for yourself.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Figurado', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Mexican,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Churchill, Figurado, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Ecuador Sumatra, Oscuro",Montecristo
Montecristo Epic,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 12 Ratings ,"Rolled by the Elite!Once upon a time, in a land far, far away there was a mystical collection of tobacco experts dubbed the ‘Grupo de Maestros.’ Their mission was to create the most flavorful, full-bodied blend under the Montecristo name. The result was EPIC! Hands down this is as premium as they come, and the masterminds behind this glorious creation should definitely be commended.EPIC is the Montecristo for those enthusiasts that want a more robust and fuller-bodied cigar...and boy does it deliver with tsunami-sized waves of flavor. Utilizing vintage Dominican and Nicaraguan filler tobaccos from as early as 2007, this tasty handmade exudes complexity. A pristine Ecuadorian Habano wrapper is delicately lain over a Nicaraguan binder and completes this masterpiece. The result, is an exquisite blend that imparts pleasant notes of spice, cocoa, nuts, earth and coffee.Montecristo Epic received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""A creamy and woody smoke with salty hints of leather. This is a large, medium-bodied cigar that is pleasantly easygoing and quite tasty.""​",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,Montecristo
Montecristo Epic Craft Cured,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"A most Epic releaseThe Montecristo line goes back years, with the Epic Craft Cured having a most storied background. In 2012, the Altadis in-house blending group released the original Monte Epic, and it was a smash success. They went on to make a limited-edition release, but for the newest release in this line, Epic Craft Cured, Altadis turned to a different blend master. Epic Craft Cured was blended and produced by Nestor Plasencia, and it’s a most worthy addition to the portfolio. Showcasing a stunning 2006 Rosado Oscuro wrapper leaf, this Nicaraguan puro is certain to please even the most discerning of palates. Before release, each component of the cigar undergoes curing in small pilones in order to better marry the flavors, resulting in a complex profile that’s salty, nutty, with notes of leather and wood. The Montecristo Epic Craft Cured is offered up in limited-edition boxes of 10, so don’t delay — you don’t want some other dude eating your lunch. Good News! Montecristo Epic Craft Cured has received a 90-point rating, noting: ""The bright cedar notes of this well-made robusto meld pleasantly with notes of earth, citrus and toasted wheat before its rich and earthy finish.""",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Robusto, Toro",No,"Nicaraguan, Oscuro",Montecristo
Montecristo Epic No. 2 Premium Selection 2007,Rated 5 out of 5,,"The Number 2 that’s always been number 1.What do you get when you make a cigar from the best rare tobacco in the world, chosen by hand by the most skilled blenders, with every stage of production performed with the highest possible degree of devotion and attention to detail? A masterpiece is what you get. And that’s exactly what’s waiting under the lid in every box of Montecristo Epic No 2 Premium Selection 2007.The Montecristo No. 2 already reigns as the standard for premium cigar quality the whole world over. Now the esteemed Grupo de Maestros has taken this already fantastic blend template and reimagined it using even higher quality components aging since 2007, and releasing it in extremely limited quantities. The blend consists of Nicaraguan and Dominican fillers beneath a Nicaraguan binder, wearing a creamy Ecuador Habano wrapper. You’ll be greeted at the outset by prominent notes of vanilla and nuts, and will find varying amounts of spice, wood, toast, caramel, and pepper as the burn travels down to your fingers. This is the second time this fantastic cigar has hit the market, and it went quick the first time around. Act fast, and make sure you don’t miss out on this one of a kind experience. ",Medium,['Toro'],Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,False,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,False,Ecuador Habano,Montecristo
Montecristo Espada,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 48 Ratings ,"Montecristo and Plasencia, a match made in heaven.The story of Montecristo Espada is seriously interesting. Not long ago, Montecristo and famed tobacco grower and cigar maker Nestor Plasencia struck a deal. This deal would gave Montecristo’s blending team, known as the ‘Grupo de Maestros,’ unrestricted access to Plasencia’s world-renowned library of tobaccos and state of the art factory. There, the Grupo de Maestro’s went to work, spending months creating the perfect blend. A blend that’s unlike any other Montecristo ever before. A Nicaraguan puro that’s overflowing with flavor. A cigar that’s as near perfect as they come. A cigar that’s easily fitting of the Montecristo name, but with a level of flavor that’s surprising and welcomed. In short, Montecristo Espada is exceptional. Meaning ‘sword,’ Espada makes full use of Plasencia’s unique tobacco archive and employs a gorgeous Habano wrapper from 2010 grown in Jalapa, Nicaragua. Underneath, an all-Nicaraguan blend of bold, well-aged long-fillers from Jalapa, Ometepe, and Condega were each specifically selected for their strength, flavor, or body. The result is an extremely well-balanced, layered with rich, hearty notes of wood, pepper, coffee, cream, nuts, and sweetness. Elegant, refined, and loaded with complexity, Montecristo Espada is truly a world-class cigar. Montecristo Espada received Top 25 honors for 2015 (#20 overall) and a well-deserved 92-rating noting: "" offering the spice of a gingersnap with touches of cinnamon that build to a sweet, spicy finish.""",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Criollo '98, Nicaraguan","Colombian, Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,"Criollo '98, Habano",Montecristo
Montecristo Espada Estoque,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Loaded to the hilt with flavor.Montecristo Espada was the result a collaboration between Montecristo’s blending team, the Grupo de Maestros, and Nestor Plasencia. The blending team was given full access to Plasencia’s legendary tobacco library and his state of the art cigar factory resulting in the phenomenal Montecristo Espada cigar. Plasencia and Montecristo have again joined forces to bring a new extension to the Espada line, the Estoque, which takes its name from the special sword used by Spanish bullfighters..Montecristo Espada Estoque features a wealth of rare and vintage tobaccos, and is a full-bodied gem packed with succulent flavors and complexity. Coming dressed in an upper priming 2013 Nicaraguan Cuban-seed viso Jalapa wrapper sitting atop a 2002 Nicaraguan Corojo seco Jalapa binder, and 2009 Nicaraguan Corojo seco Esteli, 2013 Nicaraguan Criollo viso Ometepe, and 2013 Nicaraguan Criollo viso Condega long-fillers. This is a special, super-premium cigar best reserved for those moments when you can take your time and allow the blend to fully envelope you. Good news! Montecristo Espada Estoque has received a well deserved 91-point rating, noting: ""A dark and picture-perfect torpedo with a notably pointy tip. Light notes of wood and black tea become heavier with caramel, cocoa and a warm toasty finish.""",Full,['Torpedo'],"Criollo, Nicaraguan","Colombian, Nicaraguan",False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Torpedo,No,Nicaraguan Jalapa,Montecristo
Montecristo Espada Oscuro,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Espada goes Oscuro.A few years ago Montecristo’s famed blending team, the Grupo de Maestros, reached a deal with the Plasencia family of tobacco growers. The deal gave them unlimited access to all the Plasencia’s finest leaves, and the resulting cigar was known as the Montecristo Espada. The success of the original was so undeniable, the Grupo de Maestros once again scoured Plasencia’s stock to create a follow-up that ups the ante even on the first nearly-perfect blend: The Montecristo Espada Oscuro.The Espada Oscuro replaces the 2010 Jalapa Habano wrapper with a vintage Habano Rosado Oscuro leaf, that’s several shades darker and a fair bit stronger. The all-Nicaraguan components work together to produce an intriguing mélange of complex flavors, and rich, peppery notes of earth and leather. Espada is Spanish for sword, and the Grupo de Maestros were razor-sharp when they blended this gem. If these end up as popular as the original Espada, you’ll want to grab a box today and strike while the iron’s hot.",Medium-Full,"['Robusto Extra', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto Extra, Toro",No,Habano Oscuro,Montecristo
Montecristo Media Noche,Rated 4.52 out of 5, Based on 321 Ratings ,"Hearty maduros from Montecristo cigars.Montecristo Media Noche: a beautiful, dark cigar graced by a thick Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper – oozing with natural oils. Under the wrapper resides a well-aged mixture of hand-selected long-fillers from Nicaragua, Peru and Dominican Republic. This hearty combination delivers ample oomph but in a balanced, enjoyable manner. It delivers an intense bouquet of flavor throughout, including a cedary core complemented by hints of leather and toastiness. The aftertaste is both sweet and spicy, satisfying each part of the palate equally with a savory, full-bodied cigar experi​ence. Give this blend a shot, and discover the dark side of Montecristo. ",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, Peruvian",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Montecristo
Montecristo Memories (Cigarillos),Rated 4.48 out of 5, Based on 54 Ratings ,"Montecristo cigars are flawlessly crafted by hand with Dominican grown, Cuban seed filler and Connecticut shade wrappersMany consider the famous Montecristo cigar brand to be the finest cigar in the world. This refined blend has been aged well, which adds a nice, complex depth to the flavor of this classic cigar. These cigarillos boast a superior construction and a rare blend of exquisite tobaccos, yielding a satisfying, medium-bodied profile. Try a box of Montecristo cigars today and save at our discounted prices.​Montecristo has received numerous 90-ratings, and a 91-rating in Cigar Insider, noting: ""This well-made cigar shines with oils and is well made. It is steely, smooth and creamy, with lots of white pepper flavor and a pleasant kick of herbs on the palate.""",Medium,['Cigarillos'],,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Cigarillos,No,Connecticut,Montecristo
Montecristo Monte,Rated 4.4 out of 5, Based on 63 Ratings ,"For those who want to see the full MONTE! With a name that’s short and sweet, this savvy, sophisticated cigar turns tradition on its head by employing not one, but two binders for an added dose of depth. The end result is robust, complex, and flavorful, leaving you with a highly memorable experience that’s a cut above the rest. A mix of aged Dominican long-fillers are cradled by a Dominican and a Nicaraguan Corojo binder, adding a touch of spice. It’s all bundled up inside an Ecuadorian Habano wrapper. And coming from Montecristo, one of the most well-known cigar brands in the entire friggin’ universe, it’s no wonder this is one helluva tasty experience. Have a great time with Montecristo MONTE.Montecristo Monte already caught the eye of critics, earning a 93-rating in the process. Here's what they had to say: ""The cigar has plenty of leather and spice on the palate, with a note of chocolate on the finish. It’s a delicious new take on a celebrated old cigar brand.""",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']","Dominican, Nicaraguan",Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Habano,Montecristo
Montecristo Nicaragua,Rated 4.72 out of 5, Based on 29 Ratings ,"Is there anything AJ can’t do? Messing with an old-school brand like Montecristo takes some serious cojones (that’s the technical term, I believe). I mean, you don’t mess with success, right? And Montecristo is more than successful. Luckily for us, ever since the folks behind Montecristo let AJ start tweaking with the brand and crafting new blends, it’s been hit after hit, and this newest collaboration is another notch in the “Win” column. Welcome, Montecristo Nicaragua. The fifth addition to the ‘Core Line’ Montecristo, Nicaragua joins the ranks of White, Classic, Original, and Platinum. Big shoes to fill, no? Luckily, AJ does what he does best here, delivering a Nicaraguan powerhouse that’ll keep you coming back for more. 100% Nicaraguan tobaccos bring about a rich, flavorful profile, featuring plenty of classic Nicaraguan spice, backed by a characteristic sweetness that we can’t get enough of. Good news! Montecristo Nicaragua has received an outstanding 93-point rating along with being named the #10 Cigar of the Year in 2018, noting: ""A dark, woody cigar that unfolds dense, hearty layers of chocolate-covered coffee bean and dried fruit with every puff. Rich and balanced.""",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Nicaraguan,Montecristo
Montecristo Perlado,Rated 4.83 out of 5, Based on 18 Ratings ,"The pearl of Monte’s eyeSince its inception in Havana, Cuba, Montecristo has been pleasing palates across the world. Sure, it’s gone through a ton of different releases and looks throughout the years, but no matter what type of cigar bears the Montecristo name, you know they’re gonna be good. Today, we welcome one of the newest Connecticut releases from this historic brand, Montecristo Perlado. Made in the style of Montecristo White Vintage, this Dominican handmade features a true Connecticut leaf up top. Underneath, you’ll find a mixture of Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers. The combination produces an exceptionally smooth blend that you won’t soon forget — toasted nuts join cream and slight spice in a pleasant and mellow profile that never overwhelms. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Toro",No,Connecticut,Montecristo
Montecristo Pilotico Pepe Mendez,Rated 3.57 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"Pepe who!? Montecristo. Groupo de Maestros. Though it may sound like an off-beat Spanish boy band, the Groupo de Maestros is the name of the blending geniuses behind many of Montecristo’s best blends. Combining for hundreds of years of tobacco experience, the Groupo de Maestros are more than capable of delivering a mind-alteringly good blend, and the Cuban-esque Pilotico really drives that point home. Handmade in Nicaragua, the Montecristo Pilotico Pepe Mendez honors a man who changed the world of tobacco twice-over. You may have not heard his name, but Pepe Mendez is responsible for getting better consistency and cleaner flavors out of tobacco for years. An Ecuadorian Sumatra wrapper brings around leather, caramel, and walnut. While it does come with a high-price tag, Pilotico Pepe Mendez is one of the best releases this year, and I highly recommend you grab some for a special occasion. ​",Medium,"['Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Sumatra,Montecristo
Montecristo Platinum,Rated 4.58 out of 5, Based on 433 Ratings ,"Montecristo goes Platinum!The biggest name in cigars has now dressed itself in a new, flashy (bling bling) band. The Platinum La Habana Series cigar provides Montecristo lovers with a bolder, richer blend. Wrapped in a dark, Mexican Cubano leaf, the well balanced blend of Dominican, Nicaraguan, and Peruvian long-leaf fillers will give you that fuller bodied cigar that the traditional Montecristo may be lacking.Montecristo Platinum received an astounding 94-rating, noting: ""Every puff... imparts the dense, concentrated qualities of dried fruit, smacking of raisin, black cherry and baked plum around a core of earth and hickory."" ",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, Peruvian",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Corona, Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,Montecristo
Montecristo White Label,Rated 4.7 out of 5, Based on 429 Ratings ,"Montecristo White cigars make a bold statement.Continuing with Montecristo's fine tradition of being one of the world's most in-demand brand names, Montecristo adds a bolder, richer element to its stable with the Montecristo White cigar. Comprised of Dominican and Nicaraguan long fillers, wrapped in a flavorful Connecticut-seed Ecuadorian shade grown wrapper, the White offers a smooth, robust and satisfying profile for the more developed palate. Th​is Montecristo lives up to its name.In February 2017, the Montecristo White Series review earned it an esteemed 91-rating, noting, ""Sweet and... creamy... honey, ginger and freshly ground pepper. Its wrapper is yellowish in color and the cigar burns and draws evenly.""",Mellow-Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Corona, Double Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Montecristo
Montecristo White Vintage,Rated 4.19 out of 5, Based on 27 Ratings ,"An exceptional blend.Montecristo is one of the most storied and popular cigar brands in the world. Crafted with meticulous attention to detail and using only the finest tobaccos, Montecristo cigars are always satisfying and always expertly constructed.Montecristo White Vintage is the follow-up to the heralded Montecristo White series and offers a refined and smooth experience. Coming dressed in a US grown Connecticut shade wrapper from 2008, a Nicaraguan binder and Dominican, Nicaraguan, and Peruvian long-fillers complete this easygoing blend. Mellow to medium-bodied, this stick expresses notes of hazelnut, vanilla, coffee, and spice to set the table for a mellow and smooth blend. Montecristo White Vintage will please all palates and is a great choice to enjoy any time of day. ​",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Corona', 'Double Corona']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, Peruvian",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Corona, Double Corona",No,Connecticut,Montecristo
Montesino,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 12 Ratings ,"An affordable gem from FuenteThere's a few brands that can regularly be found in the CI ashtrays. While we have to burn new cigars as they come in (tough job, right?), there's some perennial favorites that pop up week to week without a doubt. I wish I could tell you Fuente was in there, but, the high-end premiums from them are a little too rich for our blood. Luckily, Montesino exists. Although slightly different in taste than the regular Fuente line, the smooth and mellow Montesinos are a nice value. Handmade with Connecticut shade or Connecticut Broadleaf wrappers, Nicaraguan binders and Dominican long-filler leaves. Add a box of these to your cart, and enjoy the experience of the Fuente family techniques without taking a second mortgage. ",Medium,"['Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Double Corona, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Toro",No,"Connecticut, Connecticut Broadleaf",
Muestra de Saka Unicorn,Rated 4.67 out of 5,,"Saka's Crowning Achievement.Oh boy, this is it. The pinnacle of Steve Saka's blending talents. If you're looking for a budget-priced knockaround stick, keep looking, my friend. But if you want to treat yourself, and you're looking for one of the finest cigars money can buy, your search is over. The Muestra de Saka Unicorn is the result of an experiment by Saka to see what would happen if no expense or effort whatsoever was spared in the creation of an ultra-premium limited-release cigar. The $100 per cigar price tag may sound a little steep, but once you get one of these beauties in your hand, you won't regret a single penny.For the blend, Saka sorted through 6000 pounds of Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper and Nicaraguan filler, with only one percent being deemed high enough quality to make it into the finished product. The double perfecto shape was achieved by hardwood molds hand-cut by Saka himself, and production of the cigars themselves was entrusted to just one buncher-roller duo in the entire factory. Its rare that a cigar with such a high price point has a flavor profile good enough to match, but the Muestra de Saka Unicorn delivers in spades. pumping out an unbelievably complex yet medium-bodied profile with notes of cocoa, espresso, and a pleasant caramel sweetness supporting a core of roasted nuts, fresh-baked bread, and a touch of black pepper. The cost of admission is high, but with production limited to just 1000 cigars, you'll be kicking yourself if you miss your chance to pick yourself up a true Unicorn.Click Here to view the rest of the Dunbarton Tobacco & Trust portfolio",Medium-Full,['Perfecto'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Perfecto,No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Dunbarton Tobacco & Trust
Murcielago,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Third time’s the charm! The Murcielago reminds me of a Hollywood celeb at this point – always disappearing after a few years for a little touch-up and facelift. Luckily, the quality of cigar hasn’t changed one bit, and this time I think they have the look down just right. The new metallic and black bands match exactly what this cigar provides: a modern, luxuriously rich medium to full-bodied handmade straight outta Nicaragua. While the previous Murcielago was produced at the La Zona factory in Esteli, now Erik Espinosa is crafting the recipe together with AJ Fernadnez. Luckily, the ingredients stayed the same. You’ll find a San Andres Maduro wrapper leaf up top over Nicaraguan long-fillers that boasts flavors of spice, coffee, earth, chocolate, and hits of black pepper. In short? The bat is back, baby, and it’s better than ever. ",Medium-Full,"['Lonsdale', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Lonsdale, Robusto, Toro",No,"Maduro, San Andres",
My Father,Rated 4.73 out of 5, Based on 26 Ratings ,"For a limited time, receive FREE shipping on your entire order with purchase of select boxes of My Father Cigars!A 94-rated stunner.My Father is enchanting from head to toe. The traditional packaging and vitolas represents the roots of old world Cuba, while the blend combines the very best of Nicaragua with a Havana twist. Each leaf in this blend has been hand-selected for optimum aesthetics and flavor. First, you’ll notice the pristine wrapper. A Habano-Rosado leaf grown in the misty valleys of Ecuador. Beautiful and dark in color with an oily sheen and pre-light aroma that’ll make you froth at the mouth, this wrapper conceals a bold, full-bodied mixture of aged Nicaraguan long-fillers grown from Cuban-seed in Esteli. The experience is robust, yet elegant, offering heavy notes of pepper on the palate and through the nose complemented by a touch of nuts and dark espresso. My Father is a complex, medium to full-bodied cigar that’s surprisingly smooth, creamy at times, and ultimately satisfying.In addition to several 90 and 93-point ratings, My Father received a well-deserved '94,' to complement its spot among the world's 'Top 25 Cigars':""Very well constructed, with an oily wrapper and triple-seam cap. The cigar is immediately rich and meaty, with leather, coffee bean, and a balancing sweetness.""",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Corona Extra', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Belicoso, Corona Extra, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Toro",No,"Ecuador Habano, Habano",My Father
My Father Connecticut,Rated 4.53 out of 5, Based on 38 Ratings ,"For a limited time, receive FREE shipping on your entire order with purchase of select boxes of My Father Cigars!A Mellow(er) Pepin!Known by many as the full-bodied master, Jose “Pepin” Garcia strays from the norm in his newest endeavor. And it’s no surprise that My Father Connecticut is still damn tasty, despite its much mellower character. A wonderfully blended mellow to medium-bodied beauty that is certainly not lacking in flavor. Starting from the cold draw, the carefully selected Nicaraguan Corojo 99’ binder and Nicaraguan Habano and Criollo long-fillers are noticeable, delivering slightly sweet and earthy nuances. The pristine Ecuadorian Connecticut shade wrapper can be deceiving, having a refined spice lingering throughout. A thoroughly complex cigar, My Father Connecticut secures its spot right alongside the other countless 90+ rated achievements credited to the Garcia family name.   My Father Connecticut received a well-deserved 90-rating noting: ""A well-made cigar with a three-seam cap and medium claro wrapper. The easy draw delivers a floral and balanced smoke with hints of chocolate and baking spices.""​",Mellow-Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Corojo, Nicaraguan",Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,My Father
My Father Flor de Las Antillas,Rated 4.76 out of 5, Based on 295 Ratings ,"For a limited time, receive FREE shipping on your entire order with purchase of select boxes of My Father Cigars!Box-pressed beauties from My Father.Introducing the Flor de las Antillas, the first entirely box-pressed line from My Father cigars. Meaning 'Flower of the Antilles', the Flor de las Antillas represents Cuba, the largest island in the Greater Antilles islands, and home to the Garcia family's rich cigar making heritage. Traditionally focused on more full-bodied cigars, Flor de las Antillas ventures into the company's untapped niche of a true medium-bodied experience. Featuring an all-Nicaraguan blend of tobaccos, Flor de las Antillas maintains My Father's reputation for crafting full-flavored, well constructed handmades. Greeting you from the outside is a dark brown Nicaraguan Sun Grown wrapper beautifully box-pressed and smooth to the touch. This leaf houses a bouquet of Nicaraguan long-fillers and binder, to create an exceptionally balanced and smooth experience. Each Flor de las Antillas delivers a distinct array of flavors, including notes of cocoa, pepper, sweet cedar, and earth. From start to finish, Flor de las Antillas maintains its smooth character and never goes a tick over medium to full-bodied. An anytime of day My Father experience.It didn't take long for Flor de Las Antillas to catch the eye of critics earning eight 90+ ratings, including #1 Cigar of the Year honors and a 96-point score in the process, which noted: ""Delicious from the first puff, with notes of nutmeg, white pepper and just enough strength without being overpowering. They are hard to put down.""​",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Sun Grown,My Father
My Father La Antiguedad,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 96 Ratings ,"For a limited time, receive FREE shipping on your entire order with purchase of select boxes of My Father Cigars!Allow me to introduce La Antiguedad, the second box-pressed line from Pepin Garcia and My Father cigars. Meaning 'The Antiquity,' La Antiguedad joins Flor de las Antillas as a representation of the Garcia family's Cuban heritage. Once a Cuban brand, La Antiguedad utilizes the original box artwork, and employs a traditional blend of Cuban-seed tobaccos to create yet another masterpiece from the hands of Pepin Garcia.An expertly blended selection of unique tobaccos were used to create La Antiguedad. A slightly reddish-hued Ecuadorian Habano Rosado Oscuro wrapper blankets a double Nicaraguan binder, one Criollo the other Corojo. Inside, a collection of Nicaraguan tobaccos from three prominent growing regions. Aged a minimum of three and a half years, these tobaccos produce a very complex, yet smooth medium to full-bodied profile, and yields notes of cocoa, coffee, leather and a touch of pepper.My Father La Antiguedad received a well-deserved 91-rating noting: ""This box-pressed cigar is a strong and hearty smoke full of baker's chocolate, roasted coffee beans and earth, but balanced by floral sweetness.""",Medium-Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Corojo, Criollo",Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,My Father
My Father La Gran Oferta,Rated 4.67 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"A grand offering indeedDon ‘Pepin’ Garcia is an unstoppable force in the world of cigars. From his own line of cigars, to his work with My Father, to his blending and production of many San Cristobal and Tatuaje releases, DPG is easily among the top three in the world’s greatest blenders. Today, we focus on another rejuvenation of a classic brand courtesy of Don Pepin, La Gran Oferta.Handmade at the world-renowned My Father Cigars S.A. factory in Esteli, Nicaragua, La Gran Oferta features a gorgeous and dark Ecuadorian Habano Rosado wrapper leaf. Underneath, you’ll find a mixture of Nicaraguan binder and long-fillers presenting a medium to full-bodied profile. Toasting the foot, you’ll find the classic Don ‘Pepin’ Garcia black pepper up front, following up with notes of dark chocolate and a rich, fruity sweetness. Good news! The My Father Gran Oferta has received a well-deserved 91-point rating, noting: ""There's a spicy, earthy quality to this dark robusto, which gleams with oil. Notes of black pepper, almonds and chocolate build to a salted caramel finish.""",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Habano,My Father
My Father La Opulencia,Rated 4.38 out of 5, Based on 16 Ratings ,"Combine My Father and Le Bijou and you've got OpulenciaMy Father Cigars have come a long way since their start in a tiny cigar factory in Miami’s Little Havana nearly a decade and a half ago. Since then, they’ve grown into a go-to brand for cigar enthusiasts, regularly receiving outstanding reviews from critics and several top-25 honors. And we expect no less for the newest entry into this storied brand — My Father La Opulencia. A box-pressed vitola presented in six exquisite offerings, La Opulencia is here to redefine the premium cigar experience.Featuring elements of the original My Father and Le Bijou, the La Opulencia utilizes an opulent Mexican Rosado Oscuro wrapper encasing flavorful Nicaraguan filler. This premium has a smooth and creamy taste with leather and cocoa nuances. Each sample that went across our office burnt beautifully and smoothly down to the end, and I'll admit I hated to put this one down. Don't miss out — secure yourself a few My Father La Opulencias today.The Pepin legacy of amazing ratings continues. La Opulencia received a 95-rating and was named the #2 Cigar of 2018. Here's what the critics had to say: ""The combustion is perfect, the draw offering earthy underpinnings of chocolate and cocoa with each puff, balanced by a mid-palate oakiness and sweeter, subtle top notes of anise and nougat.""",Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Rothschild', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Rothschild, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,"Oscuro, San Andres",My Father
My Father La Promesa,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"A rich past, a promising future.When Jose ‘Pepin” Garcia, founder of the My Father cigar factory, left his home in Cuba completely by himself, he made a promise to his family: that he would make a name for himself in premium cigars outside of Cuba, and make his family proud of his success. Today the beautiful factory and exquisite, meticulously crafted cigars stand as some of the best in the world, and My Father’s La Promesa stands as a testament and tribute to that success.La Promesa features filler tobacco grown solely at the Garcia’s own farms in Nicaragua, and is graced with a Nicaraguan binder and Ecuadorian Habano Oscuro wrapper. The flavors are wonderfully balanced notes of pepper, leather, oak, and cream, and do proper justice to the noble inspiration behind the name. Elegance, confidence, and the promise of an excellent experience time after time are what you’ll get when you order a box of La Promesa, Pepin’s crowning achievement. Good news! My Father La Promesa has been awarded a 91-point rating, noting: ""It's a sweet and woody smoke with notes of hickory and mint chocolate accented by touches of leather and nuts.""",Medium-Full,"['Corona Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto Extra', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,False,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto Extra, Short Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,My Father
My Father Le Bijou 1922,Rated 4.64 out of 5, Based on 175 Ratings ,"For a limited time, receive FREE shipping on your entire order with purchase of select boxes of My Father Cigars!The #1 Cigar of 2015!My Father Le Bijou 1922 is a another great extension to the popular My Father line. French for ""the Jewel"", Le Bijou is a rich, full-bodied treat in typical Pepin form. Featuring a Habano Oscuro wrapper and a healthy mix of Nicaraguan long-fillers, Le Bijou 1922 exudes a robust array of flavors delivered in a remarkably smooth fashion. Complex, unique and satisfying - the Garcia Family's new star!My Father Le Bijou 1922 received Cigar of the Year honors for 2015 and an impressive 97-point rating, noting: ""It takes a profound understanding of cigar tobaccos to create a smoke that conveys uncanny impressions of dark chocolate-covered raisins, savory leather and a sweet-and-salty finish that resonates on the palate.""",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Habano Oscuro,My Father
My Father The Judge,Rated 4.82 out of 5, Based on 17 Ratings ,"For a limited time, receive FREE shipping on your entire order with purchase of select boxes of My Father Cigars!No Judge-mentsWhat do you do when you’ve won the prestigious Cigar of the Year award on two different occasions (first in 2013 and then again in 2015)? Well, presumably, whatever the Hell you want! Luckily, in the case of My Father, that answer is to continue to produce amazing cigars. My Father The Judge is the newest offering from the Garcia family, and utilizes larger ring gauges to deliver chewy, dense cigars like only My Father can produce. Handmade in Nicaragua, My Father The Judge utilizes an absolutely flawless Ecuadorian Sumatra wrapper over hand-picked Nicaraguan binder and long-fillers. The box-press guarantees that these high-octane tobaccos will be meticulously slow-burning, and deliciously rewarding. Cedar, nuts, leather, and a warm, bold core of earthiness mean The Judge is a cigar guaranteed to satisfy any enthusiast.​Great news, My Father the Judge has received an impressive 93-point rating and was named the #7 Cigar of 2017! Here's what the reviewers had to say: ""Pressed and blocky, this big robusto is topped with a three-seam cap. Notes of chocolate and gingersnap play off each other with hints of red pepper and almonds.""",Medium-Full,"['Corona Gordo', 'Gordo', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Corona Gordo, Gordo, Toro",Varies,Ecuador Sumatra,My Father
My Father Vegas Cubanas,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"A True OG from DPGFifteen years ago, the Vegas Cubanas was a critical feature of the My Father collection. As the company grew and more offerings were developed and made available, the blend was lost in the shuffle. Now, it has returned to its rightful place in the My Father lineup. Vegas Cubanas is here, it's delicious, and it's most deserving of a spot in your rotation. Sporting filler tobaccos from Don Pepin farms in Estelí and Jalapa and gorgeous Corojo leaf wrapper, the Vegas Cubanas delivers sumptuous hints of leather, cedar, cocoa, and spicy black pepper. Medium-bodied but full of flavor, we suggest getting on this one quick, as it will surely be highly sought after being away for so long.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Corojo,My Father
Nat Sherman Epoca,Rated 4.33 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"Nat Sherman has been a pillar in the cigar industry since 1930, but recently they’ve been hotter than ever. To commemorate their history (and their success), they’ve decided to re-release a formerly retired brand that was their first offering in the premium cigar market: Nat Sherman Epoca. Handcrafted in the Dominican Republic by the Quesada family, Nat Sherman Epoca employs a vintage blend of Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers paired with a silky, golden-brown Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper. This combination promotes a blend that’s smooth and creamy, but still rich with flavors of coffee, nuts, wood, and pepper. Delicious and highly-enjoyable, this high-end offering accomplishes exactly what it set out to do: pay tribute to the pre-embargo clear Havana blend for which it was named and recreate some of that experience. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Perfecto, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Nat Sherman
Nat Sherman Epoca Reserva,Rated 4.33 out of 5,,"Epoca’s bolder brother. Nat Sherman is one of the most prolific American tobacco companies. They got their start in New York City all the way back in 1930, and they’re still slingin’ fine stogies today, nearly 90 years later. Their track record speaks for itself, as does their commitment to producing only the finest products worthy of bearing the family name. This is evident in all of their creations, and the newest name to join this illustrious portfolio is certainly no exception.The Nat Sherman Epoca Reserva is the first line extension of the Epoca, and goes against the grain of their usual releases. While most of their portfolio falls in the mellow-medium category, the Epoca Reserva sits at a heavy medium-full. This is due to a bold blend of Nicaraguan and Dominican long-fillers beneath a Dominican binder and wrapper, all selected to provide strength without sacrificing a bit of smoothness or taste. ",,"['Corona', 'Corona Grande', 'Double Corona', 'Robusto Extra', 'Rothschild']",,,False,,More Details,,No,,"Corona, Corona Grande, Double Corona, Robusto Extra, Rothschild",No,,Nat Sherman
Nat Sherman Metropolitan Connecticut,Rated 4.14 out of 5, Based on 14 Ratings ,"Take the MetroAlmost a century. That’s how long Nat Sherman has been slinging cigars in Manhattan, NY. And let’s be honest — when you’ve been in the game that long, chances are you know what you’re doing. These boutique cigars are fan-favorites across the nation, and it’s clear why from the first puff. With their new line, Nat Sherman Metro, this New York company reminds everyone why they’re so damn popular in the first place. Available in three different wrappers, we’re going to be inspecting the Nat Sherman Metropolitan Connecticut today. I’m happy to report – this stick is pure gold. And I’m not just talking about the silky, Connecticut Shade wrapper. Mellow to medium-bodied, this smooth handmade delivers an incredibly balanced mixture of cream, earthiness, and a slight cedar that’s going to make this one an auto-include for any fan of morning cigars. ",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,Nat Sherman
Nat Sherman Metropolitan Habano,Rated 4.86 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"More like Haba-GOAfter nearly 100 years of slinging cigars in Manhattan, New York, I think it’s a pretty safe bet to say Nat Sherman knows what they’re doing. Call it experience, call it talent, call it a drive to deliver awesome, boutique handmades to cigar lovers everywhere. But I’ll just call it as I see it — this brand isn’t going anywhere, anytime soon.Today, let’s examine Nat Sherman’s newest line – the Metropolitan. This one’s available in three different wrappers, including this medium-bodied Habano wrapped gem. Sometimes you CAN judge a book by its cover, and all my senses are telling me this one’s gonna be great. Lighting it up, there’s a smooth Cuban quality to the cigar, delivering wood, slight creaminess, earth, and black pepper. If you’re a fan of Nat Sherman, this one’s a must-try. ​Nat Sherman Metropolitan Habano received a 91-rating in February of 2017. The review said, ""Draped in an oily wrapper, this fat cigar has a lush draw that offers big notes of roasted nuts, coffee bean and caramel. The finish is toasty and leathery.""",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Nicaraguan,Nat Sherman
Nat Sherman Metropolitan Host,Rated 4.76 out of 5, Based on 104 Ratings ,"A host of quality tobaccoNat Sherman cigars have a rich history, and the quality of the brand has always been primo. In fact, this Honduran beauty offers a silky-smooth, super-mellow taste - refined and pleasant with just a slight hint of sweetness on the palate. To me, this is the perfect morning cigar - just after a cup of coffee, this will get your day off to the right start. Made by hand from all long-fillers, this handmade is topped off with a gorgeous, smooth Connecticut-Ecuador wrapper. If you like your cigars on the mellow side, pick up the Metropolitan Host Selection today.Note: This product has recently received a packaging update. We currently have a mix of old and new packaging, so your purchase may differ from the product shown on this page. Both packaging styles contain the same cigars.",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Double Corona, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto, Torpedo",Varies,Ecuador Connecticut,Nat Sherman
Nat Sherman Metropolitan Maduro,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Ride the night train! Good things come in threes. Is that the phrase? If not, I’d like to present the Nat Sherman Metro line of cigars as evidence of why it should be! Available in a trinity of wrappers, these selections of boutique handmades are rife with quality. Nat Sherman got their start almost 100 years ago, so I guess it’s no surprise to say that these guys really know what they’re doing. For those who want the richest, darkest experience from their cigars, the Nat Sherman Metropolitan Maduro is where you should be setting your sights. The bouquet off this one is present as soon as you open the box, and lighting up you’ll find the classic bold earth, chocolate, cedar, and pepper you know and love in a Maduro selection. Dark and delicious, Nat Sherman Maduro is an A+ in my books. ",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Nat Sherman
Nat Sherman Metropolitan Selection Host Maduro,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 16 Ratings ,"Known for having a solid reputation and a tradition of overall greatness, choosing a Nat Sherman cigar is always a good decision. Within their blend portfolio, the Host Selection has always been wildly popular among brand fans, and now it’s about to really take off. Introducing Nat Sherman Host Maduro.Drawing on the massive following of the original, Host Maduro turns up the volume with the use of a richer, fuller character that still manages to remain refined and smooth. The dark Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper delivers tons of flavor, and the construction is spot-on. Whether you’re a fan of Nat Sherman or a fan of maduros in general, this is one superb selection. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto']",,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Nat Sherman
Nat Sherman Sterling,Rated 4.42 out of 5, Based on 12 Ratings ,"Worthy of a silver platter.As of late Nat Sherman has been on a roll - the hits keep comin' like a boy band from the 90's. And now fans of this legendary brand will be happy to know that Sterling is the best damn Nat Sherman yet.Nat Sherman Sterling raises the bar across the board. From the packaging and bands to the new exciting blend, it's legit. Instead of a traditional cedar box, each cigar is tied in wheels of 25 and laid to rest sans cellophane in slide topped okoume wood boxes. This wood is neutral, allowing only the flavors of tobacco to marry (instead of the traditional cedar influence). And I'm no fortune teller, but I have a feeling this blend is going to age exceptionally well. It all starts with a blend of Dominican long-fillers, the oldest aged a full ten years, layered inside a Dominican binder. Seamlessly draped around this impressive core, a buttery smooth Ecuadorian Connecticut wrapper. The flavor is full and satisfying, while the body remains perfectly balanced between mellow and medium. The end result is a rich, mellow, complex flavor that’s worth every penny. Notes of roasted cedar, bread, cocoa, cinnamon, sweetness, and creaminess combine in a well-balanced fashion.  Pick up Nat Sherman Sterling for a premium experience. Note: Nat Sherman Sterling has gone through a rebranding and is now known as Timeless Sterling. We currently have a mix of old & new packaging, but rest assured! The cigars inside are exactly the same blend.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto']",Dominican,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Lancero/Panatela, Petite Corona, Robusto",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Nat Sherman
Nat Sherman Timeless Cigarillos,Rated 4.47 out of 5, Based on 38 Ratings ,"Short cigars from Nat Sherman.Nat Sherman cigars have a rich history and they’ve built their reputation by focusing on quality. The Nats Legendary cigarillo-sized blends are superb little guys made in Holland. With mellow flavors of cream and natural tobacco, these are easy to enjoy any time of day. Grab a tin or two of Nat Sherman Cigarillos for when you're looking for that cigar experience, but don't have a full hour of time to kill. ",Mellow,['Cigarillos'],,,False,No,More Details,Europe,No,,Cigarillos,No,Connecticut,Nat Sherman
Nat Sherman Timeless Prestige,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Nat Sherman's OGHandcrafted under the watchful eye of Manueal Quesada at the revered TACASA factory, Timeless Dominican is a handmade treat for any cigar enthusiast. A medium-bodied gem hailing from (you guessed it!) the Dominican Republic, Timeless Dominican is one of the newest additions in a storied brand dating back to 1930. Medium-bodied, but full of flavor, Timeless Dominican is perfect for everyday enjoyment. Timeless Dominican is the cream of the Nat Sherman crop, featuring a naturally dark Honduran wrapper over an expertly blended bunch of Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers. Earthy notes are joined by a subtle sweetness and a slight creamy texture that makes this cigar, pardon the pun, timeless. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Perfecto, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Honduran,Nat Sherman
National Brand Bundles,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 3 Ratings ,"Satisfyingly affordableNational Brand cigar bundles are the perfect everyday indulgence due to their mellow satisfying flavor and amazingly affordable price. Cigar enthusiasts enjoy this premium for the all Honduran fillers and wrappers produced in the same factory as Baccarat and Camacho cigars. These high quality bundles of joy are a crowd pleaser to share with friends and family or if you’re just getting into cigars, it’s a great stick to start with.  ",Medium,['Toro'],Honduran,Honduran,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Toro,No,Honduran,
Nestor Miranda Special Selection,,,"Once was old… is now NEW again!Nestor Miranda, the creator of Miami Cigar & Co., is bringing back a favorite from his portfolio. From starting his company in the trunk of his car, Nestor Miranda has used his extensive liquor industry knowledge to grow his company into a monumental business celebrating 30 years of success. His successful rapid growth forced him to archive certain lines through the years, but that is where it is a WIN for you!Previously debuted in 2006, Special Selection brings together a Nicaraguan criollo 98 binder combined with a blending of Condega, Estelí, and Jalapa Nicaraguan fillers all wrapped skillfully within a Nicaraguan habano wrapper. This impressive medium-full bodied blend offers a delicious flavor profile of rich cocoa, earthiness, wood, nuts and spice. Constructed at My Father Cigars S.A factory down in Estelí, this cigar mirrors the same solid construction as any others produced there. Don’t miss your chance to indulge in this re-released piece of Miami Cigar & Co. history! ",Medium-Full,['Toro'],"Criollo, Nicaraguan",Nicaraguan,False,,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,Toro,False,"Habano, Nicaraguan",
New Cuba,Rated 4.21 out of 5, Based on 219 Ratings ,"Tasty Corojo goodness for pennies on the dollar.Casa Fernandez is one of the largest growers of tobacco in Nicaragua. Today’s hot-bed for best of the best, Nicaragua’s black volcanic soils and tropical climate equal the perfect recipe for delicious offerings, and Casa Fernandez has there hand in countless boutique fan favorites hailing from their pristine Nicaraguan farms. The cigar at hand caters to the everyday enthusiast while utilizing Casa Fernandez’s revered, Cuban-esque proprietary tobaccos. Welcome the next backorder headache, New Cuba.New Cuba is rich and full-flavored, yet still perfectly smooth. A golden-brown Corojo wrapper and a ‘Cuban sandwich’ blend of Cuban-seed Nicaraguan tobaccos leads to an enjoyable profile brimming with notes of earth, pepper, nuts, and cocoa. Boasting a complex character and a cool, slow burn, New Cuba will keep you coming back for more, and at these attractive 2-fer prices as low as $1.19 apiece, you’ll be soaking in the spoils for twice as long. ​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Presidente, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Corojo,
New Cuba Connecticut,Rated 4.25 out of 5, Based on 20 Ratings ,"New Cuba lost its tanToday’s hot-bed in the cigar industry is without a doubt Nicaragua. The lush volcanic soils and tropical climate have been producing some of the most flavorful tobacco out there. Better yet? Aganorsa Farms has been the big supplier for top-quality tobacco coming out of Nicaragua and have attributed to many highly rated cigars hitting the shelves recently. Casa Fernandez cigars use this tobacco exclusively, so when you pick up one of their cigars, you can count on quality. Their New Cuba line is one of the best value brands you can get your hands on, and today we turn our heads to its Connecticut wrapped counterpart. It comes dressed in a golden brown Ecuador Connecticut Shade wrapper, with a Cuban-sandwich of Nicaraguan Cuban-seed tobaccos blended up underneath. Sure, there may be better looking cigars out there, and some guys would immediately dismiss a mixed-filler blend, but New Cuba Connecticut delivers an unmatched level of flavor for the price and in my many samples the burn has been spot on. New Cuba Connecticut offers a mellower option to one of our top selling value bundles with smooth notes of earth, cream, cedar and nuts. If you’re on the hunt for a bundle of yard gars, or wallet friendly handouts, New Cuba Connecticut won’t let you down.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Double Corona', 'Gordo', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Churchill, Double Corona, Gordo, Presidente, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,Ecuador Connecticut,
New Cuba Fuerte,Rated 4.83 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"Nicaraguan pure!Casa Fernandez is one of the largest growers of tobacco in Nicaragua. Today’s hot-bed for best of the best, Nicaragua’s black volcanic soils and tropical climate equal the perfect recipe for delicious offerings, and Casa Fernandez has their hand in countless boutique fan favorites hailing from their pristine Nicaraguan farms. The cigar at hand caters to the everyday enthusiast while utilizing Casa Fernandez’s revered, Cuban-esque proprietary tobaccos. Welcome the next backorder headache, New Cuba Fuerte.New Cuba Fuerte is rich and full-flavored, yet still perfectly smooth. A Nicaraguan wrapper and a ‘Cuban sandwich’ blend of Cuban-seed Nicaraguan tobaccos leads to an enjoyable full-bodied profile brimming with notes of earth, pepper, nuts, and cocoa. Boasting a complex character and a cool, slow burn, New Cuba Fuerte will keep you coming back for more. ",Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Varies,Nicaraguan,
New Cuba Maduro,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"New Cuba goes to the dark side.Casa Fernandez is about as Nicaraguan as it gets. They're one of the country's largest tobacco producers, and their factory churns out some excellent sticks. With a rich history in tobacco production, Casa Fernandez creates some of the most highly-acclaimed selections available, excellently showcasing what kind of quality can come from the black volcanic soils of the country they call home. They also make one of the best bundle-brands available for those looking to save a little bit of coin without sacrificing quality, and that brand is called New Cuba.The latest addition to this delicious knock-around line is the New Cuba Maduro. Laid atop the same 'Cuban sandwich' style blend as the original is a deep, rich maduro wrapper. The blend provides enticing notes of cocoa, earth, coffee, and a bit of pepper, and the body remains a nice mellow-medium, making this a stick that's perfect to pair with morning coffee, yardwork, or relaxing after a heavy meal. Another affordable, versatile selection from Casa Fernandez, ready to fill your humidor. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Double Corona', 'Gordo', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Churchill, Double Corona, Gordo, Presidente, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,Maduro,
Nica Libre,Rated 4.36 out of 5, Based on 586 Ratings ,"For a limited time, receive FREE shipping on your entire order with purchase of select boxes of Nica Libre Cigars!Box-Pressed maduro goodness!Hand-crafted in Nicaragua, Nica Libre is a veritable candy bar. This blend showcases an aged combination of Nicaraguan long-fillers secured within a Habano binder, inside dark and oily, positively resplendent San Andres maduro wrapper. A classic maduro experience: rich, hearty, and silky smooth. Deep notes of coffee and earth smack the palate in balanced fashion, leaving behind a bold, somewhat peppery aftertaste that lingers long on the palate. A hint of dark chocolate is present during the slow burn, completing an eventful and enjoyable medium-bodied cigar. One of the finest values in a Nicaraguan handmade maduro that you'll find on the market today. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Habano,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Churchill, Corona, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Maduro,
Nica Libre Esteli Especial,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"One Nicaraguan you won’t want to miss.Nica Libre Esteli Especial honors the current cigar capital of the world — Esteli, Nicaragua. While there are plenty of places crafting premium blends, check out any Top 25 list or industry awards, and I’m sure you’ll find that Esteli is the home base for the industry’s current best and brightest. This latest offering from Nica Libre also proves that, unlike what some brands would have you believe, you don’t have to shell out half your paycheck to be able to afford a top-notch cigar. Hailing from the renowned Joya de Nicaragua factory in Nicaragua, Esteli Especial is one of the most flavor-filled blends to cross my desk in quite some time. And when you consider how many delicious blends land in our offices daily, that’s really saying something. Coming dressed in an Ecuadorian Habano wrapper over a Sumatra binder, this blend of Nicaraguan and Pennsylvania long-fillers has a hearty dose of ligero thrown in to kick things up. A solid medium to full-bodied, this hearty blend plays host to a plethora of tantalizing flavors including spice, earth, leather, cream, and cedar. Complex and balanced, Nica Libre Esteli Especial proves you don’t need to dip into your 401k to enjoy an uber-flavorful Nicaraguan cigar.  ​",Medium-Full,['Torpedo'],Sumatra,"Nicaraguan, United States",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Torpedo,No,Ecuador Habano,
Nica Libre Potencia,Rated 4.2 out of 5, Based on 20 Ratings ,"For a limited time, receive FREE shipping on your entire order with purchase of select boxes of Nica Libre Cigars!Potencia takes the Nica Libre name to new heights. A small-batch, Nicaraguan beauty from the Oliva family with a whole lot of character. Potencia is the latest offering from Nica Libre....and it’s superb. It’s a small-batch, Nicaraguan beauty with character in spades. Carefully crafted in the Oliva factory with a dark, reddish-hued Habano Sun Grown wrapper and a robust blend of well-aged Nicaraguan ligeros, Potencia brings a deep, complex flavor. Powerful yet smooth and refined – and loaded with layers of coffee, spices, earth, and dark chocolate overtop a rich tobacco core. It’s a bit pricier than the original, but well worth the coin. A very limited production item – when they’re in stock, act expeditiously. ",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,
Nica Libre Silver 25th Anniversary,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 111 Ratings ,"For a limited time, receive FREE shipping on your entire order with purchase of select boxes of Nica Libre Cigars!For 25 years of a sovereign Nicaragua.Nica Libre is the epitome of pure Nicaraguan enjoyment. Combining hearty, complex blends at a value-conscious price-point has been Nica Libre's MO from day one. Taking pride in the country that fostered its conception, Nica Libre is ready to roll out its most coveted blend yet. To celebrate 25 years of Nicaraguan independence, they are introducing Nica Libre Silver 25th Anniversary.Without a doubt the tastiest Nica to hit the scene, this charismatic blend hosts a bevy of vintage Nicaraguan long-fillers, all hugged by a refined Nicaraguan binder. A gorgeous, reddish-hued, Cuban-seed Habano wrapper encases this stew of tobaccos. The result is a well-balanced, aromatic experience, chock-full of honey, dark cocoa, and leather nuances. Nica Libre makes a loud statement with this blend, and shows why the lush soils of Nicaragua are so renowned. ​",Full,['Torpedo'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,Torpedo,No,Habano,
Nica Libre x AGANORSA,Rated 4.57 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"For a limited time, receive FREE shipping on your entire order with purchase of select boxes of Nica Libre Cigars!As Nicaraguan as a cigar can get.AGANORSA and Nica Libre are two undeniable powerhouses of the Nicaraguan cigar market, both churning out delicious blends that can only be grown in the nation’s rich, volcanic soils. Now these two brands are collaborating on a cigar the truly captures the spirit of Nicaragua like never before. Introducing: The Nica Libre x AGANORSA!From the get-go, these two brands have set the benchmark for Nicaraguan tobacco quality, and the Nica Libre x AGANORSA raises the bar even higher. Made up of 100% Nicaraguan wrapper, binder, and long-leaf fillers, this cigar is bursting with medium-full bodied flavors of pepper, chocolate, coffee, and spice with ample complexity and a refined finish. Grab a box and you’ll agree, this collaboration was a resounding success.",Medium-Full,[],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,,No,Corojo,Casa Fernandez
Nicaragua Cream,Rated 3.74 out of 5, Based on 106 Ratings ,"Smooth, robust....and affordable. Sometimes it seems the stream of CI deals will continue unabated until the sun blinks out from the sky. We might make it look easy my friend, but CI's buyers are constantly scouring in Central America and the Caribbean basin to fill the massive CI pipeline with cigar deals. When Nicaraguan Cream was brought to me, it was obvious that it fit the bill nicely. It is what it is: an inexpensive, knockaround cigar made for daily enjoyment. And that it does very well. These chunky mazos are packed to the gills with value, featuring smooth, Cuban-seed wrappers and a sandwich blend of quality Nicaraguan tobaccos. Medium to full-bodied and relatively smooth, Nicaraguan Cream delivers a consistently enjoyable, long-lasting flavor.Note: These cigars have a very slightly sweetened cap, the slightest we've ever seen!",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,"Habano, Nicaraguan",
Nicaraguan Gordo 2nds,Rated 4.4 out of 5, Based on 168 Ratings ,"​Don't 'snub' these handmades....Whoa, baby. These bulbous and stout suckers are the definition of large and in charge. Crafted by one of the hottest manufacturers in Nicaragua, these cigars are legit across the board. Hell, most of 'em I can't find a damn thing wrong with. Top-notch wrappers join forces with premium long-fillers for an experience as worthy as their banded brethren. I ain't complainin' either because I can't stop puffin' on one after another. Sorry, I can't spill the beans on which brand or blend they are, but honestly, just give these a good once over and the dots should begin connecting quite easily. And whichever one gets your juices flowin', you can expect a rich, slow-burning experience for a fraction of normal retails. Don't delay, I expect these to move faster than the salad bar at a vegan convention.",,['Gordo'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Gordo,No,"Brazilian, Cameroon, Connecticut, Habano, Maduro",Oliva
Nicaraguan Ligero-Laced 2nds,Rated 4.86 out of 5, Based on 7 Ratings ,"Ligero-laced lovelies for pennies.Here comes another dazzler for display in the seconds showcase. Enter Nicaraguan Ligero-Laced 2nds. Packed to the brim with extensively aged ligeros, these bad boys bring bold refined flavor in spades. Unfortunately, I can't spill the beans as to what exact cigars are at hand, but what I can tell you is these ligero-laced handmades are super legit. Hailing from one of Nicaragua's most respected factories, each cigar comes jam-packed with layer after layer of potent ligeros. Normally these would set you back some serious coin, but at these prices you can fill the humidor to the top. Have at it. Liga ‘H’ – Full-bodied Habano. Notes of oak, spices, leather, and cocoa. Liga ‘F’ – Extra-full-bodied Habano. Deep flavors of spice, earth, leather, and coffee. Complex and extremely robust. Liga ‘M’ – Full-bodied Maduro. Dark and strong, complete with notes of natural sweetness, earth, dark chocolate, and spices. Liga ‘D’ – Medium-bodied Habano. Notes of coffee and rich tobacco complemented by a slight hint of pepper and sweet undertones of the finish.",Full,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Robusto']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Robusto",No,"Habano, Nicaraguan",
Nicaraguan Sweets 2nds,Rated 1 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"​I can hear the whispers and moans already, ""Those are seconds, they must be crap!"" But I say 'Negative, Ghost Rider...' Although I can't tell you exactly where these handmades come from, I can tell you that they are produced at one of the most reputable factories in Nicaragua. In many instances we cannot reveal the specific blend due to manufacturers not wanting their blends being sold for much, much less. Each Nicaraguan Sweets 2nd is teeming with the same long-filler tobaccos, and flavorful wrappers, producing a rich and smooth experience. The kicker with each one of these tasty treats is that they all have a very lightly sweetened cap....that's where the 'Sweets' comes in....adding a slightly different, but pleasant experience.Note: We recommend using a punch on this cigar, in order to get the most sweetness out of the cap. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Torpedo",Yes,Sumatra,
Nimmy D by Nimish,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 4 Ratings ,"Yo, it’s Nimmy D!This bold, “in your face” cigar is named after Nimish Desai, or more accurately, for the nickname that most people call him. Yup, he’s the cousin of Rocky Patel, and this is actually his second release under the mighty Patel brand, a follow up to Thunder in 2012. Nimmy D (the dude) set out to create a cigar that was even bolder, even more chock-full of flavor, and he absolutely succeeded. Nimmy D (the cigar this time) features a Nicaraguan Habano wrapper alongside a binder from the Jamastran Valley in Honduras. Underneath this cloak of awesomeness, a balanced blend of carefully selected Nicaraguan long-fillers from Esteli and Jalapa combine perfectly. Full-bodied and full-flavored, you can expect notes of black pepper, cedar, licorice, and earth. This high-quality handmade has a rich, satisfying finish that will linger long after you set it down.",Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,Rocky Patel Cigars
Nub Cain FF by Oliva,Rated 4.52 out of 5, Based on 31 Ratings ,"Fuerte FuerteThe biggest, baddest, boldest NUB to date. Born as a theory and mastered as an art form, NUB cigars deliver the absolute sweet spot of the cigar burning experience from first light. Instead of waiting for cigars to “develop”, each NUB cigar promises a bombardment of top-notch flavors from the word go. And today, we’re proud to greet the fullest-bodied NUB to date: Nub Cain FF. Upon lighting this firecracker, you’ll be instantly greeted with a boatload of black and red pepper spices. That’s thanks to Nub Cain FF’s Nicaraguan long-fillers. In fact, this cigar is a Nicaraguan puro – probably why it performs like such a powerhouse. As it burns, you’ll find dark chocolate, espresso, cedar, and an earthy character throughout the heady profile. In short, if you consider yourself a ligero lover, you need to sign yourself up for some Nub Cain FF ASAP. ",Full,['Gordo'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Gordo,No,Habano,Nub
Nub Cameroon by Oliva,Rated 4.72 out of 5, Based on 163 Ratings ,"The highest rated NUB to date! It all started as a theory, before it was born into reality in the Oliva factory in Esteli, Nicaragua. Nub cigars were a novel concept when they were first invented – a short cigar that burnt just as long as its longer counterparts, thanks to expertly packed and bunched tobacco, which hit its “sweet spot” immediately upon lighting. Indeed, who would’ve thought back then that Oliva’s experiment would’ve paid off so handsomely and delivered one of the most popular cigar lines in year? Today, Nub is available in a variety of wrappers, each one more delicious than the last. Cameroon - dark and leathery to the touch. A sweet, cedary profile with an intriguing spice. The aftertaste is dry and toasty. Intense pepper through the nose. A medium to full-bodied cigar that’s toasty and complex, yet smooth.Nub Cameroon received Top 25 honors for 2015 (#23 overall) and a well-deserved 92-rating noting: ""but we found the NUb Cameroon to burn cool, smoke well and deliver loads of nutty, earthy flavor.""",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Gordo, Torpedo",No,"Brazilian, Cameroon",Nub
Nub Connecticut by Oliva,Rated 4.74 out of 5, Based on 186 Ratings ,"The smoothest Nub ever!Nub cigars started as a theory. Born in the Oliva factory, a cigar maker was hell-bent on proving he could capture the essence - the core - of a cigar's flavor immediately upon lighting and throughout the duration of the blend. Well, they nailed it. Nub Connecticut is perhaps the fan-favorite of the bunch, and it's most certainly the smoothest. But regardless, whichever blend and size you pick, Nub is sure to never let you down. Connecticut - smooth, silky wrapper. Mellow and creamy to start, with a rich, somewhat sweet core. The aftertaste is toasty, but crisp. Toasted cedar through the nose. Medium-bodied with a rich, milky texture.Note: Nub Connecticut is now available in a limited-edition, 4x66 10-count box. The thickest Nub ever!",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Short Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Short Robusto, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Nub
Nub Dub by Oliva,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 142 Ratings ,"Twice the Maduro in one tasty Nub.Nub Dub marks the second installment in a series of limited edition releases from Studio Tobac (the new umbrella for Oliva’s side projects - Nub, Cain, etc.). Utilizing the same blend as the acclaimed Nub Maduro, the Nub Dub employs two dark Maduro wrappers to deliver a rich and satisfying bouquet unlike anything you've tasted from the top-selling Nub family.Nub Dub combines the traditional Nub Maduro blend of aged, Cuban-seed Nicaraguan long-fillers, but swaps out the binder for a top-notch, wrapper-quality Brazilian Maduro leaf. Indeed, the same leaf used to coat this beast, giving you two amazing wrappers for one amazing array of flavor. Expect a richer, fuller, but smoother bouquet. A rich and toasty core of flavor yields dark chocolate, nuts, and spicy-sweet nuances on the finish. Medium to full in body, Nub Dub just might be the finest Nub ever assembled.",Medium-Full,['Gordo'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Gordo,No,"Brazilian, Maduro",Nub
Nub Habano by Oliva,Rated 4.58 out of 5, Based on 129 Ratings ,"A novel concept in handmade cigars from Oliva....a substantive blend that will make you rethink the cigar experience.Nub cigars started as a theory. Born in the Oliva factory, a cigar maker was hell-bent on proving he could capture the essence - the core - of a cigar's flavor immediately upon lighting and throughout the duration of the blend. Well, they nailed it.Rather than wait for a cigar to develop and evolve, which typically occurs an inch to two inches in, the idea behind Oliva's Nub was to specifically blend it to hit its sweet spot right off the bat and remain at its peak right through to the end. Each size is short and stout in stature. That's by design - not for novelty - as blends and sizes were worked and re-worked a thousand ways from Sunday in order for Nub creator Sam Leccia and the Oliva family to capture the essence of each Nub cigar blend. Anyone can create unusual shapes, each of the Nub blends and accompanying shapes was instead created to summon and deliver the blend's sweet spot. Sample one today. Habano - glossy, milk chocolate-brown wrapper. Rich tobacco core with a smoky aftertaste. Hints of peanuts are supported by a baked bread component. Spice through the nose. Medium to full-bodied with a rich, creamy character throughout.",,"['Gordo', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Torpedo",No,"Ecuador Habano, Habano",Nub
Nub Habano Sun Grown Double Perfecto,Rated 4.75 out of 5, Based on 16 Ratings ,"This “short” story isn’t over! The NUB brand has long enjoyed its reign as the king of innovation. Born as an idea to perfectly capture the “sweet spot” of tobacco, NUB cigars are one of Oliva’s biggest successes and have enjoyed their spot on the throne for years. Today, we’ve got the newest addition to the NUB portfolio: the NUB Habano Sun Grown Double Perfecto. Medium to full-bodied, this glossy, milk-chocolate wrapper delivers a rich flavor with hints of baked bread and spice. Creamy and smooth, this Double Perfecto is… well, perfection!",Medium-Full,['Double Perfecto'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Double Perfecto,No,Sun Grown,Nub
Nub Maduro by Oliva,Rated 4.51 out of 5, Based on 73 Ratings ,"Like a scoop of chocolate ice creamRich, luxurious, and ultra-flavorful. You’re got to be talking about Nub Maduro. This Brazilian wrapped version of the uber-popular Nub concept has quickly become a best-seller in our portfolio, and who could be surprised? Representing one of the most innovative concepts in cigars in years, each Nub blend is developed to hit the “sweet spot” of a cigar immediately upon lighting, and though they’re short in size, each Nub blend lasts just as long as full-sized cigars thanks to expertly bunched tobaccos.Maduro - dark, thick, and oily Brazilian wrapper. The profile is rich and toasty with a deep series of chocolate and nuts. The aftertaste is spicy with natural sweet tones. Medium in body with a toasty, full-flavored finale.",Medium,"['Gordo', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Torpedo",No,Maduro,Nub
Nub Nuance by Oliva,Rated 4.57 out of 5, Based on 346 Ratings ,"A piping hot cup o’ Nub!Unless you’ve been holed up under a rock for the last few years, you’re no doubt very familiar with Nub – the short and stout family of Oliva-made beauties that have captivated nearly everyone in the path. Now, the next phase of Nub is here…and it’s far different than anyone would have ever imagined. But in this case, that’s a good thing. Nub will instantly widen their appeal with this new line of coffee-infused handmades appropriately dubbed Nub Nuance and billed as ‘The Ultimate Coffee Experience.’ 6 sizes, 3 flavors, all different coffee styles, all downright delicious. They had their doubters years ago, and I’m sure they’ll have them now. But at the end of it all, the verdict will remain the same: this new Nub is tasty. Nub Nuance comes available in 3 delicious options:Single Roast (formerly Cappuccino): A golden Connecticut shade wrapper. Smooth and creamy with notes of vanilla bean and notes of cedar. Triple Roast (formerly Espresso): Sumatra wrapper. Rich and flavorful with dark cacao notes and a long, semi-sweet toasty finish.Double Roast (formerly Macchiato): Rich Sumatra wrappers. Creamy and smooth with notes of milk chocolate and a clean, sweet finish. ",Medium,"['Cigarillos', 'Corona', 'Gordo', 'Petite Corona', 'Short Robusto']",Dominican,Dominican,True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Cigarillos, Corona, Gordo, Petite Corona, Short Robusto",Varies,"Connecticut, Sumatra",Nub
Nub Nuance Seasonal by Oliva,Rated 4.21 out of 5, Based on 63 Ratings ,"I’m nubbin’ it. Nub — the Napoleon of the cigar industry. What do I mean by that? Well, both these handmades and the petite French general are short, stubby, and swept the nation by storm! Starting with the traditionally wrapped Nub line, and moving on to the deliciously coffee-influenced Nub Café, these stout gordos from Oliva capture the best part of cigars in a concentrated form. The newest chapter of the Nub story? Nub Nuance, a lineup of seasonally festive cigars that no one can deny. Utilizing high-quality Indonesian wrapper, Fall Harvest delivers a dish of pumpkin spice to your palate, while skipping all the calories. Nicaraguan binder and Dominican long-fillers mean you’ll find some slightly sweet tobacco flavors and a slight earthiness in this blend as well. A pleasant combo. Winter Blend: Continuing the success of the popular Nub Nuance line, Winter Blend is a seasonal blend that you can enjoy any time of year. Super flavorful with notes of coffee and peppermint, Winter Blend is warm and inviting. ",Medium,"['Corona', 'Gordo', 'Short Robusto']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",True,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Corona, Gordo, Short Robusto",Yes,Indonesian,Nub
Nub Sumatra by Oliva,Rated 4.45 out of 5, Based on 31 Ratings ,"Nub’s Small Batch Beauties! You’d be hard pressed to find a series of cigars with more success than NUB. Originally invented to capture the “sweet spot” of a cigar throughout its entire duration, this line of short and stout lovelies is clearly at the top of the game. That’s why we were grinning from ear to ear when boxes of the new Nub Studio Tobac creations started arriving. Studio Tobac refers to the small-batch releases from the NUB masterminds. Each cigar in this series is unique in the tobaccos included, or in the skill needed to create that vitola. Give one a whirl today and I guarantee you’ll find something to love. And keep your eye out for more blends in the future… something tells me this one’s gonna catch on most ricky-tick. Sumatra: A unique new offering on the NUB line, the Nub Sumatra utilizes the same wrapper leaf as the famed Serie ‘V’ Melanio to craft an absolute winner of a blend. A real heavy-hitter, with a naturally sweet finish. ",Medium-Full,['Gordo'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Gordo,No,Sumatra,Nub
Obsidian,Rated 4.29 out of 5, Based on 272 Ratings ,"There's a new sheriff in town.Obsidian’s debut did not go unnoticed. The dare-to-be-different brand set a new standard among premium handmades and the industry has taken notice. The size listing is stacked – a slew of big-ring vitolas, figurados, and more. The blend is dark, meaty, and enticing, delivering a wealth of dense tobacco flavor in an unconventional format. Packed in chunky, Spanish cedar boxes, Obsidian’s most remarkable trait is the price. Premium quality and memorable flavor, all for a fee that’s most similar to an ordinary yard ‘gar. Literally, they would be a bargain at twice the price. So what’s in this meaty porterhouse? Obsidian employs a dark, oily Brazilian Habano ligero wrapper overtop a bold blend of Cuban-seed long-fillers from Nicaragua and the Dominican, secured inside a spicy Criollo ’98 binder. The result is a densely rich and chewy blend, loaded with complex notes of espresso, pepper, earth, toast, and cream. Full-bodied, but extremely smooth and balanced, Obsidian is thoroughly satisfying.",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Corona', 'Double Perfecto', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Criollo '98,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Belicoso, Corona, Double Perfecto, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Brazilian,
Obsidian Redrum,Rated 4.25 out of 5, Based on 24 Ratings ,"Redrum! Redrum! Redrum!If you’ve been overlooking Obsidian, you should know that they’re the best cigars from Timbuktu to Portland, Maine. Or Portland, Oregon, for that matter. They’re unapologetically bold and unforgettably different, with striking packaging, big ring gauges, and heady, complex flavor profiles not for the faint of heart. Now the newest addition to the Obsidian family has busted down the doors of CI Nation with a big “Here's Johnny!”The Obsidian Redrum wears an oily and imposing San Andres wrapper over an Indonesian binder, with a long-filler blend of Dominican Piloto and Nicaraguan Jalapa beneath. You’ve got a BIG surprise coming if you’ve never burned an Obsidian before. Peppery, earthy notes of chocolate, spice, wood, and coffee await, with a burn so slow it feels like it’ll last from Winter to Spring. Grab a box of Obsidian Redrum today, because all work and no cigars makes us dull boys. ",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Indonesian,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,False,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,San Andres,
Obsidian White Noise,Rated 4.27 out of 5, Based on 174 Ratings ,"Ladies and gentlemen, make some NOISE.After establishing a loyal following, many have come to embrace all that is Obsidian. And who can blame them? There's an awful lot to rejoice in. But now, after 2 years of tireless development, it's time to pull away the curtain and reveal the newest specimen to don the Obsidian name. Put your hands together for the highly anticipated follow-up to Obsidian, White Noise. Obsidian White Noise was forged from a blank slate, to provide a fresh, exciting, and captivating experience. Dressed in a gorgeous, golden-brown Ecuador Habano-wrapper, each White Noise is simply stunning to eye. But don't be fooled, because beneath this velvet glove awaits a bevy of hearty long-fillers from the Dominican and Nicaragua. Selected from nutrient-rich primings, this core pairs exceedingly well with the sultry wrapper. The end result is a highly polished Cuban-esque profile containing cedar, cream, pepper, nuts, and coffee all backed by a toasty, slightly sweet note of tobacco. Beautifully balanced, this medium to full-bodied blend is exceptionally tasty. And by the time the burn reaches your fingers, you'll be dosing off in vision of another. Prepare to be mesmerized by Obsidian White Noise.",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Corona', 'Double Perfecto', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Dominican,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Corona, Double Perfecto, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Habano,
Odyssey Coffee,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 10 Ratings ,"A coffee a day keeps the grumpiness away.Is there any more iconic pairing than a good handmade cigar alongside a piping hot cup of coffee? The flavors of a well-crafted stogie just go together perfectly with a nice dark cup o' Joe, and now the makers of Punch and Macanudo have combined these tastes perfectly in an affordable bundled cigar for the masses! Introducing the Odyssey Coffee, a gorgeous coffee-infused gem with an even lower per-stick price than that fancy latte you picked up on the way to work this morning. From when you roll out of bed in the morning to when you're ready to hit the hay after a day of hard work, there's no bad time to light up an Odyssey Coffee. ",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Corona Gordo', 'Robusto']",Indonesian,"Indonesian, Nicaraguan",True,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Corona Gordo, Robusto",No,"Indonesian, Maduro",
Odyssey Connecticut,Rated 4.04 out of 5, Based on 98 Ratings ,"The ultimate everyday Connecticut.​Sometimes all you want is a cigar that tastes great, burns great, and doesn't take your wallet to the cleaners. From the company that brought you Macanudo, comes Odyssey. The cigar gurus won't showering this blend with 97 ratings, but the guys who really know a solid cigar when they light it up will be shouting ""Odyssey"" from the rooftops. The recipe is simple. One silky, golden Connecticut wrapper atop a balanced blend of choice tobaccos finished with a sweet cap. Odyssey is velvetly smooth, and it's worth far more than the asking price. Make the switch and never look back!",Mellow,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gigante', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gigante, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut,
Odyssey Habano,Rated 3.87 out of 5, Based on 93 Ratings ,"You ought to see this...​My cigar burning friends, this is value at it's finest, let me divluge. Made by the company who brought Cohiba, Macanudo, and La Gloria Cubana. Check. Medium-bodied, flavorful and balanced. Check. A razor-sharp cool burn. Check. Underpriced. Check. Sound too good to be true? It's not. It's Odyssey and it's coming for other ""everyday"" cigars. Why gamble? Place a sure bet on Odyssey.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gigante', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gigante, Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,
Odyssey Maduro,Rated 3.58 out of 5, Based on 12 Ratings ,"Odyssey’s seeing red!Sometimes, you want a cigar with a rich background, loads of history, a Cuban origin story, and meticulously executed boxes… the whole package. Other times, you just want a cigar that burns well and tastes good at a fair price. Odyssey answers the latter call. Made by the same company behind brands like Macanudo and La Gloria Cubana, Odyssey is a premium bundled offering that’s awesome for cigar lovers who realize presentation isn’t everything. Today, they expand their offerings with a rich and toasty Maduro. Featuring a deeper, darker Nicaraguan Habano Maduro wrapper leaf overtop Honduran and Nicaraguan ligeros, Odyssey Maduro is light on price but heavy on flavor. Weighing in at a medium-bodied, this all-day sipper delivers a delicious blend of spicy sweet notes – just enough pepper and pop to keep things interesting, overtop a cool and mellow core of naturally sweet, aged Nicaraguan tobaccos that make it perfect for all day enjoyment.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona', 'Gigante', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona, Gigante, Robusto, Toro",No,"Maduro, Nicaraguan",
Odyssey Sweet Tip,Rated 4.33 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"A sweet journey at a great price.If you’ve been around these parts for a while, you probably noticed what a great deal Odyssey cigars are. Handmade in Nicaragua, the Odyssey Habano, Maduro, and Connecticut have been delighting fans of good tobacco at a great price for a few years now, and now they’re adding something for the sweet-tip lovers! The Odyssey Sweet Tip comes draped in a Nicaraguan Habano wrapper over a Honduran Binder, and Cuban-seed fillers from Nicaragua and Honduras. The flavors are rich, creamy, and sweet, and the construction is top-notch for pennies on the dollar!",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Corona Gordo', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Honduran,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Corona Gordo, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,
Ole Shenandoah Cheroots,Rated 4.25 out of 5, Based on 103 Ratings ,"You sure can root for these! Listen, you might call me crazy, but these Ole Shenandoah Cheroots are one of my absolute favorite cigars to come through the office in years. But before I get into that, let’s get a few things out of the way. 1.) These are not fancy cigars. 2.) They are not pretty. They’re cheroots — rustic, old-school, and gritty. But they taste awesome and burn well, and that’s what really counts. Featuring a Pennsylvania Broadleaf wrapper and tons of unique smokiness, each one of the undeniably American offerings in this trilogy is the perfect option for someone seeking a quick, 15-minute bout of deliciousness. I’ve burnt through pack after pack of each option on long commutes, late nights, and early mornings – and I’m ready to declare it now: these are THE best cheroot money can buy. Get some! Original: The OG. Rich, smooth, and flavorful with a fantastic aroma. Bootlegged: Flavored with rum, Bootlegged amps up the spice factor. Appalachian Harvest: Lightly berry flavored, these are a great combination of smoky and sweet. ",Medium,['Cigarillos'],,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,Cigarillos,No,Maduro,
Oliva 2nds,Rated 5 out of 5,,"Small blemishes, enormous savings. Oliva is home to some of the industry's finest, highest-rated handmades, including 'Top 25' honorees. Every Oliva is top-notch from A to Z, and utilizing aged tobaccos, hand-selected wrappers, and relentless quality control standards that set this factory apart from the rest. Long story short: these are the blends you know, love, and read about, but they're not quite up to Oliva’s strict standards due to a slight variance in color, a vein here or there, or a sun-spot. That's the end of the bad news. The good news? You get to scoop up these Oliva 2nds for mere pennies on the dollar. And let's make it clear — these 2nds would be ""1sts"" in almost any other factory on the market. Find your favorite blend, scoop up as many as your humidor can hold, and enjoy. These cigars at these prices are like finding a Rolex at the thrift shop. Oliva 2nds are available in seven different blends, each Liga representing the 2nds of one of Oliva's famous blends. We can't tell you what's what, but check out the characteristics (hit that small ""i"" in the grid below), and with a little detective work you can figure these out for yourself nice and quick. ",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Rothschild', 'Short Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Habano,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Gordo, Petite Corona, Robusto, Rothschild, Short Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,"Cameroon, Connecticut Broadleaf, Ecuador Sumatra, Habano, Maduro, San Andres",Oliva
Oliva Connecticut Reserve,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 138 Ratings ,"A mellow-bodied gem from Oliva.The Connecticut Reserve from Oliva is a fantastic, mellow to medium-bodied handmade dressed in a silky Connecticut wrapper. This wrapper offers an exceedingly creamy flavor and mouthfeel, which complements the Cuban-seed Nicaraguan long-fillers within perfectly. After significant aging, each cigar envelops the palate with layers of thick flavor, leaving behind subtle notes of wood, coffee, and cream. Mellow it is, but short on flavor it isn't. This cigar truly satisfies, and Oliva fans will find this as a wonderful change of pace. Here's your morning cup o' joe cigar, my friend!​",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Lonsdale', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Lonsdale, Petite Corona, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,Oliva
Oliva Flor de Oliva,Rated 4.56 out of 5, Based on 441 Ratings ,"Stellar, value-oriented handmades by Oliva cigars.Flor de Oliva cigars are value-priced beauties from Gilberto Oliva and family, crafted from Dominican and Nicaraguan long-leaf tobaccos and a robust and satisfying sweet-tipped Sumatra wrapper. After aging, the end result is a flavorful, creamy blend - rich and creamy without the bite. The ‘Giants’ sizes utilize the same blend of fine tobaccos as the more traditional sizes but offer a cooler, slower burn that continues to build in flavor as the cigar progresses. A delicious (and inexpensive) display of large-ring cigars. Top-notch CI pricing seals the deal. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Lonsdale', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Lonsdale, Presidente, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Sumatra",Oliva
Oliva Inferno,Rated 4.4 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"Come on baby light my fireThe reigning kings of Nicaraguan boutiques have done it again. The Oliva Cigar Company has a highly acclaimed portfolio with cigars that are continually in the running for the ‘Top Cigar of the Year’ honors. With the #1 Cigar of 2014 – Melanio, the #11 Cigar of 2013 – Serie ‘O’, and the 94-Rated, multiple Top 25 honoree – Serie ‘V’, the breadth of Oliva’s talents are always on display, and it’s evident with this new, in-your-face release. Welcome Oliva Inferno.This Nicaraguan spice bomb is loaded with perfectly aged ligero tobaccos to produce a hearty, full-bodied cigar. The leaf up top is a thick, reddish brown habano wrapper that is cultivated in the fertile growing regions of Nicaragua. It starts out with a heavy blast of espresso and black pepper but soon soothes into a core of sweet cocoa and coffee flavors. All in all, this cigar has great construction, an honest profile, and is offered up a fair price. Give the Inferno a taste and you won’t regret it.",Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Habano,
Oliva Inferno Flashpoint,Rated 4.4 out of 5,,"Hot like fire!Just dropping the Oliva name is enough to make any enthusiast salivate. The brand has a huge list of top rated and award winning cigars. You could easily say that Oliva is at the top of its game and there are no signs of slowing down anytime soon. Inferno Flashpoint shows Oliva’s true talents for blending a cigar with some serious spice. Its blend of Nicaraguan Habano Ligero and Jalapa is wrapped with a reddish brown Ecuador Sumatra wrapper. The first third of the cigar has pronounced black pepper, but it balances out with notes of cocoa and earth. This is an absolute must try for anyone looking for a little extra bite, a lot of balance, and an overall quality that only Oliva can provide.",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Sumatra,Oliva
Oliva Master Blends III,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 75 Ratings ,"Now entering phase 3 of Oliva's Master Blends cigars.Every year, the Oliva family cultivates a limited amount of fine tobaccos to create a rare, one-time-run of super premium cigars. The blend of this cigar is based solely on the leaves harvested, which often results in an entirely new cigar from year to year. Normally, these cigars have been privately reserved for ‘family use’ only. The scarcity of leaves acquired for this line, the Oliva Master Blends, has prevented the cigar from being released to the public. But, thanks to improved growing methods and quality control, yield now allows us to enjoy the fruit of the Oliva family's labor, with a limited number of cigars produced each year.Good news, the Oliva Family has announced the third release of the Master Blends Series - a limited edition cigar featuring the finest tobaccos cultivated within recent harvests. Available in 4 choice sizes, the Master Blends III cigar (MB3) is very limited in quantities and designed to cater the distinguished palate. MB3 is constructed with a luscious sungrown broadleaf wrapper leaf and a Nicaraguan blend of Habano-seed, ligero tobaccos. The result is a beautiful, dark brown cigar that's bursting with complex, balanced flavor that satisfies the palate with a rich, bold, full-bodied finish.Inventory is extremely limited.MB3 received an outstanding, '92' rating. Here's what the experts had to say: ""A pressed cigar with an oily, chocolate brown wrapper. A good draw imparts a good balance of earthy, creamy flavors. The spicy finish hints of brown sugar.""",Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Churchill, Robusto, Torpedo",No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Sun Grown",Oliva
Oliva Melanio CI 20th Anniversary,Rated 4.9 out of 5, Based on 40 Ratings ,"My favorite birthday present.CI's 20th birthday is upon us, and to celebrate, our friends at Oliva crafted a special edition size of their #1 Cigar of the Year Serie V Melanio to ring in year number 21. This highly-decorated morsel doesn’t need much building up, but for those not versed in its scrumptious prowess, here’s a quick overview.Heralded by Cigar Aficionado and countless other blogging and cigar review outlets, Melanio reigns supreme with stop-on construction, perfect draws, and flavor that keeps you coming back for more. Enticing notes of baked bread, black pepper, and cocoa swamp the taste buds and truly awaken the senses. Now available only at Cigars International in the uber-popular 6”x50 toro size, these fan favorites are sure to run out of here quicker than Usain Bolt in the 100 meter dash. ​",Full,['Toro'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,Toro,No,Ecuador Sumatra,Oliva
Oliva Protege Connecticut,,,"Every master starts as a student.Oliva makes a boatload of cigars. In order to keep up with demand, they're constantly training new rollers. To ensure their skills are up to snuff, the factory managers have these newbies craft a top-selling blend, one they know like the back of their hand. Protege is simply an unbanded bread and butter Oliva blend made by a fresh class of rollers. I'm sworn to secrecy on the exact blend, but here's what I can divulge:- One of Oliva's top 5 best-sellers.- 90+ rated many times.- Former Top 25 honoree.- Connecticut-wrapped, medium-bodied classic.This is your chance to pay a fraction of what you normally would for top-notch Oliva handmades, so grab a bundle of Oliva Protege today, and taste the work of the next generation of master-rollers.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",False,Connecticut,Oliva
Oliva Protege Habano,Rated 4.24 out of 5, Based on 41 Ratings ,"Every master starts as a student.Oliva makes a boatload of cigars. In order to keep up with demand, they're constantly training new rollers. To ensure their skills are up to snuff, the factory managers have these newbies craft a top-selling blend, one they know like the back of their hand. Protege is simply an unbanded bread and butter Oliva blend made by a fresh class of rollers. I'm sworn to secrecy on the exact blend, but here's what I can divulge:- One of Oliva's top 5 best-sellers.- 90+ rated many times.- Former Top 25 honoree.- Habano-wrapped, medium to full-bodied classic.This is your chance to pay a fraction of what you normally would for top-notch Oliva handmades, so grab a bundle of Oliva Protege today, and taste the work of the next generation of master-rollers.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,False,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",False,Habano,Oliva
Oliva Saison,Rated 4.54 out of 5, Based on 61 Ratings ,"​Tis the season for Oliva.What happens when the Oliva family takes the best yield, from all their fields, from the same year? Amazing things....amazing things dubbed Saison by Oliva.Saison by Oliva is the latest addition to their growing arsenal of standout Nicaraguan handmades. To create this blend, a silky, dark brown Ecuadorian Habano wrapper was paired with a rich combination of long-fillers from Oliva’s farms in Somoto, Esteli, and Condega, Nicaragua - all harvested in the same crop year. This vintage ensemble is ripe with flavor, delivering a big, booming Nicaraguan personality that’s notably refined and well-balanced. Notes of leather, oak, pepper, earth, coffee, and a slight twang on the finish offer a perfect interplay and coat the palate with proficiency. It’s medium to full-bodied at its peak, but the density of flavor can hold its own against even the fullest of them. In a nutshell, this new handmade from Oliva has charm, character, and ample flavor. ​",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Habano,Oliva
Oliva Saison Maduro,Rated 4.28 out of 5, Based on 43 Ratings ,"Kick up the flavor with a heartier Saison.If you haven’t had the opportunity to meet Saison by Oliva as of yet, that is a travesty. Plain and simple, this seasonally released blend is the top shelf quality that you expect from the Oliva family at a price that has been known to make knees clatter. A combination of Oliva’s best leaves grown on their Nicaraguan farms from 2009 was utilized to create one truly masterful blend. Trying to keep up with the demand has been…to put it lightly…a challenge. With that in mind, Oliva has created a bolder, darker addition to the Saison line, dubbed Saison Maduro.Saison Maduro employs the cream of the crop from 2011 into one fully charged, Cuban-esque blend sure to satisfy original Saison lovers and full-bodied fanatics alike. Pristine Nicaraguan long-fillers are tucked beneath a chewy, dark chocolate-colored Broadleaf maduro wrapper. Bold flavors of cedar, sweet spices, and leather all make appearances resulting in a wonderfully complex experience. Consistent construction and a razor sharp burn seal the deal on this bad boy, so ready the trucks…because the bundles are primed to fly off the docks.​",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Oliva
Oliva Serie G,Rated 4.64 out of 5, Based on 195 Ratings ,"​Flavorful, well-made Nicaraguans.Oliva Serie ’G’ is a good-looking Nicaraguan premium cigar made with an authentic African Cameroon wrapper. This leaf imparts a pleasant, nutty flavor, adding to the rich bouquet presented by the Nicaraguan Habano long-fillers inside. Overall, a rich, medium-bodied cigar with hints of coffee, nuts and wo​od on the aftertaste. Do yourself a favor, and check out this perfectly balanced cigar from Oliva.Oliva Serie ’G’ received a stellar 91-rating noting: ""Nearly flawless in appearance, this box-pressed torpedo shows a distinct array of rich woods, spices, breadiness and a dense, almond paste finish.""",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Double Robusto', 'Figurado', 'Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Habano,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Double Robusto, Figurado, Perfecto, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Cameroon,Oliva
Oliva Serie G Maduro,Rated 4.64 out of 5, Based on 36 Ratings ,"Dark, oily handmades from the Oliva family.Filled to the brim with Habano-seed, Nicaraguan long-leaf tobaccos, the Serie ‘G’ Maduro cigar features a super-dark and toothy maduro wrapper leaf. The result is a toasty, rich flavor with hints of coffee on the aftertaste. Both flavor and strength grow in intensity throughout the cigar, completing a satisfying, medium-bodied blend that’s smooth to the end. Grab a few Oliva Serie G maduro for the perfect companion to any cup of coffee (or bourbon). ",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Perfecto', 'Presidente', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Perfecto, Presidente, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,Oliva
Oliva Serie O,Rated 4.6 out of 5, Based on 344 Ratings ,"One of Oliva's finest cigars...This is a classic Oliva blend that helped put them on the map. The highly acclaimed 'O' cigar series offers a diverse range of robust flavors that are chewy and rich, yet smooth from start to finish. A Nicaraguan puro that boasts a dark Habano-seed wrapper. Serie 'O' is a triumph for Oliva.Alert: Oliva Serie 'O' has been named one of Cigar Aficionado's Top 50 Cigars. Along with a '94' rating, the magazine noted, ""The smoke is delicious, with a salty, earthy flavor punctuated by tasty dried cherries and hints of cocoa and cedar.""",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Perfecto', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Perfecto, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Habano,Oliva
Oliva Serie O Maduro,Rated 4.73 out of 5, Based on 33 Ratings ,"​O yes.Building on the success of the Oliva ‘O’, the maduro incarnation boasts a dark USA Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper. The natural sweetness found in Connecticut Broadleaf make this blend full-bodied yet smooth. Inside, you'll find 100% Nicaraguan Habano tobacco only, delivering a full-bodied​ blend with a smooth, subtle finish. Notes of espresso, leather, earth and a slight spice come through in a unique balance. Oliva Serie O Maduro is a great cigar for any fan of full-bodied experiences. ​Good news, Oliva Series O Maduro has received a 90-point rating, noting: ""A dark robusto with a heavily veined wrapper, but a tasty balance of cinnamon, sweet spices and cedar.""",Full,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Torpedo",No,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Maduro",Oliva
Oliva Serie V,Rated 4.74 out of 5, Based on 328 Ratings ,"Oliva cigars deliver all the ligero you could ask for!Also known as 'Ligero Especial', the Serie V from Oliva cigars is an enchanting Nicaraguan puro chock full of flavorful goodness. On the outside, a beautiful Habano Sun Grown wrapper glistens with oils. Thick and smooth as silk, this impressive leaf conceals a powerful, yet balanced and smooth blend of aged Nicaraguan ligero from the Jalapa Valley of Nicaragua. The Oliva Serie 'V"" cigar is full-bodied and full-flavored, offering layers of coffee, spice, and tobacco flavors, with a touch of dark, unsweetened chocolate on the finish.Great news, the Serie V from Oliva received a 95-point rating and #3 Cigar of the Year Honors in 2017. But that's not all - this brand has received almost thirty 90+ ratings in its lifetime! That's consistency. The reviews noted: ""This attractive, oily torpedo is full of dynamic nut, wood, and sweet cedar flavors that frame a substantial leather core. The finish is long and rich. Tasty and complex.""",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Churchill', 'Corona', 'Double Robusto', 'Figurado', 'Gordo', 'Lancero/Panatela', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Churchill, Corona, Double Robusto, Figurado, Gordo, Lancero/Panatela, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Habano,Oliva
Oliva Serie 'V' Maduro,Rated 4.66 out of 5, Based on 100 Ratings ,"The badder, bolder big brother of Oliva's 95-rated Serie 'V'.The Oliva family blew up the cigar scene with its award-winning Serie 'V' blend. Backorders a'plenty, this enchanting handmade set a new standard among today's finest full-bodied and full-flavored cigars. Enter Serie 'V' Maduro. Previously available only during the holidays - this dark Double Toro booms with big-time flavor, and it's finally ready for year-round release. On the outside, a toothy, expertly fermented Sun Grown wrapper conceals a long-leaf mixture of aged, yet potent, Nicaraguan ligeros. The result is a robust bouquet layered with rich, toasty nuances including cocoa bean, espresso bean, earth, and dark tobacco flavors. A toasty, underlying spice completes this full-bodied treat, which represents Oliva's finest release to date.Oliva Serie 'V' Maduro received a well-deserved 92-rating noting: ""It is an exceptional smoke. It is very rich and balanced, with coffee notes and sweet, nougat flavors that build to a pleasantly woody finish."" ",Full,"['Double Robusto', 'Gordo', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Double Robusto, Gordo, Toro, Torpedo",Varies,"Maduro, San Andres",Oliva
Oliva Serie V Melanio,Rated 4.86 out of 5, Based on 691 Ratings ,"A reason to love handmade cigars.Oliva Serie 'V' Melanio has arrived. The stunning follow-up to Oliva's 94-rated Serie 'V' and coveted, limited release Serie 'V' Maduro. I'll be perfectly honest with you, we had the chance to sample these lovelies fresh off the rolling table, and they were every bit as scrumptious as you could hope. My suggestion, get your Melan​io cigars now before the backorders build.Oliva Serie 'V' Melanio will have you at hello, thanks to gorgeous Ecuadorian-grown Sumatra leaf that's dark, thick, oily, and seamless in appearance. Beneath this leaf, a flavorful blend of long-leaf ligeros from Nicaragua unites, including the Oliva's oldest, most prized leaves from Condega and Esteli, along with some extra tobaccos from Jalapa for more flavor and aroma. Each Melanio is full-bodied and full-flavored, with unique nuances such as black pepper, freshly-baked bread, and unsweetened cocoa. You might also notice some toast and lightly creamed coffee. Either way, you're in for a delicious treat from one of the most celebrated cigar-making families in Nicaragua, let alone the industry.Great news, the Serie 'V' Melanio was honored as the #1 Cigar of 2014 and earned an impressive 96-point rating, which noted: ""has rich, big notes of leather framed by a range of coffee, caramel and woody intonations.""",Full,"['Churchill', 'Figurado', 'Gordo', 'Petite Corona', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,Yes,,"Churchill, Figurado, Gordo, Petite Corona, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Sumatra,Oliva
Oliva Serie 'V' Melanio Maduro,Rated 4.92 out of 5, Based on 60 Ratings ,"Oliva makes wishes come true!Further proving that the third time really is the charm, Oliva Serie 'V' Melanio Maduro comes bounding down the wish-fulfilling highway at full speed straight into the anticipatory arms of the wise. This highly anticipated follow-up to a duo of esteemed predecessors, Serie V and Serie V Melanio, Serie V Melanio Maduro is a limited-edition box-pressed blend that lives up to expectations, and then some. Named to honor Melanio Oliva, who is believed to be the first member of the Oliva Cigar Company to grow tobacco, this maduro fitfully honors his legacy with an intriguing blend of flavor and texture. And coming from Oliva, one of the industry’s hottest and most in-demand boutique brands, it comes as no big surprise.Those of you who go mad for maduros will positively drool over the blend of Nicaraguan Habano long-fillers cradled in a dark, San Andres maduro wrapper. Packed to the brim with complex, intoxicating flavors, you might just shed a tear at how well it delivers. I kid, but honestly, this carefully crafted full-bodied handmade brings a deeper, richer bouquet to table than its already impressive brother the Serie 'V' Melanio. Expect amplified notes of pepper, earth, espresso, spices, and an undeniable sweetness to give the Melanio Maduro its signature profile. You can look forward to a lot from this one, and as far as that wishing business goes, you'll only wish you had another. Oliva Serie 'V' Melanio Maduro received a well-deserve 92-rating noting: ""Beautifully box-pressed, this Churchill offers a sweet and toasty smoke that starts with warm, bready notes before developing a walnut, toffee and tea-like quality.""",,"['Churchill', 'Figurado', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,,More Details,Nicaragua,Varies,,"Churchill, Figurado, Robusto, Torpedo",Varies,"Maduro, San Andres",Oliva
Oliva Serie 'V' Nub,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 5 Ratings ,"Oliva cigars deliver all the ligero you could ask for!Also known as 'Ligero Especial', the Serie V from Oliva cigars is an enchanting Nicaraguan puro chock full of flavorful goodness. On the outside, a beautiful Habano Sun Grown wrapper glistens with oils. Thick and smooth as silk, this impressive leaf conceals a powerful, yet balanced and smooth blend of aged Nicaraguan ligero from the Jalapa Valley of Nicaragua. The Oliva Serie 'V"" cigar is full-bodied and full-flavored, offering layers of coffee, spice, and tobacco flavors, with a touch of dark, unsweetened chocolate on the finish.Great news, the Serie V from Oliva received an amazing 94-point rating, which noted: ""This attractive, oily torpedo is full of dynamic nut, wood, and sweet cedar flavors that frame a substantial leather core. The finish is long and rich. Tasty and complex.""But that's not all. Serie V was also named one of Cigar Aficionado's top 25 cigars of the year....for the second consecutive year!​",Full,['Gordo'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Gordo,No,Ecuador Habano,Nub
Omar Ortez Maduro,Rated 4.63 out of 5, Based on 24 Ratings ,"The powerhouse value of the year.The follow-up to the 90-rated Omar Ortez Originals is here, Honduran Maduro. Instead of going the puro route, this time you'll find a diverse, multi-country array of tobaccos for a full-bodied, complex cigar. The core is composed of bold Nicaraguan and Panamanian long-fillers, secured within a feisty Mexican binder. Hugging this stout core in place, a dark and oily Nicaraguan maduro wrapper. The profile is strong yet balanced, as a dense series of rich tobacco, toasted oak, and hearty spices shine through the highly satisfying bouquet. It's not for the faint of heart, but it sho' is good. ",Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Mexican,"Nicaraguan, Panamanian",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Maduro,
Omar Ortez Originals,Rated 4.64 out of 5, Based on 36 Ratings ,"A powerful Nicaraguan puro.Omar Ortez Originals are Nicaraguan-made puros with a nice balance of flavor and strength. Dressed in a toothy, dark Nicaraguan wrapper, Omar Ortez Originals combine a bold mixture of Nicaraguan long-leaf tobaccos and hearty Nicaraguan binder. The result is a robust blend that’s rich in character with satisfying flavors. Grab a box of these suckers, and discover a new favorite, full-bodied creation.Omar Ortez Originals received a very nice rating of '90' points, which noted:""Covered in a rich, dark wrapper, this toasty cigar is full of woody, leathery flavors punctuated by nutty, earthy notes before a sweet cocoa finish. Medium to full bodied""",Full,"['Belicoso', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Belicoso, Robusto, Toro",No,Nicaraguan,
Onyx Reserve,Rated 4.68 out of 5, Based on 77 Ratings ,"Bask in the glow of this ‘94’ rated coffee-black maduro.This oily, blackened maduro is a genuine beaut, and it was rated a stunning ‘94’ by Cigar Aficionado! Onyx Reserve is a rich, full-bodied, box-pressed Dominican rolled with Connecticut Broadleaf wrappers and a long-filler combination of Dominican, Nicaraguan and Peruvian leaves. Satisfying and long on flavor with a pleasant aroma. You'll find spades of dark, rich flavors all coming together in a buttery-smooth combo. And at these prices, you can afford to enjoy this top-rated gem any day of the week.",Medium,"['Belicoso', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan, Peruvian",False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,Varies,,"Belicoso, Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Connecticut Broadleaf,
Original Cubans,Rated 4.35 out of 5, Based on 389 Ratings ,"The heavenly taste of a 1959 Cuban....at a Joe Six-Pack price!Most know that despite the hype and reputation, the shine is gone from the Cuban cigar industry. Thanks to decades of communism and the exodus of cigar making talent, the best cigars being made today come from outside Cuba. But in their heyday, Cuban cigars were the pinnacle of the cigar maker’s art. Those that remember the legendary, authentic Cuban cigars know that they tasted sort of like vanilla ice cream soda. And about halfway through, you’d get a bit light-headed and realize that these babies were potent – but you’d notice it more in the belly than in the palate. “Original” Cubans bring back that incredible taste. Made in the Dominican Republic, these beauties offer a perfect draw and sweet, smooth power that pleases the palate, all while tricking the belly into thinking these are the real deal. Covered in a gorgeous Ecuadorian Sun-Grown (ESG) wrapper leaf, you will fall in love with these cigars!""Original"" Cubans - a time machine back to pre-Castro Havana.",Medium-Full,"['Belicoso', 'Corona', 'Double Corona', 'Gigante', 'Robusto']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Belicoso, Corona, Double Corona, Gigante, Robusto",No,Ecuador Sungrown,
Oro Cubano Aniversario,Rated 3.88 out of 5, Based on 56 Ratings ,"A tasty, Dominican-made lovely. For just a buck each!Don’t judge this book by its mottled-looking Indonesian wrapper alone. The filler blend is 100% Dominican, offering a medium-bodied, smooth blend and delivering bang for the buck in droves. Pick up this 2-fer for as low as a buck and chuckle to yourself as your buddies think you just handed them a $5 cigar. Oro Cubano Aniversario is an affordable, and delicious, way to keep your humidor stuffed to the brim. Note: Each 2-fer deal includes (2) boxes of 25 cigars.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Dominican,False,No,More Details,Dominican Republic,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Indonesian,
Ortega Cubao,Rated 4.5 out of 5, Based on 20 Ratings ,"The Cubao is back!Back in the day, a cigar called the Cubao made quite a splash in the cigar world. It was created by Erik Espinosa and Eddie Ortega, produced by Don Pepin Garcia’s factory in Nicaragua, and received rave reviews and a 92-point rating. The brand was discontinued from the market when one of its rare components became unavailable, but much to the delight of aficionados everywhere, it’s making its triumphant return.Containing the same blend as the original release, Cubao is being produced by Carlos Sanchez’s factory in Nicaragua. Just like before, a beautiful Ecuador Sumatra leaf lays atop a Nicaraguan Binder and fillers from Esteli and Jalapa. Also just like before: the flavors are graceful, smooth, and rich, and full of cream, pepper, and cedar notes in perfect balance. If you lamented the loss of the previous iteration of the Cubao, or you’ve never heard of it before and you’re just looking for classic Cuban-esque flavors at a great price, you’ll want to add a box of Cubao to your cart ASAP.",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Sumatra,
Ortega M3,Rated 4.54 out of 5,,"After establishing himself in the cigar industry with EO cigars, Eddie Ortega is a vet who knows his way around. Once representing the ‘O’ half of EO, he has since broken away to form his own brand, Ortega Premium Cigars. The Ortega M3 is one of his more universally pleasing offerings, coming in chunky 54 ring guage sizes that burn even and true. ",Medium,"['Robusto', 'Toro']",,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Robusto, Toro",No,Maduro,
Ortega Serie 'D' Exclusivo,Rated 5 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"Ortega adds to the Serie ‘D’ line.Here Eddie Ortega looks to expand on the revered, delicious Serie ‘D’ line. Initially releasing the Serie ‘D’ Natural and Maduro, which were small vitola, box-pressed, power house blends in their own right, the new 'Exclusivo' rendition throws a curveball. Balanced and elegant, expect nuanced flavors and gentle strength that builds to a solid medium as it burns. A thoroughly enjoyable experience. ​",Medium,['Toro'],Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,Toro,No,Habano,
Padilla Artemis,Rated 4.33 out of 5, Based on 9 Ratings ,"A trophy blend for the hunt.Padilla Artemis is a limited edition cigar borrowing its name from the Greek goddess of the hunt. Artemis represents the first time Ernesto Padilla has crafted a box-pressed cigar.Manufactured at the Raices Cubanas factory in Honduras, Padilla Artemis features a stout blend of all Nicaraguan tobaccos tucked beneath a Nicaraguan Cuban-seed Habano wrapper. This long-filler blend is smooth and Cuban-esque with a medium to full-bodied profile. When you fire up this delicious morsel, you’ll be greeted by a host of flavors including notes of cedar, and earth, with a sweet peppery finish. With its deep, rich flavors and flawless construction, Padilla Artemis is a cigar I’m confident you’ll be returning to over and over. ",Medium-Full,"['Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,True,,"Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Corojo,Padilla
Padilla Cazadores,Rated 4.02 out of 5, Based on 135 Ratings ,"Cazadores = value.Ernesto Padilla is a straight-up legit master blender and works wonders with tobacco. His highly-rated blends are the stuff of folklore and his new releases are among the most anticipated by enthusiasts. The one thing missing in his stout blend portfolio was an affordable everyday cigar, and with the new Padilla Cazadores Ernesto delivers in spades.Padilla Cazadores contain the same superb flavor and expert construction often found in pricier blends. Coming dressed in a gorgeous Ecuadoran Habano wrapper hugging a blend of Nicaraguan Cuban Sandwich fillers, Padilla Cazadores are medium-bodied, expertly constructed, and exude billows of enticing aromas. Upon lighting, a satisfying progression of flavors emerge including coffee, cream, chocolate, and spices. Be sure to give these a try and see for yourself that a premium, flavorful, perfectly constructed cigar doesn’t need to break the bank.​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Habano,Padilla
Padilla Corojo '99,Rated 4.17 out of 5, Based on 6 Ratings ,"Padilla goes Corojo.Ernesto Padilla is widely known for his awesome blends at even awesome-r prices. He doesn’t manufacture on a huge scale, because he likes to keep control over quality and make sure each stick that bears his name is a winner.Padilla Corojo '99 comes out of the Raices Cubanas factory in Honduras, the same factory that produces hits like Alec Bradley Prensado & Tempus, and uses some old school methods from classic Cuba in its construction. Padilla Corojo '99 is rolled entubado and comes dressed in a Corojo '99 wrapper hugging Nicaraguan Aganorsa long-fillers, and is topped off with a triple cap. This blend is medium to full-bodied and includes flavors of hearty spice, pepper, cedar, earth, and leather. It’s not easy to find a cigar of this quality at this price, so I’d hop-to before these disappear.  ​",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Corojo,
Padilla Criollo '98,Rated 4.42 out of 5,,"Cree-oh-so-good, yo!Padilla cigars are a longtime fan favorite due in part to their richness of flavor and wallet friendly prices. Padilla takes time to craft his cigars and pays an extraordinary amount of attention to their construction and blending to ensure each cigar that carries his name is first-rate.Padilla Criollo 98, crafted at the Raices Cubanas factory in Honduras, is rolled entubado, and features a Honduran Criollo ’98 wrapper. The blend is finished with Nicaraguan Aganorsa long-fillers, and exudes nuances including cedar, black pepper, spice, espresso, and cream. The stick is overall medium-bodied and well-balanced, and you won’t find better prices on a cigar of this quality.  I’d recommend picking some up pronto to make sure you don’t miss out on this gem. ​",Medium,['Gordo'],,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,Gordo,No,Criollo '98,
Padilla Dominus,Rated 4.3 out of 5, Based on 10 Ratings ,"The master’s masterpiece.In naming a cigar Dominus, Latin for master, Ernesto Padilla is setting the bar pretty high. Padilla is revered in cigar circles, known for his masterful blending and highly-rated blends. Padilla Dominus may very well be the crowning achievement for the admired cigar master.Hailing from the Raices Cubanas factory in Honduras, a factory responsible for a countless 90+ rated cigars, Padilla Dominus is complex and full-bodied. Adorned with a Nicaraguan Corojo 2006 wrapper hugging choice Nicaraguan long-fillers, this blend boasts nuances of pepper, coffee, chocolate, and earth with a subtly sweet creamy finish. With a rich progression of flavors and spot-on construction, Padilla Dominus will soon be occupying top-shelves of humidors everywhere. ​Good news, Padilla Dominus has earned an awesome 92-point rating, noting: ""A dark and oily cigar that burns evenly. The draw layers the palate with leather and black cherry notes over a peppery flavor core and sugar-and-spice finish.""",Full,"['Double Robusto', 'Gordo', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Double Robusto, Gordo, Toro, Torpedo",No,Corojo,Padilla
Padilla Finest Hour - Connecticut,Rated 4.08 out of 5,,"From Cuban roots to modern-day ClassicsPadilla cigars may have only began in 2003, but their roots extend back far in cigar history. Growing up, Ernesto lived in the Pinar del Rio growing region in Havana. There, his father would grow tobacco and sell to the cigar brokers and factories. From a young age, Ernesto Padilla was surrounded by cigars, and from that heritage grew his modern classic brand. Today, we welcome the newest batch of top-shelf Padilla cigars, The Finest Hour. Crafted in honor of Winston Churchill’s famous speech, these decadent specimens come in three different wrappers. For the Connecticut version, you’ll find a seamlessly smooth Ecuadorian Connecticut shade leaf over top a dual binder of Nicaraguan tobacco and Dominican and Nicaraguan long-fillers. Sophisticated and balanced, Padilla Finest Hour Connecticut exudes loads of creamy flavor backed by toasted nuances.",Mellow-Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Dominican, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Padilla
Padilla Finest Hour - Oscuro,Rated 4.8 out of 5, Based on 10 Ratings ,"Padilla: Back in Black!From affordable bundles, to decadent super-premiums, the Padilla brand has done it all over the last 15 years. Today, however, you’re staring down the barrel at one of their finest creations yet. Welcome, Padilla Finest Hour – a trio of three complex handmades that’ll please the palate of everyone from the new guy on the streets to the grizzled cigar vets. Take one glance at this Connecticut Broadleaf wrapper, and you’ll know you’re in for a dark treat. Full-bodied and ultra-refined, this opulent handmade is crafted with a dual Nicaraguan binder and a handpicked mixture of Honduran and Nicaraguan long-fillers. Loads of black pepper greet you, backed by creamy oak, cinnamon, and milk chocolate. ",Full,"['Double Toro', 'Robusto', 'Toro']",Nicaraguan,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Double Toro, Robusto, Toro",Varies,"Connecticut Broadleaf, Oscuro",Padilla
Padilla Finest Hour - Sungrown,Rated 4 out of 5, Based on 2 Ratings ,"The evolution of an IconIn the cigar ‘biz, it’s not uncommon for brands to go through packaging updates, relaunches, and tons of “mulligans” throughout the years. A story most familiar to fans of Padilla. Let’s be clear – these cigars have always been excellent, but Ernesto loves to tinker with the look of his brand and keep things constantly fresh and contemporary. Today, we welcome the newest face of Padilla: Finest Hour. And it’s a most fine look indeed. Available in three wrapper varieties, today we’re looking at the Sungrown version. A decadent Nicaraguan puro, this cigar features 100% long-leaf Nicaraguan tobacco including a gorgeously rustic Sun Grown leaf up to. Toast the foot and loads of cocoa and creaminess greet the palate along with a warm, caramel like natural sweetness. A truly refined experience, Padilla Finest Hour Sungrown is a must-try.",Medium-Full,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro']","Habano, Nicaraguan",Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,Honduras,Varies,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro",Varies,"Nicaraguan, Sun Grown",Padilla
Padilla Fumas Connecticut,Rated 4.14 out of 5, Based on 170 Ratings ,"They're back.This nutty Padilla deal is mind-boggling, spleen-tingling, gland-pumping, eyes-dilating, palm-sweating, you name it....it's just an old fashioned great deal.Padilla's Fumas blend showcases the same complex profile that took Padilla to the top. Difference is, these are mixed filler....and obscenely cheap. Coming in silky Connecticut wrapper and filled with a blend of tobaccos from Nicaragua's most notable regions, these mellow-bodied handmades are smooth and complex. Expect a rich, earthy cigar in true Padilla form with subtle notes of coffee, cream, and sweet spices.NOTE: Padilla Fumas now come packaged in boxes.",Mellow-Medium,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Ecuador Connecticut,Padilla
Padilla Fumas Habano,Rated 4.3 out of 5, Based on 169 Ratings ,"Back and better than ever.These are just too good not to try, and at these outlandish prices you may become Gollum-like, towering over your horde of these tasty gems repeatedly mumbling, “My precious.”Padilla Fumas Habano is a “Cuban-sandwich” version of the same blend that rocketed Padilla to the top. With a spicy Habano wrapper hugging a blend of tobaccos from Nicaragua’s best growing regions, these medium-bodied handmades are spicy, smooth, and balanced. You’ll find flavors of spice, earth, coffee, and cream that will have you shaking your head in disbelief due to how obscenely affordable they are. ​Note: Padilla Fumas now come packaged in boxes.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Habano,Padilla
Padilla Fumas Maduro,Rated 4.31 out of 5, Based on 179 Ratings ,"Back in the high life again.You know the song and dance, and that’s why you keep returning to the CI savings jukebox. These tasty morsels will have you singing a happy song due to how good and wallet friendly they are…in fact at these prices it’s like a bump in your pay.Padilla Fumas Maduro is a mixed-filler edition of the same blend that brought Padilla oodles of high-ratings. The dark, oily maduro wrapper conceals a Nicaraguan blend from the most notable growing regions and features notes of coffee, chocolate, mellow spice, and pepper. You’ll be dancing a jig and singing CI’s praises while wondering if we made a mistake in pricing these so insanely cheap. NOTE: Padilla Fumas now comes packaged in boxes.",Medium-Full,"['Churchill', 'Robusto', 'Torpedo']",,"Honduran, Nicaraguan",False,No,More Details,Honduras,No,,"Churchill, Robusto, Torpedo",No,Maduro,Padilla
Padilla Hybrid,Rated 4.08 out of 5, Based on 98 Ratings ,"A Hybrid you won’t be embarrassed to show your friends.Remember this one? It’s back and burning better than ever. Sun-grown, Connecticut-seed ‘hybrid’ wrappers grown in Honduras are paired with an aged blend of Cuban-seed long-fillers from Nicaraguan, the Dominican, and Peru to create a bold and eventful blend that’s smooth and medium in body. Expect a balanced assortment of woody and leathery flavors with a touch of spice and a pleasantly rich aroma. In short, Padilla at this kind of discount is sheer lunacy. But nutty prices are mere routine by CI standards, because we're crazier than a sack full of ferrets!",Mellow-Medium,"['Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,,False,No,More Details,Nicaragua,No,,"Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,Padilla
Padilla La Terraza Connecticut,Rated 4.36 out of 5, Based on 45 Ratings ,"You’re Gonna Need a Bigger Boat.Named after the Cuban fishing village where Hemingway kept his boat, Padilla La Terazza is the big fish of the Padilla portfolio. Featuring an all-Nicaraguan recipe of premium long-fillers, La Terazza maintains that legendary Padilla quality, while CI helps you reel in the savings.La Terazza Connecticut features a smooth, creamy Connecticut wrapper with all-Nicaraguan long-fillers. The profile is brimming with mellow to medium-bodied notes of sweetness and cedar, making this a stick that's enjoyable any time. ",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",Nicaraguan,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Connecticut,Padilla
Padilla La Terraza Maduro,Rated 4.42 out of 5, Based on 45 Ratings ,"You’re Gonna Need a Bigger Boat.Named after the Cuban fishing village where Hemingway kept his boat, Padilla La Terazza is the big fish of the Padilla portfolio. Featuring an all-Nicaraguan recipe of premium long-fillers, La Terazza maintains that legendary Padilla quality, while CI helps you reel in the savings. This version of the La Terazza replaces La Terazza Maduro is a heavier cigar with a dark and oily Nicaraguan maduro wrapper, concealing an all Nicaraguan core. The complex recipe serves up a distinct medium-bodied bouquet of cocoa, coffee, and natural sweetness. Padilla pulled out all the stops for this release and crafted a truly phenomenal cigar, worthy of filling your humidor with its Nicaraguan goodness.​",Medium,"['Churchill', 'Gordo', 'Robusto', 'Toro', 'Torpedo']",,Nicaraguan,False,No,More Details,,No,,"Churchill, Gordo, Robusto, Toro, Torpedo",No,Maduro,Padilla
